subreddit,selftext,title
camping,"Hey everybody, asking for campsite recommendations between Austin and Houston.l for about 8-12 people. It can be a public park or a larger property we can Airbnb. Doesn’t have to be right in between Austin and Houston but would be nice. 

Thanks","Campsite recommendations (casual) between Austin and Houston, Texas"
camping,"Going to do a two month hang while I build a house. Need plenty of advice!

Sorry in advance for the formatting. I’m on mobile.

Some details: Construction will start in early July, 4 hours north of Toronto. In the bush, on our lakefront property my dad bought in ‘81. We’re tearing down the cabin and building a log home for my parents to retire to. We have a shed with running water and a living area, which is where my dad will be staying. I will be storing my clothes and food there as well, so I there’s no worries about that. My only unknown is how to make hammock camping for two months work... There will be bugs, it will be warm, might rain, not sure yet but I want to be more than prepared for the absolute worst possible conditions. 

Here’s my gear I’ve collected since last summer:
• Hammock Gear - Economy Incubator 20°f (more than enough)
• Kammok - Python 10’ (there’s plenty of trees, but I’d rather not use them, details later)
• ENO - Guardian (I have no worries with this. The area has mosquitos, black flies, horseflies, deer flies.)
• Sun Year - Rectangular Tarp (doesn’t seem to have a model number or anything similar. I received it as a gift.)
• North 49 - Jumbo Parachute Hammock Gathered End
• Amsteel - I’ve ordered 100’ of 7/64 so I should be fine. 
• Wool blankets and sleeping bags are also available to me. From my understanding, this should be fine for summertime hangs.

I also ordered a splicing hook set to make continuous loops and probably other cool things I don’t know about yet, should be here next Friday. I was going to also use the amsteel to replace the stiff webbing straps that came with the hammock.

While I’m still at home, I want to get to know my gear. Unfortunately, There’s no where to hang on my property. Conveniently I live across from a forest, but there has unfortunately been an encampment issue there :(. I’ve thought about hanging inside with a stand this spring while I tinker with my suspension at least. I ordered the [AmazonBasics hammock stand](https://www.amazon.ca/gp/aw/d/B076PM29JV?ref=ppx_pt2_mob_b_prod_image), will be here in a few days.

In July, I want to protect the trees (I’m the Lorax!), so I’m not sure what I can do here as I’ve never really done this before... I know it’s not good to hang on the same spot for more than a few days, but if I want to protect the trees, I just use a stand, right? Is there a way to make straps “safer”, to allow me to hang via one pair of trees for 2 months without relocating? Would I need/want to somehow protect the rain fly cord from damaging the trees? Or do I just bring the hammock stand and strap poles to the stand and attach my rain fly to that, solving the entire tree damage issue?

Since I have no knowledge or experience, I’m relying on there’s advice to be successful here. I have read a good chunk of The Ultimate Hang, Second Edition and have learned quite a bit, but my specific circumstances are not answered by the book. For example, this setup will only exist for two months maximum. The log cabin will have a covered porch which I will use for hanging from then on, so the books suggestions are impractical, in regards to building a pagoda, or a permanent post, etc.

Any advice or tips are greatly appreciated.
I’m trying to get as much advice on this as possible, so if there are any other forums/message boards you can forward me to, that would be absolutely amazing!","Desperate for hammock camping advice. Doing a two month long hang, starting in July. Any help is greatly appreciated. Plenty of info inside!"
camping," 

Here's a CBC article about how there are a ton of people trying to book campsites at Ontario campgrounds right now. if you haven't booked **GET ON IT!!** They also provide a link to tips for reserving a site.

Does anyone know if this includes backcountry sites? I have already booked mine, I am just curious.

CBC article:

[https://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/london/ontario-parks-camping-campsites-2021-1.5927993?cmp=rss](https://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/london/ontario-parks-camping-campsites-2021-1.5927993?cmp=rss)

tips for booking article:

[http://www.ontarioparks.com/parksblog/ontario-parks-reservation-tips/](http://www.ontarioparks.com/parksblog/ontario-parks-reservation-tips/)",MAD RUSH TO RESERVE CAMPSITES IN ONTARIO PARKS
camping,,My small hiking/bikepacking/caming kitchen.(not yet optimized) The bag weighs about 2.4kg. I carry 1.5l water and extra pots with my bag.
camping,"Hi Y'all, I am planning a trip to Glacier National Park in Montana for 2 weeks in July. I have unfortunately missed the window for reserving a camp ground for my time there and I am scrambling to figure out what to do. Have any of you done first come first serve camping, are there other alternatives(not afraid to sleep in my car)? ",Camping advice Glacier National Park
camping,,The “Bumper Dumper” Is a Portable Toilet For When You Can’t Hold It In While Traveling
camping,"Hi all, I (30f) am looking for advice on off grid camping. I’ve done plenty of camping but always near bathrooms and camp sites. Going to Death Valley for a week in April with some more experienced campers. Bringing my 4 and 7 yr old boys who love the outdoors and hiking. We have a 4wd 4runner and a kodiak tent.

Any and all advice would be welcome.

Thanks!",Newbie to off grid camping question
camping,,Survey
camping,,"Camped along the Salmon River for the night in Idaho. Was lucky enough to stumble upon Native Americans rock art as well! Love this state and it’s rugged, beautiful history."
camping,,Fly cam while camping in vietnam
camping,,Desert Camping in February
camping,"Good morning,

The sun is shining and it looks like camp sites will be open soon. I've been camping quite a few times with my girlfriend over the last few years (she's a seasoned veteran, I'm the newbie) - both in a tent and more recently in her VW Camper van. 

Most of our food is barbequed ontop of coals, which when finished we add logs ontop of and use as a fire to keep warm. 

One thing that kinda annoys me is that we are always using camping gas and a mini stove to brew up tea and coffee, boil water, or heat up anything that isn't BBQ-compatible.

I was thinking this year, to get a camping dutch oven, a tripod, and a kettle that can be used too - and attempt to get it all done with wood fire. 

I have a few questions though, if it's that's OK? 

- As a vegetarian, my girlfriend isn't particularly interested in all the delicious slow cooked smokey meat dishes one could make in a dutch oven, so I think I'm going to be limited to stews, soups, cowboy beans, etc.  ? Does anyone have any suggestions on the KIND of thing I can cook in the dutch oven (as opposed to on a bbq normally) ? 

- Assuming the fire was going the night before, how long will it take to get one going big enough to get a kettle boiling in the morning?",Dutch Oven + Tripod + Kettle - worth it?
camping,,Went camping with puppers and got the most precious pictures
camping,,Camping in the Joshua Tree 🏜 and since it was chilly i got the fire started and went for hike at sunrise 🌅
camping,[deleted],"Originally designed for water storage during outages (on well water), but can be used for camping too! About $25 setup."
camping,[deleted],"Ok Karma, come to me!!!"
camping,,"New tent, could not be happier with the quality. Will be breaking it in this weekend."
camping,,Pathfinder scout tarp?
camping,,Campfire on the Tuolumne River
camping,,will a spiceal needs summer camp be fun.......?
camping,,is river rafting or river tubing safe i have autism and want too go....?
camping,,is river rafting or river tubing safe i have autism and want too go....?
camping,,Lockable Fall Resistant Food Container Lockitplates.com
camping,,Amor en el Potomac
camping,,help
camping,Hey everyone. I was just wondering if there was a specific item that exists for holding the food you cooked. Say I am eating out of a pot off the fire or a bowl with hot food I usually have nothing to put that on and have to use my sleeve to hold it.,What do you bring along to hold your hot food?
camping,,Ice camping in the Canadian Backcountry
camping,"Been rocking a single burner butane for years, just car camping, but got a propane Coleman double burner for Christmas. 

Used it this past weekend and honestly, I kind of prefer the shitty butane stove lol. it's just so much easier and quicker to slam the cannister in there and away we go. 

Is propane superior in terms of heat/BTU/performance? we're not in crazy extreme climate situations or backpacking so that's not much of an issue. Gotta say, I do enjoy having 2 burners though!",Do y'all prefer butane or propane?
camping,,Chilling beers in the cold streams gets the job done when backpacking
camping,,I'm on a volcano whit my family. Respect from Mexico. 🇲🇽🖖🏼
camping,"My SO and I were doing a short camping trip on the Ozette Triangle on Washington's Olympic Peninsula. You are required to purchase a permit in Port Angeles, WA which entails you renting a Bear Can (if you don't have one already) and selecting a camp site.

We got to camp and set up the hammock spread with our group. The views on this beach are amazing and we were lucky to get out on a weekend where the weather cooperated.The next morning we woke up to a Black Bear admiring out camp. It was really exillerating and could not have gone better. The bear just poked around for a bid and ended up hopping back down to the beach to feed on muscles and anything else it could fine. I always wondered what would happen if one got too close and I'm sitting there in my hammock like a rotisserie piece of meat.

So let me know! What has been your wildest animal encounter you have experienced in the outdoors?

-Squatch",I want to hear about your animal encounters!
camping,,Custom Storage Hacks For All My Gear In My 1987 Toyota Land Cruiser Fj60 For Camping or Overlanding
camping,[deleted],A misty North of England. First &amp; only attempt at photography.
camping,,"Subzero camping. Fun, but maybe I'll wait for it to get warm again. Mt Taylor, NM"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

[https:\/\/www.youtube.com\/watch?v=Aqt-mT9qIEk](https://preview.redd.it/52go2xd57oj61.png?width=754&amp;format=png&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=11863ceef04b3ec93c3f241d483b06a415947ca5)",Secret beach in Quintana Roo only 200 people a day can visit it
camping,,Tent for sale
camping,,"Breakfast, camping somewhere near Yellowstone 🍳 🌲"
camping,[deleted],trying summer camp maybe
camping,,trying summer camp maybe
camping,,Camping in Indiana last weekend. First time taking our Solo Stove and it was worth. Double fires = 🔥warm🔥 This was our first winter trip and the snow was so worth it. Great family adventure.
camping,,"Fairplay, CO."
camping,,I need this!!
camping,,"Thirsty or excited (Bodega Bay, CA)"
camping,"i have autism and spiceal needs ok i want too try a overnight summer camp maybe this summer or a camp  where you can do rafting  swimming, fishing tubing  im  going try a special needs camp though  would summer camp be fun, would i need a life vest, what should i pack are incontinence products required even if your dry like for anxity reasons  as i will be away from home  i know i wouldnt need them but  its a extra safety thing will i need a sleeping bag what do you bring for summer camp, will i sleep in a tent or cabin, will i need extra clothes , can i take a stuffed animal ,can i take my fav blanket or  a cool hot wheels car   what summer camp like any kind support thanks",summer camp
camping,,While on the way to the camp site
camping,,"Went camping with the boys, took some pictures surprisingly they turned out really good! Let you what you think."
camping,"Looking for some tent suggestions. 
I’m 5’2” and have two pups. I’m looking for
- plenty of space for my gear
- room for a queen/full size blow up mattress
- head clearance
- “outside” living space 

Here’s my two favorite tents:

Coleman Evanston 6
- Pros
— easy to set up by myself
— plenty of room inside
— head clearance
— lasted forever. 
- Cons
— the front “outside” room doesn’t have window covers. When it rains everything gets wet. It’s also not big enough to actually be useful, although maybe I’d feel differently if it stayed dry
— head clearance works for me but not others would are taller than me

NTK tent. Model discontinued. It’s like a cross between the Arizona and Indy
- Pros
— great “outside” room. Open to the ground. Kind of wish it was a tub floor, but only kind of. Has window coverings that zip tight and it stays dry inside even in heavy rains with the open floor. 
— massive amount of space
— stays very dry
— actually easy to put away
— great head clearance
-Cons 
— this thing is massive. It needs 3 people at a minimum to put up and I need a freakin step stool to get it up.
— very difficult to put up. I’ve put it up a dozen times and it still leaves me frustrated by the time it’s standing
— the sleeping area is 1/2 an octagon shape (the outdoor space is the other 1/2) and, while it provides great space, it is awkward space. 
— the footprint on this thing is beyond obnoxious

I’ve had lots of other tents, but none worth comparing since I’m looking for something in the middle of these two. I’d rather not drop $400/$500. I’d rather stay in the $250 range but I can be flexible. 

The Nemo Wagontop with garage look awesome but $$. What I really want is the Evanston with window covers. Too bad Coleman hasn’t caught up with that.",Tent Suggestions
camping,,Kayak camping on Lake Champlain
camping,,I am hoping someone can help me! The problem is that there is zero gas flow coming out of the stove. The gas flow is open and it fits securely. Any ideas what could be the problem?
camping,,6 AM fog last summer (New England)
camping,,Went out camping the other night with some friends in -7°C on the beach with high winds and was surprised how warm we were by the fire. Coldest night of 2021 in Scotland and we barely noticed!
camping,"I bought two of these UV botles from [Larq](http://www.livelarq.com) - terrible.

One doesn't charge and both have water ingress in the UV lens.

What's worse is Larq have taken no responsibility for the issues. I first contacted them months ago. They seem to hide behind 'we're a small team' and when I give them details they ask for, they come up with another question - skirting the issue.

Save your money, I bought my wife a cheaper bottle at the same time and hers is working fine!!",Larq UV water bottle - save your money!
camping,[deleted],Larq UV botles - danger your money
camping,,"I don’t like the thought of beach camping, but actually doing it is kind of glorious"
camping,,Any idea why the kingston range wilderness in south california is labeled as closed? Is camping allowed in this area?
camping,,Love how this little campsite turned out. PNW camping will never let you down.
camping,,Sex while camping? Tell me your best story
camping,,Cooking with my Biolyte
camping,,"Aussie bush, home for the next 2 days"
camping,"I’m camping alone now, I’m in quite a nice spot and I do a bit of gold prospecting while I’m here but something I can’t seem to do is relax, I always seem to get in a semi shit mindstate and I feel uneasy the whole time. Any advice?",Can never feel completely relaxed camping alone? Any tips?
camping,,"It's the first campfire that I light by myself, haven't rained in weeks so it's pretty easy ngl."
camping,,"Reminiscing on our camping trip and wheeling with the boys!! In my backyard! (Not really) 😁beautiful Bailey, Colorado points if you know what flower your looking at... 👍🏼"
camping,,View of a storm over the ocean from the top of Cadillac Mountain in Maine's gorgeous Acadia National Park.
camping,[removed],"Windproof Lighter Metal Tiger Cool Design with a One-Click Ejection Knife. Could I invite you to test it？ then you can get it for free. If you are interested, please DM me (USA ONLY)"
camping,[deleted],what's a a spiceal needs summer camp like
camping,[deleted],Woah! This little camper has a ton to offer!
camping,,i have super powers
camping,I am male 5 10 200lb,What is the lightest 0 degree bag with a 150 budget
camping,,help.......?
camping,,February Camping in the PNW Birch Bay SP
camping,,Dry Tortugas Camping Trip - What We Ate while Camping
camping,,Winter Hot tent Camping in the Boundary Waters
camping,"Gonna be doing some fishing and camping around April. Looking for a great spot to camp along the river? Preferably away from people. I’m looking for a more secluded spot. I was hearing good things about Hobo camp but I heard it was washed out. 
 
  Would love to suggestions or even some other alternatives in the CA area.",Looking for a great spot along kern river.
camping,,Trying to enjoy my morning coffee at the tent. This is my view...
camping,"Hi,

First big camping trip with two dogs, and fiancé. We should be fairly set to go for the gear side of things. But if anyone has been to Big Bend (Texas) and has recommendations, we would love to hear them! 

Thanks in advance.",First camp in Big Bend National Park
camping,,Best place to solo camp and enjoy the view?
camping,,Ice Camping for GIANT Fish Catch Clean Cook! Multiple PBs and INCREDIBLE Underwater Carp Footage
camping,,Gotta love a weekend away
camping,,Adirondack trip B&amp;W
camping,[deleted],Car Camping Question
camping,,Can't wait for Spring!
camping,,Different kinda crossroads @ okefenokee
camping,,"A little solo camping trip in Wilson’s Prom, Victoria. Had the whole site to myself!"
camping,,We launched a truck wheel for life OUTDOORS! Let us know what you think! :)
camping,,DIY Military Surplus Awning : )
camping,,Last summer on Vancouver Island 🇨🇦🏕 There’s no place like home
camping,I have Cabela's Alaskan Guide Model 6-person Tent and I want to add insulation. Any recommendations for insulating this type of tent for Camping in the Rocky Mountains?,Insilating Tent
camping,"With COVID having ruined all our travel plans last year and looking like this year will be no different, I’m definitely feeling the pinch of cabin fever after a long, isolated winter. I can’t wait to get out on the trails and put all this new camping and hiking gear to use.

The trouble is, spring and early summer here in Southern Manitoba is tick season. The fiancé is totally petrified by the things, ans tbh I’m not a huge fan of them either. I can deal with mosquitos and black flies, but ticks in large numbers is a hard no. Tick season typically lasts until mid to late June here, but I would love to be able to get out and enjoy some time in the outdoors before that.

Does anyone know of any areas in Manitoba, Western Canada, or Northwestern Ontario where ticks are not such a big issue?

Of course COVID will have some say in what we’re able to do but it would be nice to know of some options that might be viable. Will drive as far West as Yoho or as far East as Sleeping Giant if needed.",Avoiding ticks in Manitoba/Canada
camping,,Bonfire on the ranch
camping,,Hoh rainforest in Washington last summer. Super magical spot!
camping,,FAT GUY IN PINK TU TU | BELLY FLOP FOR CHARITY | PART TIME RVERs
camping,,Hammock meditation
camping,,Campfire explosion
camping,"Slept on a cot for years but thinking about making a change to a low profile blow up pad. 
What’s your opinion?",Cot vs blow up sleeping pad.
camping,,"⬇️⬇️ Need SPONSORS to help take my camping adventures to less fortunate communities to give underprivileged kids the opportunity to camp, roast a marshmallow &amp; experience the outdoors for the first time. Please get in touch! #jasonkemm #moments_in_motion #camp_with_jason #jpro5ive"
camping,[deleted],"My cousin and I are attempting a yoga retreat at her family’s campground near Garner State Park! Almost completely packed and I received a job offer in town yesterday, and was laid off from my job in Houston due to building needing repairs from freeze. Seems like the time try something new."
camping,,That's the most interesting view (from inside) of the ShiftPod shelter tent.
camping,,I am building a DIY camping/sleeper trailer—what features are a must-have? Is there anything I should keep in mind?
camping,Sorry for the unoriginal question but I can't seem to find the same question. I go camping all year but it never gets below 0 (usually stays between 2-5 when really cold ) and I want to know what's the lightest and comfortable sleeping bag I can get for this and not too expensive. I already slept with a bad 10° one with these temps and it was cold but not too bad if it can help.,Best 0° sleeping bag around 100€?
camping,,Throw down grill getting some use on an overnighter in NE England.
camping,,Tips to Keep Your Camping Trips Safe and Secure - AtoAllinks
camping,[deleted],Zebras Camping in the Forest
camping,"In Colorado there's plenty of spots to pitch a tent amd plenty of places for our huskies to explore. But our old 4 person tent is getting cramped and our 3 huskies don't like being too far from us at night. And this season my wife will be pregnant so the more room and comfort, The better. Not to mention gear and all that we don't leave in the jeep.

It's time tk upgrade anyway and I'm looking over the cabin family tents for us. I dont have a grand to throw into a top end one. And we see the mountains maybe once a month for a weekend when my job isn't in the way of it. 

I've been lookin at things like the Ozark Trail Spring Lodge. I like the room divider since we also have friends that like to come and we play card games and stuff unless we catch a rain outside, amd the dogs would have plenty of space to explore. I like the closet amd extra storage areas too.

Are these things worth it in that style yet? Or have you used that one or have a recommendation for us? Thanks guys!

[Link](https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-14-Person-Cabin-Tent-in-Beige-and-Green/802935832?wmlspartner=wlpa&amp;selectedSellerId=0&amp;&amp;adid=22222222228138515403&amp;wl0=&amp;wl1=g&amp;wl2=m&amp;wl3=247868535528&amp;wl4=aud-1025747331336:pla-472177024557&amp;wl5=1014517&amp;wl6=&amp;wl7=&amp;wl8=&amp;wl9=pla&amp;wl10=8175035&amp;wl11=online&amp;wl12=802935832&amp;veh=sem&amp;gclid=Cj0KCQiAj9iBBhCJARIsAE9qRtB5YKYLkVweuNOhuCHNXxf0S3cuB92Z65_ApRqDB5zLt2HngTNRBo4aAqPCEALw_wcB) to the tent in question",What do you guys think about the cabin style tents?
camping,,Trying to keep cool on a very hot day (and night) at Bemm River.
camping,,Nomad life is very tough 😋
camping,,Fire Maple Camping Utensils Dishes Cookware Set Picnic Hiking Heat Exchanger Pot Kettle FMC-FC2 Outdoor Tourism Tableware
camping,,20pcs Portable Disposable Soap Paper Whitening Exfoliating Mini Outdoor Travel Camping Hiking Tools Wash Clean Hands Heath Care
camping,,Widesea Wind Proof Outdoor Gas Burner Camping Stove Lighter Tourist Equipment Kitchen Cylinder Propane Grill
camping,,Montana last summer. Can’t wait to go back
camping,,Anza Borrego - camping
camping,,"Already missing last weekend Mallee Cliffs, VIC , Australia"
camping,[removed],Gear Suggestions/Advice: Backpacking Tent and Sleeping Bag
camping,"Hey! First time poster, really excited. I started saving for a camping trip to take in November (the first camping trip I’m planning). I’m in Ohio and I would prefer to go somewhere warmer, so I was thinking Georgia. Any advice on where to look at? They seem to have so many beautiful parks, it’s hard deciding...

I’m planning on regular tent camping, nothing too fancy or difficult.",Georgia camping?
camping,"I'm a 17 year old planning a roadtrip with my friends, and I'm aware that alot of campsites have a strict no unaccompanied minors rule. I was curious if anyone knows, will they intently check if I'm 18 or older? Like will they ask for a form of ID? Im sure it varies but I would like to know as a general rule. Also if anyone has any cool locations through the US that you want to add to my list to visit, feel free to comment.",Do campsites require ID?
camping,[deleted],Sometimes simple is best....
camping,"I got everything I needed to do overnight hikes and while I do really enjoy it. I find it rather hard work and I always have a terribly bad night sleep on those small hiking Matts not to mention paper thin tents, I just feel so exposed lol. But yeah I find car camping to be just a lot more enjoyable for some reason.",Anyone else prefer car camping?
camping,,Hollow Tree Stump Fire
camping,,Camping near Siletz River Bend in Oregon.
camping,,Sunset while Yurt Glamping near Yellowstone this past summer!
camping,"I can find some on Amazon advertised as providing shade,  but the reviews mention that the airflow isn't great. I am only looking for a way to keep the windows open and the bugs out.
Car is a dodge grand caravan if that matters.

Any recommendations?",Mosquito Nwt to cover car windows
camping,[removed],Would you use a glamping delivery service?
camping,[deleted],Sunset over Yurts near West Yellowstone
camping,,Ice camping in BC. This is our setup for ice fishing. It’s a Canadian army arctic tent and very comfortable with the wood burning stove.
camping,,"Great campsite at Bendoc, Eadt Gippsland, Victoria"
camping,"I want to go camping very badly. I have just Purchased my first Hammock, yet I want to camp! I have a reliable vehicle!",I am 16 years old and live in the city!! How do I go camping!!!!
camping,[deleted],Pretty high up
camping,,Egg in a hole mmmmmm yummy
camping,,(Camping Survey) Input Needed for Camping School Project
camping,,A magnificent view of Hong Kong
camping,,Coyote Pack Howls for 8 Minutes Straight *Coyote Sounds &amp; Behavior*
camping,,Tried to Winter Hammock Camp in my backyard. Wasn't a total failure.
camping,,"Colorado Collegiate Loop August 2020: Hi all, just thought you guys would appreciate some of the pics from a trip i did this summer, was my first time hiking at altitude and i can’t wait to do it again!!"
camping,I’m usually a pretty careful person when I’m with “The Guys” but what about camp made devolve into a half savage who was cussing in the cabins with his friends.  My friends even said I became a different person at camp and acted like I was on cocaine half the time,Can some pleas explain this to me
camping,"Hi all! 

In a few weeks I will be setting out on my first real-deal camping trip, I'll be staying on Santa Cruz Island in Channel Islands NP for 5 nights with my girlfriend. I've spent a good few months researching everything I can find about the subject, we have all the gear we'll need (as far as I can tell), but I thought this would be a good place to come for more specific advice before we set out. If any of you have stayed there before and have specific tips and tricks for that location I would love to hear it(bonus points if you've stayed in late March). Or if you have any other general tips that the internet doesn't talk about I would really appreciate it. Thanks so much!",Advice: Channel Islands National Park
camping,,My friend sleeping CALMLY
camping,,Barbecue (BBQ) in The Forest With a Doggo | Skewers | Young Veal Carnati
camping,"Hi all,

I am in a business class and my team and I are coming up with and idea for an app and need some feedback. Our idea is an app for the Great Lakes that tells you the current pollution data in and around the area you're looking to enjoy the fresh water. This is merely for customer data and discovery, so any feedback would be greatly appreciated! Thank you!!

[https://forms.gle/xBpx5YgwVZVVANw79](https://forms.gle/xBpx5YgwVZVVANw79)",Water Pollution App
camping,[removed],Are campervans allowed on RV campsites?
camping,,Some photos from my trip to Ft mountain last weekend.
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/j7zd5pdn0aj61.jpg?width=960&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=02b338a580373ed168c6555ac270eba22fb97859

https://preview.redd.it/3r0yxodn0aj61.jpg?width=960&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c4ea9dd7751d5ce5c87d0f9d78c45e5c5b352727

https://preview.redd.it/owvxbqdn0aj61.jpg?width=1072&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=ffe78e27fdef16875c900781813c33debf7a56ff

https://preview.redd.it/3v79rpdn0aj61.jpg?width=720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=fa773c1acabd6fb976aee0f94ab20677196064f0

https://preview.redd.it/d9cujqdn0aj61.jpg?width=720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c23b3cc9ba6eef9b580bf7919c8813235a6c655e","Cornhole and Camping, December 2020. Pat Mayse Lake, N. Texas."
camping,[deleted],"Cornhole and Camping, December 2021, Pat Mayse Lake, Texas"
camping,"Hey, 

Been looking at lots of reviews of the Hubba Hubba NX2 and the reviews seem to be very divided. Anyone have the Hubba and have an opinion on it? Any help would be great! Thank you!",Looking for honest opinion on MSR Hubba Hubba NX2
camping,"We are going camping this weekend with a 3 year old and a 7 year old and temps are expected to drop to 40.  They have 20 degree sleeping bags and I plan to double bag my 3 year old with a smaller sleeping bag, plus they are sleeping on self inflating pads with a high r rating.

Still nervous that they will be cold!  We ski as well and am wondering about the pros and cons of wearing thermals+ ski pants / fleece to bed.  Has anyone tried this?",Wear ski gear to sleep in 40 degrees?
camping,,My campsite with my buddies from last summer. Probably the best trip I've ever had! Northern MN
camping,,"With more than 50sqmi, 5 waterfalls, 9 tunnels, hundreds of wood cabins and camping grounds, you can spend days in here without getting to know the whole place. Google maps/GPS: 📍P8H7+74 La Ciudad, Durango . 📍23.7282192, -105.6871797"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

I would love to go backpacking for a good 6-7 days, preferably in the backcountry. I live in Reno so could drive as far south as Fresno or Yosemite or Sequoia National Forest. I could also drive as far north as the CA/OR border and similar. I doubt much of the Tahoe Rim Trail is accessible or available for anything outside of advanced skills. I consider myself an intermediate winter backpacker.

It’s my first winter out here, but not my first time winter camping experience. Any suggestions on some place I could drive to, park the truck, and then spend a good 5-6 days backpacking a loop type trail or a out and back trail? I figure, with snow shoes, I can likely cover 8-10 miles a day pretty easy but wouldn’t want to stretch further than 12 miles in a day due to shortened days. Let’s keep it it 10 a day to be on the safe side. If the trails are clear, and no shoe shows required (just hiking boots and microspikes or crampons), I could cover 12-15 but don’t want to stretch it further than that.

So are there any 40-70 mile loop trails in the central to Northern California area for someone who is realistically an intermediate winter backpacker (well past beginner but wouldn’t consider myself advanced)? Also would much prefer forests to desert.",I’ve got a month PTO (all of March). Where to go?
camping,"In an effort to pretend that outside isn't still covered in snow I've been making plans to take our baby camping. She'll be about 1 and I don't even know where to start.

Most of our gear is on the more minimal/lightweight side of things so looking for your gear recommendations for family camping.

Baby's never been a good sleeper so I also worry about her napping / sleeping well in a tent, so experiences along those lines are welcome as well.

Plus any miscellaneous tips you might have! I know not to let the kid touch the ground after bathtime 😂",Give me your best tips for camping with babies/toddlers!
camping,,Benefits of dragon fruit
camping,,#Sharabi_TheTrueStory शराब में ऐसा नशा है जो अनमोल मानव जीवन को बर्बाद कर देती है। सद्भगति में ऐसा नशा है जो मर्यादा में रहकर की जाए तो जीवन को आबाद कर देती है। फैसला आपको करना है। ज़रूर देखें Video https://youtu.be/Mdn32wVN8wk
camping,,A windy day
camping,,my dads just started a youtube channel idk if promotion is allowed but if so it'd mean the world to him if a couple of you guys could go and subscribe
camping,,You never know who will show up when you camp in Vermont. Stowe October 2020.
camping,,Camp chill vietnam
camping,,"The Basin Campground / America Bay : Sydney, Australia. Only a short walk from the actual campground too. Helpful rangers, great for a trip with the boys!"
camping,"This an experiment of mine to put a playlist together of beautiful and easy meals, hope everyone can enjoy it !! 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=27s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=27s)",Australian camp cooking
camping,,Last minute impromptu camping trip last week.
camping,"I’d like to camp solo more frequently, but I’m not used to it and I get a bit nervous. What are some ways you got over your apprehension?",How to get over the fear of camping alone?
camping,,"The morning view from an open cabin in Viken, Norway"
camping,,Canaveral National Seashore
camping,"My husband and I may need to move cross country from LA to live with his folks on CT in a few months due to Covid (and just wanting to leave LA in general). While we are both not working and have the time to go travel a bit, we are creating a camping bucket list of places to camp/visit before we leave the west coast and I would love to know your favorite spots! 

Currently have Yosemite booked for April. We've done Big Sur several times (currently our favorite). Hope to get out to Joshua Tree and go back to Sequoia National Forest and even trek to Yellowstone. Would love tent campground recommendations or general parks/places to check out before we leave the western half of the states. Thanks!",Top recommendations for west coast camping!
camping,"I am looking to purchase a smaller camper van.  Any leads welcome.

Thanks",Seeking small budget camper van...
camping,,My dad at one of his fav spots ...eagles view he calls it.
camping,,The Ohio Winter has me pining for Colorado again.
camping,,The sunrise from Bald Rock Mt.
camping,,Weekend to Double Island
camping,,How durable are Kodiak tents? Will dogs damage the floor?
camping,,Wife is 20wks pregnant and still down to camp with me!
camping,,Quick Overnight to Install Stovejacks
camping,,No better way to enjoy the cold than camping inside the Quinzhee you built!
camping,,Camping at cranberry run camping ground in pa
camping,,"Ensenada, México 🇲🇽"
camping,I’m looking to go to Sequoia NF backpacking and camping in the next 3 weeks or so.  It looks like I have to buy permits for each night and and decide where I’m staying.  Is there a good loop trail where I can park my truck and then backpack for 5-6 days and end up back where I started?  I’ve never been so any help would be appreciated.,Help with route plan
camping,"If I were to bring a tv in my tent to watch Netflix and play some Xbox with my cousin, would moisture ruin it? I know it shouldn’t ruin the Xbox because I’ve done this on numerous occasions. Oh and also this is backyard camping, so probably even more of a sin to this subreddit","this is probably a sin to this subreddit, but I have a question about bringing a tv in a tent while it rains"
camping,,Last minute solo camp on some public land. Forgot my sleeping pad and was cold as hell but still had an amazing time.
camping,,Camping from 2 years ago in Coudcroft NM near Ruidoso New Mexico. Part of the White sands missile range can be seen in the 3rd picture.
camping,"Has anyone camped at New River Gorge National Park in WV? Planning a trip there in the Spring. Hoping to do some hiking and kayaking. There are a few sites in the park itself and other state/private campsites just outside in the surrounding areas. Never been there and it is a big area, so if folks have stories to share or recommendations, I'd love to hear them. Thanks!","New River Gorge NP, WV"
camping,,I just discovered this page. they have all the essentials for camping. Amazing🌲🪵🦌
camping,,Attempting to make some shade in the desert
camping,"[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=24s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=24s)

Gday everyone !!  Here is another ripper of dish that you can enjoy when you camping or simply had a busy day at work and needed to put something together soon for the kids and the family or simply for yourself.",The Ultimate Pasta Dish In The Australian Bush
camping,,Turning My Gear Test into a Date Night!
camping,,What is everyone's choice of fuel for alcohol stove?
camping,,Idyllwild campground. Perfect for night sky views and super convenient location. They also have hot water and outlets 🙂
camping,,"Weekend camping in Idyllwild was successful. Super cold, but the snow is almost all the way melted and the sunshine was great 🌲"
camping,,"3 months, over 10 campfires!!! God is Good"
camping,,First time winter camping. Beautiful skies before sunset over Lake Michigan.
camping,So many lakes are cold year round and I've been looking for a camping spot with a kid friendly swimming area with warm water. I've been to Bass Lake a few times which is great for this but wanted to see what else is out there. Any suggestions? Coming from the bay area and willing to drive for a great destination. Thanks!,Favorite camping spots near warm water in California?
camping,,"A little windy (and cold) camping next to a ~600 ft gorge, but the views were certainly worth it (Rio Grande del Norte National Monument)"
camping,Heading up there with my brothers for a week. Any info would be good. We have alternate sites ready but I want to try it out.,Anyone been to Stough Reservoir?
camping,,Nice knife for the woods
camping,"Gonna go camping for a few days with my friends. What are the things I need besides water, phones,  food, tents, and flashlights? Thanks in advance.","Going camping for at least a few days, what are the things I need besides the obvious?"
camping,,The joys of car camping and chasing powder in the winter!
camping,,First time camping on the ice this weekend. Cramped isn't the word to use with a cot in my shanty. Cozy is a good word to use.
camping,,Good ol desert in winter.
camping,"I have recently washed my Synthetic Puffa Coat with tennis balls in both the wash and drying process. I have now realized this was a bad idea because the insulation inside has moved and in clumps. Has anyone got any fixes or solutions they would love to help me out with? Many Thanks   
Ben",Synthetic Coat Restoration!!
camping,,Wild camping in France overlooking Geneva last weekend.
camping,"May or may not be a dumb question, but me and my boyfriend are going on a thirty day road trip so we bought a portable camp stove that uses butane canisters. The canisters on Amazon are about 4-5 dollars a piece whereas a canister of butane-propane mix is 2 dollars at Rei. Are the propane mix ones acceptable or should I pay for the other ones? Thank you for any help :)",Butane canister vs. Butane Propane Mix?
camping,"Looking for a new tent this summer and beyond for car camping. Some specifics:

* We've snagged a waterfront site on Lake Superior, so there's potential for super high winds
* Needs space for two adults, a dog, and a pack and play for an infant

I have an old Black Diamond two person mesa that I love for the back county but obviously that doesn't work here.  I want to buy something that will last me 10+ years and I hate the idea of using a tent a handful of times and tossing it to the dump in a year or two (That Black Diamond got pumped by some storms over the years and it still going strong)..

The two tents I'm circling are:

* Coleman 8 person Skydome
   * [https://www.amazon.ca/Coleman-6-Person-Dark-Skydome-Camping/dp/B07XGDMFTW/ref=sr\_1\_11?dchild=1&amp;keywords=coleman%27s%2Bsun&amp;qid=1614015519&amp;sr=8-11&amp;th=1](https://www.amazon.ca/Coleman-6-Person-Dark-Skydome-Camping/dp/B07XGDMFTW/ref=sr_1_11?dchild=1&amp;keywords=coleman%27s%2Bsun&amp;qid=1614015519&amp;sr=8-11&amp;th=1)
   * Love the dark room feature for my kids nap schedule
   * Love the size
   * Price is really great
   * Weary of coleman and the durability of the brand. They advertise if can withstand 35mph wind but I mean, really?
* Eureka Kohana 6 person tent
   * [https://www.mec.ca/en/product/6013-766/Kohana-6-Person-Tent?colour=BL501](https://www.mec.ca/en/product/6013-766/Kohana-6-Person-Tent?colour=BL501)
   * Eureka's seem to be reliable
   * An okay size for what I need
   * Love that it's from MEC (for non Canadians—MEC is a Canada REI and they have great customer support
   * Would like to spend less money but if that's what it is, that's what it is

Am I missing any tents I should be looking at? Does anyone have any opinions on the two that I've listed?",Tent advice (Canada)
camping,"Which tents do you recommend for 4-person winter camping? (And why?) We are a family of four.

We had a bit of condensation in our sleeping pads underneath where our bodies were. Why is this? No one had been sweating. What should I do about it?

My wife was chilly in her sleeping bag (big Agnes rated for 0 Fahrenheit, it was 16). What liners would you recommend?

I went to bed hot in my Katabatic quilt so I stripped to just thermal top and underwear and then woke up a bit chilly. What do fellow quilt campers recommend for maximizing warmth?

All in all, it was a family hit. We just need a couple tweaks and we’ll be good to go again.",Winter Camping Questions
camping,,Sunset Campfire In The Red Rock Desert Of Northern Arizona
camping,,This is why I camp!
camping,"Heading to Alabama Hills soon with a group of friends. Wondering if groundfires are allowed or do I need to bring my solo stove?  Also, is there enough dead wood in the area to gather for firewood or should we buy and bring in? Any info will help from some of you Alabama Hills veterans.  Thanks",Alabama Hills Campfire and Firewood
camping,My partner and I will be driving from the Twin Cities in MN to Teddy Roosevelt and then to Glacier NP during June. We'd like to break up the driving to Glacier across three days and will be staying at Teddy en route. Are there any good camping stops between Teddy and Glacier that you recommend?,MPLS &gt; Teddy Roosevelt NP &gt; Glacier NP - camping in between?
camping,,Had a lot of this weekend. Crossed a frozen pond in the Adirondacks and stayed on a island in our hot tents. It was my first time I’ve fishing too. It was a blast!
camping,,Had a lot of this weekend. Crossed a frozen pond in the Adirondacks and stayed on a island in our hot tents. It was my first time I’ve fishing too. It was a blast!
camping,I have a 1500 w Small space heater can I plug it into a power bank without causing a fire if I am sleeping in a camper van in winter time?,Space heater and power bank
camping,,First Time Winter Backpack Camping in a Tent - Eastern U.S. - 2 Feet of Snow - 10/10 Would Recommend
camping,,"Great spot in the French Alps last night. You can’t beat a fire on a winter camp. Sunsets, steaks and sunrises don’t hurt either 😉"
camping,"Hey folks, I'm trying to snag a few days for late season at Glacier National Park this summer. I've been getting up every morning for the last week in attempt to get a site, but am told it's already been booked every time I try (despite having my spots picked out and clicking book now at 7:00 am PST SHARP). Do any of you kind folks have any advice or do I just keep trying in hopes of beating someone to the punch? 

Thanks for any help!",Tips for booking at Glacier?
camping,,The Ultimate Pasta Dish In The Australian Bush
camping,,BEST CCW HOLSTER !! Hands Down? Camping holster
camping,"Hey Everyone,

I've got a 24 foot Aerolite Cub 236 2003 that i want to bring cold weather camping which means i will obviously need the heater. The camper currently only has 1 battery and from what i have read, the one battery will not last the entire night without possibly damaging the battery. If i add a second battery, and i make sure they are charged with the generator prior to night time, should i easily get through the night of running the heater? My generator is kind of loud and i don't want to have to run it all night and irritate everyone else out there camping.

Some additional Details - The camper has two tents for the beds which i know will make it harder to warm, outside temps will be around 30 degrees F. and i was planning on setting the thermostat to 65ish.

I ask this because i do not want to invest in a bigger battery box, bracket, and an extra battery if i will still run the risk of not making an entire night with heat or with damaging the batteries.

Thanks in advance to any insight!",Camper Battery Question
camping,,Streak and egg without egg for breakfast. (Green stuff on steak is horseradish)
camping,,First time making a snow shelter and sleeping overnight in it with our dog
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,My camp site last summer!!
camping,,JUST RELEASED-Documentary on Vancouver landscape photographer! Stunning images and a really interesting story! Has some crazy camping sites along the way!
camping,,Hugo and I enjoying the sunrise over North Stradbroke Island
camping,,A hidden gem
camping," 

I normally do international travel, but due to a virus that must not be named, I am not able to. I have the itch to travel again. Last year I planned a trip across the US (coast to Coast), but plans fell through. This year I need to get out and see the world. Have you ever rented a van and what would you suggest? I am not sure what price I would pay, but I figure renting a car and hotels would be about 200-250 a night so I was hoping for a cheaper price than that. I have found sites for RV's, but that would be an overkill for one person.",have you ever rented a van ?
camping,,Needed time to reset. The desert did not disappoint.
camping,"Long story short, I have the opportunity to get any reasonably priced tent as a birthday gift and I'm looking to select the best one to camp with my wife and my 3 year old with. The little guy loves the outdoors, and is finally potty trained!

I have a Eureka Timberline 4 which I have always treated as a 2 person tent. What size tent would your recommend that would work well for the 3 of us? 

Key parameters

* 3 season camping, in areas that can be wet at times. 
* Durability and ease of setup are more important than reduced weight.
* Bigger than a Eureka Timberline 4
* Ideally less than $300 US.",Best tent for 2 adults and a little kid?
camping,First time camping at BLM land in the couple of weeks. I heard folks are allowed to shoot their fire arms. How safe it from your experience if I were to stay overnight for a few days. I hoping my car doesn't get shot up or get I get shot by accident? Are there places that sections off where you can camp and where you can shoot? Or is it free for all?? Thanks.,BLM Camping - How safe is it?
camping,,"Four year dating anniversary dinner, So grateful she also loves camping~"
camping,,RV &amp; Camp Visit to Rainbow Springs
camping,,"Ah, the amenities of camping... Pine, AZ-ish (also check out the garlic-shaped onion)"
camping,Hey all—where could one go camping and get some bushcraft in?,(USA) Primitive Camping in East Pennsylvania and New Jersey
camping,,I’d be eating cold noodles for dinner but who cares
camping,,Finally organized the camping/ outdoor gear.
camping,,"First time camping in Buena Vista, Colorado, USA. A few 14ers in the distance. Would highly recommend."
camping,Afternoon folks! My wife and I are making our annual road trip to Vegas this year and we’re looking for some tent camping suggestions around the Flagstaff area? We have dependable 4x4 and we’re hoping to camp by a river this year but def open to all suggestions! Thanks!,Flagstaff Tent Camping Suggestions?
camping,,Camping in the Texas hill country the weekend before the winter storm
camping,,Simple Intro into Belagine Laws of High Intuition and the Harmony of Nature (Zalmoxianism)
camping,,Desert Campfire At Dusk In The Remote Red Rock Country Of Northern Arizona [OC]
camping,[https://benjamins-goods-1.myshopify.com/](https://benjamins-goods-1.myshopify.com/),Best camping store
camping," Does anyone have experience with either/both of these sets? I am more interested in feedback about the Pinnacle set and if the claims on its efficiency are true! I am willing to spend the extra money if the value is there, but I would love to hear from the community's experience! 

[Pinnacle Dualist](https://www.rei.com/product/165301/gsi-outdoors-pinnacle-dualist-hs-cookset)

[Halulite Microdualist II](https://www.rei.com/product/147771/gsi-outdoors-halulite-microdualist-ii-cookset)",GSI Outdoors Pinnacle Dualist HS Cookset vs Halulite Microdualist II
camping,,When you’re waiting for that sunlight to hit your tent after surviving a 6 degree night
camping,,Early Morning Breakfast
camping,"Any tips? I’ll be making a tarp tipi, which I’ve done before. I’ve been to the area a bunch before, but always with a friend. Any advice and tips for a first time solo trip?","Upcoming solo overnight trip, winter conditions (high of 35° low of ~19°). Northern Appalachia, PA"
camping,,"Inspired to share by that other moto camping post, fun trip I went on 6 years ago up near Mt Baker, WA!"
camping,I want to do some car camping in Dinosaur National Monument in July. Any suggestions on the best campsite to make it easy to see the park. Consider I am traveling with a 1-year-old and 4 year old. Thanks.,Dinosaur National Monument - Advice on where to camp
camping,,Brooch rose Search website:decoratiuneagoogle.demo.ro
camping,,Does anyone know the name of this tent. I lost the directions and when I do a Google search about the tent I cant find a tent matching it. I know the brand is Coleman.
camping,,Camping Season opening 🏕
camping,,Got a pretty good view of the Flatiron from my camping spot
camping,,Got a great view of the flatiron from my camping spot
camping,"Hello 😊
 We are Melanie &amp; Daniel and we cycle 🚲 from Germany to Japan around the world ... Over 50,000 km, 5 years living in a tent.  We have already experienced several accidents, were followed by the police, had escorts, got caught in a sandstorm, got married at a couchsurfer place in Morocco and experienced a lot of crazy stuff.

 After our return from Africa, we are now in Turkey after 13000km.  Instagram.com/vaegabondsworld

 The borders with Georgia and Iran are still closed, so we couldn't continue cycling towards Asia.  That's why we worked through the winter here and created a lot of new adventure videos and blog articles for you.

 Our current video number # 45 is about the chaotic but wonderful Albania
 https://youtu.be/BE1wBdLU25Y

 All other adventures from over 13,000km and 1.5 years of living in a tent can be found in this playlist

 ⏫ All countries |  Start in Germany |  around the world by bike in chronological order: https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PLG43vqBetZVoX_lcPDs_cWEfqbCnZ_Mhv

 We have also prepared a packing list for our bike world tour:
 https://vaegabond.com/ratgeber/packliste-fahrradweltreise_7450


 Hopefully we can inspire or distract you a little in this Corona time.  Stay healthy and greetings from Turkey
 Melli &amp; Dani

 Our channels:
 YouTube.com/VAEGABOND
 Instagram.com/vaegabondsworld
 Facebook.com/vaegabondsworld
 VAEGABOND.com","5 years of camping | all season 45°C down to minus 20°C | traveling the world by bicycle for 50.000km | camping, cycling adventure videos"
camping,,FLEXTAILGEAR |The All-In-One Multifunctional HEATED BLANKET
camping,,couple camping
camping,"Amazon's reviews have spun me in circles

Any recommendations?",What LightWeight 2 People Hammock +Mosquito Net And Rain Fly?
camping,"It's been a while since I've been camping but I grew up doing it. My wife and I are wanting to get back into it and I've started buying other essentials to get ready for camping during the spring and summer. I understand this is a difficult question to answer without many details or what I'm looking for, but I'm looking for your opinion (whichever reasons it may be) on what is the best ground camping tent. If money wasn't a limit, which tent would you buy? Thanks in advance!",Best on ground tent (2-3 person)
camping,,First time in the hot tent (backyard)
camping,,"Beach camping on American Beach, Fl. Nothing like a fire and the sounds of the waves."
camping,,"She Finally Came In! My new Estwing Special 17"" camping hatchet. Pictured with my trusty handmade damascus pocket knife (~discussion of gear choices, elitism, extreme mod pedantry, and determination within~long read)::pen for scale::"
camping,"Well, since I wasn't able to gain the information, comparison, and discussion that I originally sought, I thought I'd post this in a few other subs in an attempt to get advice from people that know what the hell they're talking about when it comes to a chunk of steel.  So let's talk turkey, and if you feel like some morning mod-drama, read further:   

TL:DR:  Cool Axe and a knife, Let's talk about it.  


I'm not going to name name's and call out specific subreddits, so I'll just set the stage like this:  About a year ago, I lost my job due to being at high risk to Covid because of extreme lung conditions and a close-contact family member who literally has no immune system from chemo treatments for lung cancer.  Since I'm almost totally isolated and have huge Depression, Anxiety, and PTSD mental scars from being tortured as a child, I knew going into this, that the only way I was going to keep the demons at bay (and keep myself alive) was to work...  and boy did I work.  

Among many *many* other things, a large facet of my learning experience has been survival and self-sufficiency.  I went about constructing a huge urban garden around my property, learning how to fish with lures, hunt with a slingshot, and craft traps and shelters out of wood found in the forest, using only my trusty pocket knife and an axe.  

So I posted this picture on a subreddit where I thought I'd get the best information surrounding the subjects I've been striving all year to learn.  I even saw a post on the front page of that sub that was almost exactly like my post, although to be fair, I also wanted to talk about the workings of my beloved pocket-knife, so I included that in the picture too...  

#DENIED. 

My post, the message said, did not live up to the stringent measures put in place on that sub to keep out vanity photos better meant for ""Instagrammy type pictures"".  So I messaged back:  Hey, I wanted to talk about gear with the other members, and since there's already a post of the same type on the front page, why not let mine through too?  

I got a reply:  

&gt;A difference is that the other Poster wrote a full comment to accompany the picture post.  Not really sure what the point of the pen and a 'decorative knife' is, so NOT literally the same type. 

Oh ok, no big deal. I plan on commenting too, I replied, as my axe came in with a defect that needed fixing, and I wanted other people to know that too before making a purchase.  The pen is for scale, obviously, and the knife was the tool I've been using all year, it wasn't some mall-ninja 'decorative' knockoff, but a fully functional tool that, as I said before, I wanted to discuss the in's and out's of, for people that might like to get one of their own in the future.  Kind of elitist of him to assume the latter, I thought.  

&gt;Rulers are for scale. Or coins that people are familiar with. Or even jokingly - a banana. Axes are sold by weight and haft length - which you would know having just bought the item.  

So... I... didn't use the method of scale you prefer? But the axe's length is right in the title?  

&gt;The pen is redundant. And pens vary in length - unless somebody recognises that particular one, it doesn't help in an appreciation of scale.  

So... the pen is at the same time a redundancy of the scale stated in the title, but also *not good enough* for people to recognise it's size?  It's a damn Bic pen!  Bic Pens come in *fewer sizes* than coins do... who doesn't know how big a Bic pen is?

&gt;The knife is unrelated to the Comment. Pictures should be used to illustrate your text contribution.  

But... it's right there in the title, d00d...

&gt;If there is a fault with the axe, then your picture needs to clearly show the issue. It doesn't.  

Ok... well the axe just had a bad burr on the edge, so I couldn't exactly show that, but again, I'll happily go over that in the comment section so people know.  

&gt;But this ""burr"" was not mentioned in your title: "" ... Great heft, great split"". Where's the picture of the split? Presumably you will be returning the item to the manufacturer or retailer, though they may ask why you continued to use a defective item.  

I was referring it's 'wood splitting' ability... why would I refer to a defect in the axe as 'Great'?  This is **the third** axe I've received after returning two others for being more 'decorative' than I thought it was, and the other's head bending over like a taco after splitting one piece of wood.  Since it was just a burr anyways, I just shaved it off with my grind stone.  Surely it would be helpful for other people to know this, along with information regarding the shoddy axes they shouldn't waste their money on?  

&gt;The knife was pictured to have conversation about gear in a Post about an ax?  The knife is unrelated to the Comment. As explained before - Pictures should be used to ***illustrate*** your text contribution.  I'm sure the maker intended it to be ""decorative"". It's far from a sharpened prybar lump of steel, isn't it?

It's... in the title... *and* the pict... oh never mind...  but thanks for the elitism *again*.

&gt;There seems to be something of a gap between your expectations of the subreddit, and the reality. Whilst I appreciate the length of time since the reddit account you post from was first registered, you may have missed the development and refinement of this particular subreddit during that time. Perhaps a better match may be found elsewhere on reddit?  

No, dude... I don't think there was any gap in expectations, my post fits the subreddit's intentions perfectly.  I wanted a discussion about wood carving tools, and I got an endless litany of caveats you pulled out of your ass to make yourself the 'debate victor'.  Looks like the *true* intentions of your sub is to pick apart other people's posts **for your own vanity**.  Have fun lording over your precious subreddit...doesn't know how big a Bic pen is?

&gt;The knife is unrelated to the Comment. Pictures should be used to illustrate your text contribution.  

But... it's right there in the title, d00d...

&gt;If there is a fault with the axe, then your picture needs to clearly show the issue. It doesn't.  

Ok... well the axe just had a bad burr on the edge, so I couldn't exactly show that, but again, I'll happily go over that in the comment section so people know.  

&gt;But this ""burr"" was not mentioned in your title: "" ... Great heft, great split"". Where's the picture of the split? Presumably you will be returning the item to the manufacturer or retailer, though they may ask why you continued to use a defective item.  

I was referring it's 'wood splitting' ability... why would I refer to a defect in the axe as 'Great'?  This is **the third** axe I've received after returning two others for being more 'decorative' than I thought it was, and the other's head bending over like a taco after splitting one piece of wood.  Since it was just a burr anyways, I just shaved it off with my grind stone.  Surely it would be helpful for other people to know this, along with information regarding the shoddy axes they shouldn't waste their money on?  

&gt;The knife was pictured to have conversation about gear in a Post about an ax?  The knife is unrelated to the Comment. As explained before - Pictures should be used to ***illustrate*** your text contribution.  I'm sure the maker intended it to be ""decorative"". It's far from a sharpened prybar lump of steel, isn't it?

It's... in the title... *and* the pict... oh never mind...  but thanks for the elitism *again*.

&gt;There seems to be something of a gap between your expectations of the subreddit, and the reality. Whilst I appreciate the length of time since the reddit account you post from was first registered, you may have missed the development and refinement of this particular subreddit during that time. Perhaps a better match may be found elsewhere on reddit?  

No, dude... I don't think there was any gap in expectations, my post fits the subreddit's intentions perfectly.  I wanted a discussion about wood carving tools, and I got an endless litany of caveats you pulled out of your ass to make yourself the 'debate victor'.  Looks like the *true* intentions of your sub is to pick apart other people's posts **for your own vanity**.  Have fun lording over your precious subreddit...","She Finally Came In! My new Estwing Special 17"" camping hatchet. Pictured with my trusty handmade damascus pocket knife (~discussion of gear choices, elitism, extreme mod pedantry, and determination within~long read)::pen for scale::"
camping,,Beautiful place for Camping😍❤️
camping,,Fresno Ca.
camping,,"Camping in the Marysville Mountain in Victoria. Warm days, cold mountain streams and the best campfire made damper!"
camping,,Checking things from this snow storm
camping,"The American West is unique with free dispersed camping in some areas on public land. My question, is this an American thing or do other countries have free dispersed camping? I guess I'm specifically interested in Germany and Austria.",Dispersed camping in Germany and Austria? Or other countries?
camping,,Kenosha area.
camping,"As I am sitting by my camp fire, watching it, tending it, waiting for it to die and to douse it; I thought to myself “Boy, I love my welding gloves, they make fire tending so easy.”  Obviously welding gloves and not generally on the camping gear list, but it’s so easy to tend to small campfires my just reaching in there and moving the wood around. So it got me thinking, what are the more obscure/ off label camping items that you love? Or what’s your fav item in general?",What is your best (obscure) camping purchase?
camping,,Just outside Salida.
camping,,Last ones for the day.
camping,,"Camping in Green Water Valley, Death Valley National Park, CA. I set up camp inside this rock shelter in between the sites of Green Water and Furnace. High winds today, this shelter should do the trick."
camping,,How do you organize your camping gear?
camping,,Yokohama Geolandar X-AT G017 - Fitting &amp; Initial Impressions
camping,"I managed a private campground over 12 years asked me any thing. No question about ( KOA, NPS, STATE PARK).",Campground manager
camping,,Bushcraft cooking a Roast chicken lunch
camping,,Camping in Mayo FL. Sadie Mae is the goodest girl.
camping,,Apollo camping in AZ was popular a couple weeks ago so here's one more of him just outside of Grand Teton Natl Park last May.
camping,,What are these little things? Found them on a walk
camping,Getting ready for a 4 night bikepacking trip. Is a canister of fuel enough or should I bring extra? I’m thinking I’ll only need it for coffee/hot chocolate twice a day and Mountain House meals. There’ll be three of us.,How much Jetboil fuel to take along?
camping,,Relaxing Hike/Camp Alone in New Zealand’s Mountains - Tramping the Earnslaw Burn - For Someone Stuck in Lockdown at the Moment and Yearns the Mountains (This is where they filmed the Hobbit and LOTR)
camping,,We had a special guest at our campsite. Joshua tree National park.
camping,Me and a buddy are looking to do the North Truchas Peak loop in later March. What weather conditions should we anticipate? I figured there'll be snow but how bad is it?,"Pecos Wilderness, NM weather conditions in late March?"
camping,,"October camping. Minister Creek, Allegheny National Forest."
camping,,Went on a overland camping trip last summer!
camping,,Went on a overland camping trip last summer!
camping,,Rooftop tent advice please! This was our previous setup until my husband’s Tacoma got totaled in a hit and run a few months ago. We bought a 2021 Suburu Outback as a replacement. My question: can the outback roof handle the weight of a rooftop tent with two adults sleeping in it?
camping,,Rooftop tent advice please! This was our previous setup until my husband’s Tacoma got totaled in a hit and run a few months ago. We bought a 2021 Suburu Outback as a replacement. My question: can the outback roof handle the weight of a rooftop tent?
camping,,You have to love no bugs winter camping!
camping,,Simple life
camping,,Camping is awesome and winter camping with out the snow is even better.
camping,,Sunset Campfire in The Remote Red Rock Desert Of Northern Arizona. Can’t Wait to get back Here!
camping,,Beautiful norway
camping,,Lac Bouillouses ( -10°C ) - Pyrénées - France
camping,,I've been doing a little bit of camping in Michigan this winter in my One Tigris hot tent.
camping,,What is the best and most cost effective 2 in 1 portable cooler and heater for a tent?
camping,,Great outdoors... can’t wait
camping,,Looks like Utah has less of a winter than Texas...
camping,,hi im not new to camping but im no expert. i thought id just post this here if anyone would like to have a chat on the best camping spots in or near texas or just about some cool camping experiences youve had
camping,,h
camping,"Hey, I need a serious flashlight. No bells no whistles, no bs. One that will blind a bobcat, watertight but not waterproof, handheld with strong rechargeable batteries. A working man’s tool. You’ve been out there. Where do I look?",I need a no bs flashlight
camping,,Summer in Stratchcona Park on Vancouver Island.
camping,Hoping someone can measure the length across of the otterbox 45 at it's base. Thanks!,Do you own an Otterbox 45?
camping,,Can’t wait to get back out! Electric scooter has been such an added bonus last season
camping,,Some photos from my last camp!
camping,,Stove is in the tent!
camping,,Before and after gear check for a Joshua Tree 2 day back country hike (: very excited as I’ve never been to J-Tree
camping,,Just did my gear check for a simple 2 day hike through Joshua tree for my birthday tomorrow! Was hoping my ULA Circuit bag came in today but it’s too late :(
camping,No more having to keep throwing things into the fire pit! These work great! And you'll help the entrepreneur live an independent life!,Support an autistic adult by buying JT Firestarters!
camping,,"One of our favorite spots to camp near Las Vegas! Lake Mead National Park - Echo Bay (Camp Coordinate: 36.297712, -114.399848)"
camping,"Hi all! I am going to be living in a camper van for the summer and looking to double my living area with one of those screened in gazebos, but I can’t seem to find anything with a built in floor. I’ll be fairly protected from wind, but we can get severe rain and thunderstorms every so often. I’m also going to be working long days and I don’t want to have to take it down so I need something sturdy. Would be amazing if there were zip up walls too, but I’m not sure if those exist! Preferably available in Canada so I’m not paying huge import costs. Thanks!",Camping gazebo with a floor?
camping,"Thanks to the mods for allowing me to post this.

I'd like to take a quick second to let you guys know about a new subreddit \[VA Campers\] ([https://www.reddit.com/r/vacampers/](https://www.reddit.com/r/vacampers/)).

This new community is for all types of camping (overlanding, tent, backcountry, RVing) and activities (attractions, hiking, cool towns, etc.) to do while camping in Virginia and neighboring states.  I see there are a lot of posts here relating to Virginia, so I think some of you may enjoy the new sub.  So help me out, come on by and post your favorite places and things to do.",A new community for Virginia campers
camping,"Hey everyone, I live in Western PA and want to know some good camping spots in the area. Also, interested in WV, OH and NY areas that are a few hours drive from Pittsburgh. Does anyone have any reccomendations?",Camping in PA
camping,I'm 16 and have never been camping before and I'm thinking about going camping in the Catskills with some friends. I have been hiking up there before and have sort of scouted a few possible camping sites in nice areas but am completely new to camping. What's some basic advice for going camping?,Thinking about going camping and need some advice
camping,,First-time Winter Hammock Camping -17°
camping,,happy camping Cute Travel Car Camp camper key Road sign Keychain https://moonaro.net/collections/keychain/products/happy-camping-cute-travel-car-i-camp-camper-key-road-sign-keychain-glass-cabochon-traveler-key-chain-goddess-charm
camping,,"Late August at September Morn Lake, Montana"
camping,,Found a great spot outside Canyonlands NP - We think Elon would fancy this site lol
camping,"Any recommendations for camping in Little Rock Arkansas; Amarillo, TX; Albuquerque, NM?

We are tenting but do want electric.

Mid March trip so any advice is welcome.
Thanks",Tent Camping in the US
camping,"Planning a camping trip to Franconia this summer and looking for any suggestions for camp sites. 

Trying to avoid grounds with a lot of families and RVs and more just tent camping. 

One of the best camping experiences I had was at a small campground near Acadia National park that was more “rustic” in that they had no on site staff, no running water, and only one outhouse for the grounds with a fire pit and picnic table at each site. Also had to carry all your gear to the site from a dirt lot in the front which was cool (about 5 minute walk uphill so not bad at all) Made it feel more remote like backpacking but with a little luxury. I loved the simplicity and feel of the site like that so looking for something similar hopefully! 

Would love any recommendations",Franconia New Hampshire Campground suggestions?
camping,,"One of the top 5 places I’ve pitched a tent... Del Norte Camp, Santa Cruz Island, Channel Islands NP, California."
camping,,Finished my camping gear. Now to get back in the woods
camping,,"Favorite camping spot from last summer, day to night to morning transition. Goat Mountain, WA! Sea of clouds was incredible!!"
camping,"I'm considering upgrading from my Coleman Classic to something in the $100-150 range. I was hoping for better low temp cooking. Has anyone made this transition, and was it worth it? Also, this is for car camping so backpacking rigs aren't necessary.",Is upgrading from Coleman Classic Stove worth it for Car Camping?
camping,,"One of the top 3 Sand dunes in mexico, 'dunas de bilbao' located in north México a few hours from Monterrey. Nice place to do some sandboarding &amp; camping. To get here just enter either of the next codes directly on google maps/gps: . 📍25.4266196, -102.8959761 📍C4G3+JJ Villa de Bilbao, Coahuila"
camping,,Camping in Australia
camping,,3F UL GEAR 2019 Lanshan 2 Tent 2 Person Oudoor Ultralight Camping Tent 3 Season Professional 15D Silnylon Rodless Tent 4 Season From R1295.67
camping,,Top 11 Summer Camp Art Ideas for Young Children
camping,"New to the reddit and seeking to get into camping, mainly solo but my concern is laws and regulations. While I intend to start small with campsites and parks, I do want to move on to wild camping and camping in the mountains. I need to know if anybody here has any idea on the laws in Georgia, USA about wild camping and camping that is not paid for or in national parks",Need information for future camping
camping,,"Does anyone have real world experience on the difference between a ""wedge"" shaped trailer and a ""square"" shaped one? MPG? Sway in the wind?"
camping,"Hey all! I'm planning on doing a lot more athletic camping (bringing multiple bikes, kayaks, etc) and it's going to be beyond what I can safely strap onto my truck and also fit humans. So I'm looking at 8-12ish foot trailers to put the gear into and keep safely locked up at the sites.  


I'm finding trailers seem to either be ""wedge"" shaped up front or more compact and ""box"" shaped. I would \*assume\* the wedge one would get better gas mileage but can't find any actual testing or comparisons online from real people not trying to sell me something. Do any of you have experience with these kind of things? I'd just like to hear some input, thanks a ton!","Anyone have eal word experience with ""wedge"" shaped pull behind trailers compared to the more traditional ""blocky"" ones?"
camping,"I have wanted to get a hot tent with a wood stove for several years now and I’m finally going to buy one. I need suggestions on a solo hot tent and wood stove that is good quality but not insanely expensive. All in maybe $400 tops. 

Ive browsed Amazon but everything there has very mixed reviews. To me the heat and ambiance of the wood stove is incredible and I want that but I also want a safe set up and I don’t want to break the bank. Appreciate any input!",Hot tent suggestions
camping,,Frozen pile of branches in the middle of lake forms comfortable and calming resting place.
camping,,"Inside this Mexican national park, you can explore 9 tunnels, from 100m up to 1.68km. They were meant for train tracks but never finished. . Nearby: ⛺Camping spots: yes 🏚Wood cabins: yes 💸Entry fee: Yes. GPS: . 📍23.7282192, -105.6871797"
camping,,"Visiting my old campsites around The Danube river, but flooded and frozen. it turned out to be a wonderful adventure."
camping,,"When life gives you snow make an angel. I love you Texas, stay warm."
camping,,"Fun to get out and sleep in the bush, having a woodstove makes it easy and warm."
camping,,Hike to Frozen Waterfalls and Camping in a Homemade Teepee
camping,Hey all. I live in northern Florida and I am looking to do a little weekend getaway and find a nice spot in Georgia o camp overnight and sleep in the car. I would like to get a suggestion for a place that is quiet and with some pretty nature. Mountains are a plus! Any advice is welcomed. Ideally would like to drive max 6ish hours out to reach it.,Need help finding location to do an overnight car-camping.
camping,,Sorting thru some gear. Gonna trek out this weekend. NORTHEAST PA
camping,,Somewhere in North Georgia. Enjoy!
camping,"So, tomorrow I will do my first night out in the snow. Since it's the first time camping in winter, i will stay close to my car just to see how well i can nail it, so it will be quite safe. 
My concern is: should I stay well dressed inside the sleeping bag? Being only a night, insulation from the floor is not a problem, having enough things to insulate well other than a reflective sleeping mat, but the sleeping bag is not designed for winter, but i have prepared clothes that keep me warm outside in even cooler temperatures. Is that ok? I have clothes that kept me warm at -15°C while outside.
For food, high calories it's what I thought would be the best: fatty cheese, chocolate,...and? No nuts, I'm hyper allergic to them.
One pair of gloves should be enough, and they are mittens designed for skiing so they are pretty good at keeping warm.
Any tips would be great","Camping in winter, -5°C"
camping,,"Curious, for those of you that do backpack camping. Along with your tent do you bring a hammock as well? Debating if it’s worth it for just a quick evening setup instead of a tent on those beautiful nights. Not that it takes all that long to set a tent up."
camping,,I love going camping with no destination; found this gem of a spot during one of those adventures in British Columbia
camping,,He's testing out our new sleeping bag.
camping,,Camping ROCKS!
camping,,First time camping in two years
camping,[removed],Best Dog Hiking Backpack
camping,,My Mr Buddy Heater shuts off after 30 minutes due to the green propane cylinder becoming icy cold and creating condensation on the outside. What is causing this and is there a remedy besides switching to an alternative heat souce?
camping,I love camping and live in Washington and you'd think those two would go hand in hand however I live in south east Washington which means that it's kind of a hell hole when it comes to outdoors activity's (at least for a lot of the stuff that I enjoy) so if anyone knows any good spots around southeastern Washington Hell good spots around Washington in general is appreciated. Thanks.,Anyone know good spots around south eastern washington?
camping,,Camping Lovers Gifts
camping,,Camping Video Collection [ 4K Ultra HD ]
camping,,Soo cold but so nice waking up in the first snow.. #netherlands
camping,,Just a nice tarp settup.
camping,,Various winter camping photos (February 2021)
camping,[removed],"Get Registered Passports, Driver License and ID Cards"
camping,,Wood heater in camping
camping,"Stumbled across this upstart website. It's the least predictable content I've ever read and truly speaks to a subculture that doesn't really have a voice in the media landscape. You can follow them on insta @  thedirtlot

https://www.the-dirtlot.com/post/ski-town-landlords-are-lizard-people","Dope website for dirtbags, ski bums, etc"
camping,Hey guys is anyone from Southern California? I live in Palm Springs and am looking for some camping people? We are planning a trip out to Blythe to camp swim and fish on the river. Anyone interested in going?,California!
camping,,My husbands idea of a fun camping trip.
camping,,"East Java, Indonesia 🔥"
camping,,Cover of Etta James
camping,,Shrink your URLs and get paid!
camping,"Hi All,

My mom has difficulty walking long distances, past knee surgery, and I've been contemplating on how to take her camping since she has never gone camping/hiking. She requires assistance entering or exiting vehicles with high clearance, going over tall curbs, or anything tall which involves bending the knee. I am researching places I can take her which I can drive up to the spot and requires minimal walking on certain parts (e.g. Yellowstone). For the sites that require walking like 2 or 3 miles to get to a spot, are there any recommendations anyone has or has seen that would allow me to get her there? I'm not saying a wheelchair, but I'm not saying something not like a wheelchair.


For reference:
She had the knee surgery over 15-20 years ago
She is approximately 5 ft 3
She is 67 years old",(Help) Take Mom Camping (past knee surgery)
camping,"New to sub. I figured it a good place to ask.

I miss camping but need my CPAP. I have batteries, but they are short lived and heavy.

I'm looking for various options to off grid, to glamping, to sleeping in a car.

Recently became homeless for awhile and now seems important.

... I have access to a place to sleep now, with regular power, if ice storms do not kill it again. Just now seems prudent.",CPAP User
camping,,Had a blast out in southern Oregon this past weekend. Year 11 of an annual camping trip!
camping,,A nice sxs ride in Southern Missouri.
camping,"“use the included NiMH rechargeable batteries for up to 12 hours or use 3 AA batteries for up to 29 hours.”



Motorola T260TP Talkabout Radio, 3 Pack https://www.amazon.com/dp/B01DM7AEYE/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glt_fabc_3W2TMNFREZJ36VHRGPN1?_encoding=UTF8&amp;psc=1",I bought some walkie talkies and it came with a battery and also allows you to use your own AA....it says the supplied battery provides 12 hours or use AA for 29 hours. Why the difference?
camping,"Hi all,

Me and my kiddo have good sun-zero rated bags, foam pads etc. so we have that portion of gear covered. We also have a roof top tent but we’ve been experiencing some windy conditions and that sucker really makes a lot of noise, even after I’ve accounted for loose cables and stuff. We are looking for a ground tent that is affordable yet deflects the wind at least moderately better than the rtt so we can sleep better at night. Hoping to find one that is big enough for our sleeping bags and mr buddy heater. We don’t want 10-20mph wind noise to be a barrier to camping. Any tips or suggestions are greatly appreciated. Thanks!",Affordable Tent for Windy/Cold conditions
camping,,How Small Business Can Benefit From Personal Loans | Slick Cash Loan
camping,"Hey folks,

I am looking for frequent campers to interview for a university assignment. If you are bothered by mosquitoes when trying to enjoy your time in nature because you are unable to properly deter them, I would love to talk to you to hear more about this issue. The interview would take place on zoom, be a maximum of thirty minutes and, if you are okay with it, recorded. Please feel free to reach out!",Interviewees wanted!
camping,,SE Idaho!
camping,,Out Camping and I find Free Mill Gold by Crushing some Rocks!!
camping,,Caribou 18” stove came in for my wall tent. Doing it’s initial burn. Love this thing already. Sadie is wondering why I put perfectly good stick in the stove.
camping,I ordered two Mountain Hardware sleeping bags (the rook) but their customer service cannot answer whether it zips together even though on their website it says that it does. I am pretty irritated with them so I am looking to purchase a down sleeping bag from another seller that can zip together. Was looking for something with down insulation that goes down to about 15. Thanks!,"Looking for a lightweight, backpacking, down sleeping bag that you can zip 2 together."
camping,,"Just got a new tent! I am having a hard time finding an appropriate sized footprint/ground cloth for it... any recommendations? It is 14'x9 (168""x108)."
camping,,Bivi’s and Bevvies
camping,,A full camping kit for £230! I put this together to help people starting out in the wold of wild camping. I hope it helps.
camping,,MEDIEVAL TIMES DINNER &amp; TOURNAMENT | ORLANDO FLORIDA | DINNER THEATRE
camping,,Cherry pie pie iron. *Redeeming my original post with before and after.
camping,"Hi everyone. Questions about my stove in regards to winter camping. I own a hot tent but it will be too small to fit 4 people. I do own a 6 person, screened in porch, Coleman tent. I looked up the specs and it doesn't specifically say fire retardant. After some googling, I am still stuck. Do you know if I will be able to use a stove jack on my 6 person tent and use my stove with it? I just do not want the tent melting and causing us harm. I planned on putting something down on the ground so the stove doesn't burn through my floor. Any advice would be great, thanks!",Advice on Winter Tent and Stove
camping,,Top Ten Best Dog Hiking Backpack of 2021............
camping,,Grab the day by the balls people !
camping,,Camping trip
camping,,‘Bama Hills w/ My Son.
camping,,Map shows which U.S. states spend the most on RVs per capita
camping,,"Ever Wondered Which 12 v fridge would be best for your applications. We test Engel, ARB, Waeco and Snomaster. Power Consumption, 12 hour, 24 hour Test. Insulation test. Fridge Cycling Test. The science behind the tests."
camping,,A little lakeside valentine date
camping,,No power? No problem.
camping,,Those who are love to camping they will know about tent. I'm here to share with you two durable tent ( Tepui VS CVT) that makes with same materials have but in this article It's presents some specific things that helps you to choose helpful tent. Here is the link
camping,,The Channel Islands is the best camping you can do off California's Coast
camping,,"Just a white night in Lapland, Finland on the Three countries border"
camping,"Hey everyone, I’m planning a camping trip for the first weekend in March and I’m looking at places about 45 min- 1 hour away. I’m about 30 min north of Pittsburgh,PA so that would be where we are going from. We are going to be tent camping, and I would prefer to go somewhere where we don’t need a permit. Any suggestions are welcome!",Camping in Pittsburgh
camping,"We're considering purchasing a Kodiak Flex-Bow 10x14 canvass tent. Does anyone own a Kodiak tent? Is buying one worth the money? One of the main reasons we're considering canvass is they aren't supposed to leak. However, we know canvass tents are heavy and take longer to set up. (We aren't backpacking) Are they worth those inconveniences?

 Any information would be greatly appreciated! 
.  

Thanks so much.",Question about Kodiak tents
camping,"Recently received our Shiftpod2 and I’m getting anxious to get out there! Any groups that get together? If not, anyone interested in starting one? These are luxurious and I can’t wait to mod this out!",Anyone ready for camping season?
camping,"A bit spur of the moment, leaving in a few weeks for a trip and want to camp during it. Thinking of doing it around Joshua Tree or Big Sur...
Have never camped before, but feel the pull to be with the Great Mother, ground, meditate and hike. 
Any advice you'd give for a first timer? Good resources? I'll have my car with me (not sure if that helps anything). 
Thanks in advance!","First time camping, and going solo. Not too much time to prepare, looking for advice."
camping,"Sure maybe it's against the rules, but you kind folk here inspire me in all sorts of ways to get outside. I love Cotopaxi, and as a Utah local, I can't help but support a local company! They've got great marketing, in fact, they sent me a 20% coupon, so I bought a puff! 

Then they sent me another one.

… and that brings us here. So, whoever can guess where my last weekend adventure was (or whoever is closest) will get the code for 20% off.",COTOPAXI is the BEST and the WORST. HA.
camping,,"Thunderstorm camping in Lake St Clair, NSW, Australia"
camping,What are your favorite camping stoves and grills?,Camping stoves and grills.
camping,,Tallulah river campground is a must visit during the rainy season
camping,,I went on my first solo camping trip. Got hit by the winter weather storm in Texas.
camping,,My favorite place
camping,,"Ticks, scorpions, snakes &amp; baboons! This is the Cederberg Nature Reserve. About 3hours north of Cape Town, South Africa 🇿🇦 Some are lucky to have cold weather &amp; snow. We’re dying in +40c!! Happy camping! 😬✌🏻#jasonkemm #camp_with_jason #moments_in_motion #jpro5ive"
camping,,Bad 4 season tent
camping,I need recommendations for a winter women’s sleeping bag. Do you have a favorite? I am doing a multi day trip. Weight is a consideration. Thank you!,Women’s Winter Sleeping Bag
camping,"Hi. I'm looking for an easier way to inflate my sleeping pad. Mostly car camping so a little extra weight doesn't hurt me. I am asking in particular about something that would fit the aircore's intake valve.
Please don't judge me :). I have some nerve damage in my hands that makes the ""normal"" way of inflating challenging.",I'm looking for a hand or foot air pump to help me fill my big agnes aircore sleeping pad
camping,"Hello! 

&amp;#x200B;

I was looking for something to put over a sunroof of a car that would allow it to be open (for ventilation) but also keep rain out. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Advise? Recommendations?",Sunroof rain cover for car camping
camping,,Teardrop Camping w. 🐈 by the 🌊- Little Guy Mini Max Tab
camping,"Camping in SoCal, need suggestions for decent tents. One that will fit couple of cots.  Going to start off car camping then hopefully backpacking.  
Any tips/equipment that I might not think of as a new camper? 
Basically my shopping list includes: shelter, food/water, and first aid.","New to camping, need suggestion!"
camping,,"Sunrise on Lake Powell, AZ/UT border, USA"
camping,,Tough Hook Outdoor Gear Hanger 15% OFF - Coupon Code: PRES15
camping,,"Hi, me and fellow classmates are in a class named EDD in school, we have to create a invention or innovation that would affect our life. We chose something that applied to camping, it would be amazing if you could help by filling out this survey. Thanks!"
camping,"Hello! (TLDR at bottom)

My boyfriend and I are hoping to do a big Europe road trip this summer (if COVID allows it). We want to make the experience as close to nature as possible (and hopefully cut down on spending in the process) by camping as much as we can. Thinking of going through Belgium, Germany, Czech Republic (specifically Prague), Switzerland and France (then back to the UK). We will be driving in a car but will be camping in a tent; it is a very small car, too small to comfortably sleep in for 3 weeks, so would appreciate any places that have parking too. 

We have no specific areas we want to follow yet and are in the baby stages of planning this journey! Would very much appreciate any advice/recommendations people can give for pretty places to camp in these areas. 

TLDR: my boyfriend and I are doing a road trip through Belgium, Germany, Prague, Switzerland and France and would appreciate any recommendations on where to camp!",Europe road trip camping suggestions (details in comments)
camping,,Camping on BLM land outside the valley of fire
camping,,"Dreaming of spring and camping. I started this Camp'n Wagon build last summer but haven't fished the interior. I have the woodstove, solar and 12 volt appliances ready to go as soon as the weather warms up. It had icicles on it his morning."
camping,,Winter snow camping with my 11 year old
camping,,Winter snow jcamping with my 11 year old
camping,I’ve just bought a very expensive (Sea to Summit - £175) sleeping pad. Should I be putting a foam mat underneath it to protect it from stabby things under the tent that could puncture it?,Foam mat under a sleeping pad?
camping,,Which place in the western part of the US is warmest to camp in March?
camping,,Trying to win a ORION 35 cooler VOTE SO I WIN IT PLEASE EVERY VOTE COUNTS
camping,,"My daughter and I canoeing down Linda Lake in Algonquin Park, September 2020"
camping,,Mount Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,[deleted],Mount Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,[deleted],Mt. Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,,Short camping trips (1-2 nights) vs long camping trips (3+ nights)... Which ones do you think are best and why?
camping,,Chocolate Cherry Cobbler with a Marshmallow glaze from this summer on a weekend getaway
camping,"Hi,

I picked up the Vango Vista 800 for £20 in a second hand store and I have since pitched and re-waterproofed the tent (everything is fine).

I am interested in extending the tent with a porch/awning but there is no specific model available which is made for it, as the tent was created for Go Outdoors, who did not want an awning designed.

Can anybody recommend a suitable awning for this tent? I have so far looked at the Hi-Gear Universal Porch and the Vango Tigris 800 porch, which both look suitable.

Thanks,",Tent awning for Vango Vista 800
camping,,Rodna Mountains. Such a morning.
camping,,Camping in the Welsh Brecon Beacons last summer
camping,,Pasé de una tienda de campaña para mochileros para 2 personas a este tráiler emergente de 1981 que heredé de mi abuelo. ¡Se siente tan elegante!
camping,,"the Subpolar Urals, lake"
camping,"Hello!

I'm looking to start camping in a month or so and want to have my bases covered with regard to things I'll need. I know that everyone's needs are different, so a few quick things:

\- I just purchased a camping hammock on Amazon, so my tent is taken care of in that regard (though I would gladly accept suggestions on ground tents as well!)

\- I am looking for suggestions on a backpack, boots, sleeping bag, flashlight, lightweight camp chair, food things, etc.). I plan to get into backpacking and traveling fairly frequently, so any and all advance is welcome to a 'newcomer' of sorts like myself.

I'd very much appreciate any guidance you can provide!",Comprehensive Setup Question(s).
camping,,Three Years of Time-lapse
camping,,Mojave Camping! (Coordinates + Experience)
camping,,Good morning happy campers
camping,"Hello, I and my husband moved to the US last year and we are thrilled to see the camping culture here. We are looking forward to go for camping after winters and have started researching about the gears. We are planning to start with car camping and then try the bag packing. Not sure if it is relevant - we live in Raleigh, NC but would be travelling to various places across the states. 

We have done some research on tents and have nailed down our requirements to - 3person, 3 season, no hard requirement on free/semi/non-free standing, preferably &lt; 4lbs, atleast 1 vestibule, has mesh/window for star-gazing as well. Any suggestion for a tent that will cost &lt; USD250 ? (open to shell out few extra bucks if it is really worth it)

Appreciate any suggestions.",camping tents for newbies
camping,hey i’m in upstate new york and looking for about 3 night camping/backpacking trips to do in early summer. please help me out and give me some ideas :),looking for good 3 night trips
camping,,Solo Camping &amp; Hiking in the Philippines
camping,,"Car Camping before the deep freeze. Not overly scenic, but in the woods nonetheless. :)"
camping,"I am planning a trip to Lake Mead for 2 nights (Fri-Sun) around late March or early April.  There are quite a number of campsites that are first come, first serve.  Questions:
- Where do you recommend to camp?  We are novice campers so prefer places with toilet facilities and potable water.
- Do you have any suggestions on increasing the likelihood of getting a site (or are there enough that this isn’t a concern)?
- Do you have any recommendations on hikes or places to see while camping there?

Thanks in advance for your guidance!",Availability of campsites near Lake Mead
camping,"So I’m in the market for a new tent and am on the fence about a couple of them. What are y’all’s experience with canvas tents? Also are the REI co-op tents any good. Have heard mixed things about those. Not looking for a backpacking tent so weight isn’t an issue. Also looking for something with flexibility in terms of weather (cold, snow, rain, heat). Thanks in advance!",Tent Recommendations
camping,"I was wondering if anyone had any good recommendations for sites at Wilderness State park. Is there tent sites that are better than others? I have read mix reviews. Some people say the sites are really close together and others say you cant tell your in a camp ground.

Any other campgrounds around that area that might be more secluded? Trying to stay mainland but wouldnt might going a touch into UP if there's better spots.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks",Wilderness State Park MI questions
camping,,Sonic the hedgehog in my camp fire.
camping,,"Abandoned Mansion, Do I go inside and explore?"
camping,,This is the Chuck Box I built to hold all my food and cooking supplies while camping out of my truck camper.
camping,"We love our a-frame camper, but hated the lack of interior storage. In this video we will walk you through our IKEA hack for adding interior storage to our Rockwood A192HW camper. We were able to complete this DIY project for under $200 using the IKEA Lixhult Cabinets. This DIY would also work on similar campers including the Rockwood A122 or Flagstaff T19QBHW. 

[https://youtu.be/Pch8jwUgcME](https://youtu.be/Pch8jwUgcME)

[A-Frame Camper Ikea Cabinets Storage Hack - YouTube Thumbnail](https://preview.redd.it/arof8pu5ijh61.jpg?width=500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=1a3a2980ba3422a0e28138236841e7455923274b)",A-Frame Camper Ikea Cabinets Storage Hack
camping,,Hi I am a 14 year old boy. I have been wanting to go solo backpacking would it be safe and what would I need.
camping,,"Crazy rain storm the first night and a bit wetter the next few days than anticipated but Fremont Peak State Park, CA was something to behold."
camping,What's the backpack size you usually bring to like 7+ day trips in cold winter conditions? Is 70L enough?,"Backpack size in winter camping conditions -10, -20°c"
camping,[removed],My experience with the best camping tool that has ever been created
camping,"For those of you who use blue barrels as a means of storing food in a bear-resistant/scent-resistant container, **where do you purchase the barrels?**  I'm in the market for several of them (either 2 60L barrels, or 4 30L barrels) and the markup appears to be significant. 

There are many people reselling them online; however, I have a few concerns.  First, the resellers are marking up the prices significantly...most are near the price of new containers.  Second, there's really no telling what may have been stored inside them while they were in the possession of the reseller(s).  The market appears to be flooded with blue barrels which were used to store diabetes medicine, which renders the barrels no longer safe for containing food...however, the resellers don't seem to be overly concerned about that.  Isn't the point of these barrels generally to store food? Am I being overly cautious? 

My question, then: where can I go to buy straight-up food grade barrels from a reputable source?

These barrel systems are popular for people doing river trips, and I know a few of you have probably already dealt with these questions. Thanks in advance for any insights you may have!","Finding safe, refurbished/renewed food grade blue barrels"
camping,,Looking through the weeds at Grand Teets in Grand Teton National Park OC = @daltonjohnsonmedia [1000x667]
camping,i am new camper. am i would like a good knife .any recomasions,good camping knife
camping,,Went ice fishing this Gamily Dat weekend and camped in the ice. -36*C. Good times.
camping,,"camping l´almuravella | Visitamos este camping en CUDILLERO, ASTURIAS. |..."
camping,,"So simple setup, yet I miss this little home with all this staying at home."
camping,,Our challenge: camp at least once every month for a year. Progress: 9 down 3 to go
camping,,Donald Trump Lally Sleeping peacefully
camping,,Winter camping
camping,,How to start a fire with wet wood!
camping,[removed],THE BEST RV TACTICLIGHT XFLASHLIGHT
camping,,Wuling unveils its first camping-ready truck
camping,,"Camping the Ya Ha Tinda in Alberta, Canada. It was -40 overnight but nice and warm in the tent. Such a beautiful area, I look forward to camping there in the summer."
camping,,Fastpacking overnighter photies
camping,,Sharing warm and colorful night with friend!!!
camping,,Fastpacking overnighter photies
camping,[removed],Backpacking/hiking meals - questionnaire
camping,"Hey everyone! So I’ve been looking to reserve a camp ground in September and October but all those weekend are already booked up, even though you can only book 6 months in advance. Does anyone know if I actually missed the booking rush or is that normal for it to be showing no vacancy already before the actually booking allowance? OR are group sites only available since those are twelve months out? I appreciate any help on this! Thanks!","Shenandoah National Park reserving camping spot (Mathew’s arm, Big meadow. Etc.)"
camping,,"Camping in the middle of the bush. Right in front, the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]"
camping,,Halls Gap
camping,,Fire dragon
camping,,Let’s camp
camping,,Winter tarp camping
camping,,"Great day at ""El Chaltén"", Argentina"
camping,,Sonnenuntergang in Kalabrien
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. Looking right into the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. The last picture is the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. The last picture is the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,"Camping in the middle of the bush. In the ladt picture, the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]"
camping,,What’s up fellow campers! Wild camping in South Africa. Cederberg mountains. 3hrs north of Cape Town. I slept under the stars with a troop of wild baboons about 200m away. Awesome stuff! Check out the video here — https://youtu.be/z58vmnqzqg4
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/fnuo56ze0fh61.jpg?width=4032&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=9249492091c90a858a39bb6c48191f1b363b9f2b",Camping in the desert and campfire color matches the sky color
camping,,"Camping Peruca in Garjak, Croatia. Little part of Paradise!"
camping,,Camp life😍
camping,,The UAE's Deadliest Hiking Trail
camping,,Decided to post one of my favorite sunrises while camping for my cake day. Nothing beats a Nevada hot spring.
camping,,My first camp prep/pack!
camping,,Van life
camping,,Winter camping fun
camping,"The amazing scenery of the scenic rim! So close to a lot of activities, bushwalks, lakes, swimming holes and so much more! Drop by and get 4 Wheels On The Road now!

\#4\_wheels\_on\_the\_road

*Processing img tj6a9ezndch61...*

*Processing img md2c3czndch61...*",Peaceful and beautiful camping on the Logan River?
camping,Are there any good apps that show public land versus private land to find good dispersed camp spots?,Good app to show public land
camping,,Night Site CO
camping,"I am planning an overnight trip from Vegas towards the end of March. I haven't spent much time desert camping, so I am looking at an overnight trip either at Joshua Tree or Zion. Looking for feedback for those of you that have been to either.

At Joshua Tree, I would probably reserve a site at Indian Cove or try to get one of the first-come-first-serve sites. We will be leaving in the morning on a Thursday, so there is a chance we could get a good site if we risk it.

At Zion, I would try to get a site at the South Campground. 

Thanks!",Joshua Tree or Zion
camping,,Why doesnt anyone use webbing to hike with? It's extremely useful kit! How did this never take off?
camping,,Some recent photos from our trip to Ginnie Springs in Florida! Campfire and some star photography!
camping,"Hi all, I'm getting back into camping after many many years absence. I have bought plenty of gear. I have been missing a sleeping mat because I had no idea which one I should go for. Im hoping for some suggestions. The tent I have is a Highlander blackthorn. I'm hoping for something affordable, but am open to suggestions for good gear that will last. I am from Northern Ireland if any UK campers have any weather appropriate suggestions!",1 man tent sleeping mat ideas?
camping,,"Camping, Adventure &amp; Outdoors! All sorts of cool, fun stuff. Check out https://jpro5ive.co.za for more. Smash the gallery page for my latest camping shenanigans! Follow my #moments_in_motion @jpro5ive on Instagram."
camping,,"You clicked the link! Thanks, you’re too much! I camped in my bivy tent, keeping things nice &amp; simple. We had only 1 pot each &amp; fashioned our own utensils to eat. Just another awesome camp, as always! Very sweet! 😬🤙🏻"
camping,,"Howzit all! Please help. Posted a photo earlier, no problem. Now when I hit the + button (on phone) to post another photo, I only have the 1 recent photo, NO access to the library? Why? What am I missing? Is it a “limit” thing? Thanks! 🤙🏻"
camping,,"Camping, Adventure &amp; Outdoors — South Africa, Western Cape! All cool camping related stuff! Check out my site for more. Happy days fellow camping legends! 😬✌🏻"
camping,,"What’s up fellow campers! New here, no clue what to do. Please help!?"
camping,"Hello everyone! My birthday is in mid July and my tradition the last couple of years has been to take a camping trip. In the past I’ve kayaked through Algonquin provincial Park and done an overnight in a campground in Rocky Mountain national park. I Recently moved to Washington and would like to do a trip along the coast with a campsite on the beach. I’m pretty well set up to do either car camping, Backpack it in, or boat-in.  I have a dog and would prefer to bring her along, which makes Olympic national Park not an option (assuming like other parks they don’t allow dogs on the trails).  My vehicle is four-wheel-drive capable so some rough roads to get to a destination are doable. The dog does well in the kayak so a boat-in site on calm waters is an option. I am looking to spend two nights and I would prefer to be in the same place both nights so that I can relax a bit. I welcome any and all suggestions:)",PNW transplant looking for trip suggestions on the coast
camping,,"Perfect conditions for day-camping in the mountains. Viken, Norway"
camping,,A Dozen Spectacular RV Parks for Winter Camping
camping,,True Story
camping,I live in NYC so find places to camp is a hard task. I don’t have a car that I can use to travel there. Anyone know any camping places near Queens NYC?,Camping places in NYC?
camping,,Me and my kids
camping,,One pot ramen on trianga in -3c (26.6f)
camping,"Hello,   I love the idea of camping on the beach, i dont know where to start, im looking for a free campsites on the Georgia-Savanah coast to something in North Florida so i dont have to travel too far,
 Ive been all over the internet looking for answers but it feels like i can only find sites i have to pay for 
My goal is to pack a cooler and only need gas money to get there and back. 
Where should i look for spots? 
What about my vehicle,
Idealy if i could sleep in my car amd park where theres a public shower/bathroom  that whould be just as good as setting up a tent",To sleep on sand
camping,"Hi! I'm a product designer in Chicago working on a small side project to design a really good camping checklist app. **I'm looking to talk to people who car camp and/or backpack** and who have either made their own lists before or found it not worth the hassle.

Format would be via **Zoom**. I can offer you a **$20 REI gift card** as a small thank you for your time.

**DM me your email** and a sentence or two about your camping/backpacking habits if you're interested. I'm looking for **5 participants this round** but there will be more in the future 🤘",Looking for people to test a camping checklist app concept via Zoom. $20 REI gift card for 30-45 min of your time
camping,[deleted],60% off Garmin Vivoactive 3 today on Amazon
camping,,me irl.lol
camping,"Reddit, Im waiting on warmer weather to go camping for the first time ever, aside from Army “camping.” To add to that, I am bringing my 5 and 3 year old boys. What are some tips or recommendations? Also what are the essentials you wish you had on your first trip?",Newb Camper with kids.
camping,,Winter maintenance
camping,,"Naruto Shippuden, Chapter 1"
camping,,This fire pit
camping,,"Coffee at the pond on the propety of my grandpartens. never saw that much snow here, one of my favorite paces to relax"
camping,,Cosy raining car camp at the beach.
camping,,"North Cascades, Washington State. August 2020"
camping,,Secret beach cove.
camping,,Perfect coastal day.
camping,"I'm interested in camping for free (or cheap as possible) in areas I have not yet explored. Mostly in Utah if that matters. I would like to take advantage of BLM land when beginning my camping trips by car, but it is a bit intimidating driving 2+ hours, not knowing if you can safely and legally camp in a spot identifiable as BLM land from a map.

Basic google research tells me that I can camp anywhere on BLM land with certain restrictions. But I am concerned with the information the blm.gov website doesn't give me. They would have me believe I can camp almost anywhere on BLM land without a permit, but I have heard stories of people getting ticketed for camping on BLM land, or particular areas being unsuitable for camping. I know BLM land is free and I'm not going to be able to just drive in and have a picnic and firepit waiting for me (although for some it does seem that easy), but I can't be the only one to boondock in unfamiliar places on BLM land.

So I guess my question is, how do y'all get peace of mind when picking a spot to camp in the wilderness when far from home? Are there any specific apps or communities or websites you recommend? Are the blm.gov maps up to date? 

Again, I know BLM land isn't going to have the same luxuries of renting a pull-in spot at a KOA, but people seem to have success boondocking and car camping on BLM land. For my specific purposes I would be tent camping within a mile or so from my car (has 4x4), but I use the term car-camping because it's not BLM land I am familiar with, and I have to deal with parking my car somewhere.

So, any help would be appreciated.

TLDR; what ways can a beginner get peace of mind car-camping on BLM land?",Beginner's Guide to wilderness camping (free)?
camping,,"ITAP Sunset, camping in Erie PA 2020."
camping,[removed],Carriage RV &amp; Lifestyle RV Owners Club &amp; Forum
camping,[removed],Looking for Tent Advice - First timer
camping,"Hi Reddit. What are some large, cold weather tents do you all recommend? Thanks in advance",Best tents for camping in cold weather?
camping,,It was cold so we slept inside 🥶
camping,"Greetings, denizens of r/camping! I need your help!

I’m planning a month-long western US road/camping trip with my doggerino and am coming to you all for advice! I basically want the epic national park loop experience, but national forest instead so I can dispersed camp with the pup. Buuuut it’s hard to find information on specific parts of the national forests. I know many secret spots are closely guarded, but are there any you are willing to share? 

Bonus points for being national park-adjacent for the possibility of day trips! 

Thanks!!!!",Best dispersed camping in western US?
camping,,Whoever said overlanding is boring doesn't know what he was talking about. Check out the video
camping,"Went winter camping with my girlfriend. Thrilling experience but got a few tips that could help others. We had green spruce branches under us as well as sheep fur. We combined our sleeping bags together, got blanket over us and 2 layers of every clothing... We had simple tarp above us.

About wood:

* Most of the wood will be dry since there is no liquid water in winter so you will have no problem finding some spruce branches for starting the fire.
* Wood is dry, but hard to find... Most of the wood is covered by thick blanket of snow so your main source of wood will be standing/fallen trees
* Thus... 2 hands : 1 axe is a good ratio... thank me later...
* You won't have fire in the night... so deal with it...

Camping:

* Good ground isolation is absolute must!
* Another ones body warm is great but sleeping is worse then...
* Your roof will probably get damp from your breath so keep that in mind...

And also... most of your things that you plan to do won't probably be doable since you will be cold af, we planned on heating some stones to keep us warm during night... But we survived, got ideas for better next time... So hope this helps someone else too ;)

[https://imgur.com/a/](https://imgur.com/a/dEsJUbX)  
\*Our last fire before sleeping, girlfriend for scale :D",Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,I'm in the northeast US and I have a typical easy set up 6-person Coleman tent. Need some advice in keeping the inside of the tent warm.,Need advice for keeping the inside of your tent warm in the winter.
camping,"I've been looking for a practical celestial navigation book for the intent of camping and hiking, I can only find advanced sailing type of content though, do you guys know any reading that could help me?",Any Practical Celestial Navigation Book?
camping,,"Super soft, great fit! I’m 5’3” 150lbs G cup, fits so well!"
camping,Let's save the obvious where were you camping comment on every picture post.,Request: require the location be included in trip reports and photos
camping,"These advance solar generators can be kept charged with solar panels, AC power (when avail), 12v Car outlet, gas generator or even from a small wind turbine. 

This gives you more ways to keep your essential items running during a power outage or have portable power for camping &amp; outdoor events.  An advanced solar generator that's built here in the USA. 

[https://www.deltaforcepower.com](https://www.deltaforcepower.com)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img fv8apydfx3h61...*",Advanced Solar Generator That Charges With OR Without The Sun!
camping,,Guy do you know this thing and where can I get its parts ?
camping,,Some place in the Mexican cierra campaign site
camping,"My partner and I have booked every aspect of our 2-day Rim to Rim trek including the South Rim campsite, shuttle, and a Bright Angel campsite (even the steak dinner at Phantom Ranch to cut back on pack weight). We tried desperately to get a North Rim campsite or room at the lodge on both reservation opening days, but they were sold out immediately. Any advice on where to stay on **Sunday, June 20th**, the night before our trek?

We planned to be on the trail by 5am for heat considerations, and worry that camping outside the park will affect the heat-conscious schedule. For example, Kaibob Lodge has space, but the shuttle arrives at the trailhead at 6am, placing us in the Box between 10-11am. 

Any advice is appreciated. Also, if you're staying at the North Rim on June 20th and have space for 1 ultralight tent, we will lowkey pay you to cowboy camp. Help!",Grand Canyon North Rim - Everything but the Site!
camping," Happy Friday everyone. I am making this post because I recently created a similar group on Facebook, and several members here who have been enjoying it so far recommended that I share it with you all, as they thought that you might like it too. For the past couple of years, I have set up alerts on Amazon that tell me when ""Black Friday"" caliber or ""Door Buster"" sales begin within the Camping/Outdoors department. Many friends and family have asked me to let them know when an amazing deal pops up. I started receiving a lot of these requests so I decided to create a page dedicated to sharing the best deals that show up on my alerts. I have been receiving a lot of positive feedback on the sales that I find, so please check it out if the concept interests you. Thank you!

[https://www.facebook.com/groups/1409221645932599](https://www.facebook.com/groups/1409221645932599)",Camping/Outdoors Black Friday Deals Year-Round
camping,"I'm in the process of writing a **massive** tent camping guide, and I've arrived at the part where I let my readers know how much they can expect their gear to cost. 

I made a spreadsheet with all the important gear and their average prices and came up with a total of about $1000. Keep in mind that this is based on quality gear for camping at a campsite (so no wild camping). Do you guys think this is realistic? 

I also feel like there are things missing, but I can't think of any. Maybe you guys can take a look and share your thoughts? I would love to hear them.

Here is the spreadsheet: [https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/155gPQgEQ2E82EDEsig8x38tekTIb0DkkqNjSNUcfg7c/edit?usp=sharing](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/155gPQgEQ2E82EDEsig8x38tekTIb0DkkqNjSNUcfg7c/edit?usp=sharing)",Is this how much your gear costs?
camping,,"A boy, a dog, and adventure in the Blue Mountains of Eastern Oregon."
camping,,Jiangsu Yukoufu Is Superior Water Bottles Manufacturer and drinking water bottle supplier
camping,,Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,"Went winter camping with my girlfriend. Thrilling experience but got a few tips that could help others. We had green spruce branches under us as well as sheep fur. We combined our sleeping bags together, got blanket over us and 2 layers of every clothing... We had simple tarp above us.

About wood:

* Most of the wood will be dry since there is no liquid water in winter so you will have no problem finding some spruce branches for starting the fire.
* Wood is dry, but hard to find... Most of the wood is covered by thick blanket of snow so your main source of wood will be standing/fallen trees
* Thus... 2 hands : 1 axe is a good ratio... thank me later...
* You won't have fire in the night... so deal with it...

Camping:

* Good ground isolation is absolute must!
* Another ones body warm is great but sleeping is worse then...
* Your roof will probably get damp from your breath so keep that in mind...

And also... most of your things that you plan to do won't probably be doable since you will be cold af, we planned on heating some stones to keep us warm during night... But we survived, got ideas for better next time... So hope this helps someone else too ;)

\*Our last fire before sleeping, girlfriend for scale :D",Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,,Desert camping
camping,,Superior Borosilicate Pitcher and Water Bottle Supplier
camping,[removed],$5 for your opinion! At what age did you get your first cell phone? Help us with our study! ( PayPal / Amazon Gift Card )
camping,,Maple Soy Glazed Smoked SALMON- FIRE IT UP FRIDAY
camping,,"Throw back to my good bye camping tour before leaving Alaska, taken at a site outside of Mccarthy."
camping,,How To Love Wintertime Camping Even If You Hate The Outdoors
camping,,Hello. This is a picture of a tent and clay stove that I built
camping,,The best views are the ones you don’t need to sit up from your bed to see
camping,,How can ı find dry wood for the fire in the winter camping. What are your suggestions?
camping,,Camping nearby a glacier
camping,,Can’t beat beach camping (with the exception of flies that bite you).
camping,,Can’t beat beach camping in Australia. (With the exception of the sand and March flies)
camping,"1. Your drink stays nice and cool.

2. Don’t have to worry about keeping perishable food chilled.

3. The fire seems to feel a tad bit better.

4. Appreciation for when the sun is closer.

5? Everything freezes overnight. Everything.

Anybody have any other things that they love about winter camping?",Things I like about winter camping.
camping,Any opinions on these 3? Looking for something very comfy as a tall side sleeper. I prefer something a little heavier for sleep comfort--won't be backpacking with it. I'll be car camping this april in the south..so probably lows of 40 degrees F.,Big Agnes Torchlight vs Nemo Disco vs Nemo Tempo?
camping,,Woke up with this little fella next to the swag
camping,,Tell me you love cane's without telling me you love Cane's!
camping,,A little winter camping in Idaho.
camping,,4 days with the phone off=😀
camping,,"My daughter and I canoeing across Linda Lake in Algonquin Provincial Park, this was right in front of our camp, 4 days of beautiful weather and you can see the color change in the background."
camping,"Hello!
I am planning on going camping mid March and was looking for recommendations for your favorite camp sites that aren't too crowded, have a good view of the stars, and is close to Philadelphia, Delaware area?
I appreciate all of your help!
❤",Recommendations for East Coast!
camping,,Winter creeks in Oregon are the best!
camping,,Think I’ve seen this cabin in a horror film!
camping,,BIG NEWS! 1988 Toyota Fj62 Land Cruiser Beginning Stages of Part Out/ 1986 FJ60 First Drive/For Sale
camping,,New YETI Tundra 45! Slapped a few stickers on her already!
camping,,"Camping overnight in a tree in the backyard with hammock, lockdown vibes. Super enjoyable"
camping,,Honeymoon camping at Great Basin NP last summer
camping,,North Vancouver Island camping trip last fall
camping,"i'm trying to slowly chip away at the national parks, but to be honest am nervous about driving all the way out somewhere and not being able to camp/ not having a nearby backup campground. 

my general itinerary is this:

* austin --&gt; cloudcroft, new mexico area (to explore white sands). i want to camp in lincoln national forest for three nights.
* then after, drive from cloudcroft to guadalupe mountains national park and camp there for three nights. 
* then el paso area --&gt; austin. 

i'm a bit nervous because neither lincoln nor guadalupe mountains take advanced reservations. i just wanted to ask from people experienced here how early is early enough to grab a FCFS spot, generally? 

thanks so much, everyone!","how early should you arrive for first-come, first-served campsites?"
camping,,Morning coffee after camping next to preserved old Romans wells in Croatia during my thru-hike last summer.
camping,,Snow camping set up in Grouse Ridge
camping,,"Sometimes all I need is my tent and my guitar [OC] [White Mountains NH, last summer]"
camping,,WIN OUR CAMPERVAN FOR £5!
camping,,Hot French press morning coffee in the frozen forest ☕
camping,,"Photos of Yosemite’s ""firefall"" — a stunning yet brief February phenomenon"
camping,,"Cedar Creek WMA, GA"
camping,,"Cedar Creek WMA, GA"
camping,,This is Tenerife Island in Spain. We went surfing and camping. I stoped to take some photos. What do you think?!
camping,,Some photos from my last scout trip
camping,[removed],Backpacking food for the trail: What are your thoughts?
camping,"Husband and I love camping in Michigan's UP, but haven't branched out much on *where* we stay. 

We also love Kentucky &amp; Tennessee's LBL, and usually spend half the day driving around looking for a good spot to set up. Any recommendations there?


Also East coast beach camping!?
Never been to the ocean but would love to sleep on the beach. 

I'm excited and trying to get at least one good trip planned before our baby is due in July.","Favorite spots in MI, KY &amp; TN"
camping,,Mirror Lake State Park-Wisconsin Winter Camping 6°
camping,,One of the best fire I’ve done!!! Btw that is me
camping,"Hello, I am part of a group of business students conducting interviews for a project developing a business in the camping industry. We are looking for candidates to interview (virtually), which take about 10 minutes of your time. If you would like to help us with the project, please PM me for more info, or leave a comment saying you're interested.

Thanks for reading!",University Students Looking For Some Interviewees
camping,,Winter Camping in the Arizona Superstition Wilderness
camping,,Great view
camping,,Snow camping setup
camping,,"Was cooking breakfast this morning when this little guy paid me a visit. Negev Desert, Israel"
camping,,Army helicopters continue search operation on K2 for Ali Sadpara and team
camping,,"Winter Camping, It’s Just More Fun!"
camping,,"Winter Camping, Fun Than Summer Camping"
camping,,Camping as a therapy for grief?
camping,,Best Small Hiking Backpack
camping,,Big cool birds
camping,,Seeking campground suggestions on this route - May 2021
camping,,Reflective beauty in WA.
camping,,Hidden gem in BFE Nevada
camping,,Found at secret location in George Washington NF
camping,"I have run across one— we’ve been camping in a pop up, which we like a lot but It’s dying. I’m thinking a Rialta is a nice combination of low drama and still able to boondock. Am I right?",Anybody have a Rialta?
camping,I don’t spend a lot of time in the woods and haven’t dealt with ticks before. I’m taking my kids camping over spring break to an area that has a lot of ticks according to some reviews I’ve read. Is there a certain bug repellent that is really good for ticks or any other trick I can use to keep them away? My kids are younger and aren’t going to do the best job at checking their clothes and stuff for ticks.,How to avoid ticks?
camping,,Since we're talking about gear storage
camping,,Adirondacks Forest
camping,,Hello. This is a bamboo tent I built
camping,,Who likes organizing their gear almost as much as camping?
camping,,How do you afford to camp year round?
camping,,Planning to camp in 2021? Here's what you need to know
camping,"Do you know of any that are open?  I want to possibly go next weekend, and I honestly haven't camped before.  I don't wanna bring much supplies, but if anything I have a wrangler that I can sleep in to stay warm.",Good beginner camping spot in Shenandoah?
camping,,Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,,"It's a dream come true, having a fire in the snow. Looking at snow and trees while sipping on coffee. Now I wait for another snow day, for the second stage of the dream, Camping in the snow."
camping,[deleted],Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,[deleted],Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,[deleted],First fire in the snow
camping,,OVERNIGHT stay in BUSHCRAFT SHELTER. HOMEMADE ICE CREAM
camping,,Went on a camping trip in the mountains of Utah and got this stunning picture 💙
camping,,"Trying to find my camping chair drunk, after the fire goes out, and no headlamp."
camping,"Particularly with six rivers it seems there are a lot of options all along the river. They all seem so beautiful!

Particularly oak bottom and panther flat’s campsites in six rivers seem to appeal to me. I like lush greens, rivers, watching fish, and water ponds.",Planning a Patrick’s point and six rivers trip? Which campsites do you recommend?
camping,"I moved to Wisconsin in May of last year. I haven't gone camping in forever. I need to get away from it all. The problem is, the snow is packed up! I'm not sure what type of gear I need. I lived in Texas before and camping there is a lot easier. What's some gear I should bring? What type of tent should I use? Thanks!",Can someone recommended camping gear for the cold/snow?
camping,,Planning a camping trip? Probably going to need a camp fire at some point and time right? We have top quality rich pine aka fatwood bundles perfect for getting your fire going! Contact us now for an exclusive offer! Diamond State rich pine aka fatwood! https://etsy.me/2Z38Sdl
camping,,Our family trip to Tammisaari
camping,Hi y’all I’m looking for some hot spring recommendations. I’m located in the central coast of California / Northern California. I’ve seen a lot of info going around I’m just looking for some first hand recommendations. Preferably free natural hot springs with camping near by of course.,HOT SPRINGS WANTED
camping,,My two most used knives. The one was my great grandmothers shed knife. And the folding knife my grandfather and I found metal detecting (Knobel’s Grove) in the early 80s. I use these for EVERYTHING camping cooking hacking carving fishing hunting fingernails etc.
camping,,"To Winson and Gladys. From the Hornbrook family, grande prairie Alberta."
camping,,Little campfire behind my house
camping,,Could as many people do this sign but the place you’re from? It’s my grandparents 60th anniversary! Want to reach as many as possible!
camping,Hmu with something you'd do with no one else in the room,Bored so let's chat
camping,,Amongst the pidgeons
camping,,View of Mount Adams from a cliffside campsite at the base of Mount St. Helens
camping,,Wild camping spots in the UK
camping,,Waking up early for the road trip and getting such views on the way
camping,"Can somebody explain about wood for fire while camping? I camp using freecampsites.com, but I’m afraid to get some kind of ticket for illegal fires or , especially, cutting wrong wood. What are the rules? Like, most of the times I can collect small/medium sticks, but when I see dead tree I’m afraid to use saw/axe to collect big blocks for overnight fires.

When I watch YouTube videos, a lot of the time In forests of Siberia it’s like “cut whatever you want”

Also, any cheap tent/wood stove setup advice? 
Currently I’ve Kelly Gunnison 2p tent",Wood and camping(USA)
camping,"First post! I have been a long time lurker on this subreddit but have been an avid camper my entire life. I'm in the process of building a Tacoma with roof top tent setup for the spring. 

I had been in the market for a rotomolded cooler for a while. I looked at all the big brands like Yeti and Pelican as well as some options we have readily available here like Woods and ProFrost. I needed a large capacity cooler because at times we will have up to 6 people using it at once. After seeing one in person I ended up going with a Whiterock cooler (TRK78). The build quality matches that of all the top end brands but what really set it apart was it's latch system. It has this 2 stage ""detent"" that not only seems to really set the seal perfectly but also makes opening and closing so much easier. 

I have only done some preliminary tests with it at home but I will eventually be doing some side by side comparisons this spring with some bigger name brands and see how it performs. First impressions though are really solid! 

My truck build starts at the end of February and I am looking forward to sharing more pictures of the build!",Whiterock Coolers
camping,"I'm pretty particular about campgrounds. This one just didn't cut it. 
[hickory knob](https://youtu.be/-ouCD3bH7Vs)",We were under-whelmed with this place.
camping,,Foggy morning at the state park last weekend
camping,,Found a huge mirror on the trail!
camping,,"They get caught by the police in Africa, get caught by a sandstorm in Sahara, outdoor camping for more than one year, get married while couchsurfing and a lot more... Fully subtitled in Turkish, German and English | Morocco cycling adventure | 20 episodes of outdoor survival cycling through Africa"
camping,,Hello from Tammisaari camping -20 c
camping,I've camped when it has snowed before but I've never set up a tent in the existing snow. Do I clear the snow away first and then put the tent directly on the ground or do I set up on the snow?,Camping in snow question
camping,"Heads up: I am suuuuper frustrated, so I apologize if this is inflammatory.

This year sequoia national park changed how they you request backcountry permits - yay no more faxing in and wondering if you got a permit! So I got on as soon as it opened to make sure I could get passes for the trips I was intersted in. Opens at 7am and the site doesn't even crash or anything - whoopee! BUT, half the campsites are not listed, some trails are on there while others are completely missing - I was scrambling to replan all my trips around the available sites for so long that I couldn't get any of the permits! Can someone explain to me why so many campsites are missing!?!?!?!

&amp;#x200B;

Im so bummed - I had 4 trips ready for booking in priority order in case I had any trouble and now have none. yup, just sitting here crying. I'm crushed.

&amp;#x200B;

check out [recreation.gov](https://recreation.gov) it's even a nice website!",sequoia new permitting system...how does it work?
camping,,My set up Vs my Buddy's
camping,,"Camping without tent, only sleeping bags. No fire, only cold food. Sunrise. Spain. Summer 2019."
camping,[removed],How to make a tequila table.
camping,,Love my hammock
camping,,Sunset in wonderland
camping,,A good buddy on mine does survival gear review. He is an Air Force SERE specialist and just want to show him some love. Take a look.
camping,,Funds for university
camping,,"Junior sous chef Archie the beagle, helping cook breakfast at the camp kitchen in Moab, Utah"
camping,"To start this off, I live in Ohio, and my friends and I want to go camping, but we’re not really sure where to go, or even where to start looking. To explain our confusion, we do not really want to go to a national park or any campground, rather, we want to be able to go somewhere where we can be as loud as possible. Not asking for spots, just asking about how we should go about finding a place.",How to find a good camping spot?
camping,,When your husband wants to test out the portable solar setup...
camping,[removed],New camping rental company
camping,"We have looked &amp; looked &amp; looked, and finally we believe we have found it. OUR DREAM CAMPGROUND!!! We can’t give too many details yet, because our offer was just accepted, but it has over 100 sites consisting of tents, cabins, RVs and RV sites, lake, river, pool, gameroom, lots of activities and close to major attractions. 

We are so incredibly excited to continue building upon the amazing place it already is &amp; make it even greater. Our dream is to have a destination campground that is a beautiful, restful, politics-free zone, that becomes your regular spring, summer or fall getaway and the happy place you go to in your head all year long. Follow us on our journey and then follow us to our destination.",WE THINK WE’VE FOUND IT!!!
camping,Does anyone have permanent sites? Just bought a small piece of land on a local river. Looking for ideas. Maybe an outhouse and permanent camp kitchen? Will be using a tent for a while at least.,Permanent campsite?
camping,"I’m looking for spots away from people, not campgrounds. Thank you!",Best camping in the San Bernardino mountains (CA)
camping,,Beautiful Vietnam
camping,,Sunrise over wonderland
camping,,"Moro Campground, Crystal Cove State Park, Laguna Beach, California"
camping,"Me(37m) and my 2 daughters(both 6f) are currently camping. The girls shower room is a 5 minute walk from the men's shower room and I'm not comfortable leaving my girls alone for that amount of time.

The showers have no curtains or walls to prevent people from looking at them and am wondering if there is anything I can do to prevent any potential creeps from watching them",How do I keep people from watching my daughters shower while camping
camping,"I'm not the one planning it, my mom is, so I want to know which thing I should suggest to her for what we should do in June when we go to Maine. 

Thank you to anyone who should respond.",How should I go about planning a camping trip/ booking a cabin and or lodge?
camping,,Wir geben niemals auf
camping,So my sleeping bag is rated at 1C or 35F and I have a sleeping bag liner I’ll also be wearing long johns sweatpants and sweater and a hat while sleeping. I’ll have a wool blanket beneath my insulated sleeping pad. Will all this be enough for -20 or should I get a warmer sleeping bag all together. I was fairly warm previously when I had gone in -9. This was without the liner. What do you guys think,Winter camping advice
camping,,Someone (me) forgot to weigh down the tent
camping,,A warm weekend at Burnt Corral campground
camping,,"Enjoying the weather with the locals. Port Macquarie, Australia."
camping,,"One of my favorite sites, tucked away on an easy and gorgeous 12-mile loop in SE Wyoming."
camping,My wife and I have a campsite in Yosemite in April. It’s a Saturday and Sunday night. We’re looking to do a little backpacking trip on Friday and coming back Saturday. Does anyone have any recommendations? Not wanting to get too much elevation for storms and snow etc. going to do my research since my wilderness permit for my first choice (ten lakes) was denied for that time of year.,2 day backpacking trip in Yosemite. 2nd week of April.
camping,"This winter I started trying my hand at cold weather camping and have been enjoying it so far! however something that has prevented me from extended trips is that I always seem to end up getting my sleeping bag wet overnight. I've been sleeping in a tent (Cabelas Alaskan Guide Model Geodisic 4man for reference) and so far i've always gone with a friend or 2. The tent is big enough for 3 comfortably but inevitably, when sharing the tent I brush up against the edges of the frost covered tent walls. Is there a way to prevent the frost from building up along the walls of the tent? I had read vending is a necessary thing to do and last trip we slept with the window on the door opened. I also (mistakenly) tried a waterproof slip to cover my sleeping bag but I ended up awake at 3AM soaked through (down bag too...). My theory is sweat/respiration from the body got trapped inside the waterproof cover. 

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR: How do i properly vent my tent and how can i make sure frost won't build up before it's already gotten my gear wet...",How can I stay dry at night cold weather camping?
camping,,"Lake Powell, Utah. One of my favorite campsites."
camping,,"Looking to take our pop up camper out more. We live in Temecula, CA so prefer to stay in So Cal. Any suggestions for areas where the roads aren’t too bad?"
camping,,Barbecue (BBQ) in the Forest | Pork Steak | Pork Sausages | Pork Kebabs
camping,"Please confirm if this is even normal, because i believe this is very dangerous, and before anyone says why are you tipping on its side if this was in a tent really there could be 100 reasons why this could happen and very easily be knocked over, i cant believe its supposed to be like this

so i just brought a kampa parabolic heater i was using in our tent after i took out and only turned heater on its side for a second and - this f\*ki\*g happened

please confirm if this is even normal really

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=63NTKaEqyIE&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;ab\_channel=rosra](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=63NTKaEqyIE&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;ab_channel=rosra)",is this even normal video included very dangerous
camping,"So my family and I are interested in doing more camping...more nature oriented get aways and less to tourist attractions. The last time though we camped in a tent, it was a disaster. Rained like crazy, we got soaked, it was freezing...but the lake, the kayaking, the hiking were amazing!!! So, we're trying to figure out the best way to do this. Bigger tent with cots, pop-up, etc. RVs seem just ridiculously expensive to me and I really don't get how anyone justifies the cost when considering gas mileage, site fees, wear and tear, property tax, registration, etc. I'd love to hear what gear others use and love and how to make camping more endurable during bad weather. I am leaning toward a large tent with cots and air matresses, but I am fairly new to all this. Camped a lot as a kid, but only a few times as an adult. Want my daughter to love it as well, and not hate it because of the lack of a good night's sleep.",Tent or.....?
camping," ⁣  
𝐈’𝐯𝐞 𝐛𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐨𝐟𝐟 𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐟𝐨𝐫 𝐚𝐛𝐨𝐮𝐭 𝐟𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐝𝐚𝐲𝐬. 𝐀𝐟𝐭𝐞𝐫 𝐝𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚 𝟓 𝐝𝐚𝐲 𝐟𝐚𝐬𝐭, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐰𝐚𝐬 𝐬𝐮𝐩𝐩𝐨𝐬𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐛𝐞 𝐚 𝐜𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐭 𝐦𝐞𝐚𝐥, 𝐭𝐮𝐫𝐧𝐞𝐝 𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐨 𝐜𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐭 𝐃𝐀𝐘𝐒. ⁣  
⁣  
𝐈 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐫𝐞𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐭 𝐢𝐭. 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐞’𝐬 𝐰𝐡𝐲:⁣  
⁣  
•𝐈 𝐜𝐚𝐧’𝐭 𝐫𝐞-𝐠𝐚𝐢𝐧 𝟓𝟎 𝐩𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐬 𝐢𝐧 𝟓 𝐝𝐚𝐲𝐬.⁣  
•𝐈𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐨𝐰𝐞𝐝 𝐦𝐞 𝐚𝐧 𝐨𝐩𝐩𝐨𝐫𝐭𝐮𝐧𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐚𝐧𝐚𝐥𝐲𝐳𝐞 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐠𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐨𝐧 𝐢𝐧 𝐦𝐲 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐭𝐫𝐢𝐠𝐠𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐦𝐞, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐝𝐢𝐟𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐬𝐚𝐦𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐧𝐞𝐰 𝐭𝐨 𝐦𝐲 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐦𝐚𝐲 𝐢𝐦𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐰𝐚𝐲 𝐈 𝐝𝐨 𝐨𝐫 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐭𝐚𝐤𝐞 𝐜𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐦𝐲 𝐛𝐨𝐝𝐲.⁣  
•𝐈𝐭 𝐠𝐢𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐦𝐞 𝐚 𝐜𝐡𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞 𝐭𝐨 𝐩𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐦𝐲𝐬𝐞𝐥𝐟 𝐰𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐚 𝐰𝐚𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐜𝐡𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐞𝐧𝐠𝐞 𝐦𝐲 𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐬𝐞𝐭, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐛𝐨𝐝𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐠𝐞𝐭 𝐛𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐨𝐧 𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐤. ⁣  
⁣  
𝐌𝐨𝐬𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐮𝐬 𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐟𝐫𝐨𝐦 𝐮𝐧𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐡𝐲 𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐤𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐡𝐚𝐛𝐢𝐭𝐬. 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐢𝐬 𝐚 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐜𝐞𝐬𝐬, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐢𝐭’𝐬 𝐨𝐤𝐚𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐡𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐬𝐨𝐦𝐞 𝐛𝐮𝐦𝐩𝐬 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐛𝐫𝐮𝐢𝐬𝐞𝐬 𝐚𝐥𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐰𝐚𝐲. ⁣  
𝐎𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐥𝐞𝐟𝐭, 𝐈 𝐰𝐚𝐬 𝐦𝐲 𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐯𝐢𝐞𝐬𝐭 𝐰𝐞𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭, 𝟐𝟒𝟓. ⁣  
𝐎𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭, 𝐈 𝐡𝐚𝐝 𝐣𝐮𝐬𝐭 𝐥𝐨𝐬𝐭 𝐧𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐥𝐲 𝟒𝟎 𝐩𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐬. 𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐰𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐭𝐢𝐦𝐞𝐬 𝐈 𝐡𝐚𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐞𝐭! ⁣  
𝐈 𝐝𝐢𝐝𝐧’𝐭 𝐡𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐢𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐨𝐠𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐠𝐡 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐣𝐨𝐮𝐫𝐧𝐞𝐲, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐈 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐧𝐨𝐰, 𝐛𝐮𝐭 𝐈 𝐤𝐞𝐞𝐩 𝐦𝐨𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐨𝐰𝐚𝐫𝐝𝐬 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐬.

# To learn more contact : bhaktigiti108@gmail. com (remove space)",How I lost 40 pounds in just few days
camping,,"My brother gave me this DEER,I love my brother."
camping,,Finally home from a great weekend at the Blue River and some successful trout fishing. Made for a good dinner over the campfire.
camping,,"Camping in the Valley of the Gods, UT. [OC]"
camping,,"Valley of the Gods, UT. [OC]"
camping,,"A frosty night Valley of the Gods, Ut. [OC]"
camping,,Love me some campfire meals 😍
camping,,"Best time of the year to visit and camp in Death Valley National Park, California"
camping,,"Daydreaming at work, thinking of all the camping I'll be doing this spring. Here's a couple photos from last year."
camping,,"Best time of the year to visit and camp in Death Valley National Park, California"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img nrxzzfm976g61...*

Whether you're heading off to the park for a weekend picnic or you want something to stop your lunch from turning into a warm soggy mess before your lunch break at the office or college, a decent food cooler bag is essential. There are several types of coolers, the main ones which are made from hard molded plastic or strong synthetic fiber.

Most people have a cooler that is hard, which can mean heavy or bulky, making its' mobility limited. Here, MIER soft cooler made from durable fabric with thick insulating materials, but they are more lightweight, practical, easily packing away when not in use. Even more, most [MIER cooler bags](https://www.miersports.com/collections/coolers-lunch-bags) Inside using heat-welded seams to prevent flexible liner leaks, very easy to clean when spilled juice/soup.  


So how to choose the best cooler for yourself? There are some points for you chosen:  


* Thicker insulating linings generally work better and look out for fastenings such as strong zips to help keep the air out.
* Name brand cooler, which is using food-grade material.
* The Interior is heat-welded seams so that it can prevent leaks.
* Solid stitching reinforcement on all stress point, especially the shoulder strap.
* Easy to foldable and store.

To understand this, you need to look at all aspects of a cooler. All in all, we need to measure performance — how cold it stayed, how easily it loaded, how durable it was against leaks, how comfortable it was to carry. So interesting! Hope this information can help you. Anyway, we welcome you to email us to tell us your good idea or suggestion.",How to Choose a Best Cooler Bag for Yourself
camping,What tents and or manufacturers are using polyester for their tent flats? Not pros or cons question just wondering what companys are using it on the tents.,Which tents have polyester fly material?
camping,,Supper in the rockies 😍
camping,,Our riverside campsite this weekend
camping,,Me &amp; my best friend built a fort in the woods &amp; watched cartoons.
camping,[deleted],It was cold so we slept inside
camping,"Hi hope it's ok to post this as a first time poster here.

&amp;#x200B;

I own a canvas bell tent for when i go camping (or more often larping) and i was looking to invest in some equipment this year. 

&amp;#x200B;

I was looking at getting a in tent heater but not really sure about the best options out there and it will need to be suitable for use in the months of Late November and December. I know propane heating is out because it's really bad circulation in the tent and carbon dioxide.

&amp;#x200B;

I have alternatively been looking at a hand cranked/solar panelled battery pack which has a usb port in it. To have one of the small office/desk heaters. However i don't know how reliable and useful a small heater such as that is.

More often than not we never have an electrical port because we are camping right in the middle of the woods so it needs to be something portable and the like.

&amp;#x200B;

Any suggestions?",In Tent Heaters!
camping,"Since life is on hold, I thought that maybe making a channel of my campfires would be a nice thing that brings some kind of joy to some people out there.No talking, no me promoting some brands or any other kind of bullshit. Just videoes of campfires, atleast once a week. Feel free to check out.

And Admin, delete this post if it's against some guidelines.  


[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bq8Igd0ms64](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bq8Igd0ms64)",Made a channel for my bonfires/campfires
camping,,"Promised the daughter we would go camping, and then got quarantined. Still had a pretty good time in the backyard though! (Eastern NM, USA)"
camping,,"Don’t feed the deer, camping or not"
camping,,"Car camping with a British Roadster, spotted on Vancouver Island, BC (Summer 2019)"
camping,"Any suggestions for the best resources to find good dispersed camping spots on BLM land or National Forests? I like AllTrails but its more for hiking and not camping. It would be nice to have a combination of trails and roads and boundaries of BLM and National Forests so I know where I can and can't go camping on public land.

Thanks!",Best app/website for dispersed camping?
camping,Just curious on your experiences with woodstove winter camping. What is your set up with the cost and sleeping capabilities? Looking into an alaska trip next winter,Anybody use hot tents?
camping,"We’re looking to do a late March trip with the kids and my wife would love a spot where you can hear water. She doesn’t sleep great while camping, and I think some flowing water white noise would help. She also just really likes being near water, generally.

I have some spots in mind, but all are in the mountains where it’ll be pretty cold for tent camping in March. I’d love to find a place at lower elevations that would work. Primitive is fine. We’d be car camping, but don’t need electric, etc.

We’re in the Piedmont of North Carolina. Any suggestions within a few hours?",Riverside/stream side camping in NC/SC/VA?
camping,,OfflineDay starts at Sunset this Friday. Here's a friendly reminder. Enjoy your time away from all the noise. With love - OffllineDay
camping,"I am currently renting a house that has a bed outside (regular mattress, pillows, sheets etc). It's super comfortable to lay there during the day, but unfortunately due to the humidity at night, the sheets get absolutely drenched. Are there are other gear I can buy that will keep moisture free in high humidity? I am thinking of buying an air mattress. Any suggestions for something more comfortable? And what about the sheets and blanket/duvet?

https://preview.redd.it/ldvrdtkbphf61.jpg?width=1500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=047a95f43fe8ae4f1bd02380803d6a8ea80ee5d7",Outdoor Bed (Permanent) - Materials?
camping,"Hello Reddit,  Looking for some advice/ideas/suggestions for some great camping places/trip plans for across Canada.  We live in Ontario and have done some camping in the area but we are looking into doing a 2 week (ish) camping trip either out west or east of Canada.  We were hoping to ask fellow reddit followers for some ideas/suggestions etc to make this a great trip.  So send us your camp ground ideas, hiking trails, kayaking spots etc., we would love to hear it all!",Canada West/East Camping Ideas
camping,[removed],Lighter camper options for under 10K?
camping,"**Cold winds:**

In all my previous camping trips in winter, I must have been lucky to not having much wind, that luck ended the last few days. With day temp being a cozy -10 deg C, and night time towards -19 deg C, sitting by the campfire did not warm my feet. I also could not literally warm my boots too close to the fire, maybe risking the glue and the plastic on my boots coming undone. I realized then that a single layer of wool socks probably wasn't enough. Seems like I would have to consider buying some larger boots that I can use with two pairs of socks + a plastic bag inside.

&amp;#x200B;

**Boots:**

Ugh, I need better/larger boots in winter that is warmer. A single medium thick wool socks isn't warm enough for me.

&amp;#x200B;

**Drying socks and failing:**

I tired two times to dry my wool socks at the campfire. Once at the side of the flames, and the other time lower at the side of the hot coals. Both times my socks melted and either turned into stiff plastic, or became so brittle, and two socks of different pair ended up with a hole in them. :(

&amp;#x200B;

**De-icing my tent:**

On a positive note, I managed to de-frost my tent after a couple of days out in the cold. I very carefully, used a trangia spirit burner with full fuel, and burned that on the trangia triangle stand, on top of a plastic thingy so it all wouldn't risk melt the bottom or slide around. **I made sure to stand outside the tent during the burning as I had no idea just how dangerous it might be re. toxic carbon monoxide and carbon dioxide.** The flame was not hot/high enough to damage the top of the tent. It was surprising to see that the interior temperatur rose to what must have been +10 or warmer, also making sure I have some ventilation going on. I manage to defrost most of the interior in a single burn, with some small stuff left in the corners.

Edit: I should keep better eye on things, because just because I managed to de-ice the tent once, maybe it won't work as well the next time. Only did it once.

&amp;#x200B;

**Spirit burner fuel:**

I made sure to bring an excess amount of spirit burner fuel, and I am happy having done that, never really having to worry too much about running out anytime soon when making food.

&amp;#x200B;

**A relaxing campfire:**

Well, assuming there isn't any wind, it is a good idea to floss/brush teeth and eating food and whatever by the campfire, instead of doing that later in the cold. Melting a little snow on the fire is also fairly trivial, and doesn't have to reach boiling point for brushing one's teeth.

&amp;#x200B;

**Changing clothes in the cold:**

I like changing first the top side, and then the pants side, while being in my sleeping bag, either in the evening, or early in the morning before I get up.

&amp;#x200B;

**Thawing food by the campfire:**

So, thawing food by the campfire was simple enough, I just had to be a little patient. Also, bad idea placing hot dog buns inside my jacket, three of them became squished. :) Also, thawing a small bottle of mustard, I had no patience for that. Placing the small bottle of ketchup some time before eating, made most of the ketchup liquid and usable. To my surprise, the ""beer sticks"" (meat) that I had brought with me, had not frozen, and could be eaten as such without warming them up.

&amp;#x200B;

**Failing to dry my sleeping bag:**

So, after some time out in the freezing cold, I can't help breath onto the top part of the sleeping bag, and that stuff turns to ice. Afaik, that icy part is not a big issue, but still, hanging my sleepin bag to dry outside, there was too much shade and hardly any sun shone onto the sleeping bag, and with the sun being so low this time of the year, I gave up drying to dry the sleeipng bag in the sun, and brought it home instead. :| I have no idea how damp if at all my sleeping bag was, probably not an issue, but then again, I have no idea.

&amp;#x200B;

**Added:** I have for the previous two weeks been in and out of the woods, either camping or just being out in the cold, and looking at my toes, two are blue (the ones beside the big toe), and should they fall off, it is an improvement, from when I was camping out in -5 deg C, and lose two big toe nails, and the two beside. I actucally had to yank them off, because they did not want to fall off by themselves. :| My last bad camping trip in 2018, my other shoes became wet and very cold from goofing around in the powdery snow (just wool socks inside autumn boots), and I was unable to start a fire the first day.

&amp;#x200B;

**Bacon:**

Frozen. Bacon.  Hard to manage unless you go for thawing the whole package. Probably best to protion at home, before it all gets frozen hard. I sort of managed, and had bacon wrapped hot dogs with sesame seed buns. :) I also brought lompe because there were 8 buns for my 9 hot dogs. I also brought tortillas for my re-hydrated hot meals, but I never used any and took them home. They too ofc were frozen, but with lompe it was rather easy to separate into individual pieces when frozen.

&amp;#x200B;

**Snow brush thingy:**

So, I brought along a snow brush for a car and it worked nicely for cleaning off snow from the oversnowed campsite and also boots and tent.",I learned some new things duing winter camping
camping,,"Camping in Toujen, Tunisia be like"
camping,,By the Bonfire
camping,[removed],New Year 2021 celebration package in Rishikesh
camping,,Been going through a rough patch and one of my friends decided to get me outside; Northern Singapore.
camping,[removed],Hope you’ve had or having another brilliant day
camping,,California Hotsprings
camping,,smokenado
camping,,Ladybug Season
camping,"I’m taking my husband on our first car camping trip when it gets warmer. We are in the process of acquiring our gear, so have no idea what size boxes we should plan on getting for kitchen and sleeping/gear stuff.

We have a sedan (no hatchback) and a medium sized dog on the back seat. I was planning on putting the cooler next to him on the seat. 

Would it be better to just have one plastic bin in the trunk with kitchen stuff and dry food in and rest of the stuff spread between a duffel bag and smaller plastic bin?

We would only be going for a weekend on our first trip.

Any recommendations for a setup would be helpful! Thanks 😀",Recommendations for kitchen and gear box size... (first trip)
camping,,"My 3yo had had enough of the campfire shenanigans, so she went into the tent alone to read Pete the Cat Goes Camping 😸"
camping,,Cooking steak dinner in the back of my Suburban Camper
camping,,Where To Buy Professional Eyeshadow Palettes In Bulk
camping,,"Past Trip to Rainbow Mountain Whistler, Canada."
camping,,Stayed at Lake of the Ozarks State Park last summer. So many deer that would come straight up to the campsites!
camping,"... and it has friends nearby...

Hi! My girlfriend and I are camping down in Turkey and starting 21:00 yesterday, a stray dog has been barking and growling at the entrance of our tent. There seems to be a massive pack patrolling the forest.

We figured it'd just leave eventually, but guess what: it is still here 11 hours later... 

Any advice? Would it be a better idea to just get out of the tent completely so we can scare it off and give fighting it off a better chance (in the case that may be necessary) or should we take a more slow and friendly approach?

I would usually go for a friendly approach, but this dog is clearly very upset with our presence. We're not scared of dogs, but would prefer to keep our limbs intact. 

Thanks!",There's a very angry dog outside our tent...
camping,,VR Camping Videos!
camping,,Really missing mornings like these! I took this on a disposable camera. Adds to the nostalgia camping holds for me.
camping,"So the first part of this is from listening to ""missing 411"" as well as creepypasta stories -Which is very wide but can have a subset for camping and stuff- BASICALLY just creepy/scary stories that may or may not be true. Can you share yours or link to a good scary story?

ALSO the reason I am posting is because I currently live in my car BUT I have never camped before. I was at a Walmart and saw a $25 ""3 person"" tent and thought ""Gee that is pretty cheap""...

So can you tell me:

What all do I need to camp? What to buy and stuff? Be pretty specific and detailed?

What are the dangers and how do you combat them? Honestly I have considered buying a BBGun cause they are $30 at Walmart but I didn't know if it was considered a ""Gun"" or of I was legally allowed to keep it in my car or if I need a permit, etc... But staying in my car has proven VERY safe and I have never had an issue... Even so I am kinda scared of camping... If anything I would want to know in case of an emergency....?

Oh and also how do you eat and stuff? I don't want to kill any animals or anything...",CREEPY Camping Stories? PLUS How Can I Try To Camp?
camping,,Had to take a layout photo before a nice quiet trip in the jungles of Guam.
camping,My friend wants to go on a 3-6 hour hike and then camp out at the top for her birthday. I have never before been camping or hiking for that long so i have no idea how to plan this. What do we need? Where can i look for places that i can camp at and that have nice hiking trails? Please help me out,Camping trip in CT
camping,[deleted],Scratch made fire pizza!
camping,,"What is your most cherished camping item? Mine is my Grandfathers's 55 year old stove. It is one of 2 items I have of his. He died before I was born, and I am very glad to have it. I'd like to restore it one day, but until then I'm glad to be using it very regularly."
camping,,From a recent 4 day solo trip. Is winter anyone else's favorite time to get out?
camping,[deleted],Most recent trip to Alamo Lake State Park (AZ)
camping,[removed],"I need feedback, please"
camping,,Tips for camping sandbars during a kayak trip?
camping,[deleted],Hey guys ! Can you set up a tent in a isolated park for a few hours ?
camping,,Rate my setup
camping,,"tried cooking rice in a bamboo for the first time, i'd it went prenty well. hahaha"
camping,,"My favorite camping purchase by far! Thule Tepui Autana 3 with annex. Odell Lake, Oregon"
camping,,I brought my kids to the same spot my dad took my brother and I camping 25 years ago.
camping,,That camp food.
camping,Wondering how strict they are with the number of tents allowed on a site. It says expanded sites can have 12 people but only 2 tents... if 6 people have 3 backpacking tents would the make us leave?,Has anyone camped at Peanut Island in palm beach?
camping,,Tuskegee National Forest. Alabama looking kinda spooky.
camping,,a box of kindling camper joy
camping,[removed],Water Straw Filters
camping,"My fiancé and I want to take a camping  trip soon and we are unsure of what the best camping spots near us with little to no fees? Somewhere that offers camping year round, drive up spot, porta potty’s, picnic tables, fire pits, preferably 1-2 hours drive from us in Eugene Oregon? Also preferably somewhere where it’s a larger campground and most likely other campers there?",Oregon Camping Spots
camping,,"Me and my 3 friends are camping in Big Bear, California in the snow for 3 days, 2 nights. Any advice?"
camping,,"From our hike up to the falls while camping - Fall Creek Falls State Park, TN, January 2021"
camping,,"Being out in the rain is still better then being stuck indoors, most of the time"
camping,,First time making Shakshuka. I really recommend this as a breakfast dish during cold weather.
camping,Me and some buddy’s are looking to plan a trip to the Grand Canyon SOON and I was wondering if there was any free BLM land nearby that anyone could suggest?! And if so where is it located? Thanks!,Need a Grand Canyon camping sight
camping,"I've been looking at tents for my future 8 day camping trips (4 times a month April - August) and I have landed on this tent

Any thoughts before I buy it? 

It is a 3-season tent and if you're wondering, I'm interested in the teal navy one. 

Is the North face a trusted brand for tents?",The North Face Homestead Roomy 2 Tent
camping,"Hey all,

I am new to thermal pads. I had some questions that I figured people who camp alot would know!

* Do you think thermal pads are worth investment when it comes to low 40s (f) or are they meant for lower?
* Do you still use an air pad on top of these? Or are they meant to replace? 
* Any recommendations on brands? I see there are air type (like the air pad I use) and there are foam types that fold up in a Z shape. 

Im looking to do some camping where it usually wont get below 40 or so. Smaller form/lighter is great but i dont need it to be that.",Question on Thermal Pads
camping,Suggestions are appreciated!,Looking for a campground where I can leave a camper year round in Michigan’s UP.
camping,,Water treating techniques?
camping,,Natural Spring
camping,,My First Month Car Camping :)
camping,,No frying pan? No problem! Throwback to steaming a salmon filet over pine boughs while dispersed camping in Pisgah.
camping,,You can tell from my designs I’m from the PNW
camping,"We are planning a trip from Utah to Montana to see family, and plan on camping near Yellowstone on the way back, but I personally don’t like staying in camp grounds, do any of you know of some decent open camping areas near Yellowstone?",Free camping near Yellowstone?
camping,"Last weekend, I found a BEAUTIFUL spot to hike, camp, and fish in Blue Ridge, Ga. I set up my hammock along a rushing creek right off the Appalachian Trail. I had a blast hiking, fishing, and camping in one of my favorite new spots. In this video, I take a few minutes and show my winter hammock camping setup, and share what I believe is the most comfortable way to camp.

[https://youtu.be/IZ1f215fmuQ](https://youtu.be/IZ1f215fmuQ)",Hammock Camping
camping,Thinking of going camping there this weekend into next week and beach camping. Are you able to get to beach camping without a vehicle with 4WD? And what other things would be cool to check out?,Padre Island
camping,"You hammock-camp when hiking? What if there are no trees - **like, on a beach.**..?

Simple: the 1 extra item I take for this eventuality is a piece of Tyvek as ground-cloth. Then just use the inflatable mat I use in the hammock to lay on - and sleep bug-free as if I'm in a tent.

https://preview.redd.it/w4h0ixymu8f61.jpg?width=1720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=9cdf3e4af0faa1819ac71549c2f4e84e58412e31","OMG, no trees..."
camping,,SOLO ICE CAMPING CATCH CLEAN COOK with INCREDIBLE UNDERWATER FOOTAGE (Day 1)
camping,[deleted],Does anyone have advice on stuff that someone with a bad back could use to sleep on at night while camping?
camping,What are some good places to camp in Los Padres National Forest ?,Los Padres National Forest
camping,[deleted],Photo I took while at our campsite in sequoia.
camping,Go forth and conquer!,Good morning good people
camping,,Just some good winter camping eats
camping,,The midnight views
camping,"Hello! I’m new to camping and a friend of mine (same household) wants to go somewhere around May/June (assuming everything is okay). 
Joshua tree is her choice, but I wanted to see if there were any options that have the following;

- on the cooler side, some shade available please
- would love for there to be green but understand if this isn’t available
- bathrooms available?
- within &lt;4 hours of Los Angeles

Thank you!",Southern California camping around may-June. Any recommendations?
camping,,"shark point chickee , everglades national park"
camping,"Hi everyone, 

I'm in south central PA and finally have my set up for car camping in my subaru outback! I was wondering if anyone in PA knows any 420 friendly campsites? Any help or link to appropriate subreddits are greatly appreciated!",PA 420 Friendly
camping,"Having spend literally decades traveling and living in all kinds of places like sailboats, vehicles, etc, .. one thing I've learned is that if its hot I can sleep pretty much anywhere as long as I have some kind of fan blowing on me.  Fans keep the air moving over your body and allows your body to use its ability to perspire to keep you cool.  So now I want to start researching to find something that is long lasting, light weight, easy to travel with, and flexible power (which probably means USB if the fan has enough air flow to be useful ..).

Love to hear your thoughts and recommendations.

Edit, also not as interested in fans with integrated rechargeable batteries because I prefer to centralized battery power ..","Planning for summer .. I need a portable fan, would like some pro advice from experienced people who use them (meaning not random Internet search results from people who don't actually use one)"
camping,,Valentines Day For Outdoorsy Ladies: 7 Gifts That Don't Suck
camping,"I'm wondering about the tricks of the trade, finding campgrounds when it's summer and in glorious locales like the Rocky Mountains (or the Pacific Northwest).  Let's skip pandemic effects for now, since I may be traveling and camping for a couple of years.    


I'll be getting a National Parks pass, so I'd like to favor those to get the \~$8/night camping fee, but I am fine diverting to state parks if Nat'l's full.  I can hit places on Monday for a week or two stay.  I am in a SUV w/tent, and don't need hookups.  Will I always be able to find a state or private camping spot within 50 miles in case a weekend is full?",Normal Summertime Campground Availability in U.S. Rocky Mountains?
camping,"What do y'all do to power all your portable devices (also including camping gear) while on a trip or in remote locations?

I have a solar panel for my trailer, which has a car battery. Also a high capacity power brick for recharging devices.

For camping gear items like headlamps, I was thinking about purchasing a battery charger with rechargeable batteries that I can charge from either my trailer or brick via USB.

How are you handling this?!",Portable charging strategy?!
camping,,Looking forward to cooking outside again.
camping,[removed],I’m available for hookup
camping,[removed],Campervan Rental Suggestions ?
camping,"I have this older tent that is green and beige or OD and beige as some one once called it. the color isnt really faded but is in fact remarkable condition as I have lugged this tent around with me in my life for over 25 years. I cant even tell you where I got it from. I always thought it was an old military tent. I was told all the pieces were in the bag but I have NEVER been able to erect the tent. I have had several ppl throughout the years try and figure it out with me, but to no avail. My only option now is to find the model and buy replacement poles or fashion my own some how. I am not too knowledgeable about vintage, canvas tents. I was a boy scout, grew up in the military so Im no stranger to the outdoors or tents that I have grown up with. But i am hoping to find some one with some info on this tent. I have pictures and because reddit is so picky with posting pictures, I will def send some in email. 

&amp;#x200B;

Color - Green and beige

5-8 man tent (Large)

Canvas with 2 side windows, split zipper door and a tarp type bottom.

Very heavy duty. 

No logos on the tent ANYWHERE

Only a metal tag embossed with the tent model number (which I have searched and searched for to the ends of the interwebs with no avail)

It kind of resembles a sear vintage hillary cabin tent, but all hillary's had their logo on the doors. 

&amp;#x200B;

If ANYONE can help me with how to get this thing standing, I would appreciate it!!  I'm pretty sure it a ""Cabin"" tent.",Researching older 60's/70's Canvas Tent
camping,[removed],https://sociali.io/ref/gu51874460
camping,,Can’t wait for spring and the warm summer months to return. More camping in the ADKs awaits.
camping,"Trying to be spontaneous with a group of friends, any available primitive campsites for the weekend? I wanted to do something in the Florida keys but looks like it is all booked a year in advance. Any recommendations?",Looking for a campsite for this weekend in south Florida.
camping,[deleted],Jackery Power Station
camping,,The best way to start the day
camping,,The weather turned overnight from my last post
camping,,"Missouri has some beautiful waterways. Hopefully the Wild &amp; Scenic Rivers leg of the state becomes less impacted by people, soon. :/ Below is Hawn State Park"
camping,[deleted],Summer 2021 is looking very exciting! 71 day camping road trip 🏕
camping,,2020 Campers Choice Awards
camping,,"Snowy solo trip in Suches, GA"
camping,,A Joshua Tree winter weekend at Indian Cove Campground!
camping,"My friends and I are keen on camping sometime this year, ideally in the not so hot spring. Location isn't really an issue, however we are east coast and if the trip involves flying there will need to be a rental car; which I'm sure will be accommodating to our gear amount.

We have no interest in RVing, but would like to maintain some of the nicer amenities like a restroom/shower at least once a day. I don't know if there are places where you can hike between camps with running water and set off again the next day. Any pointers would be much appreciated.","What would be a good ""in between"" kind of camping for a group that is less experienced?"
camping,,Good morning
camping,,Camping Rough Botswana
camping,,Good morning :-)
camping,,"Got a few inches of snow over the weekend camping in Linville Gorge Wilderness, North Carolina."
camping,"Does anyone know of a European version of BLM land dispersed camping? I know in Scotland you can camp pretty much anywhere as long as you don't bother anyone, but what about other countries?

&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/lqzav46hx1f61.jpg?width=850&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=cc909640b5f127edc32ff30b93f754fa3cc8489f","Great camping in Alabama Hills, CA last summer. I miss BLM land now that I am back in Europe."
camping,[deleted],Instagram outdoors page
camping,[deleted],High-speed chase ends in tragedy for local Vermont rabbit. (My camping story from last weekend)
camping,[deleted],High speed chase end in tragedy for local Vermont rabbit. (My camping story from last weekend)
camping,[removed],COMING SOON HAPPY BALLANTYNE DAY IF YOUR WANT TO NEED SPECIAL GIFT CARD THEN WE ARE PROVIDE 100% FREE $200 AMAZON GIFT CARD
camping,"""That which we need the most will be found where we least want to look""",Inspirational
camping,,First hill top winter camp - only 520m but with wind it got chilly
camping,[deleted],First Hill top winter camp - only 520m but it got cold
camping,[deleted],Tent Camping in Dhanoulti | Dhanoulti Camping | Yelnyadventure
camping,,Driving in Chobe national park Botswana. Great camping at Ihaha campsite lots of wildlife
camping,[removed],A chance to win a free cordless hair dryer
camping,"HI, 

I am looking forward to taking a one month roundtrip vacation around my country, a road trip on my 150cc bike and camping gear with my mini bike trailer(possibly), any ideas anyone has such as preparations, experiences are welcome, this will be my first bike road trip I am going on and organising .

&amp;#x200B;

Many thanks.

&amp;#x200B;

\#WildBunch",Any one take road trips with motorcycle buddies
camping,,Nice place to live in Baja California.
camping,,Santa Barbara Mountains to Sea
camping,,"Who else uses tying up bear bags as an excuse to practice too many knots? This one has some lashings around the bags, a square knot to tie two ropes together, a two-half hitch on the log, a taut line hitch to tether the rope, and a clove hitch to tie off the remaining rope 🪢"
camping,"
Have a fantastic day",Good morning
camping,,"Izmir, Turkey. I really miss camping."
camping,,Can’t wait to go camping and try this absolute machine out
camping,,I camped all across the US this summer but beach camping in the Dominican Republic might take the cake
camping,,Weekend trip on the Blue River for Rainbow Trout
camping,,"Camping site at Kheerganga, Himachal Pradesh, India. 31st Jan, 2021."
camping,,A little winter camping last night during the winter storm in ny
camping,Where is the best place to find camp spots when all state parks in CA are closed because of covid?,Where to find campspots
camping,,A very cold night in the blue ridge mountains
camping,"I'm looking for a collection of campfire stories that I can take camping and read aloud around the fire on long dark summer nights. Ideally not just a 'spooky stories' book, but one that also has Jim Bridger-esque tall tales of all sorts of outdoor adventures. Anyone know of anything like that?",Anyone got a good book of campfire stories?
camping,[deleted],Thank you much! The shirts came out PERFECT!
camping,[deleted],Bought these for our best camping friends and they loved them. As you can see by the photo!
camping,,A playlist full of folk music that’s best listened to when sitting around a campfire!
camping,"Hi all, 

I’ve been trying to find a portable power station that I can charge with my car while I drive, that will power a small space heater overnight for a SUV sized room. Any recommendations/tips?

I can’t figure out the numbers behind battery output/input for either item",Question about space heater/power station needs
camping,,Need more rope
camping,[removed],"Mid December Covid hit our little town we live in when not camping. It got me, my wife, her brother, my sister in law, and her father along with several other dear friends of ours. We all survived. So now we donate to help others. Schedule your blood bank appointment today."
camping,,"Norwegian coastline view, from summer last year!"
camping,,Winter Camping in Northern Wisconsin
camping,,"What a scene it is !!! Do you know, what it is called?"
camping,,enjoying winter &amp; building fire in snow - viking style
camping,,"Winter camping in Jemez, NM"
camping,,Dutch Oven Enchiladas and Pizza From Last Weekend’s Camping Trip...
camping,,When I camped at Joshua Tree National Park for the first time last July.
camping,,Nice spot next to a farm
camping,,"Beautiful artwork, isn't it...?"
camping,[deleted],Nice spot next to a farm/Esbit Stove &amp; Crusader cup
camping,,Lowcountry camping in January
camping,[deleted],Lowcountry camping in January.
camping,[deleted],I do this design for my camping lover friends.
camping,,Fire
camping,,Windy conditions with the RTT. Had to strap the edge of the rain fly cover at night due to the flapping noise. Still great sleep with that ocean breeze.
camping,,Here is the summer and interior pics and story in comments
camping,,My Camping Setup.
camping,[deleted],My Camping Setup!!
camping,[deleted],My Camping Setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,,"Grand Bend, On, Canada late September last camp of the year! Beautiful. Had a little fake fire/heater action super cozy."
camping,,Beach camping Ho Tram Vietnam
camping,"Hello all: I'm a bit of a novice camper, and am wondering if the ""dispersed""/ primitive campsites around Big Bend are open without any reservations? There are several places that pop up on Google Maps when I search for ""dispersed camping Big Bend"", and I'm wondering if all of those are just sort of ""open"" on a first come, first served basis. I'm wondering what to do over spring break during the third week of March and could use some guidance. Is Big Bend feasible at all?",Primitive camping available around Big Bend?
camping,,Ocean glow
camping,,Our paradise
camping,,First time in new tent!!
camping,,Beach camping PNW
camping,,Camping in Bhamala a beautiful area surrounded by mountains with a river flowing next to it.
camping,"Hey guys, it would be awesome if some of you filled out this 15 question form :D

[https://forms.gle/aXAXpTdBC9KREHtu9](https://forms.gle/aXAXpTdBC9KREHtu9)

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you for sharing!","Your motivations, goals and frustrations during camping"
camping,,Rise and brapppp
camping,"What are some good places to camp in California during the winter? 3-4 Hrs Max from LA. 
Thanks🤙",Winter Camping California
camping,Have a nice day,Good morning beautiful people
camping,,Dispersed camping near Medicine Bow - August 2020
camping,[deleted],Dispersed camping near Medicine Bow
camping,,This was my home for two years in the Colorado mountains. I miss it everyday
camping,,The Big Dipper above our campsite this past summer. It's what I dream of when it's -25C outside.
camping,,before the storm rolled in.
camping,,"Clear -6° VT last night, snowshoe car camping"
camping,"I have a North face 700 down jacket. Which I want to wash but do not have any down jacket / sleeping bag type of laundry detergent are there any recommendations as what makes a good substitute laundry detergent for a down jacket?


Thank you",Down jacket washing
camping,"Driving to a camp site this summer that's about a 7 hour drive. 
There is a place about 2 hours we can stop and stock a lot of perishables and also pick up all varieties of ice. Not sure if we should pick up all food and ice at our stop, or at least prechill the cooler on the drive and then stock. 
4 nights it needs to last, we can pick up ice reasonably close to our campsite. 
Not sure what cooler to buy, what ice (or ice packs! to use, when to fill it (in relation to our long drive time), etc.!

What would you all recommend?",Need some tips on a cooler and how to pack it.
camping,[removed],Not everyone gets to go to bed on a full belly🥺
camping,[removed],Not everyone gets to go to bed on a full belly🥺
camping,"Hey all! Your posts have inspired me to finally take a camping road trip! I just booked 4 nights at Lost Claim campground outside Yosemite in May. Does anyone have experience with this campground? It looks near the park which is great since getting a campsite in Yosemite seems impossible. Unless there is something I'm missing?

Also, does anyone have suggestions for camping in or near Sequoia national park? Thanks in advance!",Planning my first camping road trip!
camping,,Weekend getaway to the tall pines of East Texas.
camping,,Did a test burn in my Solo Stove Titan today! Very impressed with it so far
camping,[deleted],It was cold so we slept inside
camping,,"Snow Camping - Mogollon Rim, AZ"
camping,[deleted],"Cold morning in Flagstaff, AZ"
camping,[deleted],Bedtime
camping,[deleted],He made it through a 20 degree night 🥶
camping,Need some advice on a new 6 person tent. We need a new one since our current tent is just to small for our cots and dog. I am planning on getting a small camper in the next year or two depending on finances. I’m on The fence if I want to get a better tent like the kodiak canvas or just go with the Coleman instant tent since I’m planning on the camper in the next couple years. I know as far as quality there really is no comparison but the cost is almost 400 difference. We’re camping into late fall for hunting in Colorado so weather and definitely wind is an issue. Any advice would be greatly appreciated,Cheap or expensive tent
camping,[removed],Doing the coast to coast (Devon) For charity in may any support would be much appreciated!
camping,"Hey folks, I'm sorry if this isn't the perfect sub for this, I've posted this in a few places and there's nowhere very specific to find the answer as there seems to be very little trace of this campground on the internet unless it goes by a different name. It's called East Rock Springs Campground, in the Sheldon National Antelope Refuge.

It's listed on google maps, there's a couple sparse entries about it if you search for it. There's no campground listed there on the forest service website (though maybe it'd be on another federal website?). There's two reviews on the google listing and they're fairly recent, saying it's an awesome spot, but that's about all there is. It looks like an incredible location. It shows up on google earth satellite and you can see a little path leading to what looks like could be a campground? This is the place on google earth.

[http://us.geoview.info/east\_rock\_spring\_campground,5703582](http://us.geoview.info/east_rock_spring_campground,5703582)

They do mention you need a capable 4x4 to get there, which I have, but obviously I'm a little hesitant to go miles and miles down back roads looking for some campground there's little documentation of. But then again, it couldn't hurt to try, right? Worse comes to worse I can probably boondock out there...

But there are a lot of people here, maybe someone's familiar with the place?",Little known campground in North Eastern Nevada - is it real?
camping,[deleted],Counting down the days until Summer! ~Olympic National Forest~
camping,"I do a lot of winter camping, and I typically camp with my girlfriend... so I’ve been thinking about purchasing a double wide sleeping pad to make things a little more warm/comfortable.

Currently, we both use the Klymit insulated static V sleeping pads, so I’ve been looking into the double version of that one... but I’m wondering what other options are out there. 

It needs to pack small enough for backpacking (I have a 65L bag), so something like a big exped mega mat would probably be too bulky.

There are a lot of cheap options on Amazon, but I would like to get something of higher quality, while not exceeding $250.

Any recommendations?",Double wide sleeping pad recommendations...
camping,,Starved Rock a Couple Weeks Ago.
camping,,Travel
camping,,Last spring’s camp trip to Valley of the Gods and Monument Valley. ⛺️🏕
camping,,Last summer’s camping trip at Green River lakes. 🛶⛵️🏕
camping,,Camping at Cathedral Valley⛺️🏔🏕
camping,[deleted],Camping at Cathedral Valley 🏔🏕⛺️
camping,"So, I'm in need of finding a camping buddy. I've gone solo a few times and I love it but I'd like to find someone who enjoys the outdoors like myself. Any tips on how to accomplish this?",Need a camping buddy
camping,[deleted],"Found a new fav campground in Key West, FL! Bahia Honda State Park was AWESOME!"
camping,,Living room camping on a cold and rainy PNW day.
camping,I’m looking to sell my Nissan 370Z to potentially lease or own something that I can use to camp with. I’m on a budget so I’m looking at cheap options beyond the Subaru Outback (which I’m considering),Cheap vehicles that are good to camp in?
camping,[deleted],It was extra cold so we slept inside
camping,,"Trying out the new ""suv"" air mattress vs. tent at Death Valley NP. Comfortable and warm! Sunrise from my car window."
camping,,Desert camping
camping,,Our 10x12 inside set up. Floor pads help with rocky surfaces. We also have a small ceramic heater &amp; coffee maker set up that's not seen in the photo. Nothing is better than staying snuggled up in a sleeping bag with a cup of coffee first thing on a chilly winter morning.
camping,,"Yellowstone was full up last Summer but I found a wonderful tent site just north in the Gallatin National Forest, MT. Love a good sunset."
camping,,Core 12 Person Instant Cabin test run
camping,[deleted],Spring Camping Trip to Cathedral Valley.
camping,[deleted],"Spring Camping trip to Cathedral Valley, UT!!"
camping,[deleted],Spring camping trip to Cathedral Valley and Monument Valley.
camping,[deleted],Spring Camping trip to Cathedral valley and Monument Valley..
camping,[deleted],"Spring camping trip Cathedral Valley and Monument Valley, UT."
camping,,My camp fire Tampere -19 degree C
camping,[deleted],Winter Camping near Moab..
camping,"I am seriously annoyed by how my piezo lighter doesn't light, even though I've emptied it and refilled it with lighter fluid.

I can see the piezo thingy causing sparks, but I have no idea how large the arcing light is supposed to be to ignite the gas.

The gas, obviously comes out of the lighter, and I've even managed to increase the gas flow a little, with no effect.

**Q: What could be wrong?** At this point I am more interested in knowing the issue, than getting the lighter working again.

I did noticed, some time ago, I got the lighter working again, as long as I stored it vertically, but that doesn't work when I try it again. Storing the lighter upright, does not make the lighter light up.

This lighter has a small window, so I can see what the level of gas liquid is inside at all times.

Somehow my mind is thinking of calculated expiration dates for consumer products, like light bulbs, but what could be wrong with this lighter? The piezo igniter seems to work.","My piezo lighter doesn't work, not even in room temperature, what could be wrong?"
camping,"Hi, I have a self-inflating sleeping pad and it can be pretty bulky rolled up in its bag on trips. I’m wondering if I can pack it folded along the back of my pack without damaging it? Couldn’t find any answer online. Thanks!",Question about self-inflating pads
camping,,Manti Lá Sal National Forrest
camping,"Me and my son are about to do our first wild camp in the next 3-4 weeks, our dog will be coming too. Location will be south west Scotland.  

Any tips, such as making a fire without scorching the ground, which food to cook in the fire, needs to appeal to a fussy 10 year old.  Going for a number 1 is easy enough what's the standard practice for number 2?

We want to try some basic bushcraft, any ideas on this?

Thanks.","First wild camp, any tips?"
camping,,Hey guys check out our YouTube channel and recent video
camping,"I have a Carinthia Defence 4 bag, which is rated at -15 degrees celcius comfort temperature. Even at 0 degrees I get very cold, and freeze all night. What should I do?",Freezing in my sleeping bag.
camping,,Camping in Australia done right. Share your set ups.
camping,,Dancing Flames
camping,,"Wanting to book 1-2 weeks of a campground, am i able to book this when the first day becomes available?"
camping,,You may not like it but this is what peak camping looks like!
camping,,Such a beautiful set for the day. Waiting for the new rise 🌄
camping,,Pic not the best. But steak and veggies skillet cooked over the campfire.
camping,,After the storm southwest montana usa summer 2020
camping,,Is it camping If you are not in the woods?
camping,,Is it camping if you are not in the woods?
camping,,Soul searching in the snow
camping,,"Campsite heaven in Willamette National Forest, Oregon"
camping,"I'm planning to camp for a couple months. From August to November. The biggest issue I'm having is finding a place to camp, preferably free but I have absolutely zero idea where to go. I want to go somewhere where I can be alone and not too dangerous because I've never camped this long before. I live in Florida currently but I'm willing to travel out of Florida to go anywhere.",Need help finding a place to camp for a couple months
camping,,Indoor camping
camping,"Hey all, are these a thing? I can’t find any online.",Foldable hot tent stove
camping,,"How To Make Baked Potatoes In A Campfire - Campfire Meal, Grill Survival..."
camping,,Snow turns camping into something hilarious. Location : Turkey / Belgrad Forest
camping,,Camping last night in Michigan Waterloo recreation
camping,,A silent camp in the woods of western Turkey
camping,,"Snow in California - Camp Nelson CA, in the Sequoia National Park"
camping,,"Couple of months ago we discovered a white sandy creek oasis about three miles down the river in Tuskegee National Forrest in Alabama, and last night we finally camped it."
camping,,Smoked Prime Rib at our annual deer hunt
camping,So I am curious on what are the popular/easy methods to keep your blades ( knife or axe) sharp while your in the bush. I know that if I'm only out for a day or few days my blades probably aren't going to become so dull they will be useless but I was thinking about a long term survival situation. Does anyone take a sharpening stone with them and if so what kind?,Keeping blades sharp
camping,,My favorite part about camping is the company
camping,"I have access to a lot of granite countertop cutouts.  The size of a sink or end piece of a large slab.  They are just a rock that is cut about an inch thick and polished on one side.  They make GREAT flat areas for camping cooking or anything a countertop can be used for.  Is it wrong to leave one of these at a campsite for the next person?  Not National Parks or private camping sites, but end/side of the road State or National Forest unpaid sites people use once in a while.  It is just rock. Toss it on another rock and they shatter into smaller rocks.",Is bringing a rock from one location to another and leaving it bad thing?
camping,,"Sunrise Campfire &amp; Coffee— Henry Horton State Park, TN"
camping,"Like the title states, I’ve got 3 days of PTO to burn by the end of March and with weekends and days off needed during the week I could stretch it to 6-7 days in a row. 

I live in PA and would prefer to not be camping in freezing weather. I’m considering any states south of me and would prefer to not go lower than SC. 

What places that fit this criteria are worth checking out for the camping but also the nice weather?!",PTO to burn by March
camping,,fındık içi
camping,,"Beautiful sunrise with a sea of fog on the way to Zion National Park, Southern Utah"
camping,,Little surprise waking up to a collapsed tent with a couple inches of snow in AZ. Good thing we packed the necessities to make our morning a little better.
camping,"A camping trip to Green River Lakes, Wyoming last summer..

https://preview.redd.it/3u4d0dbthhe61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=7f909dcf350e291a663fadb714ca89f2780617e2

*Processing img wtv19tcthhe61...*

https://preview.redd.it/a2n70gcthhe61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c7b9b31b509f8134da9518771514a3c7da3be038","Green River Lakes, Wyoming."
camping,[deleted],"Green River Lake, Wyoming."
camping,"I love to camp. To me the best trip is remote and private, a challange to acess, weather backpacking or trucking. A clear night to cowboy camp under the stars. And a fire roasted hot dog. And some friends to share the time with.

To my wife- its a queen sized air matress inside an instant pop up tent with a rug and a heater. An entire refrigerator to cook meals on the bbq and both our dogs for company.

I also enjoy her style, but she dose not enjoy mine.",What is your ideal camp?
camping,,Night one was freezing but beautiful. Tonight in South Carolina it should be warmer but half an inch of rain on the way overnight. First trial in the rain.
camping,,My current situation.
camping,,Camping @ GEMINI BRIDGES
camping,Winter camping trip Veterans Day 2019!!,Winter camping @ Gemini Bridges near Canyonlands N.P. !!
camping,"I think I can conclude that I do not prefer winter camping in -20 deg C. 

I think I would prefer -5 deg C or -10 deg C.

In -14 deg C, I had a fairly good time in my sleeping bag, having a sleeping bag that should be ""usable"" down to -25 deg C. However at -20 deg C I could feel a chill presumably from the zipper line, which was only covered by some thinner bit of fabric and maybe a little filling.

Changing clothing in -20 deg C was surprisingly ok, probably helped by having dry clothing available ofc.

Putting on ""ice cold"" boots in -20 deg C, was also surprisingly trivial, and did not feel freezing cold, because I had dry socks and also had been previously using a shopping bag around each foot out in the cold.

By the campfire I got smoke in my eyes and I got tears in my eyes, and I felt my eyelashes starting to freeze. :D

My campfire lit up with one match though (firestarter heh), as I had been careful using dry wood only. I found some possibly non-dry wood from a fallen tree that blocked a trail and had to be sawed off, so I put two long logs at the bottom of the campfire to better reflect the heat and eventually those too at the bottom started to burn.

I was happy I had been using an assortment of hand liners, gloves and mittens, incl. thin water proof construction worker gloves.

When I got up in the night, feeling the chill in -20 deg C, and I had to take a piss, I had to make a decision if I wanted to try go at it, for the next 6 hours, or just walk home, so I walked home. :)

I had also been using a 1+ liter hot water flask (w. proper screw plug), and I noticed that the bag was still moderately warm after 6 hours being in the sleeping bag, but even with the hot water flask, the chill I felt was not fun and I wasn't sure what was wrong. Could be that it was the zipper area, or, that my neck strap did not fully seal my upper part of the body, even though I tried to make sure I had a tight fit.

I will now probably camp in less freezing conditiosn and also look into what a better sleeping bag might look like.",-20 C camping woes
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/tx70u92mnge61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=5325266714313acceb2fe2f7a1f0454e06254151

https://preview.redd.it/f0bzdi2mnge61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a31f70b47f56c7af28548089493bb4e6b4511e7f",Winter camping near Canyonlands N.P. last winter!!!
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 62r08r1lmge61...*

*Processing img 4z52fr1lmge61...*",Winter Camping last winter near Canyonlands N.P.
camping,,"Island camping , narragansett bay RHODE ISLAND. 3 summers ago"
camping,,Go camping they said. Get away from people. Enjoy nature
camping,,"I love winter camping! Here are a few shots from my most recent camping trip. Spent the night near second peak of Mt Seymour n ar Vancouver, BC. Camping in the winter is a bit more challenging than the other seasons, but with the right equipment and the right experience it is amazing!"
camping,,Glamping in South China with my girl. We are camping rookies who love the vibe.
camping,,"Not so much winter camping, but camping at Lunch Counter on Mt Adams in Washington state last September. Had to knock the ice off my tent the next morning, but the stars were amazing that night. Two day hike up."
camping,Hey All.  I am planning a campervan trip in June to Oregon with my daughter (9) and brother (not 9).  Any recommendations for places to go inland oregon would be appreciated.  My brother has done the coast so we want to try other things.  Looking for recs you wouldn't find on a standard goolge search.,Oregon Campervan trip
camping,"Hey everybody,

Noob camper here. I’m taking my family (wife and 3 young children) camping in a couple weeks at Sam Houston National Forest. It will be my first time truly camping, but as we are moving to Denver in a few months, and intend to really get into more outdoor living with the kids, we figured this would be a good start. While I don’t have a lot of experience camping, I do consider myself to be relatively capable outdoors, so I’m looking forward to finding out how right or wrong I am.

We have most of the essentials taken care of already (tent, sleep mat and bags, and various other items), but the one thing I’m very curious about is food. Option 1 is obviously to just bring a cooler and make sandwiches, but I’d like to cook at least 1 might. My wife thinks we need to just buy a stove, while I’d prefer to try cooking over a campfire. I’d be interested to know how much of a learning curve there is to cooking with a fire.

Also any other tips anyone can provide are welcome!",Camp cooking
camping,,Since we’re doing winter trips... my buddy and I a couple years back at flagstaff lake. 5 mile hike in and out!
camping,,Snow camping up on Mt. Rainier
camping,,🧟‍♀️
camping,,Summer vibes
camping,,Roof top on the Mississippi
camping,I just purchased a berghaus air 8 and I am interested in buying the air porch however im just wondering am I able to use any tent porch or does it have to be berghaus specific.,Berghaus air8 and porch question
camping,,All set up for a great weekend of camping.
camping,"Planning a travel to New England in the spring, traveling from FLA to MASS and would like to stay at interesting, tiny campgrounds - like Trimble Park, in Mount Dora, FLA. Little county parks, etc.  Suggestions????  Cautions?","Suggestions for small (say, County) campgrounds from FLA to MASS"
camping," TL/DR: just curious what others do in regards to campsite layout to fend off critters.

I’ve grilled tasty smelling foods on grills and made stews in Dutch ovens for most of my camping life. With that even though food and garbage was stored in the car after dinner my campsites were typically visited by various scavenging omnivores during the night. I’m pretty sure it was the remnants of cooking grease that attracted them.

They would come check out the tent even though I would wear different clothes than I cooked in. I would hear stuff get knocked over outside the tent, you know typical stuff.

I tried an experiment the last five campouts. I was hiking / dispersed camping. My fire and cook area was at least a hundred feet away from my sleep area. Plus I only made easy meals with a single pot and an alcohol stove. Nothing with a heavy aroma but yet still tasty. I left no food bits behind as is my general practice. My food bag was hung somewhere between the cooking area and my hammock.

The only animals that I encountered were deer. In one case there were a pair of bucks running around a nearby clearing snorting and clicking at each other in the full overhead moonlight.

The other was a deer at dawn who saw my hammock and kept smacking his hoof on the ground while he stared at me. Both truly cool experiences.

Other than that, no trash pandas, bears or anything bothered my campsite at night.

Do you think 100’ away is overkill for campfires or cooking?",What is your typical distance between campfire / cooking area and where you sleep?
camping,,We are buying some large acreage and planning on having a few campsites. Do you use private campsites and what do you look for in a campsite? Thank you.
camping,,What price are you paying for insurance on a class B RV.
camping,,Fire is life in the outdoors
camping,,Fire is life in the outdoors
camping,"I just picked up a new 4-season bivy and want to try it out in the snow. The location I was planning on testing it out is a campground in the summer, but in the winter it's mostly unused. It's right beside a fairly busy cross-country skiing trail and a snowshoe trail, about 2-3 hours by snowshoe from a ski resort.

The problem I have is that the new bivy is bright orange and kinda looks like an emergency shelter. I'm worried that someone might see me from one of the trails and think I'm in trouble. Is there a good way to mark the site and make it look like I'm there intentionally? My plan is to dig a trench to sleep in (for the wind) and then mark around it with flagging tape on sticks so I don't get stepped on if it snows. I'll also have my rucksack and snowshoes there outside the bivy which might help.

I still want to be fairly visible so that I can be found easily if something goes wrong and I don't return when I'm supposed to, but I also don't really want to be bothered if everything is fine.

Has anyone dealt with this before? Am I just overthinking it? Any advice is appreciated.",Worried about bivy bag looking like an emergency
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,Beautiful please
camping,,"Recent find, they seem like they're in good shape. Any advice before I head out in snow?"
camping,,Nature Photos
camping,,"After years of taking long exposure and time-lapse photography across the country, I’ve finally put them all together. If you want to see more content like this, please follow @crucible_pictures on Instagram."
camping,,Sights and sounds of the snowy Squamish river
camping,"Hey everyone I was thinking about getting a Hennessey hammock. Seen quite a few videos of them being used and they look great. They seem packable, light and easy to set up. Anyone have any experience with these hammocks? Or can anyone suggest another dependable hammock. TIA",Hennessey Hammock
camping,,"Sometimes, you just make do. This was one of our winter backpacking trips in the Sierra Nevada."
camping,,Trip with family and friends location: Jeddah-Saudi Arabia
camping,,*!$##?!***!!! Free campers. #sberryrvcamper. Rhode island USA
camping,,Camping at the beach!
camping,"It’s just as simple as that, folks. I want to make sure I don’t freeze (especially if there’s wind/rain and a fire is not viable). Any general tips or gear recommendations? The temperature where I’m going averages 35to15F/2to-9C.",Prepping for first winter camping trip! Advice?
camping,,Winter / Late season hammock camping. Would this work in conjunction with a sleeping bag and nothing else? Or do I need to get an under quilt with a sleeping bag and a static pad (blow up air mat that would normally keep me off the ground).
camping,"Hello! Need some advice on what to get. It must be big enough for a family of four

Thanks",Best cast iron pot for campfire cooking
camping,,"luckily the campground was full so we found this spot literally on the edge of the Mogollon Rim instead (Payson in the distance, 2k ft down) (a few years ago)"
camping,"I live in the Atlanta area and have a tent for my Jeep Cherokee. Two dry runs in my backyard with the new gear so far, one field run a dozen miles away, and now this weekend I head about 100 miles northeast solo to Lake Keowee in South Carolina (near Clemson) for two nights. First nights in rain. 

Where are y’all off to this weekend, what’s the weather your are expecting and what gear are you running?","Where is everyone camping this weekend, starting January 29th, 2021?"
camping,,North woods during a snow storm. Nothing and everything at the same time. -In the woods we return to reason and faith. -Ralph Waldo Emerson-
camping,,I just picked up a new T.
camping,,Comparativa de aislamientos
camping,,"Seasoned steak in the of Wadi Abaythran, Saudi Arabia"
camping,,"A dog, a hammock and a campfire"
camping,I was thinking of taking my family camping this summer and have heard great things about moose river plains in the adirondacks. Was wondering if anyone had recommendations on which camp sites are best for seclusion fishing and swimming in this area,Recommendations for Moose river plains adirondacks
camping,,Pleasant Valley Campground on the Owens during the 2020 fires
camping,,The iKamper withstood another snowstorm in the Sierras (Shaver Lake). Life is good. https://youtu.be/66PkmoRiQyQ
camping,I am taking my kids camping for the first time this summer I haven't gone since my oldest was born so about 4-5 years. I'm a relatively experienced camper.  I'm looking for suggestions of places to camp whether it's a campground or primitive camping between central New York and the Adirondacks. Preferably free with easy access to fishing and swimming. I hate camping at a campground right on top of other people's camp sites. Usually I would just hike in one of the parks but having small children I'd like somewhere I can have my car near the camp. All suggestions are appreciated!,Looking for secluded family camping in central new york
camping,,Savings Store
camping,,"Camping in Gleeson’s Landing, South Australia"
camping,,There must be sufficient preparation for every expedition in the wild.
camping,,"Camping in Killarney Provincial Park, Ontario"
camping,,Moonrise on the Mojave Desert
camping,What are your must-have items/equipment for a week-long backpacking?,Backpacking
camping,,"Just patiently waiting to go camping again, in the meantime, I guess I'll start updating gear"
camping,,"""fire and the nigh sky are two things you can look at for hours"""
camping,,Can't Wait for the Sun Again in Western Ontario
camping,"Going on my first solo trip on Saturday with the dog. Figure I would go easy and do limit cooking sense I am still buying gear. Can anyone recommend an easy and simple meal to cook for dinner? Breakfast is simple with cowboy coffee and bacon and eggs. Only cook supplies I have are a cast iron skillet and the basic kit you get for hiking. I have a 1 burner colemans stove I was going to bring, but will have access to a fire pit. Any suggestions???",Meal ideas?
camping,,Camping just outside of Austin! Pretty cool spot. Russell Park.
camping,[removed],Help me out by answering this quick survey
camping,,Market research survey
camping,[removed],Help me out by answering this short survey
camping,"I live in the DC Metro area and am looking for an escape. I’m looking to go out to the mountains with my dog, and seeing as its winter I was looking for a cabin. I’m not looking for anything fancy, but I definitely want something off the beaten path with nice mountain or forest views.

I’m probably not looking at the best sites or just expecting a bit too much. Most of what I’m finding is houses or “cabins” in town and/or meant for 4+ people. It’s literally just me and my 35lb dog.

I’m willing to travel up to 6 hours for this getaway - but given COVID restrictions I know some areas may not be an option.

Any recommendations are appreciated!",Looking for Recommendations: Rustic Cabin Camping and Pet-Friendly
camping,"I work at a cpground and we are thinking of building a hammock site with permanent posts. I have never used one before. Anyone have a layout of a design for a site? And those who do hammock camp, what are some of the good and bad of developed hammock sites?",Hammock camping
camping,"Sup yall,

Thinking of heading up to trona Saturday morning, some good rain is expected Friday nigh.  I've never been up there, I'm wondering if its a gamble, are the roads sandy? more gravel packed? any pointers would be great.

Cheers!",Trona Pinnacles post rain?
camping,,Fire roasted chicken for the camp family!
camping,,I'm in! Let's go.
camping,"Those in CA, with the restrictions lifted, are any campgrounds open again? Hard to tell.",Bay Area/Northern California Campgrounds open now?
camping,"Hammocking with my son on an island 2019. 2020 trip got cancelled because of...  well you know.

&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/vdlj2howp3e61.png?width=2390&amp;format=png&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a1b1853c25b6047133b73d9a4d5c6a388bf8c5f1",Hammock camping on an island
camping,,"Campfire and beautiful sunset at Harriman State Park, NY"
camping,"I just booked a site at fish creek in Glacier NP, in my rush to get a site before they're all gone I didn't really look it over too much, until after when I notice that it says ""site not suitable for tents"", even though they let me choose a tent as my equipment and have it listed on the site as being allowed. What do they mean? Am I going to have problems setting up when I get there?","Site not suitable for tents- but tents are ""allowable equipment"". What does that mean?"
camping,,The Onion is throwing shade
camping,,a four-day trip to the cabin in the southern part of Norway
camping,,"Tough picture to capture, but my most exciting camping to date! Camping at the base of Volcan Pacaya in Guatemala! Yes, that’s lava in the background!"
camping,,Fodable rocket stove i made for a camper.
camping,"I’m not from the island but my dad and sister we’re born there. Dad is what you call an ex-pat and sister hasn’t been since birth. 

I have traveled to the island a handful of times always staying with aunts and uncles who are all much older now. They don’t really hike and camp they are more the casino type. 

Is a solo camping trip to Puerto Rico feasible? I do speak Spanish and look like and islander. Has anyone camped and if so where on the island. Looking to stay near family in case (Arecibo Area), but open to any ideas or suggestions.",Puerto Rico Camping advice 🇵🇷
camping,,I survived the night with my best friend during NC’s snowstorm (hammock camp)
camping,[removed],Best Honey benefits in health
camping,,Geertop camping tent - TopRoad 3// Three colors options. Do you guys like it?!
camping,"So I brought ketchup with me camping, in the freezing cold. I thought I could just thawn the frozen bottle of ketchup somehow, but now I am not sure what to do, because it seems obvious to me that the ketchup would re-freeze several times over if one leave it in the cold over serveral days.

Maybe ketchup bags would be better? Thawns more easily and portions better?",How do I best thawn a bottle of ketchup in winter?
camping,,Best camping sites in north India
camping,,Good morning beautiful people
camping,,Find great camping products on gobigshoppe.com with FREE shipping worldwide.
camping,Hey I’m in Missouri and was wondering the best places to go camping in the Colorado mountains. Also please give any info that may be needed. Like passes I might have to get,Colorado camping
camping,,Doggos bed for camping. Anyone got something similar?
camping,,Beautiful sun rise &amp; Camping @Hong Kong
camping,,Went solo camping and this happened. Run in with a Cougar!🐱
camping,,Campground at Havasupai falls
camping,,Camping from above
camping,,Winter camping from 2 years ago. Going again next week.
camping,how about you?,i like camping
camping,I’m looking for a place to camp/ bushcraft for a week in Michigan does anyone know of any cool spots?,Best places in Michigan?
camping,,🍻Cheers🍻
camping,,About today's morning stroll!
camping,,"Lijiang, a healthy place to escape city stress, with an excellent environment and leisurely lifestyle"
camping,So anyone go cold weather camping with their dog?  I'm teething to figure out what to take for my border collie when we go out.  I have boots and coat.  Not sure what else to specialize for cold weather.  She goes during warm weather with me all the time.,Doggie Camping?
camping,"I was wondering if anyone knows of any good spots for overnight car/van camping in or around Big Bear Resort. I have a Sprinter Van that can fit essentially anywhere a car does, but unfortunately it's not AWD, preventing me from getting to anywhere too tricky. 

I'm originally from Salt Lake, so I'm used to the snow, but don't have any frame of reference for Big Bear during the winter. Ideally I'm looking for anywhere to park overnight, somewhere that I won't get ticketed or hassled. 

Curious if there are any year round campsites, overnight lots, dispersed camping, etc. 

Any advice is appreciated!","Big Bear Resort, CA - Winter Van Camping"
camping,,Plaid pals 👯‍♂️😎 couldn’t be cooler
camping,[deleted],"Camping alone, until I can camp w/ friends."
camping,,"Camping alone, until I can camp w/ friends."
camping,"What are some of your most trusted and needed ""things"" for car camping?  
Thinking about seeing some National Parks and instead of a camper or hotels, I think that living in my SUV would be a good idea. I know campstove/pots &amp; pans/cast iron, blankets, cooler.   
But what are some other ones you have used in the past and continue in the future?  


Bonus points for any campsites you have used in the past.",US national Parks Car Camping Essentials?
camping,,My almost monthly Mojave desert getaway pics from last month dec 2020. It was cold asf for me.
camping,,Hello everyone! Me and my best friend Mentos went out to the woods this Saturday. And i made some tasty dinner! Butter cooked turkey with onion infused shroom sauce besides freshly cooked potatoes. I hardly recommend to try out recipe! Video ? ---&gt; https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2Co63mAQJBY
camping,Looking for a place to set up camp in two weeks! Would love a super scenic view to wake up to. Any recs out there?,Campsites with a view in North Carolina?
camping,,Just received this hand forged axe / hatchet. What’s something I can use to preserve and protect the wood and my hands from abuse? Just oil? Or gloves....
camping,,"4,000 mile Family Vacation, 38 people total (all vehicles/campers traveled together)"
camping,,View from the van - Grand Teton National Park - Wyoming
camping,,Our Solo Stove Ranger in action. Loving this!!!
camping,,"We had no plans for the day, so we figured why not walk a few hundred metres into the woods and make the fish soup outside instead? Hallingdalen, Norway"
camping,Can't wait to get back out camping once lockdown lifts. Missing some nice sunrises and sunsets being stuck at home.,missing camping
camping,[removed],Asking for help
camping,[removed],"If you want to get $200 Amazon Gift Card free, click here and submit email."
camping,,Thought someone here might find this useful.
camping,,"Perspective is a humbling thing. I heard a lot of complaints about how the quarantine impacted the mind of many, in a negative way. It impacted mine in a positive one."
camping,,Our Wilderness Escape Mobile Camper
camping,,Took this photo last october in eastern Finland and just realized that i love it as wallpaper awell.
camping,,The solo stove... My favorite spontaneous facebook purchase.
camping,,Any one have any personal methods of dealing with mosquitos and black flies while spring/summer camping in northern ontario?
camping,,レッドレーザーポインター100mw指し棒型 赤色レーザーペン型レーザーポインター 強力
camping,"We camped here for 4 nights between Christmas and New Year.

*Processing img 1817lgqgold61...*",Camping at Al Sila in the Arabian Gulf
camping,,"Camping at Ft Jefferson, Dry Tortugas NP. 70 miles west of Key West FL, it's got the best beach in the Keys and a night sky to die for"
camping,,"Camping at Ft Jefferson, Dry Tortugas NP. 70 miles west of Key West. Best beach in the Keys, and billions of stars at night. Worth the effort!"
camping,I am looking for a good travel guide or book that includes state parks all around in the US. Any good recommendation?,State park guide recommendation
camping,,My First ever Winter Overnighter! I did it under a small hennessy hammock tarp and managed to get a big fire going - very cozy! 😊
camping,"Hey all, looking for some experienced folks who have the GSI cookset. I love to cook outside and did a lot in scouts. 

I’m intrigued by the pack-ability of the sets. In the perfect world, I’d get the Pinnacle full camper set, but honestly as a single guy, the backpacker seems enough for me. Anyone have the Bugaboo instead? I’m down for a lower price if they preform similar. 

Love to car camp, and I’m looking for something to help me stay out in the woods longer. Around two nights. Interested in MSR too if they have a good option.",Anyone have the GSI cookset?
camping,"I have 3 big dogs. 1 is a boxer/Rottweiler, 1 is a husky, and the other one is a pitbull/black lab. My concern is how to keep them in the area. I was looking for portable fences or something. We have stakes for the ground but I'm so paranoid about them pulling it out, which happened once. 

We can't afford a rv or a rv rental. I would like to get your ideas and inputs on this. I miss camping and my pups hold me back from going back out.","I have 3 big dogs and want to go camping, but I got concerns."
camping,,"Montgomery Bell State Park, TN"
camping,"I've gone camping with my family multiple times when I was younger, I'm now 25 with a wife and daughter, and I really want to get back into camping. I have a large tent, chairs, and an air mattress, that's about it. I'm just wondering what are your guys must haves for camping? Any tools that make your experience that much better? I'd love to hear. Thank you!",What are your camping must haves??
camping,,New to camping. What tents do you guys recommend for 5 or so people?
camping,,First winter camping trip on top of « mont des morios » in Quebec. -16 celsius with winds up to 65 km/h
camping,My close group of friends never like camping and never want to come along with me and the few times they have come they complain a lot. How do I go about this because I’m willing to go almost every weekend. I’m willing to go by myself 18(f) but kinda worried if anything bad were to happen. For the people that solo camp do you have helpful emergency items? Do I need a new group of friends? Jk but fr.,My friends hate camping!
camping,"Hey everyone, I'm looking to order a tent in time for valentine's day, and I've tried looking around the discount websites, and I think I've narrowed my choices down.

Ideally, what I buy will be useful in future genuine camping endeavors.  My girlfriend and I aren't \*hardcore\* outdoorsy people, but we enjoy hiking and I want to introduce her to some good camping experiences in the future.  This tent can serve as (A) bonafide camping gear, or (B) a cheap shelter that we can bring along if we decide to include other people and have (by then) bought a better separate tent for ourselves.

I think [this Stoic Driftwood 3](https://www.steepandcheap.com/stoic-driftwood-3-tent-3-person-3-season) would serve well for (A), while [this Wakeman 6-person](https://www.overstock.com/Sports-Toys/6-Person-Tent-Water-Resistant-Dome-Tent-for-Camping-With-Removable-Rain-Fly-And-Carry-Bag-Blue-By-Wakeman-Outdoors/15439589/product.html?refccid=6JIEM6DEDS6LGGSBC5I54SFTCM&amp;searchidx=39&amp;kwds=camping%20tents&amp;rfmt=top_rated%3ATop%20Rated) seems to fulfill the goals of (B).

For the sake of my uses for V-day, spaciousness, and comfort is more important to me than durability/quality/utility - which is why I'm even considering the Wakeman.  What I'm looking for by way of feedback is whether the I should dismiss the Wakeman entirely because it's crap, or whether I should skip on the Stoic because I'll probably find a good deal on a good quality 2-3 person tent in the future.  I only really see myself pulling the trigger on something like the Stoic (or any comparable alternatives provided below) if it's pointed out that the sale opportunity is really crazy.

Thanks!",Help me pick a tent!
camping,,"Wanted to share my Portable All-In-One Kitchen kit! It's waterproof, dustproof, crushproof, and contains everything I need for food prep. Modded from a hard-case &amp; can withstand any weather that's thrown at it."
camping,,The most important thing you need to know when camping!
camping,Looking for a good bag to use as a edc,Looking for a good edc for outdoors
camping,It would be really beneficial to get advice from women about some camping related things,Is there an active subreddit for women and camping?
camping,,Another camping trip in the books. Can’t wait to head north for the spring.
camping,,Another camping trip in the books. Can’t wait to head north for the spring.
camping,,https://sociali.io/ref/gu51874460
camping,"So I'm new to the bushcraft field but I've been doing a lot of research and am in the process of getting some gear I can rely on. I haven't had the opportunity to go out in the field because I personally do not own any land nor do I know anyone at the moment who has sufficient wooded area that I could practice. So I've been looking in to camping around lakes, rivers etc. However I have been worried about the legal aspect. I prefer not to trespass on someone's land and cut anything down because I wouldn't want someone to do that to me. Also I have found that the government land that surrounds the lakes they do not allow camping off of a developed site (sites that have water and electric hookups and there are some ""primitive"" sites that's just a cleared area with a gravel patch for a tent.) Any suggestions? TIA",New to bushcraft and need advice
camping,,Summer Camping
camping,We love camping at the beach but I hate vacuuming sand out and finding it for weeks after the trip... We want to camp off the water and have the same great time minus the sand. So I was wondering if there are any good rivers or lakes that are around the San Antonio or Austin TX area that can provide the same great vibes?,Best place to camp/overland off the water that is NOT the beach?
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 0tjoauwi9id61...*",Camping in the Arabian Gulf at Al Si'la near the UAE /Saudi border
camping,"Hi. I own this.

I have used it half a dozen times. When I do so, all my friends and family make comments like ""Oh so we glamping"" and then they're so happy and cozy. It is \*absolutely\* required to use a 10x10 straight leg tent with this. The photo says ""canopy not included"" but it should say ""canopy and frame not included"" Kind of expensive altogether but I adore it. I originally bought it to lure my non-outdoorsy friends and fam to camping but honestly now even I love it and I never thought I'd love car camping so much. ( I'm mainly a backpacker )

[https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-7-Person-2-in-1-Screenhouse-Connect-Tent-with-Sewn-in-Floor/677979266](https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-7-Person-2-in-1-Screenhouse-Connect-Tent-with-Sewn-in-Floor/677979266)

Now is a good time to buy. It sells out all summer.

&amp;#x200B;

I use two cots in it but it would easily fit 4 cots.","For those who like it lush, this is the single greatest tent of all time. G.O.A.T."
camping,"  

**Bell Tent Sussex**

Luxury Family **Bell Tents for sale** for, glamping and festivals camping, lovingly handcrafted with 100% organic cotton canvas. A waterproof unzippable tent, perfect camping tents all year round. 

[www.belltentsussex.co.uk](http://www.belltentsussex.co.uk/) 

Our 100% cotton canvas bell tents make a great option for camping in the great outdoors. We offer tents from 3 meters to 6 meters that provide ample room for family and friends. We cherish the fact that the product is made with organic, premium quality cotton canvas for long-lasting use. All camping tents are crafted 280 GSM canvas materials for durability and longevity.

For convenience, these tents are faster to set up without worrying over their tension and tightness of the pegs and poles. It comes with strong guy ropes and heavy duty quality pegs, and poles. Our tents have galvanized steel tube and copper-zinc coated for better stability. They’re also easy to carry and very convenient for storage.

All our bell tents our waterproof and strong enough to endure the harshest of weathers. Our tents of all sizes have thick PVC flooring for better protection against dirt and grime and are fully zipped and sealed making them 100% waterproof, also keeps out ALL bugs.

What’s more it has 4 half-moon windows and 4 vents on the apex that are meshed for better breathability. Our Bell Tents also come with a polyester anti-bug net to get rid of those pesky mosquitoes.

Bell Tent Sussex also sells portable wood burning stoves, perfect for inside the bell tents, canvas awnings, cast iron tea pots, coir mats, air beds and much more.

To look at our range of products please see links below, we have a live online chat, so feel free to ask us any questions you may have. 

[www.belltentsussex.co.uk](http://www.belltentsussex.co.uk/) 

3m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-3-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-3-metre/)

4m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-4-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-4-metre/)

5m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-5-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-5-metre/)

6m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-6-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-6-metre/) 

Porch For Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/arc-porch/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/arc-porch/) 

Awning For Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/canopy-awning/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/canopy-awning/) 

Stoves For Bell tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/portable-wood-burning-stove/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/portable-wood-burning-stove/)",Bell tent Sussex
camping,"I really wanted to go to this campsite I like being at, but with snow and additional snow fall, I was simply exhausted and failing to complete the last 10% of the trip, and I had to put up my tent near a trail. Pushing on was just not an option.

Worse still, I spent two hours unable to get a campfire started at -14 deg C the next morning. Luckily I could make warm food by boiling water. The sleeping bag was warm, so that was nice, but the nose got cold. I will try bring  a filter mask and cut holes in it, to protect the nose a little while not really blocking air, maybe that will help keep the nose warmer. I even wore a bakalava, but it only has a small piece of fabric covering the nose and the bakalava (face mask) wasn't enough to keep the nose warm.

I did not want to quit, but I can't stay out there atm, so I went home without my gear, but I did take the time to stopming up a path through the snow the final 10% of the way. Luckily I managed to find the unmarked trail spot on, a second time, after the second snow fall, so that was fun. Some snapped branches indicates where the trail goes, but those marker aren't everywhere.

I think I will stay home for a few days and get back out, hopefully after the weather gets a little warmer, in some days it will be -15 outside, and probalby -18 in the forest.

I also had a firebox that I failed to light, so I made sure to bring it home, loosing a kilo of weight from my backpack that way. I also noticed that I had somehow brought ten pegs, probably another 200-300g weight I brought home as well. I don't need the tent pegs in winter.

I will go out again soon and bring more spirit fuel, firestarters and a woolen sweater, lots of matches and most importantly, plenty of plain woolen socks (not the thick one I already sleep with those).

So, btw, I tried out a new thing on this trip. Using leather boots, in addition to adding the goo to try seal the leather from water a couple of days before, I also used to shopping bags in plastic, in my boots. This I think helped me keeping me more warm, preventing sweat to soak the leather boots on the inside. It worked nicely. I also use various soles. Foam soal which is comfy, and soles for better insulation and warmth.","Had to quit sort of, things didn't go as planned (backpacking)"
camping,,Beautiful natural mosaics were everywhere this past weekend.
camping,"Attention all Adirondack park campers! I have a poll in r/Sacandagacampground. Come vote on your favorite spots and join the subreddit if you want. hope to see you all participate.

\-Aiden snyder

   mod of r/Sacandagacampground",Sacandaga campground poll
camping,,Our very first time camping and stargazing. I can't wait to find some more spots to try out!
camping,,AZ winter camping comes highly recommended.
camping,,"I quit my job as an RN in October to have more time and better mental health for my kids. This was our celebration trip to Blue Valley Campground near Highlands, NC. Their first “roughin it” trip, they did great!"
camping,"Hello! I'm wondering if it's ok to set up a tent in a park for a few hours. I've tried looking it up online, but it seems like it's only an issue if someone is sleeping in a tent overnight. I'm trying to find some alone time with my bf (we both live with our parents, and we don't want to stay in a hotel due to COVID), so I was wondering if a tent being up for a few hours would be a legal issue.

I live in California if that makes a difference.

Thank you!",Can I set up a tent anywhere (as long as it's not overnight)?
camping,,"There was a massive storm during the night, water dripping through the tent, and harsh winds. At one point I felt the ground shake, only to realise in the morning that a tree had fallen, fortunately it fell in a perfect arch over my tent"
camping,,"View from my tent on the Mogollon Rim, AZ"
camping,,"Morning on the swamp, Tickfaw State Park, Springfield, LA."
camping,"Ive never camped before in my life but have always wanted to go out and escape the city for a couple days. Im a nyc city guy (19yrs old). Been watching a lot of camping tips and stuff on youtube. I want to know your opinions on if i should go solo camping, and if not how can i get into the camping scene without anyone to personally show me.",First time camping (solo)
camping,,"A Man and his Dog Make Camp- Shenandoah VA, Cub Run Rd"
camping,,Remembering the backing through Tennessee this past summer
camping,,missing setting up camp with this guy at lake tahoe this summer
camping,,Winter camp - NorCo
camping,,Weekend trip to the Gila Forest in NM
camping,"I am getting an RV in May 2021. I'm thinking of ideas about where to stay, what to do. What are the suggestions and handy tips that you would give to a fellow camper?",Help for the first camping trip?
camping,,My first time camping in snow!
camping,"I apologise if this isn't allowed but wanted to try and reach as many people as possible. 

This year my partner will be taking on the mammoth task of walking 117miles from coast to coast in memory of our son George who was sadly born sleeping last year in April at just 5 months in pregnancy. He will be doing this for a charity who helped us with the service we held for George. Please click the link and consider donating so the charity can continue helping other parents financially unable to have the funeral/memorial of there wishes for their precious baby/child. [https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory#.X6rWaXbZClY.facebook](https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory#.X6rWaXbZClY.facebook)",in memory of baby George
camping,We have tented in the past as a couple but this year we will have a 1 year old. Does anybody tent with a toddler?? Or anybody with a family have a truck tent? Any advice or special gear? Hopeful for a fun summer of outdoors! Thanks!! :),Family camping
camping,I’m in the market for a queen sized air mattress and two twin air mattresses. I’m for sleeping pads too if anyone has any recommendations? Thank you!,Air Mattress/Sleeping Pad?
camping,,Our first time camping in Kentucky! Nolin Lake State Park
camping,,"Dome tent camp in white snow, location Luanchuan County, Luoyang City, Henan Province, Mainland China."
camping,,He’s got a strong connection with the force
camping,,"Some quick pictures from this weekend's trip to Michaux St Forest in Southcentral PA. A nice, cold camping trip in the beautiful woods of Pennsylvania!"
camping,I know this seems like a dumb question. But I recieved a pair of lacrosse alpha burly pro muck boots for Christmas. They're the 1000 insulate. What type of socks will make them easier to get on and off?,Sock reference
camping,"





Just got the email notification I know a lot of people have been on the waiting list for it, stay safe everyone!  The new coronavirus strain is like 50% more infectious.

https://medxsuppliers.com/

Even with the vaccine recipe it seems things are going to get significantly worse before it gets better. We just don’t have enough vaccines to give to majority of people.",Medx just restocked their CE certified KN95 masks for $2 each
camping,,Backyard Camping and Grilled Bacon and Cheese
camping,,"We loved our trip around Iceland with the Mink camper. Thinking about buying one, but is a teardrop camper feasible in central Europe (particularly Switzerland)? Any advice?"
camping,,Imagine Camping with that Gengar Sleeping Bag 🥰
camping,"Looking at the jayco flight and the evo T2700.

I like the finishes of the jayco better.

Layouts are very similar.

The evo has an upgraded chassis and is consequently heavier.

The evo has significant more storage.

If the layout is similar and the price is similar, go for the finishes I like? Or go for the storage?

Not planning to live in it, but having a closet and a pantry with a family seems like it might come in handy!",Purchasing a travel trailer! How important is storage?
camping,,Went for a camp &amp; woke up in the snow. Fantastic experience! Northern Ireland
camping,,"Went for a wild camp, woke up in snow! Northern Ireland."
camping,,How I Almost Died While Camping + Roobet Monopoly
camping,"Hello friends!!

I have a question related to tarp poles.

So usually when someone says “tarp poles” they refer to the poles used as external structure of tarps to give various designs, correct? 

I am wanting to know if there is a specific name for poles that can go on the internal structure of tarps to open the top portion creating more of an open environment. 

I ask this because my tent/bug net combo, the Eno Guardian base camp (fantastic btw) has rings on the top that I assume are for these types of poles.

Do any of you have any recommendations or use something like this??

TIA!",Tarp pole question
camping,,Am I wrong for taking a kid camping in the cold?
camping,,one of the best camping areas in Europe. In Samothraki Greece
camping,,Maybe th best place in Europe to go camping. Paradise In Samothraki Greeçe
camping,,"Slimmy Tabs Super-Burn Dissolvable Tablets - Natural Ingredients, Keto Friendly, No Calories, Gluten and Sugar Free, Vegan, Boosts Energy &amp; Tastes Delicious! - 54 Tablets (Berry Blast Flavor)"
camping,,"Take a hot bath in the open air with hot water flowing from the ground at its temperature Exceeding 35 ° C In cold weather, about 10 ° degrees Guaranteed to adjust your mood with special flavor and taste📍Oued El athmania ,Mila ,Algeria"
camping,,"Went camping with some friends in Fort Flagler, WA. Beautiful and a lot of fun"
camping,,"กางเต้นท์ภูเก็ต ภูชมดาว สวยมากบอกเลย Camping Phuket at Phu Chom Daw, Amazing viewpoint in Phuket"
camping,I live in the central valley of California. I want to camp again real bad but tired of taking chances and places not being open. Can anyone point me in the right direction? Ill drive anywhere in the state. I don't have a limit really,Willing to travel
camping,"The first time I went camping after getting back to Utah after military service, I went to a new location in the High Uintas. (Ashley Mnt Range) 

I got anxiety so bad I left all my gear, hiked to my truck, and drove over an hour to get cell service to call my wife. This was about 7 or 8 years ago!

Before my army days, when i was a teen-mid twenties, I would go truck bed camping alone all the time! Never remember feeling afraid, or having anxiety....Time may have a way of making one forget those fears though.'

How about you?",Do you get anxiety camping at a new location? has it ever kept you awake at night? What do you do to counter it? (stories welcome!!!)
camping,,Today morning run.. started with no sun and then saw it rising
camping,,No heater this time but I brought my 0°F sleeping bag
camping,"Personally I carry around a brass coin on every hike. It’s fun to fidget with and hold in my hand whenever I’m going on longer hikes. I like the feeling knowing that it has travelled with me and gone just as far as I have on my hikes for the last few years. It’s just cool to think that this little coin has travelled to more places than some of my friends and family. Does anybody else carry something similar with them that isn’t part of their gear? Please, share what you carry with you, and tell me what it means to you.",What is something you take with you on every hike? (Not gear related)
camping,Could a 16 liter pack be viable for a 2-3 day hiking/camping trip?.,Backpack size
camping,,I like taking the cat camping. Made this portable cat apartment for Luna. I think she likes it. Everything recycled.
camping,,Pancakes for breakfast?
camping,,⛺️
camping,,Nice fire with even better views
camping,,"To drain or not to drain, that is the question! :)"
camping,,Buy Verified Cash App Accounts - Bitcoin &amp; VCC Enabled
camping,,"Me and my girlfriend on our first snowy winter hike outside Stockholm, Sweden."
camping,"Has anyone encountered showing up to your campsite only to find someone else already setup on it?

Have a few camping trips planned this year and made reservations through [recreation.gov](https://recreation.gov). Not really concerned with summertime trips as there should be plenty of rangers/staff available to reconcile such situations. Have an early spring trip though that is considered off-season and campgrounds are not staffed every day and for limited hours, which has me wondering the likelihood someone takes my spot? I won't be showing up super late or anything, maybe around 5 or 6 PM.  


Who has had this happen? What did you do? What as the outcome?  


Thanks all!",Anyone ever have an issue with someone occupying your reserved campsite?
camping,,Home
camping,,"First field run and things are going great! Need a mallet and a campfire pan, but other than that it was cozy AF."
camping,,Camp setup at Jocassee Gorges overlooking Lake Jocassee November 2020
camping,,"Snow on top of snow at Mount Rogers, Jefferson National Forest, Virginia."
camping,,"Hola! I wrote a recipe book for life on the road - limited resources and ingredients in mind - hoping to raise some money to buy my own vehicle and escape the rent circle. If you would like to support or find out more, please visit greensheeplife.com 🌻 Stay Safe!"
camping,,Just small walk wit my dog..
camping,,"Extreme Winter Camping in a Polish Lavvu and a Cold Ice Bath. Kiruna, Northern Sweden."
camping,I would like to purchase a lightweight/small effective camping stove. Biolite has a small camp stove but its sold out on their website.,Whats the best type of camping stove?
camping,,"Here are some pics of me and my hammock on the Camino de Santiago. After spending the first 2 nights in albergues, I yearned for wildnerness. I spent the following 7 nights floating under the stars. Accompanied by prancing deer and curious boar, I couldn't have imagined a more beautiful experience."
camping,"Mother Nature never fails to amaze me. Isn't this view jaw droppingly wonderful to look at. Would you want to camp here if given chance?

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img y5dr5ykbo1d61...*",Mother Nature
camping,,OnlyFans
camping,,Texas winter camping getaway. Needed 4 days without news or social media last weekend.🤘
camping,,Always like reading outdoors
camping,,Winter Camping the day after Christmas in North Georgia
camping,,as requested.. my van walkthrough. enjoy!
camping,,#berniesandersmeme
camping,,"Snowy Winter Camping in the Forest outside Stockholm, Sweden"
camping,,Camping with the homemade tarp hammock
camping,,Backyard counts?
camping,"Hi there! Planning a trip to Death Valley NP the second or third weekend of March 2021. All NP campgrounds are closed until may but still would like to camp. We are fairly experienced tent campers and have done some camping on BLM and forest land. We will have a 4 runner and a mazda CX-5 (could present some issues if we need high clearance, but it has 4WD). Hoping I could get some BLM recs for tent camping! Was looking at Panamint Valley, so if anyone has experienced camping there that would be great too! Thanks so much!!",Death Valley Camping Recs
camping,"
https://sport.woot.com/offers/marmot-limestone-4-person-tent-2?utm_campaign=AmazonOffer+-+20210121+-+Sports+and+Outdoors+-+3199310&amp;utm_source=Amazon&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;ref_=pe_3199310_566157190

Solid deal on a premium car camping tent. The Limelight is tall enough for you to stand in. I have the 6p model.",FYI Woot is closing out the Marmot Limelight 4p for like $200 brand new:
camping,,A luxurious lunch. South of Zion NP
camping,,A luxurious lunch. South of Zion NP
camping,"Me and my partner lost our son George last year in April. The charity I am deciding to do the 120 mile walk for has helped us and a lot of other parents during the hardest time of our lives. During covid they are not getting much funding so they are struggling to help familys that are in desperate need.

Anything would be appreciated even a quid, if you can't donate please could you share as it helps just as much as any money would! Thank you so much here is the link [https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory](https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory)",Doing the coast to coast (Devon) For charity in may any support would be much appreciated!
camping,"When we go camping,, we have at least 2 vehicles, so space and weight aren't ever an issue. My knees aren't great, so I got a double height air mattress. Its just a cheap Intex 1 from Walmart. Its said on the box it has inner baffles (I think thats the word...), but its still really wobbly! Are they all like that or would a better 1 be more stable? Or should I just get a cot?",Air mattress vs cot?
camping,,Winter Camping Off To A Warm Start With Our Portable Wood Burning Stove and Waterproof Fire Starters
camping,,Raise them outside.
camping,,Nature Boy
camping,,Sunset over Rodman Reservoir in the Ocala National Forest. Florida has more than beaches y'all!
camping,,[camping in Oregon 🌅]
camping,"[https://youtu.be/es3Ag57\_GCc?t=115](https://youtu.be/es3Ag57_GCc?t=115)

Can you really camp in a hammock in freezing temps? 

Last summer was such a waste cuz of covid, hope this summer is better...but might try a winter/early spring?","I'm not much for winter camping , but this guy makes it look kinda fun!"
camping,,My Dad camping in a shelter we built...during a snowstorm!
camping,,My First Camp in my Bushcraft Shelter Snowstorm
camping,"Hey all! 

I am joining the Nevada Conservation Corps this April and will be going on 8 day camping trips, followed by 6 days of rest, from April to August and I probably have a billion questions. 

Is there a better subreddit for 8 day/ long camping trips or one for the Reno Nevada area?","8 day camping near Reno, Nevada"
camping,"Any opinions on Kicking Horse Campground in BC?  Campsites to avoid, extra things to bring, etc. 

Planning a trip for this summer.",Kicking Horse Campground
camping,"I’m 48 yo, 6 foot one and 250 pounds.

How exactly do you people sleep in hammocks all curved up at your head and feet? 

Seems like an unnatural position to sleep in when my whole life I’ve slept flat.

I’d like to invest in a hammock system for cold weather here in New England but the $25 hammock that I bought at EMS in Nashua NH recently clearly isn’t going to cut it.  

Thx for any help.",Noob question about hammocks
camping,,"Hammock camping a few weeks back on New Year’s Eve, the snow was a nice surprise!"
camping,,Some homemade high-energy foods you can take camping
camping,,Do you guys have any pet peeves when cooking in camps?
camping,"Just found out that we will be working remote for a few more months, so I am planning a few trips - where I can drive and setup a base camp type adventure, and do some small hikes from there in afternoon/evening.  I am looking for a good reliable Hotspot that is better than my phone hotspot, to where I can still work from ""home"" (camp spot).

Does anyone have any experience with something like this?",Any idea/tips for selecting a good WiFi Hotspot for remote camping? ie. not a local campground
camping,,Algonquin Provincial Park August 2020
camping,"Hi fellow campers, since the start of covid my best friend and I have really gotten into backpacking through Ontario’s national parks. We’re currently planning our next trip which will be from March 6th - 10th in the western uplands at Algonquin provincial park. Both of us have very little experience with winter camping. I was just hoping to get some advice from you guys on what weather conditions might be like, what type of clothes would be best to pack, and any other tips or advice for camping around that time of year. Thanks in advance for all of the tips you guys share, I can’t wait to read them!",Camping at Algonquin Provincial Park in early March
camping,,I miss (slightly) warmer days
camping,"This is one of our favorite camping spots in Anchorage, AK.  Yes, this is in the ""city"" of Anchorage, at 21miles/33k south of our downtown.  This is our ""let's go camping with whatever you have in your truck"" spot.  Cheers from Alaska, USA!","My first post: I'm Alaskan, so be kind :)"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... January '21, 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty. He had a blast off-roading and visiting this spot called the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty. He had a blast at this spot called the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... January '21, 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty - took him to the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,If I have a good quality sleeping bag do I still need an under quilt?,Hammock camping
camping,,"Camping with my 5 month old in Idyllwild, CA in July. This was his second camping adventure &amp; he loved it!"
camping,This is a sleeping bag I've had for about 6 years. Last time I used it was about maybe 1 or 2 years ago. Since then it's been packed away. I just took it out and the stuffing feels packed. What's the best way to refluff it? (Ik refluff isn't a real word).,Best way to refluff a sleeping bag
camping,,Beautiful sunrise last weekend camping 🌵
camping,,Winter Camping- First Attempt at Video Making
camping,,My brother and I got out last weekend for some winter camping. -10°C
camping,"So I'm looking to get a new tarp and I'm moving away from sil nylon, looking to get a silpoly tarp. I was thinking of HG but realized the head weight is only 1500mm rather then 2000mm. Is that much of a difference? If so, What tarps with (doors) would you recommend in the higher rating head weight area? Reason I'm switching is because I noticed in heavier rainfall it does soak up a lot of water and I'm trying to move away from that with silpoly. As well as the whole packing away while soaking wet thing too. It's not horrible but Im trying to make it less of a hassle. I'm looking for a tarp with line loc pull outs too. I can probably have them custom out them in so I'm not too worried about that. Please if you have any suggestions. Feel free to throw in your imput.",So I'm looking to get a new tarp
camping,,Truck Bed Camping in Glacier Peak Washington
camping,,Anyone know if there any good campgrounds around Southern California that are currently open?
camping,The pandemic has closed the national/state parks. Where can I still camp within driving distance of the Bay Area?,Where can I camp in the Bay Area?
camping,,My set up!
camping,,Can you eat rabbits with myxomatosis? Here are the deets:
camping,"Comicon is a thing......

Is campcon a thing?",Campcon?
camping,[https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCfbLUHs45SUVQTcVN0oAAgA/featured](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCfbLUHs45SUVQTcVN0oAAgA/featured),Friend of mine moved to the woods. Check out his youtube channel
camping,,Hammock in the snow.
camping,,Left picture is New Year’s Day 2017. Then the same spot in the spring.
camping,,Winter camping on the Colville NF
camping,,Do guys like my new budget stove?
camping,Suggestions?,"High-quality, easy, compact, quick set up tents for the winter?"
camping,"Trying to get back into the wild and take one of my daughters with me. Can anyone recommend a minimum packing list or good site/book to find one for 2-person back country backpacking? I’m rebuilding my kit from the ground up. So far, I have an REI tent that was discounted for being returned.",Taking 10 yr-old backpacking first time
camping,"Hey all. I’ve been eyeing the Life Tent and Life Bivy from GoTimeGear. Are these reliable products? Links provided below.

https://www.gotimegear.com/products/life-tent-survival-shelter

https://www.gotimegear.com/products/life-bivy-emergency-sleeping-bag",Thoughts on Life Tent and Life Bivy?
camping,,Camping off the Woody Gap portion of the AT with one of my camping buddies
camping,"Looking to see if there are common problems that people are having when they are camping, and if we can come together to offer solutions that we have tried to any of these problems!",What is the biggest problem that you face when camping?
camping,,Testing some wet/cold weather gear I plan to use next year when I thru-hike the Appellation Trail.
camping,"This is basically about bitcoin mining investments,making up to 2000$  daily from mining .dm if interested",Anyone interested in making extra money?
camping,,Motorcycle Camping in Nova Scotia
camping,,"This tent has now survived 4 seasons, from 97 to 7 degrees, 0 to 20mph winds, torrential rains, an 8in snow dump. Best tent to date!"
camping,,"How do you find wood that lights, esp in winter?"
camping,"Looking for some good camping spots in GA. Anywhere is fine, but I have been to the Little Grand Canyon so far!",GA primitive camping spots?
camping,"Hi all. Just got a small tab trailer and want to try it out. We are looking to spend a week in the mountains in GA, NC or SC in August or September. we live in south Florida so trying to keep it under a 12 hour drive but will go farther if it’s worth it. We have 3 dogs that will come along and want a spot with electric. Ideally a river or lake in the campground. Any suggestions on where to go?",Trailer camping in Appalachia
camping,,World's coolest winter? at Dubai UAE
camping,,"Camping on top of a mountain. (Naag Tibba, India)"
camping,,What a view
camping,,"Camping place at night roughly minus 15 ℃, the lake has frozen, bring to the milk and coke woke up in the morning also froze🥶"
camping,"I’m hoping to visit the Bonneville Salt Flats in Utah in spring, and I know they don’t allow camping on the flats. Does anyone have any recommendations for a campsite in the area? Thanks in advance!",Camping recommendations by the Bonneville Salt Flats
camping,,Tacoma ＴＲＵＣＫ camping | Washington: Coulee City [PHOTOs]
camping,,Camping/Hiking Bowmans wash
camping,[deleted],Tacoma ＴＲＵＣＫ camping | Washington: Coulee City [PHOTOs]
camping,,Camp finally set up (5*20ft domes)
camping,,It's been a long time since I went on a picnic with my friends. A rare photo
camping,"I recently bought a camping sauna which comes with a tent and stove. I'm looking for some places to camp which are close by a water source to take a plunge. Does anyone have some recommendations? Ideally, a place within 5 hours of the Bay Area, but I'm open to hearing about places further away as well.",Looking for waterfront camping recommendations in California for a portable sauna
camping,,This is for my next trip
camping,,Just For Camping lovers
camping,,Grand Canyon Coffee Sunrise
camping,[deleted],Cold Texas nights...
camping,,Camping in the Sierras (June 2019)
camping,"So I’m going to be on a 21 day itinerary of Maui, I will be walking around the entire island while camping along the way at legal beaches and parks, occasionally staying at airbnbs and couch surfing (yes people in Hawaii love the website couchsurf). I have practically everything I need for my trip that’s allowed on a plane before I hop on the plane. Anything else will be purchased there. However I’m looking at the tungsten 1p and the tungsten 2 p tent. The 1p is small, 4lbs, yet still can fit a grown man comfortably. However I’ve noticed the 2p tent is only slightly more expensive and only weighs 1 pound more with a lot more room and vestibules for storage. My question is, would that one pound/little bit of space in my bag, be worth the 2p tent or should I just bite the bullet and go the minimalist route with the 1p? Please this is the hardest decision I’ve had to make on my gear lol. Ps if you have any other suggestions for tents they’re welcome, the tungsten is just my favorite by far from what I’ve seen at the price range/packability and ease of set up. The tent MUST FIT INTO MY BACKPACKING BAG W OTHER GEAR AND ONE PAIR OF CLOTHES.","Deciding what tent to backpack with, please help."
camping,,Evening in the Adirondacks
camping,"Anyone have any recent reports for how the road to Usal Beach campground is currently? I know a lot of people warn the road can get really bad after rains but we haven’t had THAT much rain so far this year. Hoping to make it out there before the forecasted 2 weeks of storms in California. We have a lifted 4x4 Cherokee so I’m usually not too concerned, but we have never been to this spot and really want to check it out.","Usal Beach Campground, California"
camping,,"West Turkey Creek Campground, Arizona"
camping,,Any tips on how to deal with campfire smoke? Especially on rainy days!!
camping,Hey so I have a quick question. My girlfriend just got into camping and loves it (thank god!) And is a huge coffee addict. So I was gonna get her the Jetboil java kit for her birthday in July and was wondering if anyone knows if it might come on sale within the next couple of months?,Jetboil Java!
camping," 

Good day friends! Thanks in advance for those who take the time to read. :)  

I  have recently decided to bring my dream of camping in my car to life to travel around and have stumbled into the realm of roof top tents. The one I have my  eye on is the  [Tepui Kekenam 3](https://tepui.com/products/thule-tepui-explorer-kukenam-3). It looks like a good choice with the cons being mostly quality of life stuff. My issue is justifying the  price when I could just work on building out a frame for the inside to  sleep on with some storage underneath. However, sleeping inside the car brings about worries of not having enough storage in some situations which makes me lean more towards the roof top.

My question is: What is your experience with your roof top tent?

What is the biggest issue you have had with the tent?

Any recommendations or other options around the same price or lower?

If you could do it again, would you go with a difference setup?

Does roof top tent camping restrict you in any way from staying at campsites?",Roof top tent for my Subaru Outback
camping,,Wild Camping in English Countryside
camping,,"10 free power stations being given away, link in comments"
camping,,10 Best Camping Places in Uttarakhand
camping,"One man tent, chair, and table. Supper was a sub sandwich in the cooler. No fire needed. Allegheny National Forest, PA.

https://preview.redd.it/2uyr08wtzhc61.jpg?width=4128&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=3540a198cf86ca59772e4aa509299a7ee54d6dd2",My version of a quick and easy camp.
camping,,My friends and I are planning a trip to North Carolina to go camping here in about a month or two. Any recommendations on back country camping in NC for about a week? Thanks guys
camping,,"Blue Mountain of the Adirondacks, New York, United States"
camping,,How do I best maintain this grill grate (stainless steel)? I only gave it a brush today (steel brush afaik) after a very long time.
camping,,"At Peak One, Colorado, for the state’s first snow of the ... Summer. When we arrived the temps were at 97. One day later it was 7 with 8in of snow. The grounds went from 180 people to 6. Perfect timing :)"
camping,,"Tell me your story of getting ill from your drinking water. Location, water source, side effects, recovery process."
camping,"So to sum it up quickly I grew up in Los Angeles to two parents who grew up in Los Angeles. Neither of them ever camped as kids and the very few times I went as a child it was in a log cabin less than 5 minutes off a main highway.

Hardly what I would call true camping.

So I told myself I wanted to get out there and really do it. I bought myself a nice size tent, sleeping pad, stove, flashlight, firestarter, sleeping bag...

And it's all been in my closet for about 8 months now.

The thought of just driving out and finding some random place to camp is so foreign in my mind that it just doesn't make sense to me. I would really appreciate some guidance on getting out htere and actually teaching myself how to camp.

Thanks for any and all advice guys!",I've never camped. Nobody in my family has ever camped. I really want to learn. Where do I begin guys?? I've somewhat of a start but need help actually getting out there.
camping,,"Winter camping near Shenandoah National Park, Virginia. USA"
camping,,"Qinter camping on the Shenandoah River, Virginia"
camping," I'm currently doing A Level product design in the UK and for my project I have to design and create a product. The specification is extremely broad and allows for a lot of freedom, but a large part of it must be consumer driven, so I was wondering if anyone has any product ideas that would help them with camping (excluding fabric products e.g. coats, bags etc.). Thank you",Got any product ideas?
camping,,"Camping in Älvdalen, Sweden. Awesome company, tasty food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this 👍🌲🗻"
camping,,[Skyline camping in Oregon] [sunset]
camping,What should I bring to a camping trip,"Hey guys, I'm planning on camping this summer and this is my 1st time camping"
camping,,Sequim Bay State Park - 1/17/2021
camping,Great 3 day escape from everything and everyone.,Sequim Bay State Park 1/17/2021
camping,[removed],Free Stuff tools for Camping and Hiking.
camping,,Yukon mountain camp...just outside Carcross.
camping,"Love to car camp. I’d love a table to cook and eat that goes in the car. It’s either one of those roll tables (they have a lot of brands but they all have a modular design, with a separate surface that folds like planks. The whole thing packs into a smaller package, but the surface area is less.)

Or, a simple plastic folding table, around 4 ft. It’s sturdy and larger but the weight has me thinking. What would you choose for a few nights of cooking stews for one or two people?",Car camping and table advice?
camping,,One of the beat tentsite views I've ever had (Central California)
camping,[removed],Free Survival tools for Camping and Hiking.
camping,I’m planning a weekend road trip from Illinois to Maryland and back during the first weekend in March and was thinking of trying to overnight camp halfway. Can anyone recommend a place somewhere between Cleveland and Columbus?,Camping in Ohio
camping,"I'm planning on car camping in the near future, which I've only done in the past when it snowed so I'm not sure how warm it will be inside if it's not snowing. I don't currently have a sleeping bag, so I'm considering setting up a merino wool liner and sleeping in midweight merino wool base layers inside my car. Is that a reasonable setup or will it be too cold if it drops to ~30F at night?

I've seen people say only using a liner isn't really enough unless it's 75F+ but I think that's assuming sleeping outside. I usually sweat with sleeping bags so I don't want to buy something that will be excessive for car camping in that setup, unless I'm overestimating the insulation from a car. Should I go with this liner/layer combo or should I just get a light sleeping bag?",Car/Liner/Base Layer for Sleeping
camping,,My Simple Setup for Quick Overnight.
camping,"I have done no trace camping since I was a child. If there are people who are new to it, what are the challenges and hacks you find useful to make it more comfortable and to make it easier to erase all evidence of your passing?",No trace camping
camping,[deleted],"Zapata Falls, CO. Gave me a Fortress of Solitude vibe"
camping,,Does this method work?
camping,"I always cheap out on pants for camping, hiking and scrambling and I never learn my lesson. This time I want to buy an all season pant that I wont rip or donate after a year. I live in the mountains of Canada, warm summers, snowy winters and everything in between. I need something that's breathable for the summer but durable enough for the snow. Fjallraven and Outdoor Research seem to have what I'm looking for but at $250 + I'm wondering if anyone has found anything cheaper that does the same job. TIA",Looking for solid all season outdoor pants for men
camping,,Silent Solo Hiking- Mountain to Sea
camping,"Hello all!

Does anybody have a crossover SUV/SUV/truck that they swear by for car camping? I'm finally ready to buy a new car, but I want one that will really live up to being a travel car for me and my co-pilot, a 95lb German Shepherd!  As such, the more space, the better! 

Bonus points if it's a hybrid! If I'm enjoying the wild, I want to do my part to help save the wilderness. =D

(PS, will delete if on the wrong subreddit. Just hoping for some advice from the experts).

(PPS, no Fords. I have the escape now, and it's engine completely gave out at 58,000 miles. I want a car that will last.)",Best car for car camping...with a doggo?
camping,"So I’ve been wanting to do an overnight camping trip for some astrophotography and stay in the car. Was wondering if anyone has recommendations for maintaining airflow in the car without the car being on? I tried cracking the windows a bit, but last time when I went out to the dessert I got lots of sand blowing into the car and another time I had bugs flying in. Maybe some kind of netting made for that? To be held between the car frame and window?

Also, what are typically the laws regarding sleeping in your car? The places I’ve been before were in the middle of nowhere with no roads, so I didn’t really have to worry about it. This time it’ll be different since there is actual roads and stuff in the surrounding area, which means cops could drive by.",Wanting to go camping but have a couple questions.
camping,,Goooooooood morning!
camping,,"The sky looked cool [Flagstaff, AZ]"
camping,,"It was cold so we slept inside [Flagstaff, AZ]"
camping,,Cold view
camping,"I went camping this past weekend for the first time after buying some gear from REI. Did it alone and had a good time reading and playing on my Gameboy. The campsite I stayed at was right on the Potomac river separating Maryland and Virginia which was pretty cool. It was the type you park a little ways away and have to carry your stuff to the site.  
  
Was just curious from others with more experience about tricks for dealing with the cold. I got a pretty good sleeping bag that's rated for 18 degrees and a sleeping pad, but could still feel the cold ground underneath (Lows were in the mid 20s) Had on a bunch of layers with wool bottoms and top. I was up for about an hour around 4am feeling pretty chilly even with the bag drawstring closed around my head. I also had an issue where the breath from my nose was condensing on the outside of the sleeping bag and dripping back down onto my neck! Do folks double up and use two sleeping pads in the winter? How does one deal with condensation in the tent? I had the rainfly all the way closed most of the night to try to keep some warmth in and wind out but after noticing the condensation issue I unzipped it a little.  Also getting a sleeping bag back into it's little carrying sack is the most frustrating thing imaginable.
  
Here's a picture of my site and reading by the river! I had a good time and hope to take what I've learned to have an even better time the next trip.  Eventually I'd like to start doing some hiking/camping trips but have to figure out what to do about carrying multiple day's worth of food first. I probably also need one of those camp stove deals but then that's even more stuff to carry. Thanks for reading.
  
[Site](https://imgur.com/XUdEOAC)  
[Good book!](https://imgur.com/iF5JDDE)  
[The river](https://imgur.com/GPNrPer)",First time camping - Winter and solo
camping,,Camping in Mojave.
camping,"This may be a silly question but I've searched and haven't found a solid answer. I'm in northern Ontario and am planning on going winter camping. Usually in the summer keeping food in your tent is a huge no-no because of bears, but since they are sleeping now, is it ok to store it in my tent? Or somewhere outside burried in snow or something? Or should I just hang my food like normal? I'm thinking of other wildlife that I don't really want to encounter in the middle of the night (i.e. Wolves, coyotes.) Thanks in advance!!!!",What to do with food while winter camping?
camping,"[Buy Verified CashApp](https://usayelp.com/product/buy-verified-cash-app-accounts/)Accounts, We providing high quality Cash app accounts at the chepest prices with 100% verified guarantee.",Buy Verified Cash App Accounts
camping,,Solitude among the Joshua trees in Juniper Flats
camping,,"Another weekend in the ""hot"" tipi!"
camping,[deleted],Another weekend in the hot tent tipi!
camping,,"From a 7 week camping trip this summer. Sequoia National Forest, California. Headed out for a shorter trip tomorrow!"
camping,,Camping in the Kruger National Park (South Africa) with the wildlife coming up right next to the fence at night.
camping,,Winter Camping Pizza Taste Test - Ottawa Lake Campground Kettle Moraine State Forest
camping,,"6 years ago I took this picture while hiking with a good friend. Unbeknownst to us this was the first of what would become an annual tradition, to go out and explore different wild locations in the country. It was also the last time we step foot in the park. It’s about time to change that..."
camping,,Rate my camping temps were 27 degrees at night. Jennings State Forest.
camping,"I lve in kalamata greece and i want to try out camping ,does anyone know any good places?",Places to go camping in greece?
camping,,Just wow
camping,,[camping in Oregon]
camping,,Yukon living room
camping,,"Lone wolf howling in Transilvania, very close to my camp, sound on."
camping,,First time build the dome tent on mountain camp
camping,,Four days camp a week ago at Karangahake Gorge New Zealand with my mountain bike. Track was 3ft wide most of the time with a 64ft drop to the side so no time to stop for glory shots.
camping,"hey i live in illinois and was wondering if anyone knew a good place to go camping. preferably i’d like someplace very forested with a camp site available near a body of water, i only want to drive 5-6 hours max to get somewhere unless there’s a really good place elsewhere.",Looking for a place to go camping
camping,,This morning at Tahoe National Forest in my Tahoe
camping,,I figured you guys would appreciate this one ❤️
camping,,Tested my DIY Roof top tent this weekend in La Pine state park. Held up good with minimal condensation even at -2*C. Have to sew the windows for better ventilation though!
camping,I stay down in  north county San Diego/ south oc and i need to get out but blm and state parks are closed. Anyone willing to share a location? My insta handle is the same as my reddit if you want to dm me the coordinates? The last thing i want is to blow out the spot. Just want to get away from any sense of civilization. thanks!,Cali camping
camping,,Steel Creek Campground on the Buffalo National River in Arkansas
camping,,A little late but here’s some pics from our New Years camping weekend
camping,"We have a rather grand tent that we use a double high air mat ress in with an attached vestibule. It's really great, we've been happy with it, but due to some wind damage and what is shaping up to be a permanently bum leg, we're exploring other options. 

We chose such a big tent because my husband is 6'3"" and it's nice he doesn't have to bend over. But really, we only use the tent for sleeping/storing things we dont want condensation to gather on in the early morning. 

Here's our thought process:

Currently we pack up my 98 Camry to the brim. It works, it's just my husband and me. But our trips are usually: find a camp spot, pitch the tent, unload the suitcase/cooler/toiletry bag/camp stove/air mattress/bedding so we don't have a full car while we explore the area/find local firewood and have room to transport it. 

So, we started thinking of a little trailer to put that stuff in that we can just drop off in the morning, do our fun stuff, and then come back to set up. 

Which led to thinkin: my car's not gonna last forever no matter how good a mechanic my husband is. And he's a professional! Coupled with I had an ACL reconstruction a year ago that resulted in nerve damage to my shin; I can't kneel or even have pressure on 75% of my lower leg. So rolling the tent is stupidly funny with me trying to apply pressure with my boobs and elbows. We began to think - we don't use the tent for anything but sleeping. Why couldn't we use a little trailer  that has secured storage as well as a bed? Something that we can leave packed during the week, and just grab the cooler and head out Saturday morning? 

It also appeals to our desire to try a little winter camping. 

We looked at teardrop trailers but they have way more than we need. We don't need a kitchen area, AC, battery bank, shower, or toilet.  

My Camry has a hitch, but my next vehicle will be bigger. Maybe an SUV but I'm leaning towards a small pickup. So I'd have increased towing capacity. 

Is there a subreddit, or even a good thread, that would be in line with what I've described here? 

Happy camping!",Looking for holes in my plan as well as examples for a trailer
camping,,"First ever solo camping trip! Had a lotta fun in Hurricane, UT"
camping,[deleted],"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"So grateful to have found this hidden gem over the weekend. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"So grateful to have found this hidden gem over the weekend. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"We made rice, beans, and chicken burritos"
camping,,He’s a good boy
camping,"Hi, me and a group of friends are planning to walk the west highland way (92 miles) for the charity 'Trees for Life'. Please donate (all proceeds go directly to the charity) it will really help us to make a difference to the Scottish wilderness. We are planning on doing the trek in April and may even attempt Ben Nevis, if time allows for it. All donations are strictly for helping regenerate the Scottish forests (now only 2% of its original stature) and protect native animals. Thank you very much for your kindness, every donation no matter how small helps loads:))

I chose the charity ""Trees for Life"" as I have always been very concerned about the global impact of climate change and I wanted to help make a difference to this issue in the best way I could. Scottish forests now only span 2% of there original stature and 'Trees for Life' plans on helping to regenerate the Scottish forests and to help conserve and reintroduce native Scottish wildlife. So I decided to get a group of close friends together to trek with me trek across the Scottish highlands, for the conservation of wilderness in the Scottish highlands. Please help me make my dream of global (Scottish in this instance) wildlife conservation a reality!

[West highland way for 'Trees for Life'](https://gofund.me/e1923e9e)",Treking the West Highland Way for the conservation of Scottish Wilderness. All proceeds will go directly to 'Trees for Life' (a registered charity)
camping,,"Winter camping cooler, Jester Park, Iowa"
camping,,"Winter Camping, Jester Park, Iowa (Trip report in comments)"
camping,,Camp chairs: Parts sourcing question
camping,,Would having Gucci x Northface increase your Pokémon Go catches? This collab is such a joke to me
camping,,What's your next adventure?
camping,,Awesome commercial
camping,,He found a bone
camping,,He found a bone
camping,,A good spot to pee and let the dogs stretch their legs
camping,,Sockwa X10 | Feel the Ground
camping,,A great way to wake up
camping,,Just got back from a quick weekender at Padre National Seashore - 60 miles of beach!
camping,,"First time cooking venison on an open fire, any tips or tricks? Full video in comments."
camping,,Back in September when the temps went from 97 to 7 in 36 hours...
camping,"Hello fellow campers. I'm a freelance writer currently writing for a camping blog. I'm not here to advertise. I'm actually here to ask a question to help fill in some information I'm lacking for an article. Please let me know if this isn't okay.

I'll get right to it. I'm writing about ways to make winter camping fun, whether you're camping in or out of the snow. I don't do much winter camping myself, so I was hoping some of you could tell me about what you do to have fun while winter camping? This applies to car camping and backpacking-type situations.

TLDR - What kinds of activities do you use to have fun while camping in the winter?",Ways To Make Winter Camping Fun?
camping,,"A 5 day Winter camping in Älvdalen, Sweden. Awesome company, great food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this. 🗻🌲"
camping,,"Camping in Sweden with awesome company, tasty food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this. 🌲🗻 The location is just north of Älvdalen."
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir.
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir
camping,,"Found an awesome campsite near an old broken dam. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"Set up a nice basecamp outside of Helen, Gerogia for a great two day trip"
camping,"So it is winter and with the snow around the more or less easily seen trails in the woods are covered with snow. Wanting to go camping out in the woods I thought I'd check on things to get an idea just how much snow there is. It would be no fun going anywhere with 50 cm snow, or worse.

Turns out there is in my area about 20-40 deep snow.

One task today was to trod a path through the snow to find my way later, and this works nicely as long as there doesn't come much more snow on top of the old.

Another task is actually finding a way through the forest without spending any excess time finding my way.

I managed to find my way, and it was a good thing I had a compass with me, as I knew I shouldn't try move too much to neither west or east. Not only did I manage to hit precisely this one stone on the path that I am used to seeing, I also hit right on the spot where the non marked trail ends on a crossing marked trail, so that was great fun.

Anyway, I spent some 4 hours making my way to my location, where I normally use some 80 minutes.

I spent some 6 hours walking around today and I am exhausted. :)

Because it is winter I had to bring a headlight, just in case it got dark when I was still out in the woods.

Despite me sloshing around in powder snow for hours, my pants nor my boots seems to get wet, probably because I had an insulating layer inside my pants and also venting my pants on the side to have the excess heat escape.",I am glad I checked out my camping spot ahead of time.
camping,,Mobil ski chalet and stealth camper build
camping,"Here's the link to the story - or you can just read it below! [https://www.happybucketlife.com/jakes-two-key-rules-for-happiness/](https://www.happybucketlife.com/jakes-two-key-rules-for-happiness/)

&amp;#x200B;

**Getting creative**

My family was never one of those families that went on exotic vacations a few times a year. While we couldn’t afford a spring break in Florida, my parents still found creative ways to take my sister and I traveling when we were little.

As a result, we explored our natural neighborhood in the beautiful state of Wisconsin by way of a few campgrounds every summer.

Years later, I am so grateful for these summer adventures and the lessons my parents taught me along the way. The importance of community and the importance of nature.

&amp;#x200B;

**2020 taught us so many lessons**  
This past year has been hard for everyone and we’ve all spent more time outside in an effort to keep our family and friends healthy. In so many ways, COVID-19 has been and continues to be, an absolute tragedy. There is no way around that. Loved ones dead. Businesses closed. Jobs lost. The list goes on.

Despite these truths, however, I do think we can learn so much from our experiences this year about how to be happy.

&amp;#x200B;

**Visiting every State Park in Indiana brought me more than just the views**  
Due to COVID, I've been able to visit nearly every State Park in Indiana this year. With travel options nearly erased, my friends I discovered camping as the best way to get out during quarantine. These adventures crisscrossing the state in search of a great hike or campsite provided something to look forward to nearly every week. I’ve made amazing memories and gotten to know my adopted home state in more ways than I ever could have imagined.

Each time I visit a new campground, park, or trail, I can feel myself connecting more deeply with my surroundings. With each step on a challenging hike, I feel more alive and the worries of the workplace fade into insignificance. The brain rests while the soul comes alive with the sound of birds, rushing water, and rustling leaves.  


**What I need to be happy.**  
These moments of clarity exploring the outdoors helped me find myself and what I believe matters. What I need to be happy.  


**It comes down to two rules:**  


Love the people you are with and love yourself.  


If you find the right crew, keep them around.

If you find something you love, keep doing it.  


Everything else will fall into place. For me, by connecting with the outdoors and sharing my love for nature with like-minded individuals, I found what I needed to feel joy in a horrifying year. For you it could be anything.",My friend's awesome story about how camping brought his family together and helped him define happiness for himself in 2020.
camping,,Back in September when the temps went from 97 to 7 in 36 hours...
camping,"I’ve tried the originals, don’t care for them. They don’t have a “sphincter” &amp; the caps often got knocked open, pouring product all over me &amp; my stuff. Cost exceeds the value.

Any alternatives?",matador flatpak dupe
camping,,My fiancé got me this
camping,[removed],Buying American is Difficult to do While Shopping Online
camping,,First time camping on BLM Land...
camping,,"Join us (in solitary) on the 5th of February at Sunset. A 24 hour break from our screens. Doesn't that sound nice? With Love, from OfflineDay"
camping,"Hello all! I’ve recently seen some awesome photos of the Adirondacks posted here and I know that the park holds some incredible nostalgia and intrigue for a lot of people interested in both hiking and camping alike!

I’m a college student in Upstate New York and I currently assist the Lake Placid New York Development Committee to help plan projects in tandem with Clarkson University that seek to improve both the community feel, public economy, and tourist attraction of the town and the surrounding park. I’d love to hear from all of you about your trips to the park in the past, what you did, what you loved about it, what you hated. It doesn’t have to be just about Lake Placid, but those stories are welcome too! I’ve lived near the park my whole life and have worked pretty closely with some of its local officials. Hearing stories from people who love the land and experiencing the natural beauty of the Adirondacks has always been an incredible way to learn about what matters to people the most. Stories. Photos. They’re so much better than just trying to ask someone what’s good or bad!

TL:DR I work with the Lake Placid Development Committee in the Adirondacks and would love to hear your stories from the park, both good and bad!",Adirondack Appreciation Post!
camping,"I was booking camping reservations last night for this summer and found out the US National Park system is extending free entrance fee into National Parks for 5th graders and their families. This is usually only for 4th graders. The park service extended it to 5th graders because many parks were closed last year because of Covid. Fifth graders do need to complete a brief (easy) test and print out the entry pass but then they and whomever else is in their car get into National Parks for free. Details in link. Rocky Mountain NP, Grand Canyon, Yellowstone and all others are included. Daily fees are usually $25-$35 per car per day. This pass makes it free until mid August. 

Get on it!

https://www.nps.gov/kids/fifthgrade.htm",Free National Park entrance fee for families with 4th and 5th graders (USA)
camping,"I drive a 2005 Ford Explorer and I’m looking to start traveling for cheap with my partner soon. We’re both broke and in our early 20’s, so packing a bag for the weekend and paying ~100$ for a car mattress seems a lot more doable than spending loads on hotels every time we go out. Our combined weight is approximately 500lbs- he’s muscular, and I’m just super tall and chunky lmao. I feel this would be a great way to start camping too, this would be a good place to kick on the AC and rest after hiking.

I need this thing to be super duper durable, I don’t want to pop it on our first excursion. Every air mattress I’ve ever had experience with pops quite easily- but that may just be because my parents have *always* chosen cheap over quality. 

Ideally, a mattress topper to go with wouldn’t hurt either. We both have scoliosis so the more support the better.

Any recommendations would be appreciated and I thank you in advance 🙏🏻","What’s a good, durable, inflatable mattress for SUV’s that can carry ~600lbs?"
camping,,Did some hot tent camping over the weekend near the Catoctin Mountains. Did not disappoint!
camping,Can someone recommend a durable wagon for primitive camping. My last wagon wasn’t very all terrain.,Help with Wagon recommendations
camping,,😉
camping,,My relaxing campsite recently 🤤🤤
camping,,Holiday Park Homes For Camping in the UK
camping,,Avail The Cash Back Offers on Dating before its gone...
camping,,Camping to the UK with Seaton Estate Holiday Cavan
camping,,WoW! Holiday Camping in Scotland with friends
camping,,Anyone know a good spot to camp in Western Washington? Live in Tacoma and I'm looking for a nice little spot that's not too far away
camping,,Found a cool rock the other day
camping,,Found a cool rock the other day.
camping,"I am sure I’m overthinking this and please excuse my ignorance. 
I was camping in the Appalachian Mountains in Eastern Tennessee near a river. Around 130 in the morning I was awoken for some reason. I heard the river rumble past but I also heard what sounded like splashing and “laughing.” The splashing sounded as if it was a kayak paddle pushing the water but it had no real rhythm to it. And when I say laughing, it was almost as if I was hearing a family kayaking down the river and giggling at jokes and such. I summed it up to being crazy people kayaking in the middle of the night. I listened for around 30 minutes before O drifted back off to sleep. It never seem to fade or grow silent it was pretty consistent. 

I’d love to know if anyone has anything I can rationalize this as. 1 am seems like a bad
Time to be kayaking through rapids of a river. 

I’m open to all answers from animals to folklore. 

Thanks y’all, once again I apologize for my ignorance in the matter, just kinda freaky",Just a question
camping,,"Camping in the San Juan Mountains, CO [OC] (1729x828)"
camping,What would you do if you get the chance to enjoy different kind of himalayan Enduro in the Land of Himalayas?,Himalayan Enduro Adventure
camping,,Olympic National Forest PNW
camping,,How We Almost Died While Camping in A National Forest
camping,,Adirondacks trip
camping,"Anything that really works but is a little left field beyond the normal things people take?

Thanks!","What do you have in your camping ""kitchen"" besides the normal utensils (knifes, forks bowls and tongs etc) that maybe other people don't know is a good thing to have?"
camping,,"City of Rocks State Park, NM. Interesting rock formation."
camping,"Flying to the PNW for camping.  While camping we will spend a few days roughing it on a boat in the Strait of Juan de Fuca.  I will be solely relying on my jetboil, hoping I can get fuel in Bellingham or Seattle as I know I can't fly with fuel.  Last time I flew to camp PNW it was a new jetboil in its package.  I used the heck out of it and made soup and tea for the few of us at St.Helens on a freezing day.   I left the fuel out there with my friend but can't recall if I checked the jetboil or carried it on.  I never cleaned it with alcohol or any other special tricks to remove fuel residue.

What have been your experiences flying with a used jetboil?  The flights are domestic.  I am stressing because I am putting a lot of planning on using this item due to the extreme temperature change for me.   I also don't want to rely on finding a new jetboil out there as I have limited time before getting on their boat.","Flying to camp, jetboil questions"
camping,"I have been researching camp kitchens and I really like this one:

GCI Outdoor Master Cook Portable Folding Camp Kitchen https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07C3WK867/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_ItpbGb3JS3PXX

The question is are these worth it even if you go car camping and typically have a picnic table? Just wondering if it’s convenient to cook and store equipment separately from the picnic table.",Is a camp kitchen worth it?
camping,[removed],Free everstryke weather resistant match!
camping,,Building a chuck box. This one's cool but needs handles for transporting imo.
camping,,Tonight we attempt to fit 3 humans and 2 dogs back there
camping,,Tonight we attempt to fit 3 humans and 2 dogs back there
camping,,"Nothing better than sitting by a good campfire! Big Lake, Alaska"
camping,"Hi, genuine question, I'm a 19 year old student thinking about my career path, and the thing that rejuvenates me is camping and spending time in the outdoors but it blows my mind how some people can find time to go camping, how do you make time and what kind of career/job allows you to enjoy this beautiful past time?",How do you find time for Camping
camping,,Good winter trip! Tested some wool gear to.
camping,,Professional Army Outdoor Camping 3 Men Tent + Storage Space - OD Green - New
camping,[http://ebay.us/SshTjK](http://ebay.us/SshTjK),Hunting Emergency Survival Kit Fishing SOS Survival Gear Outdoor Camping 12 in 1
camping,,Camping at Brazos Bend State Park to escape Houston. #fishing #camping #outdoor #dog
camping,,B
camping,,Trip to Adirondack NY State Park
camping,[deleted],Trip in Adirondack NY Park in September 2020
camping,,My friend design this for my next camping good luck wish. I just love the design. Do you guys like it??
camping,"Looking for some lesser known brands of high quality both ethically and actual material. Was doing research on The North Face and did not find good things. I would like to support someone that supports both the love for the outdoors and ethical labor practices. Someone (or a company) that puts people in front of profit, unlike North Face.

For reference:

https://www.outsideonline.com/2405448/outdoor-gear-factory-abuse-labor-practices","Direction on camping brands pls, not North Face"
camping,So I am going to finally take my dog Finn camping. He is still a very young and very skittish to new things and sounds.  Anyone have any advice on how to help ease him into camping? I know the first night I wont sleep much cause he will prob be up and dog all night. Oh and he is only about 25lb mix breed but very loud bark. Plus what the best thing to bring for his bed?,Advice for dogs first camping trip
camping,,"Al Naslaa Rock Tayma, Saudi Arabia, Natural or Out of this World??? Desert Camping Saudi Arabia"
camping,,"Alone in winter is fun, w/ family works too."
camping,,Camping at Brazos Bend State Park to escape Houston.
camping,,Dippers first winter camp
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,Is wool better for winter or summer?
camping,,Pennsyltucky boy here looking for a weeklong adventure in the Green Mountain State. Looking for a trout stream and loneliness. Send me coordinates or just a good park. And Go!
camping,,Happy New Year!
camping,,Rare driver camping
camping,"A bit of snow has come here in Sweden, so what better than going for an overnighter in Svartedalen nature reserve. Enjoy 😊",Solo winter camping overnight in snowfall | Making flaming hot Pan Pizz...
camping,,Campfire breakfast on the Muurikka | Testing the Helinox chair One
camping,,Happy New Year!
camping,,Camping on the red sea has its fun
camping,Hello all! I was wondering if you have any recommendations on how to find hike in campsites in my area. I’m from the Shasta area of California. If there are any good resources that you could share I would appreciate it!,Where can I find a hike in campsite?
camping,,More from waking up in a tent with a 6 month old. Everyone wants to know. How is it camping with a 6 month old?
camping,,Mojave National Preserve this weekend
camping,,After a hard day .... Comfortable night
camping,,Did some camping during a road trip back in NOV 2020
camping,,"How to stay motivated to workout, stay fit and healthy for the rest of your life"
camping,"I am looking for a heater for inside the tent. 

I found some that are propane powered but I worry about carbon monoxide poisoning, even with a detector. 

Are there any that run on battery or solar powered?",Best portable heaters for the tent
camping,,I lost my drone in the river! What now?
camping,,Tried our new solostove out in the backyard before taking it out for the real deal! Fun to look at and minimal smoke!
camping,"New, but packed away camping backpack stinks and has smelled as long as we’ve had it.  Threw in a storage closet and recently found it.  Has never been wet or had anything inside.  How can I deodorize it?  Safe to toss in washer?  No frame But has padded back and lots of straps.",Camping backpack smells... fishy?
camping,,"First time Camping, Kedarkantha base camp."
camping,,My home for night on a layer of spruce
camping,,This hammock was an incredible Christmas present to myself!
camping,,"Full rainbow 🌈. Just outside of Vernon, BC. Take me back"
camping,,Help a research study
camping,,It was a beautiful evening.
camping,,San Bernardino National Forest
camping,,Car camping on the beach tonight
camping,,Weekend project set up a fire pit for backyard camping
camping,,"Finally got out and used our Christmas gift. Bledsoe State Park, TN"
camping,"So I have a coleman river gorge 6 person tent and I really want to save some room. Plus the bag it comes in sucks. 

I know I obviously can't compress the poles...

But what size compression bag do I need? I love sea to summit but I don't think 20L will do, maybe 30? Any advice would be great. 

We prefer a larger sent for me, my wife, my dog, and possibly to bring along friends. Obviously getting a smaller tent is an option but don't think it's needed. Thanks for the help",Compression sack question #2
camping,,Camp fire
camping,,The city has been draining so I decided to get back into camping. Most of the nearby campsites are all booked for the weekend so I’m giving the new gear a test run in the backyard.
camping,,"Chill Surviving freezing cold in forest at campfire. I tried to make my second video more entertaining and chill, hope you'll enjoy guys :)"
camping,,I Almost Died While Camping in A National Forest
camping,,"View from the top of Mt Finke, South Australia."
camping,"As title.
I know about snow anchors for snow but whats the best solution when there is no snow but the ground is frozen?",Setting stakes/pegs in Winter/frozen ground
camping,"I just finished making a rough sketch of the entire guide but felt like there might be some things missing. Then I had the genius idea to see what the camping subreddit has to say about it. Could you perhaps give me some of your valuable insight? It will be greatly appreciated.

Here's the sketch: [https://dynalist.io/d/1KavL1XCDRozOhULBNpNyGRk#theme=dark](https://dynalist.io/d/1KavL1XCDRozOhULBNpNyGRk#theme=dark)

Note: not every line is a subtitle, some are just chunks of information and will be adjusted.",I'm putting together a massive tent camping guide and need your help
camping,,Lungs full of fresh air
camping,"Hello r/camping, I started piecing together a few emergency necessities for my car a few months ago which has ballooned into a bit of a hobby of curating a bug-out-bag. It started as reflective emergency road triangles, emergency blankets, knife that has a seatbelt cutter and window breaker. But now I’m onto lifestraws and single person tents haha.


Anyway, I bought a nice compass on eBay but it’s useless unless I know how to use it. My plan was to watch some YouTube videos and test it out locally then go out into the woods, in a relatively safe and not totally remote area and field test it. Since I’m doing that I may as well do a one day or two day excursion with a heavy load of all my gear just to try it all out. Below I’ll list all of the things I will be taking with me on my first run (hopefully I get the formatting right so it’s not annoying to read) and then on subsequent tests I’ll refine what is essential and what I can do without. I would greatly appreciate any tips or suggestions on things I should be ready for/need to buy/ or other cold weather camping advice. Thank you.


* 57 gallon backpack
* 4.3 pound single person tent
* 16x20 multipurpose drytop tarp
* nylon rope
* duct tape
* lifestraw with bladder
* winter clothing and knee pads 
* kbar, bear spray, emergency whistle
* [this first aid kit and all its contents](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B08CVRXH4Z/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_PVXaGb399YVES?_encoding=UTF8&amp;psc=1)
* spork, small camping pot and pan
* [this small stove with fire starter cubes](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B01B3NRAUA/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_fYXaGb7WV6MKH)
* zippo with spare fluid
* [this compass](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07Q3VSZ26/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_x1XaGb763KSM5)
* ReadyWise Emergency Food Supply Grab Bag
* Handsaw, small collapsible trench shovel
* [This power supply/radio thing](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07FKYHTWP?ref=ppx_pop_mob_ap_share)
* cellphone with offline map downloaded and gps. USB charge cord
* gloves
* Water bottle

Again any suggestions, tips, and advice are greatly appreciated. Thank you! Also I am in NE America to get an idea of the worst kind of weather I’ll be facing. For fun as an exercise outside of general tips; let’s say worst case scenario I need to walk about 300 miles- a four day journey -to the Canadian border.",Testing BoB. Wanted some tips on winter weather camping/navigation/survival.
camping,,My First Time- NO Tent- Solo Winter Camping Under a Tarp (AWESOME!)
camping,,What is your favorite place to have a breakfast? Share Your travel Instagram! ig : saigonmunch
camping,,Excited to try out our new sleeping pad. Camping in central Florida next weekend!
camping,,Best camping ever!
camping,,Here we go
camping,,Colorado just outside Durango
camping,,Waking up in a tent with a 6 month old baby like.
camping,,-10c hammock trip. Lake froze overnight
camping,,-10c hammock trip. Lake froze overnight
camping,,my camping view is very special from UAE
camping,,New hot tent setup! So excited to get it out today!
camping,,Camping at Mai Khao Beach Phuket Thailand!
camping,,Camping in one of Oslo's many lakes
camping,,"Twin Lakes, CO. We were fortunate enough to get this drive in spot."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 5xgj2ao8snb61...*

 1. A good drying place  
Under the [awning](https://www.chinafoldingtent.com) is the best place to dry your clothes. The awning can block the wind and rain, and the lower part can be equipped with a drying rack to dry the clothes, even if it rains suddenly when you are out. More importantly, it can cut off the damage of ultraviolet rays to clothing and prevent clothing from fading and becoming old.

2. Harmony and unity of shading and daylighting  
While shielding the scorching summer, it can reflect strong sunlight into the room in the form of diffused light, so that the indoor light is bright and not dazzling, and does not affect the view from the window outside the room, extending people's living space from the interior Going outdoors creates a new living space.

3. Anti-ultraviolet function  
The sunshade's sunshade cloth has a special anti-ultraviolet function, which not only protects human skin from ultraviolet rays but also greatly extends the service life of indoor decoration and furniture.

There are a variety of patterns and colors of covering cloth. Users can personalize and decorate the window surroundings according to their own tastes. They can also choose the appropriate awning model according to the shape of the building to make the building equipped with the awning of the day The objects are more personalized decoration, thereby enhancing the image of the overall building.",What Is The Role And Function Of The Awning?
camping,,"Camping in Croatia, Peljesac Island"
camping,There aren’t many wild boar around my area but there is definitely one outside my tent and I have food in here. Am I gonna die? I don’t know what to do I just know that boars are very dangerous holy fuck one just touched my tent I think they know I have food,I’m fucking terrified
camping,,"Camping this past spring in Lone Pine, CA"
camping,,How To Never Get Bored Cooking With A Single Gas Burner or Camping Stove
camping,Alrighty y’all I’m looking for a place to camp around north Texas.  Preferably not a place with a lot of foot traffic. Any recommendations would be appreciated.,Looking for a free play to camp
camping,,Breakfast on the Beach @saigonmunch
camping,,"If it wasn’t for this sub, I wouldn’t know this tent exists. I can’t wait for spring."
camping,,SPARKS
camping,,View in Washington state. The mountains are so beautiful.
camping,,"Campers of reddit, What's one thing you didnt think you'd need until you needed it?"
camping,,"I have made steady progress over the years trimming pack weight. The past 3 years I've struggled justifying making additional changes. My eno hammock system is heavy, but it's not changing the smile on my face or heart, you know? Please challenge me here if I should consider making changes."
camping,,"She was very curious about us, and that white thing called a tortilla.. Curious and friendly.."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/1qswfx718lb61.jpg?width=4608&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=0df9d75f795d59b16c91ae62dc51f7fc1e3409ef",Spent a few weeks rafting the Colorado River and camping in the Grand Canyon
camping,,"Fishin Camp Life: Back axle on my pickup shifted, cannot go home to my Q..."
camping,"Just seeking advice on where to go this weekend. We're a family of 4 (kids are 4 and 6) and we camp often, but this will be our first time doing it on dispersed land and not a campground. We're traveling from Los Angeles in a minivan and we have all the gear. We were originally planning to head to Kofa/Palm Canyon in AZ but are last minute considering Alabama Hills now as it's been at the top of our list and weather looks super mild this weekend. I am mainly wondering if Alabama Hills will be extra crowded, as it's a holiday weekend. I don't know what to expect...if people say AH is ""crowded,"" does that mean you actually see neighbors in all directions when you look around, or are you able to get a good spot still with some privacy? Any opinions are very welcome - thank you!",Kofa or Alabama Hills for first time boondocking
camping,So what's the secret to getting a good / popular site at the state parks in Michigan? I'm locked and loaded every morning with no success.,Reservation problems with Michigan State Parks
camping,,Gurgling of water meditation
camping,,Under the moonlight
camping,,"Some good nights camping in Lincoln national forest, NM"
camping,,Bushcraft Breakfast - Petromax Firebowl - Wild Camping International
camping,,"Camping in the Ocala National Forest, just before the new year"
camping,[deleted],Camping in the Ocala National Forest just before the new year
camping,,"Undisclosed location in BC, Canada (I forget the name of the lake). What a beautiful place in the mountains :). Lake was freezing cold but very refreshing."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://reddit.com/link/kxzoiz/video/9t1jda4x9jb61/player

This product is now available at [CatamaranTech.com/](https://CatamaranTech.com/products/23-in-1)

&amp;#x200B;",THE ULTIMATE SURVIVAL TOOL 23-IN-1 FOLDING SHOVEL
camping,,Tried a flame pack from Walmart for the first time. Camera just doesn’t do it justice
camping,,"Spent a night in the Amazon. It was cool but terrifying. I don't want to repeat it, lol."
camping,,Not a bad spot for a camp. Long hike in with way too much crap but it was worth it. Kenzua Dam in PA.
camping,"Looking for some great camping spots for summer and fall that are family friendly, any recommendations?",Need recommendations for camping spots in Northern California
camping,,Rainy mornings in the tent just hit differently.
camping,,We started 2021 with a leaky tent and crazy rain! Great story to tell now that it's over!
camping,,I will develop a andriod mobile 2d and 3d game for just $20
camping,,Decoratiunile naturii
camping,,"Daily daytime camp outs happening at the family homestead. (Might have a fireplace, but no water, electricity or bathroom.)"
camping,"I'm looking for camping gear,I'm new to camping(I don't know anything).I'm searching for cheap camping accessories,I'm searching for some places for camping(I'm from India).The places should be safe,I started thinking of camping because of yuru camp if you have places like the ones in yuru camp then please tell.",Looking for camping gear and places
camping,,"I will design awesome mascot for your esport logo, twitch or youtube"
camping,,When a donkey wandered in and joined us for breakfast while camping last summer
camping," 

https://preview.redd.it/zhsdwiymngb61.jpg?width=800&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=16a668958a5422fbce902ea77717f8b80d0b11a7

　　Do it yourself, how to, outdoor life

　　The investment [pavilion](https://www.chinafoldingtent.com/) seems a bit expensive, you can only use it in summer and the rest of the year, it sits there, no one uses it. This seems to be a waste of money, but you can never go wrong again. The pavilion can be used all year round, but you must know how to use the pavilion and for what purpose. So go out there, buy a pavilion, and use it all the time in some of the most unusual but awesome ways.

　　Tip 1-Turn it into an outdoor cinema

　　Since the pavilion is already set up, you can easily convert it into a home theater. Drag the TV, CD system, and other speakers to the pavilion for installation, or just buy another set of entertainment equipment (flat screen, soundbar), which can be covered and sealed when not in use.

　　After the theater opens, organize a party with your friends and family, watch the latest 3D movies, host a sports night, and even watch your favorite shows in this exotic new entertainment venue you created for yourself and your family. Unfavorable weather such as rain or strong wind may prevent you from using the pavilion, but you can invest in heavy-duty PVC solid walls to keep the pavilion warm and safe. Alternatively, you can use the pavilion when the weather is not too severe. Mother Nature does not show her anger every winter night or weekend.

　　Tip 2-Temporary Shelter

　　If you have a movable pavilion, you can easily move the pavilion in the hot summer to provide temporary shelter for vehicles. Install a pavilion on the driveway or sidewalk, and then park the car in the shade.

　　Tip 3-Build a greenhouse

　　Build a small garden in the pavilion to protect the environment. In winter, establish a small garden and plant seasonal vegetables such as potatoes, onions, peppers, eggplants, etc. Don't forget to buy strong or flexible plastic walls to keep the inside of the pavilion warm and moist. With the right heater, you can easily get a comfortable supply of fresh vegetables throughout the winter.

　　Tip 4-Open a pop-up store

　　Do you have a small business? Use it as a pop-up store by setting up temporary pavilions in parking lots, exhibitions, and popular shopping areas. You may need a license or permit, but this is a significant way to increase awareness of local businesses with minimal investment.

　　Tip 5-Charity Activities

　　Charity activities are an excellent way to collect food, money, and clothes for the poor. If you have a portable pavilion, place it near a church, hospital, or any event to promote charitable activities. With the right pavilion, you can attract walkers into the pavilion and encourage them to follow your favorite charity. After all, any kind of contribution can have a huge impact on any non-profit organization.

　　Tip 6-Temporary storage

　　Are you decorating the house? Or do you have to leave your home for a few days because of pests and fog? Use the pavilion as a temporary shelter or a place to temporarily store your property. In summer, this is possible. However, in rainy weather and winter, you may need extra protection. Under these adverse conditions, make sure you have a strong PVC wall to provide temperature control and protect you and your property from strong winds.

　　Tip 7-Use it as a team-building exercise

　　For seminar organizers, teamwork is a great way to encourage a community atmosphere. Building things together is a great way to encourage team unity, and the pavilion is a perfect choice. In a company seminar, you can divide your colleagues into teams and then compete. The team that built the pavilion received the reward first. This team exercise can encourage unity and ensure mutual communication and better professional ethics between teams. Of course, you can also set the pavilion as an outdoor seating area during business seminars, or set the pavilion as an outdoor snack area during business lunches or events.

　　Tip 8 – Make jazz on the kid’s birthday party

　　Children like to have fun birthday parties. If you already have a temporary gazebo, hold a pantomime, puppet show, or magic show in the gazebo and make the kids happy throughout the party. You can rent two more pavilions, and hire temporary tattooists, handicraft teachers, etc. Your young guests will have a wonderful time.

　　Tip 9-Giveaway

　　If you have a company, the pavilion is a great way to promote your company locally. Created pavilions with logos and distributed them to your vendors as freebies. You can also give it away to customers who shop in your store or customers who win simple daily contests.

　　Tip 10-beach party

　　If you organize a beach party, then you know it can be very windy and cold at night. In order to provide temporary protection, please set up a pavilion on the beach and place lounges, rocking chairs, and carpets in the pavilion to relax.

　　As you can see, the pavilion is the perfect holiday destination when it comes to relaxing outdoors. Just sitting in the pavilion completely comfortably in the pavilion can provide a multi-purpose investment.",10 Unusual But Great Ways To Use The Gazebo
camping,Hey Campers! What kind of tent do you recommend for winter season?,Winter tent
camping,,Car camping at a disused Quarry in South Australia recently.
camping,,watch this video
camping,,Campfire on the beach from a while back in Öland Sweden
camping,"I recently bought a truck and I’m trying to decide how I want to focus my camping set up. 

I have thought about buying a camper shell, building a bed frame with storage and sleeping in the truck bed. Only one issue, I’m 6’4 and have a measly 5 and a half foot bed. I could sleep diagonally but this would make it very difficult if another person were joining me.

I am also very interested in doing the roof top tent option which would be mounted on a truck bed rack. I love the idea of this because I could then use my truck bed for other items and likely be more comfortable. I would also be able to more comfortably fit another person. My main concern with this option is the durability and the longevity of these roof top tents compared to a camper shell where I wouldn’t have this concern. 

Anyone have any opinions on which option they would do and why?",Roof top tent vs Camper Shell
camping,Would it be safe for me to do a 2 day water fast while camping with my dog in below freezing temperatures? Or would it be dangerous without having any food to keep my core body temperature at the right level?,Fasting below freezing.
camping,,"Different camping view. Big Red Sand Dune, central Australia, for the Big Red Bash 2019. Remotest music festival in the world. 1300 miles (2000km) west of Brisbane 10,000 people all camping for 4 days. 3days there and 3 days back all bush camping."
camping,,"Looking down at McCarthy Creek to Booth lake, access point 17 in Algonquin Park, Ontario, Canada."
camping,[removed],NOLS courses for non-professionals? Worth it?
camping,,My favorite campsite from my favorite trip. The view of Half Dome was perfect. Also a few other pics from the trip. Yosemite National Park from 2017.
camping,We camped &amp; snorkeled at Devil's Den in Florida in our #tinycamper - IT WAS AMAZING! CHECK IT OUT! [https://youtu.be/PBH9lKFRx68](https://youtu.be/PBH9lKFRx68)   \- What's your dream camping spot? ,CAMPING IN FLORIDA
camping,"My wife saw a video of someone with an enclosed gazebo and a ducted fireplace, so now she wants one.

Yes, I've told her it's stupid and potentially deadly, but I don't know how long it takes for a single propane gas oven to fill a space with CO.  She said she would open the door while it's on, but I don't know if that's good enough, and it would make it cold.

How long can it run for without it being dangerous?",My wife wants to add a propane gas firepit to our 10 x 10 enclosed gazebo. How long can it run before I have to worry about carbon monoxide buildup.
camping,"My wife has pretty severe Scoliosis and has a lot of trouble wearing backpacks. I reckon she would do okay with a lumbar pack, but there does not appear to be any lumbar packs large enough to support a multiday excursion without myself being overburdened. Does anybody have some insight on packs that may help alleviate weight on her back? Or form fit to be weighted in a manner more suitable to her?",Backpacks for Scoliosis
camping,"Another Redditor just posted their pics of backcountry camping in Algonquin Park, and I have a flood of good memories from about 20 years ago in the late 2000's when a handful of buds and I used to go winter camping between Chirstmas and New years each year. I thought I'd share, even though this reddit seems more dedicated to pics than words :)

We never took tents. Back then, hot camping wasn't a thing, and we felt like we could get by without one - but that didn't preclude us taking some other ""creative"" shelters. We weren't much good at lightweight camping. I recall my pack was over 80lbs every time we went. Our clothes were mostly wool and we didn't do ""high tech"" fabrics since we were all broke, and the army surplus store was down the road.  Sleds were a prominent part of our gear.

In year 1 - we thought this was a once in a lifetime adventure, so everyone over planned and overpacked with all sorts of expectations and concerns. We arrived at Algonquin Park at the crack of dawn and hiked back into the woods on the Western Uplands trail (IIRC). Pulling the sleds and hiking in the snow was far harder than we'd anticipated. We moved slower than we thought we would and quickly saw we wouldn't be reaching our intended goal. Eventually we reached Starling Lake and declared it ""home"". 

John pulled out a huge 50'X25' Canadian Tire tarp and we started to talk about how we'd set it up to make a shelter. Eventually we stretched out the tarp on the snow and decided that we'd dig a pit to stretch the tarp over. The pit was dug, and  the tarp stretched out. by time we were done digging, the sun was getting low. It was a warm night for January though. No one was cold, and the snow was getting heavy - there may have even been a light fog. We found some dead trees in the woods and stripped their branches for firewood. The spars that were left, we laid across the pit to hold up the tarp, and lashed a grid together, then stretched the tarp over the trees and crawled inside dragging in our gear behind us. 

As we got the fire going to cook dinner, John produced a large piece of Tyvek housewrap.  We set 4 spars in the ground and made a gazebo as a light drizzle began to fall. As we ate, the drizzle thickened and we became concerned about freezing rain. After a meal of reconstituted dehydrated whatever it was, we all made a run for our shelter to stay dry, and indeed, it was very cosy inside - but the roof didn't have much insulation. We all decided that a quick shoveling session to put snow on the tarp roof would be a good idea. an hour later, the roof had a consistent 6"" layer of snow on it, and everyone headed back inside to dry out.

With about a half-dozen candle-lanterns lighting the space, everyone settled into or onto their sleeping arrangements. With the weight of the snow, the roof was a few inches lower. In the spaces between the spars, the tarp sagged more, but it was all good and warm and comfortable.

It wasn't until after we were asleep that the drizzle became rain. The rain was gentle and silent and we didn't hear it hitting the tarp since the snow muffled the sound. I think it was Jim who woke first. His sleeping bag had soaked through, and he woke up everyone else. The weight of the rain on the tarp had made it sag down to where it was nearly touching me, and the water in the snow pit was coming up from below. I was on a cot about 4"" off the ground and about 1"" from the ceiling and trapped between the water above and the water below. No one was getting out of the snow pit dry, and all of our gear was soaked through.

We all scrambled to the gazebo, which had collapsed with the weight of water. For the rest of the night we would stand outside alternating between trying to rescue our fire (which sank into the ground as it burned) and the gazebo (that kept wanting to tip over with the weight of water it was holding). 

As the night went on, nature was kind to us, and the temperatures dropped below freezing, turning the freezing rain to snow and the water to ice. Eventually, 2 of the guys were able to return to bed, but John and I stayed up tending the fire and the gazebo. 

As soon as the sun reappeared, we got everyone up and assessed how bad things were. I recall my backpack being a frozen brick. That may be incorrect, but for sure it was not in good shape. we decided to dismantle camp and hike back out. Everything weighed extra with all the water. Dis assembling the pit was a mammoth chore with the tarp frozen to the poles. 

Luckily we had food for 4 days and had only stayed 1. We ate well and laughed about our mistakes as we tore camp down. everyone was exhausted. On the way out, the trails were a skiff of snow over a slick of ice, and we all had to lean on each other as we trudged along with packs that were all over 100 lbs.

That year set the tone for all the years of winter camping that followed. It was the first great failed experiment - others would follow including home-made snowshoes falling apart on the trail, a mitten dryer that turned into a blowtorch when put over the fire, The year we arrived too late to build quinzees and ended up sleeping out in the open, the year we took a marine from Florida with us who had never seen snow, and so on. While all of our trips had amazing failures, we never felt like we were in real danger, and always came away laughing and having a great story to share. 

Jim and John are in their late 60's now and no longer camping. I miss going out there with them. I'd do it again in heartbeat.",Winter camping memories
camping,"Just spent 3 days on the river in the New Bren KOA, great little spot.I you have a chance check it out

Camper Rockwood Primer A122,

2 adults, 1 teen, &amp; 1dog

https://preview.redd.it/3fqxw7951cb61.jpg?width=1332&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=659c0aa430555bdaadb3097297623f27543d2bae",New Bern NC KOA
camping,,Spent the last week exploring Big Bend state and national parks
camping,,20 degrees is nothing when you’ve got a furry space heater in the tent!
camping,,Quick question. What is the worst that you've experienced during any camping trip?
camping,,"Love all the camping symbols on my shirt! Fires, s’mores to name a couple!"
camping,"I want to do more camping this year and I was wondering if anyone knows of a good bedroll or sleeping bag suitable for someone who is 6'10""?",Good Bedroll / Sleeping Bag for Tall Person
camping,,Recall on Sea to Summit Pots
camping,,University project: Portable hydromechanical generator
camping,,Trekkertent Saor DCF 4-season winter tent review
camping,,I could do this forever 💓
camping,"Hey guys, I have a few trips planned for this upcoming summer and would love to hear what kind of foods you bring when camping. There will be 2-4 of us together with 2-4mile hikes out to our campsites. I have a nice cooler and Coleman stove, but less to carry is always preferred. 

I read someone likes bringing summer sausage and roasting it over the fire. Those are the sorts of things I’d love to hear more of and thought others might as well. Thanks!",Suggestions on favorite foods to pack or meals to make?
camping,,"Little Limestone Lake, Manitoba, Canada"
camping,"I’m going solo backpacking/camping in mountain lion country. Not too worried about hiking during the day.  However, when I’m setting up camp, cooking over a campfire, etc... it will be around sunset and into the evening.  Any precautions I can take since I will be solo camping during their prime hunting time at dusk and right after nightfall?  Thanks in advance for any tips.",Advice on backpacking in mountain lion country
camping,"I am working to secure a remote location to be the site of an outdoor sustainability school that will include a no trace camping area, what are your thoughts about how popular that might be? At most I would prepare some specific areas to be flat enough for tenting and have water available on-site. More details at: [https://gofund.me/52fa3b77](https://gofund.me/52fa3b77)",gofundme to save 80 acres
camping,,Let's hear some of your best camping hacks that you have.
camping,[removed],レーザーポインター ペン型300mwレーザーポインター 赤光 紫光レーザー光線
camping,,"A cold morning in algonquin park, ontario."
camping,,"Resurrecting FJ60s, FJ62s &amp; FJ55 TOYOTA LANDCRUISERS: Parts, Builds, Revival &amp; Fixing Updates"
camping,,First Camping Knife!
camping,,BLACK - Pearl Jam | cover
camping,"My Campfire

I love it! [Mini Campfire](https://www.solikefire.com/collections/fire-pits-1/products/teenra-portable-stainless-steel-bbq-grill-non-stick-surface-folding-barbecue-grill-outdoor-camping-picnic-tool)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img ft9nayhgh9b61...*

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img v80b5nrdh9b61...*",My Camping Tool
camping,"A friend an I are planning to car camp at one of the sno parks near Tahoe, since some allow over night parking. Were wondering how cold it can get for us to safely camp in our car. 

We've tent camped with the overnight low getting around 30F. We have a down comforter, heated blanket (I planned to preheat it before we turn the car off) and a thick foam sleeping pad. Is there anything we should know before hand, and is there any rule of thumb for how cold is too cold to camp in your car? 

Thanks!",Realistic expectations for winter car camping
camping,,"Bushwacking up the ridgeline facing south overlooking O.S.A. Lake in Killarney Provincial Park, Ontario, Canada, early spring."
camping,,"Sea to Summit pots, recalled. Fyi and all."
camping,"To the people who have been to Glacier national park in the US, what were the best trails you did there?",Glacier National Park tips?
camping,,07 Subaru Outback build &amp; Yosemite January 2021
camping,"I've been making campsite reservations for a trip this summer to the National Parks and may have two friends joining me for a few days. All of the reservations I've made were just for one person and I am wondering if I need to make changes to that prior to my trip? It would still just be one site, but with two tents for three people. Any ideas?",Does the # of people on a site reservation matter?
camping,,Much prefer the bottom pic
camping,"I know a lot of campsites are closed everywhere so I'm literally looking for anything at this point. I'm in Santa Cruz and willing to drive 10 hours or a bit more in my Prius, so no off-roading and avoiding snow right now. I'm considering Moab or Zion if any camping is available, but does anyone know how the weather is in the winter there?  Any ideas on dispersed camping I could do? One of my roommates might have covid so it's ironically a better idea to get out. Hopefully somewhere is open?!!",Any dispersed camping open in California? (or possibly Arizona and Utah)
camping,"Hey guys,

So I am a newbie at camping, and wondering what kind of qualities do you look for in gloves? Comfort over thickness etc?",What kind of qualities do you look for in gloves?
camping,"I am interested in your experience camping at or near this park in North Dakota. Their camp sites are almost all first come-first serve this year which I have never done before. And as a planner makes me nervous!
 
Just looking for anyone else’s experience with this area or tips for actually getting a site. Thank you!",Anyone camp at/near Theodore Roosevelt National Park?
camping,,First night truck camping with this chompasaurus named Ringo. Slept more in the truck than he ever had at home.
camping,,Made myself a fun little sticker for my new tumbler.
camping,,First night in the new tent! Did a dry run in the woods by my house :) it got down to 21 degrees Fahrenheit!
camping,,"Camping with the pups at Fall Creek Falls State Park, Tennessee in October"
camping,[deleted],"Husband and I camping with the pups at Fall Creek Falls State Park, Tennessee, USA in October"
camping,,Bag-o-Lasagna and some garlic toast (Kissimmee Prairie Preserve State Park)
camping,[deleted],First time female car camper
camping,,I saw someone else awesome reflections photo and thought I would share one I took of my own! Bon Echo PP
camping,,The fiancé and I took a day trip out to Lake Fairfield State Park (TX)
camping,[deleted],The fiancé and I took a day trip out to Lake Fairfield State Park (TX)
camping,[deleted],The fiancé took a day trip out to some trails and Lake Fairfield state park (TX)
camping,,Don’t forget to look up the next time you’re camping!
camping,Do I just simply throw it out? Or is there a safe place to take it to? Can I recycle it?,What do I do with expired bear spray?
camping,,One morning while tent camping in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) mountains (2018)
camping,"I’m trying to find a place to do some dispersed camping away from everyone in Northern California. 

In particular I’m preferring to search BLM land for places to camp, but I’m getting a lot of conflicting information when searching online. National forests seem fine too, but there’s a lot of talk of stumbling into private property and whatnot.

To anyone with experience finding dispersed campsites to just set up for a day or two without anyone around, how have you gone about searching for/getting to these types of sites? Thanks for any advice you might provide!",Dispersed camping in Northern California
camping,,Black Sand Dune Camping Saudi Arabia (Quick Video)
camping,,My childhood best friend just started this channel. Figured this great community could give him some support!
camping,,#winteriscoming
camping,,"Reflections - British Columbia, Canada."
camping,,"Lake Louise, Alberta, Canada!"
camping,[removed],Looking for help with a personal project I am working on about camping!
camping,I've tried to Google it but didn't find anything. Anybody done any winter camping in MA and know places that allow it?,Winter camping in MA?
camping,,Palo Duro Canyon State Park
camping,"I know this is a goofy question.. 

Going camping in bear country. I’m a girl so I’d like to smell good but not attract bears.. 

does anyone know any tips for scents bears don’t like but people do? Or any other tips for a girl who’s camping that are useful.. it’s my first time! 😊🐻",Bear safe perfumes and soaps?
camping,"I am a mid-level experienced car camper and have only camped in camp grounds up until this point. This sub has inspired me to stop paying $15 a night to sleep 30 feet away from another tent and go explore the national forest near me (Talladega). I found my spot and checked it out last weekend. I also have two more backup spots nearby in case a gate gets closed or someone is already there. Each spot has an old fire ring.

Any tips for making the transition to dispersed camping? I think I am going to be a little freaked out the first night but I want to give it a go!",First time BLM camping. Advice? Freezing temps expected
camping,,Camping finally in “winter” TuHcan escape is Mt Lemon.
camping,,15 Smart Tips for Camping in the Rain
camping,,This little fella came up while setting up a tent in Cades Cove
camping,,Help Me Reach My Goal and Support: one last time
camping,,"Our first winter camping trip. Tahquamenon Falls, Paradise MI"
camping,,Cottonwood lake in pikes and San Isabel national forests (CO)
camping,,"Great Sand Dunes, Colorado. Hiker in the distance"
camping,,"Trip to Mt Iso, Senapati district, Manipur"
camping,,"Camping a cold November day in Oslo, Norway"
camping,,Cozy nook ambience
camping,,"Poland Spring, Maine"
camping,,Desert Camping in Unexplored Saudi Arabia
camping,,Red Sand Camping (Mars Lookalike) Saudi Arabia
camping,,Awesome Camping Experience in Unexplored Saudi Arabia by American Family (Mars Lookalike)
camping,,Black Sand Dune Camping in Saudi Arabia (Moon camping)
camping,,openfire cooking
camping,,From the lakeside
camping,,View from yesterday's hike!
camping,[deleted],View from yesterday's hike!!
camping,,You didn’t even know you needed these chairs!
camping,"Moved to Arizona a few years ago from the grand Teton area of Wyoming and have loved camping all my life. Moving out here has posed its challenges mainly being that i live in the city and it’s gonna be a drive anywhere to go to a decent camp site and when I find one, it’s basically a hotel for tents doesn’t feel like camping. Any good recommendations out there for beautiful areas that are “undeveloped “ or just don’t have a tents every ten feet?",Arizona camping
camping,I got the Nomad around three weeks ago and since then I have used it on two camping trips. I want to give you a no bs review so I’ll just list my personal pros and cons about the tool. Pros: it’s really compact so it takes no effort just to throw it in the bag or put in my wallet. The versatility of this thing is great it has like 13 or so tools (of which I probably use 6) but just cutting down Six tools into one makes the purchase great for me. Now the cons: the weight is more then I thought it would be (this might not necessarily be a bad thing but I just was caught off guard by it) and the knife on the tool is dull so I had to sharpen it on my stone. Overall I would give an 8/10. (https://backpackingmovement.com/products/card-multi-tool),Nomad Multitool Review
camping,"I decided one day that I was going to stop buying duraflame logs since they are a waste of money. Duraflame logs are made of three ingredients. Wax sawdust and seeds (for crackling sounds). 

Apparently a lot of people have sources for free sawdust near them but I can’t seem to find any of that so I came up with my own recipe. Instead of sawdust I substitute charcoal.


Here is the recipe

Take lump charcoal (home made or store bought) and grind it into a sand like powder using a blender/ food processor.
[tip: use a wire spoon called a spider to pick the coals out of a cold fire, shake off the soot and salvage the charcoal]

Melt wax in an all metal pot or kettle [this is importand] and pour it into a container with the charcoal until it becomes like wet sand when you mix it.

Scoop out the mixture with you hands when it cools down *JUST* enough and scoop it into a sheet of aluminum foil. Wrap the aluminum foil around the pile of charcoal and once fully enclosed, massage into the shape of a loaf/log. Set aside till completely room temp (about an hour for me)

Unwrap loaf from foil and place onto wax paper, wrap wax paper around about 3 times and press sides like a burrito so it is fully enclosed in wax paper.

***here is why it’s important to use a fully metal pot to melt the wax*** 

You can place the used pot on its side in a fire to burn off the wax and leave behind just soot, that can be easily scrubbed off with Brillo or steel wool with some washing abrasive if needed until all the black is gone.


Now some people don’t like using paraphin wax becouse some studies show it produces certain unhealthy chemicals when burned. I don’t have a problem with paraphin wax but if you do then you can use bees wax or if that’s too expensive use vegetable waxes like soy wax.",I think I figured out the perfect campfire fuel recipe.
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,,Tarp Shelter for Life
camping,,These are reliable methods to start a fire without matches or lighters
camping,"Trying to plan my summer camping trips and want to go somewhere new. I like pretty lakes/rivers where the campgrounds are either right on the shore or close enough for a five minute walk. Do you have any favorite campgrounds that fit that description, within 1-3 hours of Sacramento?",Best waterfront campgrounds in Nor Cal?
camping,,Eastern Sierras this past weekend. Unbelievable sunsets and stars!
camping,,Northern Ontario Camp N Cook - Steak and Beans
camping,"I’m looking at some from REI that start at around $50 but can go up to $100. I’m not a big spender when it comes to camping so I’m wondering if these are worth it. I don’t think I’d be using it for sleeping at any point, just hanging out. So I don’t mean a tent hammock.",Is a camping hammock worth it?
camping,,Whats your top five camping gear need to haves.
camping,,Photos from our 5 day trip in the BWCA from last week.
camping,[deleted],Photos from our 5 day trip in the BWCA last week.
camping,A lot of the stuff on amazon has bad reviews because it is low quality.,What camping cookware set would you recommend for cooking over a campfire?
camping,"Found this in with some family photos and and notes that my mother had saved over the years, she had cut it out, probably from a magazine I would guess.
Survival Training.
When I married 30 years ago, I was a camping enthusiast.  My bride had reservations about a camping honeymoon, but I painted a glorious picture of sitting close together in front of a campfire, or looking out over spectacular scenery.
There were a few mishaps.  For instance, she accidentally inserted the tent's center pole through the canvas; it rained that night.  The outboard motor gave up the ghost, and so did the fish in the lake.  Two flat tires enriched the journey home.  When I apologized for the discomforts, she passed it off cheerfully.  ""I know there will be some hard times in the future,"" she said.  ""But I've lived through a week with a nut in a leaky tent, and I'm ready for any natural disaster.""",Camping story from the past.
camping,,Deep in the Canadian Rockies (July 2020)
camping,,"Anyone else find a pocket bellows to be a great addition to their pack? My friend brought one along on our last camping trip, and it was quite handy!"
camping,Drag the rod towards you rather than pushing the steel away from you,Best use of a Ferrite rod
camping,"Me and my girlfriend want to go camping this weekend because of the holiday on monday, but so many things are closed because of the government shutdown. Does anyone have any recommendations for camping spots that are open?",Camping in California
camping,The office is currently closed. Am I still allowed to do some backpacking in the state park next week?,"Winter camping in Green Ridge State Forest, Maryland?"
camping,"Any recommendations for places to go dispersed camping or hiking or backpacking? There is some BLM land in Anzaborrego that is still open. 

Some of the longer mountain routes seem a bit long for a day trip and driving home. My girlfriend and I have a long weekend and are hoping to get outside and away from the city for a few days.",SoCal camping/hiking/backpacking
camping,,"BC, Canada"
camping,[removed],$5 for your opinion! At what age did you get your first cellphone? Help us with our study! ( PayPal / Amazon Gift Card )
camping,,"Sespe Wilderness, California- June, 2020- first solo backcountry camping trip"
camping,,5 Winter Camping Tips
camping,,"How to overcome my fear? I travelled from São Paulo to Manaus (Brazil) only to enter the Amazon rainforest but now I'm in front of it I can't enter it, I'm afraid, I don't know what can happen. My instincts are obliging me to return to the comfortable civilization."
camping,,Wallpaper
camping,,"A wild camp in Scotland, UK I did before lockdown. Longing to get back up there again!"
camping,,"As promised: The new hard shell roof tent from ventura. Coming to the market from Feb 2021, the price is amazing! log onto venturas Web site to put your deposit down and if you tell them landrover Jay recommended you - the price will shock you (there will be a limited number sold at an introductory"
camping,,レーザーポインター ペン型300mwレーザーポインター 赤光 紫光レーザー光線
camping,"With such a wide spectrum of backpackers in this group, I'm curious as to what people prefer as their cook set. Are you an ultralight alcohol fuel stove kinda trekker, or do you prefer the luxury of a larger kitchen?

I've been using the GSI Pinnacle Soloist for four years now... here is my gear review based on using it for day hikes, overnighters, week long treks and kayak adventures.

https://youtu.be/VueoAm-4OzI",Preferred cook set?
camping,,Good morning from Massachusetts!
camping,My brothers family and I are going to go to St. Mary’s Retreat Feb 19-22. Cannot wait to set up EVERYTHING I own for camping. Pics to come soon. I’m so friggin excited.,Can’t Wait
camping,"I'm going car camping next month, have an inflatable mattress, super comfy but I was chilly in November in the 30's. Likely the same temp next month. 

My bag is rated to 40 degrees and I put a liner

I was considering a walmart blue CCF mat on top of my mattress - super cheap @ $9 but not sure just how much they help. I've read they have an R value of almost 2, I'm curious how much that helps. 

Any experience with that kind of setup anybody?

Thanks",R-value of 2 - how much does that help?
camping,Where can I go to? Seems the forests are closed.,Socal camping spots?
camping,"Thinking about doing a night next week and would like some advice on must haves, or tricks anyone might know from experience.",Tips for winter camping!
camping,,Reflecting in the Texas cold...
camping,,"My review of the campground at Gulf State Park in Gulf Shores, Alabama!"
camping,,Campfire Breakfast
camping,,"Hehe, so true..."
camping,,"Star Lake, Tahoe Rim Trail, August 2020"
camping,"I got a 40L pack and my single-person tent is defaulted to being strapped to outside my pack, either on the top or bottom. Is it wise to compress or fold the tent body and rainfly to put inside the pack?",Packing tent in backpack: Compress or Fold?
camping,"Hey all! My questions are about mattresses, particularly cold(ish) weather mattresses since I'm going camping in about a month and it's likely to drop into the 30s while I'm there.

 \- Question 1: If I combine two R-2 pads, will it really make an R-4 pad (or is that an internet lie)? 

 \- Question 2: I'd like to bring my air mattress along for comfort. If I do, should I put the foam mattress *under* the air mattress, or *over/on top of* the air mattress for insulation?

TIA everyone - I really appreciate it!",Cold Weather Question
camping,"Planning a trip out there this coming weekend. I know inside the park is closed for camping. Looking for a spot to set up for one night. I figure I’ll locate some BLM plot and set up there, but I was curious if any recommendations would come through by asking. 

Thank you in advanced.","Those of you who have been to Joshua Tree recently, where have you spent the night?"
camping,,First time camping since I was a kid... I didn’t realize how much I needed this.
camping,"Getting prepped for an extended Moab trip. Bought a Firebox Gen 2, 5"" and a Trangia spirit burner. What do you guys recommend?",What fuel for Trangia?
camping,,More than a decent place for some warming drinks. ☕️
camping,,Modified this $20Fireman’s hatchet into a Bushcraft-ish axe lol. Let me know what you think.
camping,,Annual Boundary Waters trip led to a hopefully non annual hammock failure. Got to set up the Camp ENO bivy to finish off the trip!
camping,[deleted],Annual Boundary Waters trip led to what is hopefully a non annual hammock failure. Got to setup the Camp ENO bivy for the rest of the trip!
camping,"I have begun to plan for a small camping trip and was hoping to get some inspiration for the food. One of the best meals I’ve had was camping at Joshua Tree for a uni trip, and the supervisor made a deep dish zucchini lasagna. We cut up the zucchini (with other ingredients) and put into the deep dish then we put it under coals and fire to cook it (didn’t need a stove or nada). And for dessert we had bananas that we stuffed with PB, chocolate, and marshmallows and wrapped the stuffed banana with foil then put it with the coals (similar to the deep dish). Any fun creative cooking meals like this?",What’s the best camping meal you’ve made/had on a trip?
camping,,Is this how you start camping/hiking?
camping,,The beautiful Czech bohemian forests
camping,,[crabbing and camping ] Oregon coast
camping,,An amazing View from Big Bend National Park last summer
camping,My buddy and I had a fun time hiking up this mountain to this beautiful view,An amazing view from Big Bend National Park
camping,"Hi all,

I got a MSR Pocket Rocket Deluxe for Christmas, and I’m looking for ways to utilize this gas stove. It seems like it’s mainly geared towards backpackers trying to make MRE’s but I’d like to use this for something like a skottle or cast pan to cook some premo meals. With the output of the MSR being 11k BTU’s and the Tembo Tusk supplied burner (I think by Coleman) being 10k BTU’s, I don’t really see the problem, but it doesn’t seem to be marketed in that fashion. 

Any help is appreciated. Thanks!",MSR Pocket Rocket Deluxe Stove Uses
camping,,Trail Ahead
camping,,Snow in Louisiana! Enjoying every moment of it.
camping,,Kayaked 5 miles in the ocean to camp on this island. Also this was my first time going to the ocean.
camping,,Flourless Pancakes – 3 Ingredients
camping,,On the road to Birdsville with the camping table on the back
camping,,"Camping on the bank of the Diamantina 'river' in Bordsville, Australia. 29 December"
camping,"I'm looking to go camping with my girlfriend. We have a 4x4 &amp; offroad. We're in socal &amp; want to see something else. We're fine dispersed camping &amp; prefer secluded areas. 

Anywhere I can go that has forest, a lake &amp; a view?

Tried looking at Yosemite area, but surrounding forests have closed a lot of roads to go to dispersed areas for camping (Stanislaus National Forest). I. E. MVUM shows I can only be there 4/15 to 12/15

Tried Tahoe National Forest but it has a similar road restrictions fro. 4/1 to 12/1.

Lastly, can I cross state lines? Lol. Arizona seems more chill.",Where to go now? Lol.
camping,,Enjoying much in Camp
camping,"With the onslaught of this virus alot of us have taken to trekking and camping keeping in mind the social distancing aspect of this hobby. While there are alot of blogs amd videos on various trekking and camping spots most of the information is out dated and sparse. This led me to the idea of making a discord server for hiking, camping and perhaps travelling in general for our diverse country. Would like to know how many would be interested before putting in the work to make a server.","A discord server for trekking, camping, hiking etc in India"
camping,,Vatnajökull glacier in Island
camping,,Key4ce - IT Professionals
camping," Hi everyone, I'm in the market for a portable/lightweight power supply that can output 300W. I need it to have a capacity of at least 1000 watt-hours, but my understanding is that stations that can do this are very expensive and run at least 600-700 dollars, usually 1000 dollars.

I was wondering.. could I get a 300W portable power station (like the Renogy Phoenix or Rockpals) and add extra batteries myself? I'm also not opposed to building the entire thing myself, but it would have to be portable/lightweight, and I'm not sure that's possible. My budget is ideally $300, and at the absolute maximum $500.

Any advice would be appreciated, thanks :)",Portable power supply advice and recommendations
camping,"On the fence between getting a Teardrop camper or going with camping trailer with RTT.  I see PROs and CONs of each.  Teardrop camping scores high on the convenience scale while I see going with RTT closer to traditional tent camping experience. Both are still full of conveniences and a win either way. 

Really curious why you went one way or the other and if you later wished you had picked differently. Thanks",Teardrop camper vs camping trailer with RTT
camping,"I'm in Santa Cruz and looking for a little getaway alone. I've never camped alone but I know I can do it, and I'm looking more into dispersed camping, not campgrounds, because I know they're not open now. And you also don't have to pay lol. I have a Prius so I can't do any intense driving or off-roading and I don't want to drive in snow, so mostly thinking of going south for warmer weather. My one idea is Joshua Tree but I feel like a lot of people are going there these days. I could potentially bring my surf board if it's worth it but that depends on the ideas! I also don't have to stay in California, I'm just hoping for a place with no snow but want to adventure!! 

Also if there's any must-have gear lemme know! Especially since I'd be going alone (and a woman) :)",Ideas for week-long solo camping trip in California? (25f)
camping,,A very soft camp spot at Magheroarty Beach in County Donegal in Ireland
camping,"Having problems using recreation.gov. For e.g. see https://www.recreation.gov/camping/campgrounds/233116/availability and go out 6 months to july 10th 2021. On some sites it says ""available if reservation is before _____"", what does this mean and how can I hope to reserve something?",How do you guys reserve popular spots?
camping,,Old meets new for coffee while camping in the Sam Houston National Forest this past weekend. Absolutely gorgeous (and cold) morning.
camping,,Glamping and taco night on the West Coast in our Suburban Overland Rig
camping,,Steak time!
camping,,"QUESTION HELP. So I bought an air mattress to place in my tent and realized after I opened it that it uses an electrical plug. On the tag it says 120v, is there any way I can get this plugged into my trucks lighter port with some kind of adapter or piece?"
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,,A Short Video From Golden Horn Outdoor Knives
camping,"As the title says, we’re looking to upgrade a lot of our camping equipment including our cooler. 

We’re looking into Yeti Cooler 35. Seems solid, great features, durable, cherry on top; cool colors. 

But, what else can we look at that comparable? And if you have a Yeti, is it worth it?

We’re more than fine putting out this type of money for a quality cooler, something that will withstand the test of time. As long as it will withstand the test of time. 


TIA",Recommendations upgrading the cooler.
camping,,Top of the world
camping,,"The view this morning, standing on the End of the World, was unreal."
camping,I love hiking alone and I normally go on 8-12 miles hikes on days off. I have gone camping a few times less than five times. I want to try camping alone as a female. I would camp in my car as it would be my first time alone and pick up seems easier. I’d camp at a state parks with showers and toilets and the trip would be 2 days 1 night. Is this a good idea for a first time solo camper who is looking for more experience?,I want to try camping solo female but I’m an inexperienced camper
camping,,Burning a marshmallow
camping,,Who else loves a good winter camping trip?
camping,,January night in a wind shelter with the dog.
camping,"Looking to rent a smaller rv to take a road trip to the UP of Michigan in the summer with a couple buddies and my dog. Any hidden gems that you won’t be right next to someone? Not afraid to go all the way up to copper harbor. Just looking for some nice views, brews, and some fishing!",Quite place to rv in the UP
camping,"I am new to Georgia, and my tent attaches onto the top of my car. What are primitive camp sites that allow me to bring my car into the physical campsite?",Primitive camping in Georgia that allows me to bring my car into the camp site?
camping,,Palisades State Park in South Dakota last night
camping,,Winter camping in Canada on the shore of Lake Superior
camping,,"Mindblowing view from my camp of the Eagle Nebula, Swan Nebula, and Milky Way over Mt. Shasta [OC]"
camping,,Fire underneath the parachute. Ararat Vinyards NC.
camping,,More parachute camp pics.
camping,,Built a roof top tent for my forester !
camping,,"Since everyone liked the parachute camping pic so much, I thought I'd add some more."
camping,,"Since everyone liked the parachute camping pic so much, I thought I'd add some more."
camping,,Camping in below 0c (Sweden)
camping,,"Palo Duro Canyon State Park in Canyon, Texas"
camping,[deleted],"Greetings from Texas, it never snows here!"
camping,Is it a terrible idea to take a 20 degree bag into the 0-10 range and count on warm layers of clothing to make up the extra insulation? How miserable will I be?,using sleeping bags below their rating
camping,,RooftopTent Camping near Grand Canyon National Park (free dispersed camping)
camping,,"Greetings from Texas, never snows here!"
camping,"Specifically the REI Base Camp 6 vs Sierra Designs Nomad 6 for a family of 4. 

Anyone have experience with both?",Comparing 6 person tents
camping,,Subscribe to me to see even more content 😘 https://onlyfans.com/hawtmama00
camping,So for anyone that has the Coleman prairie breeze tent with ceiling fan/light system.  I know it runs off the cpx 6 battery pack rechargeable which is junk but can anyone tell me when the max voltage is on the fan/light? I want to make a replacement pack with my 3dv printer that will use 18650 li-ion batteries but just 2 of those together output 7.4V. would this kill the fan/light and/or the switch for it?,Coleman cpx 6 replacement
camping,,"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,"I'm needing more lighting in my tent, does anyone have a solution for running any sort of string light around the inside of a tent? It's canvas so I was thinking maybe some velcro would hold up the lights? Can't use a safety pin or anything, any help would be appreciated!",Creative Solution
camping,,Backyard camping!
camping,,"Only came for a night, stayed for 4..."
camping,,BCF Mossy Oak Survival Kit 2021 - Review
camping,Had a great time biking through the Karangahake Gorge.,Karangahahe Gorge bike camping. Bit of an NZ trip for the end of 2020 in heavy rain.
camping,,First backpacking trip in RMNP feels great to get away. (Summer trip)
camping,,Loco puppy
camping,Long story short I currently only have one of those cheapo roll up foam ones that don’t really do anything. Can anyone recommend any better ones that are more comfortable?,Camping pad suggestions?
camping,,"Glen Head Signal Tower, Ireland. Normally inaccessible in a 4x4. Access possible in the drought of 2018. These early-19th-century Napoleonic towers were part of an 81 towers communication system constructed, furnished, and staffed between 1804 and 1006 to defend Ireland against French invasion."
camping,,"When you can’t get out camping, camp in your backyard ⛺️ 🔥"
camping,,If I can’t get out sometimes I like to have a campfire in my backyard 🔥
camping,,"What is the most beautiful of this charming desert, it is the desert of Egypt, where calm, safety, psychological comfort and adventures are the most beautiful trip in the world, you will make it, you will feel that you are in another planet"
camping,,"Trying out the new hot tent and stove in the back yard, and it’s even snowing!"
camping,,"Regarding camping alone in the winter, yes."
camping,,Winter Camping ALONE. Anyone else camp like this?
camping,,wish I was out camping out in Utah...Doing some art inspired by the national parks. This time it's Arches! what's your favorite sun/moon color? Enjoy and thank you.
camping,,Is this camp griddle too far gone or can it be refurbished?
camping,Would like to know just in case I get a leaky tent.,What is a good tent seam sealer?
camping,"Hey guys! I've recently decided to try out camping after wanted to since i was a kid but never got the chance to. I'm coming upto my mid 20s and want to start doing more like hiking and camping, nature stuff. I love the idea and i always tend to sit in the garden for long hours, stargazing and practice breathing exercises and other stuff. I live in london so i can't go anywhere really local, i think. I like the idea of traveling up to scotland and visiting some places up there. If anyone has any information or tips before i make the travel, i'd love to hear them.  Thanks guys &lt;3","Beginner, Any Tips?"
camping,"Hey everybody,

I am looking to do a several week road trip through Colorado and Utah now that I am self employed and have freedom over my schedule.

I am a bit of a noob camper, but I would really like to do a lot of car camping in Utah and Colorado after having been stuck in my house for the past year. 

Utah especially seems to be a camping utopia, but there's almost too many spots that come up wherever I search. I'm not sure how to discern which places are actually worthwhile, especially for a bit of a novice camper.

What are your favorite campgrounds to go to in UT and CO? I'll be renting a decent sized car and for parts of the trip I'll have a group of 4 or 6 or so, but I'll also be alone for most of the trip.

Any advice is appreciated. Thanks!",Best campsites in Utah or Colorado?
camping,,"Highlands Backpacking Trail, Algonquin Park, ON."
camping,,Camping for a research trip and had the stars in my tent. Any advice on how to keep this from happening???
camping,"Does anyone know of an area that’s open for camping near San Diego? Right now it seems like everything is either closed because of the state park shut downs (due to COVID-19), or the fire ban. We don’t have a 4x4 so we are limited to short hikes into the area or car accessible.",Camping in SoCal
camping,Im currently enrolled in college and all my courses are online so I'm trying to find a way to use my laptop to attend class while camping/fishing. As far as power goes im covered I just need a way to get internet. Im on a family plan for my phone with minimal data so thats not an option. I found rentable unlimited mifi devices too which look good for extended trips. What i really want is like reloadable data only sim cards so I can prepay for a couple gigs of data and use a dongle to connect my laptop up. I looked around without finding anything good. Does anyone know of anything like that or any other options I could use? Im in the US and dont plan on going too remote mostly near highways,Doing classes while camping
camping,,"First hike and bonfire coffee of the year. Viken, Norway"
camping,[deleted],"First hike and bonfire coffee of the year. Viken, Norway"
camping,,"Don’t push yourself too hard! Cranberry Wilderness, West Virginia."
camping,,Ready for the warmer weather
camping,,Lakes Like Mirrors - ONF
camping,,Why do people put a circle of rocks around a campfire? What does it do?
camping,"Firstly, I hope this is the right sub for all your sakes. No one wants a newbie coming round here asking dumb questions.

In brief, I’m looking to do a road trip in Scotland and was wondering if it’s as simple as just driving there, take a couple of sleeping bags and doing your thing? I mean is prior research required or just wing it?

If anyone has done this before and has any tips it would be appreciated!",Advice: ‘Route 66’ of Scotland
camping,,"Watchman in Zion for New Years, Goosecreek south of Arches boundary on the Colorado, Mathers at the Grand Canyon, Daytrip to Bryce. All clean, well maintained grounds. Arches campgrounds were closed til March."
camping,,"Got to see this bad boy today. Cecil Webb camp grounds, Florida"
camping,,Throwback to having to sleep in a parking lot through my road trip... still enjoyed breakfast!
camping,"It's the middle of summer here in Australia, and where I'm camping next week may reach 47C or 116F. I'm looking for some specific tips, ideas or products other than ""seek shade"", ""go swimming"" etc. Cheers.",Tips on keeping cool
camping,"This is how we spent our reading week in Bruce Peninsula National Park, Toronto, and Niagara Falls and our recommendations out the best places to visit and camp in Ontario. I give you recommendations of activities you can do in Niagara falls, places to eat, and more! Subscribe and leave a comment below if you have been to any of these places!","HOW TO TRAVEL ONTARIO Niagara Falls, Bruce Peninsula National Park, Toronto"
camping,,not often you get snow at Big Bend National Park (TX)
camping,,"LAKE LOUISE Travel Guide, Top Things To Do, WHAT TO SEE"
camping,Besides the obvious *must have* things like fire starter etc.,What is your most important non-essential item in your camping kit?
camping,,Beautiful camping spot in the Blue Ridge Mountains. ⛰
camping,,"Over Christmas, we camped out in Ozark National Forest, about an hour from Huntsville, AR."
camping,,"Southern Lakes region, South Island, New Zealand. 10 days with 2 other families. Epic start to the new year!"
camping,"Not after advice, just curious what everyone purchased for your very first camping trip without your parents to supply everything. 

Not including food, water etc.",First camping trip - how much did you spend on camping equipment?
camping,,Want to take the family camping in the redwoods this summer. Who has a recommendation for a good spot? Will be staying for 2 nights.
camping,"Hi all! I plan on going camping sometime in the near future but the thing is I've never gone and I don't have any of the gear I might need. For personal reasons, I'm trying to avoid big retailers like Amazon, Walmart, Dicks, etc. Is there any good website or whatever to find cheap or even second-hand gear? Also are there any good checklists out there of the stuff you need for camping. Thanks :)",Finding cheap gear (first time camping)
camping,,My last camp with friends in a trip car beetle
camping,,Stephen F Austin Orion's Belt
camping,,"My SO took me camping for the first time, in sub-freezing temperatures. A fun, memorable trip (despite the very cold, sleepless night lol)! Enchanted Rock State Park, TX"
camping,,"Even in full lockdown in Glasgow, Scotland, it's always good to practice to get warm. -6degC, wet wood, basic fire starting kit. Always good to get used to being able to get a good fire in prep for actual camping"
camping,,Most Comfortable Tennis Shoes for Women: Expert&amp;#039;s Top 10 Picks
camping,,Found really close to one of my normal camping spots with bits of the wood all around it. Bear?
camping,"I've only been camping twice and both times were with an experienced camper. I absolutely love the experiencing of camping (and being in nature in general) but am too scared to go out and do it on my own. So scared, in fact, that it's been \~5-6 years since I last did it. 

I wasn't raised by a family of campers. I wasn't raised in a place that had abundant camping spots or nature to explore. 

I now live in a different place that has so many good spots it's insane. I've been living here almost 5 years now and really, really want to finally try camping. It doesn't even need to be super minimalistic like I see some of you do (which looks awesome btw). I just want to know some basics, some tips. Things to bring, what to look for, etc. 

I understand that much of camping is learning from mistakes. But I know there have to be some basics out there. 

Many thanks in advance to those who provide tips. I can't wait to finally do this!

PS - I do hike often so I am at least accustomed to being outdoors. I already own a tent and portable shower.",Tips/Advice for a Novice Camper?
camping,,Second time winter camping was a blast!!
camping,"I an going to have to go to Greeley CO in late March, and since it is the only time off I am going to get for a while, I’d really like to make it fun and do some camping and hiking on the way out there. I am starting from Oregon so I will mostly be on the I-84 and the I-80, so I am hoping to find somewhere that isn’t too far out of the way off one of those highways. Right now, I am leaning towards the Utah side of Dinosaur National Monument, but I have no idea if the weather at that time of year will be suitable for hiking and camping. I am not equipped for more than a little snow. If you have been to Dinosaur in early spring, I would love to hear about you experience, and if you have other ideas of places I could go, I would really appreciate it!",March trip along the I-84/I-80
camping,,Over night in the Swiss Alpes
camping,,"Nothing fancy, but we tried making insulated car window blackout curtains. We were camping out in Arkansas over Christmas (15 degrees), and wanted something to help keep us a bit warmer in our '03 Highlander."
camping,"So much [food that's good for camping](https://www.reddit.com/r/socalhiking/comments/kt3qrl/the_holy_trinity/), is also way too salty and too low in fiber. If you're camping more than a single night, how do you not get backed up?","ASKING THE REAL QUESTIONS: How does camping not make you constipated, bloated, and inflamed? I NEED TO POOP"
camping,,Did a little hike in/hike out at Shenandoah National Park on a nice loop that hit part of the AT; highly recommend you head to this park when you can!
camping,Looking to make a chuck box for my wife for our camping trips any ideas? Pics?,Camping chuck box ideas
camping,,"Took a trip to Uwharrie, NC last weekend! Poured rain both nights but cleared up during the daytime! Was super eerie but relaxing!"
camping,"I bought my first ferro rod. It comes with a scraper that's too dull to do anything. But when I briefly scratch the rod with the serrated section of my Gerber, I get sparks. For local camping, I can just sport my Gerber knife. I'd like to carry the firestarter as an emergency backup on my keychain, but I don't want to introduce any pocket items that are banned for commercial flying.

I obviously can't carry my Gerber in this post-9/11 world. Is there some other item that is sharp enough to reliably use with camping firestarters, but also safe enough to meet TSA regulations?

An orange flame BIC style lighter can at least be carried in checked luggage. But I'm also leaning towards more reusable, environmentally friendlier, less plastic products lately. That's why I'm keen to get into ferro rods.",Item sharp enough to use a firestarter but safe enough for TSA?
camping,,The Best RV Camping January 2021
camping,,"ice dip while camping on NYE, anyone else rinse off the 2020 with a cold splash?"
camping,,"Moose walking through campground. Redfeather, CO"
camping,,First time camping at Enchanted Rock!
camping,,YouTube Tour Of A Suburban Camper Conversion
camping,"Hello Guys, Am planning to go caming in MP and mainly near Pachmarhi Area. As I have already seen the snow and there are lot of people already there so thought of going into the greens this time.

So people over here if have or planning to do camping, please help me with my plan if going there is worth it!!
Thank you in advance.","How's Camping near Pachmarhi, MP"
camping,,i am this old
camping,"We are a couple looking to rent a van style camper and stay in the Florida keys. 

We have one small dog and love fishing. 

Not opposed to staying on a designated rv/camper site, just unsure what works for us. 

Any info and recommendations are appreciated. Thanks",Seeking Florida keys recommendations
camping,"Hi folks!

I'm heading out to Temagami for the first time this summer, the 2nd and 3rd weeks of August. Planning 10 nights doing a loop that leaves from Camp Wanapieti, over to Diamond, down through Obabika and back through Lake Temagami. Planning on taking it slow, doing the hikes at Chee-skon and looking for pictographs. 

I'm looking for any advice or experience you might have in this area, especially when it comes to booking a permit. I know you can only book a permit 2 wks ahead of your entry date, but do you have to tell them where you'll be each night? I imagine this loop is incredibly popular, do you think I'll have trouble finding a decent site? Lake Temagami is huge - do cottage powerboats tend to slow down around canoes or is it in my best interest to avoid them? (I did a large swath of the French last year and the cottage boats there were ruthless around canoes!)

Thanks folks - happy planning season!",Temagami advice?
camping,,Can't beat a nap in the woods!
camping,,Campground Sunbathing
camping,,The first guy to ever go camping - a Ryan George sketch
camping,,Gotta love a nice campfire...or two!
camping,,The view inside my hot tent on my last overnighter
camping,,call me +1 (267) 230-6431
camping,,BWCA is where my hearts at. Protect it. Please.
camping,"Travel across America

I’m a 20 year old guy, from Florida but staying in California at the moment. I’m looking to start a journey across America. I was wondering if anyone else is looking to the same but maybe too scared to go alone. I’m a friendly person, adventurous, and determined to do this long term. Open to different ways although I don’t have a lot of money and no car. I can fly anywhere to start in the US and would preferably like to camp out and walk but open to suggestions. Message me if you’re interested at all.",Walk across America
camping,"Hi mid 20s male wondering if it is safe to go camping during the pandemic?  Was thinking of taking my car to a state park in TX and sleeping in a tent, but worried about catching COVID-19 in the campground/specifically using the restroom.",Is it safe to go camping?
camping,,Down the Barron River
camping,[removed],レーザーポインター 強力 Amazon レーザーポインター 赤 目
camping,,camping @ big horn. IG: jessixa_ann
camping,[deleted],camping @ big horn. IG: jessixa_ann
camping,,Gold Head Branch State Park
camping,I’m not sure but is anyone camping in CA? I believe some of the forest are closed. Does anyone know any solid places near SoCal,Californi camping
camping,,Panamint Springs Resort just outside of Death Valley. Breathtaking views.
camping,,"Me and my best friend just chilling in the hammock. Betswy-co-ed, Wales (pre lockdown)"
camping,,Relaxing
camping,"So, it was late in November month I think, it was about 0 deg Celcius and there were strong winds. It was so shocking to me how cold it was, and my wool cap nearly flew off in the winds, partly because of how my old woolen cap had loosened over the years, no longer sitting tightly around my head.

So.. I ordered this new headwear with fake fur around the top and basically around the face. :) It should be a lot warmer than my old woolen cap, especially around the ears.

Next up, I should probably buy some mittens, because I have no warm gloves that are decent below 0 deg C. :( One can buy wool liners, but ofc, those has to fit inside your gloves or whatever. Too bad my old wool liners for hands has started to come undone in the seams on the fingers, have to consider buying some new stuff.","I had to buy new headwear, I hadn't realized the stuff I had was not good enough."
camping,,She enjoys the campfire
camping,,Lunch Using The GrandPa's FireFork
camping,[deleted],What's your favorite 2-person tent?
camping,,The views that keep on giving
camping,,Urban winter stealth camping behind factory in hammock
camping,,"Night view a few steps away from my campsite at Joshua Tree National Park, California, USA"
camping,,I drew the campfire! Located near the Buffalo River in Arkansas.
camping,Hope the mods approve.  You might find this funny:  https://youtu.be/eYa46Ap49Kk,Reminds me of how most of friends and wife feel about camping.
camping,,Waiting on that second cup seems like forever lol
camping,[removed],VISIT USA with a Travel Gift Card at 0
camping,,3 days camping down Indian Arm near Vancouver! One of the most beautiful places I have ever been - we left the phones behind and brought the Super8mm camera along for a fun adventure
camping,,Big Bend National Park
camping,,warms the soul
camping,,How to Enjoy a Winter Camping Trip
camping,,Can anyone identify the name of this style of caravan? Would like to buy one but don't know what to search!
camping,,Types Of Chainsaws - Tool Gears
camping,"I've been looking to purchase a survival knife for an upcoming trip out east. I'm looking for something that will be able to perform  well at a lot of different tasks as well as be used to defend myself from wildlife or (more likely) unsavory humans. As such I would like a larger blade (5-8 inches). The lighter the knife the better. I've been looking at a [Ka-bar Dog's Head Utility Knife](https://www.kabar.com/products/product.jsp?item=1317), but would love to hear what y'all use and recommend, thanks!",Good survival knife
camping,,Get Iphone 11 pro sign up and claim your entry now
camping,,Epic Spit Venison | Wet and Cold Wild Camp | Bushcraft Cooking
camping,,Wolds way north yorkshire walk
camping,,"Couple more pics from our New Years trip on the Murray River. Regional Victoria, Australia. So serene that all your troubles go away"
camping,,Seoul City in South Korea Tour in 4K BlueMoon Universe
camping,,Today I Made This Illustration rate please Thought you guys might like this design i made today
camping,"I am looking to buy some land near a national park to rent out to people who have RVs. I am someone who has never ever camped, and has always stayed in hotels when visiting these parks. I want to invest in the bare minimum at this point in time, and then eventually build a house to rent it out on AirBnB. For now, I was thinking of renting the land through Hipcamp and making it clear that there are no toilet facilities available, that the RV would need to come equipped with toilets, and that no dumping is allowed. Apart from the land being close to the national park, there would literally be no other amenities offered. Is there anyone in the RV community that would even go for something like this? How much per night could I charge? The national park in question is Sequoia &amp; Kings Canyon National Park.",What do people using RVs booking through Hipcamp desire?
camping,,"Dolly Sods West Virginia, Best Camping On the East Coast"
camping,"First of all thanks to everyone who commented with tips you all really helped and a lot of what you told me came in so handy!! 




Just wanted to update because I and a lot of the comments where worried it would be so hot that it would be dangerous .... I just wanted to say it was the complete opposite !! It rained and rained so bad the first night that our whole tent flooded and we had to throw tarp over the top of our tent to stop it !! We had to give up camping and book a hotel the next night because we were soaked to the bone and freezing cold !! Then we headed to Little Desert which was hotter and didnt rain but again absolutely freezing! I didn’t get a wink of sleep I was shivering all night 🤣🤣 


So yeah just an update and thanks again to whoever commented bringing a tarp sheet with us really came in handy 🤣",I posted here a while ago about tips for camping down great ocean road in Melbourne and wanted to update!
camping,"First of all thanks to everyone who commented with tips you all really helped and a lot of what you told me came in so handy!! 




Just wanted to update because I and a lot of the comments where worried it would be so hot that it would be dangerous .... I just wanted to say it was the complete opposite !! It rained and rained so bad the first night that our whole tent flooded and we had to throw tarp over the top of our tent to stop it !! We had to give up camping and book a hotel the next night because we were soaked to the bone and freezing cold !! Then we headed to Little Desert which was hotter and didnt rain but again absolutely freezing! I didn’t get a wink of sleep I was shivering all night 🤣🤣 


So yeah just an update and thanks again to whoever commented bringing a tarp sheet with us really came in handy 🤣",I posted here a while ago about tips for camping down great ocean road in Melbourne and wanted to update!
camping,,New Years night went well!! Here’s a winter fire to distract you.
camping,,Winter camping in Alaska
camping,,"Beautiful view from the Bartram Trail, Rabun county, Georgia"
camping,,"What is better for an ice box - ice bricks, bags of ice or just frozen water bottles?"
camping,,Ocotillo in October
camping,,A morning view from our cabin deep in the woods near the lithuanian border
camping,"Recently I have gone into research mode to try and find the best cookware set for me and my gf to use when we go on our trips, and it just now came in. My favorite part about it is that it breaks down into the size of two small pressurized gas containers, plus it is super easy to clean. Used it this past weekend and just wanted to make an appreciation post!

https://preview.redd.it/0h404dh8rs961.jpg?width=500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=29c481f95f0b110410969a962c5577410d28d995",I'm In LOVE With My Cookware Set
camping,,"AAAC Wildlife Removal of San Diego &amp;#x2d; Trapping, Repair"
camping,"I'm an idiot and just spent 2 days camping in a bivvy (similar to a tent) on two very cold windy days with my door wide open and my face facing the door so I could watch the lake as I slept. It's really uncomfortable and red right now and I now have learnt my lesson, I am not more powerful than winter.",Anybody have any home remedies for wind burn?
camping,"Qustion for my fellow UK campers. I tend to spend most of my trips wild camping up in Scotland but the £40 budget tent I bought a while back is finally giving in.
I'm looking to upgrade to something in the £200 - £300 range.
Any recommendations for tents that can deal with the highlands weather? My current consideration is the msr elixer 2.",Best tent for UK rain and wind
camping,"I hate wearing shells camping because they always get an ember hole eventually and I was scared to wear my gortex jacket (which has now been stolen in true Vancouver ""fashion""). 

Just a big old heavy beat-around jacket for the West Coast drizzly winter camping. I guess those big tartan ones seem to be popular? 

I'm not from this continent or even a place that gets cold (mid north Australia). I've been in Canada 6 years but I still SUCK at choosing winter gear for some reason.

Please help!",Best jacket for sitting around a fire in the winter drizzle of the West Coast (Vancouver)?
camping,,"Get the BOIS together, we're having a campfire! Last stop before Mt Pinos, CA"
camping,,"First new year camp. California, Still cold!"
camping,,Camping in Sedona last week.
camping,"My wife started a travel blog for our PNW camping adventures around the PNW. She's been having a lot of fun with it. Though maybe you guys would like it. 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhIwZcQDuEY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhIwZcQDuEY)",My wife started a travel vlog of our camping adventures around the PNW
camping,,Just how effective would a rape whistle be against a bear? Asking for a friend.
camping,"Hi 🙋🏻‍♂️ Camping ⛺️ Reddit,

This Spring 🌸 I’ll be looking to car camp 🏕 with my little one (will be 11 months) for his first camping experience.

Just looking for some advice / guidance from others whom have car camped with babies 👶🏻 in the past.

I’m thinking 🤔 I’ll need a two person sleeping bag, my current bag is a “mummy” style.

Other than that, not sure what else is a good idea 💡 to buy / bring that I typically wouldn’t.

Many thanks 😊

David 🐉",Car 🚙 Camping ⛺️ with Baby 👶🏻
camping,,We all need more of this in our lives.
camping,,"Pixley Falls (Boonville, NY)"
camping,"Last week the weather was perfect.

https://preview.redd.it/k3bhfynh6q961.jpg?width=4000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=ff0a382180a046412847c7c48261711bd5ad9f70",Clearwater Campground in Ocala National Forest
camping,"Just saw the backpacker's great post and thought I would share the view from our car camping site...

*Processing img 4xl8q9pa3q961...*",Clear Water Lake Ocala
camping,,First trip for 2021 in the Aussie bush. Can't wait for more
camping,,"Hello, guys, I am looking for camping survival kits, just found the 2 choices. But don't know which one would be the best, can anyone help me out? Really appreciate that."
camping,,"Australia, the water's muddy and it's 37deg C..."
camping,,Wal-Mart $1000 gift card giveaway. Sign up and get a chance to win $1000 Wal-Mart gift card.
camping,,Pre-Covid : The things we took for granted. Inch Beach - Ireland 2018
camping,Looking for a good air mattress and/or sleeping bag recommendation for a my husband and me. Temps aren’t below 30 degrees. What is the most ideal sleeping situation?,Sleeping bag/air mattress recommendations? 2 people
camping,,Leave No GPS Trace on Social Media
camping,,So I tried out Camping in -20 weather...
camping,,Freshwater croc not happy with me gettin a selfie
camping,,A pic from my most recent bikepacking trip in Sam Houston National Forest.
camping,"I’ve never camped in CT despite living here and want to do some solo camping closer to home. 

I know there’s a decent section of the AT that runs thru the state but I’m looking for other ideas as well. 

Any suggestions are greatly appreciated. Thanks!",Camping in Connecticut?
camping,,A Site I’ll Never Forget (Southeastern Utah)
camping,,Post campfire Ramen Noodles nap
camping,,#Camping #RoofTopTent #HEOTent
camping,,"Setup camp at an abandon farm in Antelope Valley, CA."
camping,,Prepping for my first time ever wild camping. Got a load of good deals over Black Friday. Any advice for a first time wild camper?
camping,,Kayaked in to this cliffside campsite deep in the canyons of Lake Powell.
camping,,Summer cliffside camping in Moqui Canyon on Lake Powell.
camping,,Probably the last wild camp I will be doing in the UK for a while... Ft a very pleasing old Vango.
camping,"There are a few tents I'm  eyeing for my family of 4, but there are no specs listed on the website of the retailer OR the manufacturer.  
I don't know if they are just last years models,  but it's odd that I can't find reviews or specs ANYWHERE... or is it?
Specifically,  I'm looking for specs and reviews of the Eureka Evasion 4 , the Eureka Bella Coola 4, or the SAIL Toundra. 
The one tent that does have info is The North Face Talus 4 , which I'll buy if I can't find more info on the others.  
Any advice would be super helpful",Where can I find specs and reviews of Eureka tents?
camping,,A Photo I Took Of Our Recent Trip To Ocala National Forest
camping,"Was just looking online for a Waterproof match for a post covid camping trip me and the boys have been planning and I stubled across one for FREE so I thought id share:

[https://twitter.com/FreebiesUsa1/status/1346537913962668037](https://twitter.com/FreebiesUsa1/status/1346537913962668037)

These are great bit of kit to keep in your bag on a trip.

Mine is due to arrive on Friday ill post an update on how it is.",Freebie Alert - Waterproof lighter completely free
camping,[removed],WATERPROOF matches - FREE!
camping,,Camping
camping,,Little excursion over the long weekend
camping,,Toasting Marshmallow!
camping,,"Winter in Yosemite National Park is something else, amazing!"
camping,,Cold weather backpacking trip at grandfather mountain state park
camping,,Pre-Covid Life. Camping on Inch Beach in Ireland
camping,"So i'am looking into buying an Big Agnes Flycreek or tigerwall platinum tent. However in the area where i hike, heavy rain is a given if i'm going on a multiple day trip. Now i read that Big Agnes tents have a 1200mm waterproof rating on the raincover and floor, aswel as the optional footprints. And stacking the floor and floorprint doesn't help and maybe makes it worse by trapping water between them. I've read online that to be sure that your tent floor is waterproof you need a 1500mm waterproof rating. Can anybody tell me if this is true or give me personal experiences with big agnes tents. If there is any chance of water seeping through the floor (given the floor isn't damaged) its a no go for me.",Big Agnes UL waterproof concerns
camping,,"In search of campground in Florida to spend my birthday. Activities enjoyed: fishing, hiking, kayaking, SUP- will have 50 lb fluffy dog joining. Any suggestions?"
camping,,Hanna State Park campground - Jacksonville FL
camping,,One of the best trips I have ever done with my VW camper!
camping,,Little freshwater crock trying to have a go
camping,,NYE in Brecon
camping,,"WHO have the Folding Camping Chair ? pls om me , thx"
camping,"Hello all! Looking to buy a sleeping bag meant for cold conditions, and a bedroll to match. Let’s say I have a budget of $150. What can I get?",Affordable 0° sleeping bag and bedroll
camping,,Kids 1st Camp
camping,,When the rain keeps everyone else away sl you and the kids have the campground to yourselves.
camping,,"I'm a female wanting to head out for my first solo camping trip. Husband won't go when the nighttime weather will be in the 30's...wussy! I'm looking for tips, advice, location suggestions from any other women who camp solo. #Nature❤"
camping,,17 tips for first time international travelers
camping,"Hey everyone, I'm planning on a 10 day road trip at the end of March from LA to Yellowstone and back.   I'm going w my bf and we're planning on camping most of the trip. I've tried to keep the driving as spaced out as possible and less than 7 hrs a day. LMK if you guys know of any good camping spots at any of our stops and if there's a better place than Provo to stop at that's in between Yellowstone and Vegas. Here's what I've come up with so far: 

**March 26:** 

Leave at 7AM

6hr drive to Zion National Park 

Explore Zion

Camp @ Zion

**March 27**

1.5 hr drive to explore Bryce Canyon NP

Camp @ Zion

March 28

5 hr drive to Park City, UT

Stay @ Airbnb

**March 29**

5 hr drive to Grand Teton NP

Camp @ Gros Venture Campground in Jackson, WY

**March 30**

Explore Grand Teton

**March 31** 

3 hr drive to Yellowstone

Camp @ Yellowstone

**Apr 1**

Explore Yellowstone

Camp @ Yellowstone

**Apr 2** 

6 hr drive to Provo, UT

Stay at Airbnb

**Apr 3**

5.5 hr drive to Vegas 

Stay in Vegas 

**April 4**

Drive home",Itinerary for road trip from LA to Yellowstone
camping,,Near Mammoth Lakes - CA
camping,,"For those of you who have experienced that hellish one way road that is tidus canyon, almost got me convinced to buy a 4x4"
camping,"Looking for a lantern that's easy to pack but packs a punch. Just need it for me and my wife at our site if we need it.

Would use it just to see what we're doing at night, inside the tent, and just making sure we have something other than the fire or our phones. 

Preferably runs on battery or can be recharged",LED Lantern recommendations
camping,,"Hello guys, I wanted some advice. If I were fishing off a pier at night and wanted a light that could shine the furthest through the water and into the depths, what that be more throw or flood and what are some good flashlights that could shine really deep into the water off a pier? Thanks!"
camping,"Hi guys. 
So for a while now I’ve had an intense feeling of wanting to run away from what I have now and who I have now and go totally alone with the only worry being food, shelter and safety. I live in the UK, so the only “bigger” forests are in the highlands of Scotland. Scotland also being the only place in the UK where free camping is legal; is why that would be the best destination. Temperatures can and have got to -10 degree Celsius/ 14 Fahrenheit in the winter with snow getting up to 6-14inches in the area I’m looking at. Weather is typically cold for around 3 months.Unlike Chris I want to be totally prepared with stuff that will keep me alive, especially during winter. And I’m also thinking long term so how would I keep replacing what I have if they became damaged etc etc. So many things popping up in my head which is probably telling me not to, but it’s making me so so happy and purposeful thinking about it. Shelter, warmth water I think would be the main important thing,  then obviously food. We don’t have the diversity of animals the US does so that’s a small worry of mine, although we also don’t have many predatory animals to worry about. I’ve thought about building a shelter into a save kinda thing like you see on the primitive videos on YouTube, except mine won’t be fancy water falls lol. Also building a fire place with a working fire/chimney . I don’t have hunting skills, actually none at all so advise there will be good especially traps as that’s taken my interest. Idk what I’m asking really I’m just asking for any advise you guys can throw at me, few things I’ve mentioned as you’ve read if you could help with those. I know it’s a bad idea but I want to and I plan to for as long as I can... is that do able ? Never coming back?",Planning to go “Into The Wild”
camping,,What it’s all about
camping,,Awesome Free Waterproof Fire Starter For Camping!
camping,,"Valley Of The Gods 01/03/2021, taken by me."
camping,"This will sound a bit odd but I’m looking for a two person tent that I could set up in the living room. Not a joke, I promise. My gf and I made a makeshift blanket fort a few months back to watch movies and it was really fun. Was thinking a small tent would make the process a bit easier. I have no tent experience so not even sure what to search for. Since it doesn’t need to be fancy or big, I’m looking more for cheap. Just enough to fit us in with a small tv. That and really easy to assemble. Any suggestions would be greatly appreciated.",Odd tent advice - living room tent
camping,,New Year Camping in BC Canada
camping,,Best way to wake up 😌
camping,,"Rincon Beach, Ventura, California [OC]"
camping,,"So I recently went through a divorce, my kids are staying with me tomorrow so I’ve set up this little indoor camping den to get them ready for our adventures :) trying to be a good dad and create those precious memories, hopefully they like it."
camping,"I (F28) have always loved camping since I was kid and continued to go camping (tent camping, specifically) into my teens and twenties. I’d camp at festivals or at camp grounds or parks. My fiancé (M27) has never camped a day in his life. He’s the type that’d rather have a cozy bed where he can control the temperature setting. But we both love to travel, explore nature, see new places and meet new friends. Does anyone have advice for me to try to get him more interested in camping? Or suggestions on how I could make the camping experience more comfortable for him?",Advice needed on how to convince my fiancé we should go camping more often.
camping,,"First Successful Winter Car Camping Trip in Moab, Utah"
camping,I am excited to go on some trips this year. I just freed up some time in my life. My wife and I have two trips planned for the next couple of months and I have a couple of solo trips planned for the next couple of months as well. Happy New Year everybody!,Excited!!!!
camping,,"Howth, Dublin, Ireland"
camping,,Awesome new backpack I got in a subreddit! This is a awesome addition for your next trip.
camping,"Hi there! We recently uploaded the movie from our latest overlanding journey in Sweden. Check it out if you want to, 50cm of snow and a Jeep JLUR guaranteed :). We spent all of the nights in a tentipi tent heated with a stove, and cooked all of our food over an open fire in a Dutch oven!

We have been doing overlanding trips every year since 2014, and all of our trips have been uploaded on our YouTube channel SevenBarAdventures. There are a lot of inspiration on our channel if you are interested!

https://youtu.be/ACiddaE1xDs

Cheers!",Movie from our latest adventure in Sweden with lots of snow!
camping,,This campsite cactus made my day
camping,"I've been lurking here for a while, and only went camping once in my adult life with friends. But i loved getting out and away from everything.

So my question is, have any of you just tried camping in your normal car, and is it any fun, or is it not the same as sleeping in a tent under the stars?",Camping in a sedan car?
camping,,Ooni Pizza Oven Rocket Ship Wild Camping
camping,,Monthly GIVEAWAY started on Deus-Blade. Great knife for camping!
camping,,Annoying Orange - 2020 KILLS!
camping,,It never rains when you camp in the snow
camping,,New Year New snowstorm lol. Had a great time in the woods this weekend!
camping,,Lake Powell 2020
camping,,Did some desert camping to start off the new year. First time in Kofa National Wilderness Refuge (Arizona). Great time to say the least.
camping,,"Wild camping in Wicklow, Ireland. Before it got cold!"
camping,,first snow = first snow bivy of the season
camping,,"Park Life, Dublin Ireland"
camping,,2020 highlights
camping,,"Camping fun,with Family and Friends and Drinks"
camping,,Marshmallows on Fire
camping,,"If you're looking for a camping area near Istanbul,check out Sakarya,Turkey #camping #turkey"
camping,,"#Camping in Sakarya,Turkey"
camping,,AMERICA’S NATIONAL PARKS RANKED BEST TO WORST
camping,,How me and a couple of friends celebrated this New Years.
camping,,Apalachicola National Forest
camping,,"1st roadtrip of 2021, and probably the last one for a while.."
camping,,Welcome to the bohemian forest
camping,,Camping with the sports games is a good idea? What do you think guys?
camping,,"Saying goodbye to 2020 at Matanzas Inlet, FL"
camping,,"Our Labor Day trip to Gallagher Head Lake in Washington state. The lake is about 5500’ elevation. It was gorgeous all the way up! The last pic is an abandoned gold mine, as the trail is an abandoned gold mining road from the turn of the century."
camping,"I live in Central Washington and I was looking to do a hiking/foraging/fishing/camping trip this coming spring, but I am struggling to find lakes to camp at that aren’t several mile hikes. I’m okay with a few miles or so for a hike, but I don’t want to go crazy. Do you guys have any recommendations for any lakes y’all have camped at where you know there’s fish? Thanks!",Anyone in Washington have recommendations?
camping,"OK, this is the first year with my boyfriend for Valentine’s Day. I am having a hard time getting him what he wants, he wants to do something that involves quality time and spending time together. Which is great because I love those things too. Anyways tonight I went to my BFF’s (Don’t worry we live in the same city and we both follow covid-19 protocols) and her camping gear was out, she told me she was “reorganizing it”. 
An idea formed in my head of what to do, he isn’t a fan for cold weather but the thing is I don’t mind it and have camped in the winter months when I was younger. The problem is I don’t remember what I need for camping now because when I did when I was younger it was all my parents gear which they have all sold. Other than a waterproof tent, is there any tips or tricks you as a camper can tell me about camping in the winter? And what can I do the cold? Also how do you cook food if camping in the cold? Any suggestions? Any help would be greatly appreciated! Thanks!",Valentine’s Day Idea?
camping,,Camping for New Years!
camping,"Kids always look forward to attending yearly summer camps. Once registered and before arrival day, all camper families will need to complete our Additional Forms (included in our Pre-Camp Packet – see below). [**Camp Forms**](https://campnorthstarmaine.com/pre-camp-forms/). Everything you need to know about the upcoming summer is located in this section.",Summer Camp Pre-registration Form | Camp North Star
camping,,Weather is just right for desert camping. Sonora
camping,,Back Yard Bushcraft Series Setting up Polish Lavuu
camping,,"Awesome weekend camping trip at Motosuko Camping Ground in Yamanashi, Japan"
camping,,"Sarek keeping guard&lt;3 Finnemarka, Norway."
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,4 Days on the Trinity River
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/ecQxNYBH3PThnMDa7](https://goo.gl/maps/ecQxNYBH3PThnMDa7)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img npn1o08rz6961...*",Park Life
camping,,Park Life
camping,,Back in Sep 2020 !!
camping,,"Hammock Stealth Camping, almost caught"
camping,,"Had a blast camping to start off the new year, we all made chairs and hung out the whole night."
camping,,Over night at Cook Forest
camping,,Spent the last week in the woods/desert. East Verde River and Sedona. Best way to leave 2020 behind.
camping,,Boundary Waters Camping on New Years (Minnesota)
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/8ewZ6BqA8uhZq3D77](https://goo.gl/maps/8ewZ6BqA8uhZq3D77)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img ny6pk3wdh6961...*",Park Life
camping,"Me and my dad are camping buddies, and I really want to get the old man a camping related gift for his birthday. 
I’m broke as shit, so if you have any suggestions for a good gift under 35$ 
I was looking at the Bison Rolling Grill. Or something in that field.",Good camping gifts
camping,,Pandemic paradise 😌
camping,,First Winter Camp
camping,,"Nice view to wake up to, to ring in the New Year"
camping,,Fishin Camp Life: Unloading my Grizzly to get ready to head home Part 2.
camping,,Beautiful Badlands South Dakota
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,My cat claimed my sleeping bag as her own.
camping,,I really want to go camping again
camping,"Any suggestions on places to camp in April in or around Ohio. Not looking for cold weather camping, not experienced enough, and would be car camping.",Camping in April
camping,,Built a log cabin in the woods - Scotland!
camping,,Best Way to Lose Lower Belly Fat
camping,,What it's really like to go camping overnight in the rainforest during HEAVY RAIN!
camping,"Hello there! Currently looking for a privacy pop
Up mainly to use as a shower/changing clothes at dispersed campgrounds and such) Basically my go to method is a spray bottle and a few wash rags to clean myself. It works fine if there is a bathroom on site i just throw my spare towel or tarp on the ground to catch the water/soap. 

My issue is I’m 6ft and wondering is that 3 inches really an inconvenience to other tall fellow campers. 
I’d be the main one using it, most friends if they join at 5”10-6”3. 

Would love some feedback before i make a purchase!",Anyone 6ft+ have issues with the Pop Up Pod?
camping,"I recently got a Nemo Disco 15 for Christmas and its my first time owning a non-synthetic sleeping bag. I decided to test it out tonight and one of the first things I noticed was a few feathers here and few. Fast forward to now (I've been browsing my phone for 2-3 hours since then, and my black boxers have visible down all over (probably a 4 feathers every centimeter. Not taking a picture for obvious reasons). Is this normal? This bag has amazing reviews online and I really like it ever for this leaking","Is it normal for downsleeping bags to ""leak"" a fair amount of down?"
camping,,"Near Moab, Utah. 10 degrees Fahrenheit. Free site near Lone Mesa."
camping,,"steep ravine, CA early December"
camping,,"Is it camping season yet? Colorado, USA"
camping,,"Our private campground in the Mississippi forrest ""Camp Firefly"" ready for visitors to experience the syncronous fireflies that call it home."
camping,,Fishin Camp Life: Unloading my Grizzly to get ready to head home Part 1.
camping,,Just used skills I learnt over 20yrs ago in a Year 8 Home Economics class to repair my Swag bag without stabbing my finger. Just sayin'
camping,Driving down I95 from NY to Florida.  Was wondering what people’s experiences with KOA campgrounds were like?,KOA
camping,,Early morning coffee &gt; late night marshmallows
camping,,Camping in Colorado during the start of Quarantine last year. With my Best buddy Dash!!
camping,"Hi All - 

&amp;#x200B;

I have the following sleeping bag for my wife and I: [https://www.rei.com/product/136334/rei-co-op-siesta-30-double-sleeping-bag](https://www.rei.com/product/136334/rei-co-op-siesta-30-double-sleeping-bag)

&amp;#x200B;

I want to get a compression sack to make this thing smaller but also keep it dry. I am looking at Sea to Summit brand. What size sack do I need?

[https://www.rei.com/product/730882/sea-to-summit-event-compression-dry-sack](https://www.rei.com/product/730882/sea-to-summit-event-compression-dry-sack)

&amp;#x200B;

I am also looking for one for my clothes to keep them dry and fresh. What size is good for a 2-3 day camping trip?",Help with Compression Sacks
camping,"I completely new to camping and have been getting all my gear ready (rooftop tent setup) for my first trip. 
I feel like my timing is shit as all the campgrounds in SoCal are closed due to covid. Does anyone know the status of dispersed camping options. 

Thanks so much.",Southern California BLM or National forest camping during COVID (2nd Lockdown Edition)
camping,,Of of the best days of 2020. Northern Montana in the summer.
camping,,"Some hammock camping on a beach near Clearwater, FL. Built the whole structure in the second picture during the night with my buddy."
camping,,Camping in KOFA National Wildlife Refuge
camping,,"Since the last post got so much love, here are some more shots from my trip to Great Basin National Park, I highly highly recommend going here. Sadly we didn’t have time to summit the actual mountain but just the glacier, it was beautiful and such a great hike in of itself"
camping,,"Since the last post got so much love, here are some more shots from my trip to Great Basin National Park, I highly highly recommend going here. Sadly we didn’t have time to summit the actual mountain but just the glacier, it was beautiful and such a great hike in of itself"
camping,,Thought these might make cool trivets for cast iron while camping
camping,,Arizona winter camping!
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/xAL9MiEkvmyGZN1C9](https://goo.gl/maps/xAL9MiEkvmyGZN1C9)

https://preview.redd.it/peun12hmmz861.jpg?width=2048&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=d15ed57aeca811e1908afa94db6aaec99097e74f",Park Life
camping,,This is how i woke up in 01.01.2021
camping,,Wish I could do more but CA shutdown everything again.
camping,"One of my younger family members were setting up their own online store selling these led beanie headlamps so I decided to buy one for camping and I’m impressed. 
Pros: It’s a Unisex, one size fit design so it’s suitable for all, it’s warm and cosy and provides a bright light to find your way in the dark. Suitable for all occasions, simple to use has rechargeable batteries all round solid piece of equipment. 
Cons: Delivery took roughly 2 weeks, could be improved, apart from that as a customer I’ve received great service and I genuinely recommend it.
[Their website](https://www.mackenziedisplays.com/products/warm-winter-beanie-led-headlight)",Led Beanie Headlight
camping,,Wildfie visitor!
camping,,"Beautiful Cabin in Finland, Fantasy B&amp;B"
camping,,Announcing the Absolutely Best Campgrounds and RV Parks for 2021
camping,,Perfect balance
camping,"My husband and I almost always camp &amp; hike together. I've been considering getting a double sleeping bag, particularly for colder weather- seems like I can steal some of his man warmth, as I'm almost always cold while he sleeps like a baby. Has anyone had experience using one? What are your thoughts? Things to avoid?",Thoughts on double sleeping bags
camping,,"Funds for university, organised by Bediako Bright Asare"
camping,"We use a 2500 watt 100ah lithium [solar generator](https://deltaforcepower.com/collections/portable-lithium-solar-generators/products/portable-lithium-solar-generator) from Delta Force Power for camping. It's lightweight and can power everything we need while we're camping out in our converted van. 

We also use it for emergency backup power. It can run a full sized fridge for 15 hours without solar panels (at night) and all day with the solar panels. 

You can also add extra batteries for increased run time.  My pic below shows the system with three total batteries (300ah.)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img qkn5370x8y861...*",Best Portable Power For Camping &amp; Emergency Backup Power
camping,,Bacon in the dark [southernmost Sweden]
camping,,Successful New Mexico holiday trip full of some great hiking
camping,"For those of you who have been, where are the “secret” spots? Where do you recommend posting up for the night? What are the less traveled roads and paths?

My fiancé and I will be going in a month and need to start planning somewhat of list of things to see and do. We are camping in our truck so we plan on staying somewhere different every night.","Trip to Sedona, AZ, USA"
camping,"Hi, me and my boyfriend are going to take a trip down south (Georgia, Florida) and I was wondering if any of you guys know where I could rent the cheapest campervan. we are on a budget so if I could find something around 500$ for a week would be perfect. p.s (we live in Indiana)",Does anyone know the cheapest campervan I could rent for a week?
camping,,People working through the holidays be like
camping,,Love the feeling of setting it all up and just gazing at it in the scenery
camping," The best tarps we’ve found

#### OK, so tarps are just a sheet of waterproof material with some eyelets. Anything will do, but these top picks are reliable and come with the bits and pieces you’ll need.

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img uhk7cy3p2x861...*

Best [Canvas Tarpaulins](https://tarpaulinsshop.co.uk/product-category/canvas-tarpaulins/) For Camping",The best tarps we’ve found
camping,"Hands up if you're not an outdoorsy person? 👋 Read about how my camping experience made me love the indoors even more! 😊
https://talkcrates.blogspot.com/2021/01/why-camping-is-not-for-me.html?m=1",Why camping is not for me!!
camping,,"Just found this sub, so I figured I'd post some of the cooler shots I got from a trip in February of last year. Will surely be browsing and posting here more often!"
camping,,"Coral Bay, Western Australia. Calm water and coral overflowing with fish 5 meters offshore"
camping,,"Coral Bay, Western Australia. Calm water and coral overflowing with fish 5 meters offshore"
camping,,first time camping in the backyard.
camping,,The yearly sorting and organizing of camping gear has begun.. yey. Amazing how much small and useless or otherwise expired *stuff* gets collected at my place
camping,,A beautiful day in Virginia.
camping,,Some productive advice in these comments for a fellow camper. 😂
camping,,"Dear ladies and genteimen, I want you to help me refresh the products :Outdoor sport gloves.If you are interested in this and your other requirements, you can contact us.We will send you the free samples directly,if you can help us write the good reviews."
camping,,Maiden voyage of the Stormbreak 3 in Hawaii.
camping,,Does anyone know of any truck camping near San Luis Obispo?
camping,"Looking for advice. Would like to beach camp the NC Outer Banks. Is mid February or mid March better? What specific area would you suggest? I’m from SC so can get there in about 5 hours. 
Thanks!!",Outer Banks
camping,,"Great way to waste some time, best to be prepared rather than do it on the spot"
camping,Does anyone know of any good spots along the coast and/or disperse camping spots where I can actually make a fire?,Places to go winter camping in WA state?
camping,My camping backpack is not waterproof. Looking for a good spray to coat it. Any recommendations?,Looking for water repellent spray for backapck
camping,,Glamping inside our Suburban Overland
camping,,"Camping in Palase, Albania (ALB). Picture taken from the seashore (Jon sea) and with Llogara Mountain in the background."
camping,"Hey everyone,

I have a quick question about camping near Mt Washington, NH.

I have hiked it throughout the summer a few times, but never the winter. I am curious if anyone knows how I’d fair camping close to my car in Pinkham Notch.

Thanks!",Mt. Washington camping question
camping,,"Couldn’t think of a better way to start the new year! (Superstitions Wilderness, Arizona)"
camping,,"I've spent one day at campfire in the winter forest. This is my first video, any feedback is welcomed. Thanks :)"
camping,"Hello! I'm super new to reddit but have been trying to plan a three week trip to a bunch of National Parks this summer and was hoping for some input! My dates are June 18th to July 9th and can post a more detailed itinerary if needed. I know this sub is for camping in general but if anyone has an idea of a better one for these questions please let me know. 

1. My first stop is Grand Teton NP, I'm leaving from Northern Colorado and expecting to get to Grand Teton around 2 or 3pm- is all hope lost at trying to find a FF campsite? Some of the stuff I've read says that Gros Venture and Lizard Creek would be my best bet but I'm worried I won't get a spot. 
2. I have about 1 and 1/2 days in Yellowstone (I know it's not nearly enough time), but what are the realistic ""must see's"" in that timeframe? I'm staying in the Madison Campground if that helps.
3. I'll arrive in Glacier on 6/23 and am worried that going to the sun road won't be open. Any suggestions on other areas to see/explore if this road isn't open? I also haven't made reservations here but am leaning towards Many Glaciers or St. Marys campgrounds- any input on those?
4. After I hit North Cascades and Mt. Rainier I'm heading to Olympic and realized that I am not going to have nearly enough time to even see the highlights. My current plan is to stay at the Kalaloch Campground and try to see the HOH rainforest and some of the beaches. Is there anything else I should try to see on the south side? Or a better way to spend my 1 1/2 days? 
5. I will be in Salem Oregon for the 4th of July as an in between- is there anything special I should see while there? I'm just staying the night so I won't have a ton of time there! 

I know that I'm trying to pack a lot into a short amount of time but I'm really hoping to see as much as possible. The parks I'm visiting are as follows: Grand Teton, Yellowstone, Glacier, North Cascades, Mt. Rainier, Olympic, Crater Lake. I only have 1-2 days in each park, but if anyone has any input about any of them I would love to hear it! Thanks!",Looking for input on NPS Road Trip
camping,,"Camping in the living room with my best friend! Too old to hike or sleep inside, but never too old to have tent snuggles."
camping,,"New Year’s Eve camping trip. Peak District, UK"
camping,,I recently acquired some land completely FOR FREE! Here’s how you can do the same:
camping,"I've been searching through r/camping , alltrails, [freecamping.net](https://freecamping.net) etc and there's just so much information that I'm to the point where I need recommendations from people that have been there.  


I'm planning a camping trip for myself and my dog for this coming May and I'm really interested in trying the Pisgah National Forest which is a few hours from me. The main complication is that although my dog loves hiking, she can't go as far as she used to and can't handle crazy hard trails either (she's getting soft in her old age), so I'm trying to find trails that have established primitive sites as soon as 1/2 a mile in. I'm also planning on staying a few nights so I will need reasonable access to water.  


Any recommendations would be greatly appreciated! You can of course DM me as well if you don't want to blow up your spot ;)",Pisgah NF - Looking for free hike in camp site recommendations (with close water access)
camping,,Interested mates only
camping,,"Camping in the living room with my best friend! Too old to hike or sleep outside, but never too old to have tent snuggles."
camping,"Hey everybody, asking for campsite recommendations between Austin and Houston.l for about 8-12 people. It can be a public park or a larger property we can Airbnb. Doesn’t have to be right in between Austin and Houston but would be nice. 

Thanks","Campsite recommendations (casual) between Austin and Houston, Texas"
camping,"Going to do a two month hang while I build a house. Need plenty of advice!

Sorry in advance for the formatting. I’m on mobile.

Some details: Construction will start in early July, 4 hours north of Toronto. In the bush, on our lakefront property my dad bought in ‘81. We’re tearing down the cabin and building a log home for my parents to retire to. We have a shed with running water and a living area, which is where my dad will be staying. I will be storing my clothes and food there as well, so I there’s no worries about that. My only unknown is how to make hammock camping for two months work... There will be bugs, it will be warm, might rain, not sure yet but I want to be more than prepared for the absolute worst possible conditions. 

Here’s my gear I’ve collected since last summer:
• Hammock Gear - Economy Incubator 20°f (more than enough)
• Kammok - Python 10’ (there’s plenty of trees, but I’d rather not use them, details later)
• ENO - Guardian (I have no worries with this. The area has mosquitos, black flies, horseflies, deer flies.)
• Sun Year - Rectangular Tarp (doesn’t seem to have a model number or anything similar. I received it as a gift.)
• North 49 - Jumbo Parachute Hammock Gathered End
• Amsteel - I’ve ordered 100’ of 7/64 so I should be fine. 
• Wool blankets and sleeping bags are also available to me. From my understanding, this should be fine for summertime hangs.

I also ordered a splicing hook set to make continuous loops and probably other cool things I don’t know about yet, should be here next Friday. I was going to also use the amsteel to replace the stiff webbing straps that came with the hammock.

While I’m still at home, I want to get to know my gear. Unfortunately, There’s no where to hang on my property. Conveniently I live across from a forest, but there has unfortunately been an encampment issue there :(. I’ve thought about hanging inside with a stand this spring while I tinker with my suspension at least. I ordered the [AmazonBasics hammock stand](https://www.amazon.ca/gp/aw/d/B076PM29JV?ref=ppx_pt2_mob_b_prod_image), will be here in a few days.

In July, I want to protect the trees (I’m the Lorax!), so I’m not sure what I can do here as I’ve never really done this before... I know it’s not good to hang on the same spot for more than a few days, but if I want to protect the trees, I just use a stand, right? Is there a way to make straps “safer”, to allow me to hang via one pair of trees for 2 months without relocating? Would I need/want to somehow protect the rain fly cord from damaging the trees? Or do I just bring the hammock stand and strap poles to the stand and attach my rain fly to that, solving the entire tree damage issue?

Since I have no knowledge or experience, I’m relying on there’s advice to be successful here. I have read a good chunk of The Ultimate Hang, Second Edition and have learned quite a bit, but my specific circumstances are not answered by the book. For example, this setup will only exist for two months maximum. The log cabin will have a covered porch which I will use for hanging from then on, so the books suggestions are impractical, in regards to building a pagoda, or a permanent post, etc.

Any advice or tips are greatly appreciated.
I’m trying to get as much advice on this as possible, so if there are any other forums/message boards you can forward me to, that would be absolutely amazing!","Desperate for hammock camping advice. Doing a two month long hang, starting in July. Any help is greatly appreciated. Plenty of info inside!"
camping," 

Here's a CBC article about how there are a ton of people trying to book campsites at Ontario campgrounds right now. if you haven't booked **GET ON IT!!** They also provide a link to tips for reserving a site.

Does anyone know if this includes backcountry sites? I have already booked mine, I am just curious.

CBC article:

[https://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/london/ontario-parks-camping-campsites-2021-1.5927993?cmp=rss](https://www.cbc.ca/news/canada/london/ontario-parks-camping-campsites-2021-1.5927993?cmp=rss)

tips for booking article:

[http://www.ontarioparks.com/parksblog/ontario-parks-reservation-tips/](http://www.ontarioparks.com/parksblog/ontario-parks-reservation-tips/)",MAD RUSH TO RESERVE CAMPSITES IN ONTARIO PARKS
camping,,My small hiking/bikepacking/caming kitchen.(not yet optimized) The bag weighs about 2.4kg. I carry 1.5l water and extra pots with my bag.
camping,"Hi Y'all, I am planning a trip to Glacier National Park in Montana for 2 weeks in July. I have unfortunately missed the window for reserving a camp ground for my time there and I am scrambling to figure out what to do. Have any of you done first come first serve camping, are there other alternatives(not afraid to sleep in my car)? ",Camping advice Glacier National Park
camping,,The “Bumper Dumper” Is a Portable Toilet For When You Can’t Hold It In While Traveling
camping,"Hi all, I (30f) am looking for advice on off grid camping. I’ve done plenty of camping but always near bathrooms and camp sites. Going to Death Valley for a week in April with some more experienced campers. Bringing my 4 and 7 yr old boys who love the outdoors and hiking. We have a 4wd 4runner and a kodiak tent.

Any and all advice would be welcome.

Thanks!",Newbie to off grid camping question
camping,,Survey
camping,,"Camped along the Salmon River for the night in Idaho. Was lucky enough to stumble upon Native Americans rock art as well! Love this state and it’s rugged, beautiful history."
camping,,Fly cam while camping in vietnam
camping,,Desert Camping in February
camping,"Good morning,

The sun is shining and it looks like camp sites will be open soon. I've been camping quite a few times with my girlfriend over the last few years (she's a seasoned veteran, I'm the newbie) - both in a tent and more recently in her VW Camper van. 

Most of our food is barbequed ontop of coals, which when finished we add logs ontop of and use as a fire to keep warm. 

One thing that kinda annoys me is that we are always using camping gas and a mini stove to brew up tea and coffee, boil water, or heat up anything that isn't BBQ-compatible.

I was thinking this year, to get a camping dutch oven, a tripod, and a kettle that can be used too - and attempt to get it all done with wood fire. 

I have a few questions though, if it's that's OK? 

- As a vegetarian, my girlfriend isn't particularly interested in all the delicious slow cooked smokey meat dishes one could make in a dutch oven, so I think I'm going to be limited to stews, soups, cowboy beans, etc.  ? Does anyone have any suggestions on the KIND of thing I can cook in the dutch oven (as opposed to on a bbq normally) ? 

- Assuming the fire was going the night before, how long will it take to get one going big enough to get a kettle boiling in the morning?",Dutch Oven + Tripod + Kettle - worth it?
camping,,Went camping with puppers and got the most precious pictures
camping,,Camping in the Joshua Tree 🏜 and since it was chilly i got the fire started and went for hike at sunrise 🌅
camping,[deleted],"Originally designed for water storage during outages (on well water), but can be used for camping too! About $25 setup."
camping,[deleted],"Ok Karma, come to me!!!"
camping,,"New tent, could not be happier with the quality. Will be breaking it in this weekend."
camping,,Pathfinder scout tarp?
camping,,Campfire on the Tuolumne River
camping,,will a spiceal needs summer camp be fun.......?
camping,,is river rafting or river tubing safe i have autism and want too go....?
camping,,is river rafting or river tubing safe i have autism and want too go....?
camping,,Lockable Fall Resistant Food Container Lockitplates.com
camping,,Amor en el Potomac
camping,,help
camping,Hey everyone. I was just wondering if there was a specific item that exists for holding the food you cooked. Say I am eating out of a pot off the fire or a bowl with hot food I usually have nothing to put that on and have to use my sleeve to hold it.,What do you bring along to hold your hot food?
camping,,Ice camping in the Canadian Backcountry
camping,"Been rocking a single burner butane for years, just car camping, but got a propane Coleman double burner for Christmas. 

Used it this past weekend and honestly, I kind of prefer the shitty butane stove lol. it's just so much easier and quicker to slam the cannister in there and away we go. 

Is propane superior in terms of heat/BTU/performance? we're not in crazy extreme climate situations or backpacking so that's not much of an issue. Gotta say, I do enjoy having 2 burners though!",Do y'all prefer butane or propane?
camping,,Chilling beers in the cold streams gets the job done when backpacking
camping,,I'm on a volcano whit my family. Respect from Mexico. 🇲🇽🖖🏼
camping,"My SO and I were doing a short camping trip on the Ozette Triangle on Washington's Olympic Peninsula. You are required to purchase a permit in Port Angeles, WA which entails you renting a Bear Can (if you don't have one already) and selecting a camp site.

We got to camp and set up the hammock spread with our group. The views on this beach are amazing and we were lucky to get out on a weekend where the weather cooperated.The next morning we woke up to a Black Bear admiring out camp. It was really exillerating and could not have gone better. The bear just poked around for a bid and ended up hopping back down to the beach to feed on muscles and anything else it could fine. I always wondered what would happen if one got too close and I'm sitting there in my hammock like a rotisserie piece of meat.

So let me know! What has been your wildest animal encounter you have experienced in the outdoors?

-Squatch",I want to hear about your animal encounters!
camping,,Custom Storage Hacks For All My Gear In My 1987 Toyota Land Cruiser Fj60 For Camping or Overlanding
camping,[deleted],A misty North of England. First &amp; only attempt at photography.
camping,,"Subzero camping. Fun, but maybe I'll wait for it to get warm again. Mt Taylor, NM"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

[https:\/\/www.youtube.com\/watch?v=Aqt-mT9qIEk](https://preview.redd.it/52go2xd57oj61.png?width=754&amp;format=png&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=11863ceef04b3ec93c3f241d483b06a415947ca5)",Secret beach in Quintana Roo only 200 people a day can visit it
camping,,Tent for sale
camping,,"Breakfast, camping somewhere near Yellowstone 🍳 🌲"
camping,[deleted],trying summer camp maybe
camping,,trying summer camp maybe
camping,,Camping in Indiana last weekend. First time taking our Solo Stove and it was worth. Double fires = 🔥warm🔥 This was our first winter trip and the snow was so worth it. Great family adventure.
camping,,"Fairplay, CO."
camping,,I need this!!
camping,,"Thirsty or excited (Bodega Bay, CA)"
camping,"i have autism and spiceal needs ok i want too try a overnight summer camp maybe this summer or a camp  where you can do rafting  swimming, fishing tubing  im  going try a special needs camp though  would summer camp be fun, would i need a life vest, what should i pack are incontinence products required even if your dry like for anxity reasons  as i will be away from home  i know i wouldnt need them but  its a extra safety thing will i need a sleeping bag what do you bring for summer camp, will i sleep in a tent or cabin, will i need extra clothes , can i take a stuffed animal ,can i take my fav blanket or  a cool hot wheels car   what summer camp like any kind support thanks",summer camp
camping,,While on the way to the camp site
camping,,"Went camping with the boys, took some pictures surprisingly they turned out really good! Let you what you think."
camping,"Looking for some tent suggestions. 
I’m 5’2” and have two pups. I’m looking for
- plenty of space for my gear
- room for a queen/full size blow up mattress
- head clearance
- “outside” living space 

Here’s my two favorite tents:

Coleman Evanston 6
- Pros
— easy to set up by myself
— plenty of room inside
— head clearance
— lasted forever. 
- Cons
— the front “outside” room doesn’t have window covers. When it rains everything gets wet. It’s also not big enough to actually be useful, although maybe I’d feel differently if it stayed dry
— head clearance works for me but not others would are taller than me

NTK tent. Model discontinued. It’s like a cross between the Arizona and Indy
- Pros
— great “outside” room. Open to the ground. Kind of wish it was a tub floor, but only kind of. Has window coverings that zip tight and it stays dry inside even in heavy rains with the open floor. 
— massive amount of space
— stays very dry
— actually easy to put away
— great head clearance
-Cons 
— this thing is massive. It needs 3 people at a minimum to put up and I need a freakin step stool to get it up.
— very difficult to put up. I’ve put it up a dozen times and it still leaves me frustrated by the time it’s standing
— the sleeping area is 1/2 an octagon shape (the outdoor space is the other 1/2) and, while it provides great space, it is awkward space. 
— the footprint on this thing is beyond obnoxious

I’ve had lots of other tents, but none worth comparing since I’m looking for something in the middle of these two. I’d rather not drop $400/$500. I’d rather stay in the $250 range but I can be flexible. 

The Nemo Wagontop with garage look awesome but $$. What I really want is the Evanston with window covers. Too bad Coleman hasn’t caught up with that.",Tent Suggestions
camping,,Kayak camping on Lake Champlain
camping,,I am hoping someone can help me! The problem is that there is zero gas flow coming out of the stove. The gas flow is open and it fits securely. Any ideas what could be the problem?
camping,,6 AM fog last summer (New England)
camping,,Went out camping the other night with some friends in -7°C on the beach with high winds and was surprised how warm we were by the fire. Coldest night of 2021 in Scotland and we barely noticed!
camping,"I bought two of these UV botles from [Larq](http://www.livelarq.com) - terrible.

One doesn't charge and both have water ingress in the UV lens.

What's worse is Larq have taken no responsibility for the issues. I first contacted them months ago. They seem to hide behind 'we're a small team' and when I give them details they ask for, they come up with another question - skirting the issue.

Save your money, I bought my wife a cheaper bottle at the same time and hers is working fine!!",Larq UV water bottle - save your money!
camping,[deleted],Larq UV botles - danger your money
camping,,"I don’t like the thought of beach camping, but actually doing it is kind of glorious"
camping,,Any idea why the kingston range wilderness in south california is labeled as closed? Is camping allowed in this area?
camping,,Love how this little campsite turned out. PNW camping will never let you down.
camping,,Sex while camping? Tell me your best story
camping,,Cooking with my Biolyte
camping,,"Aussie bush, home for the next 2 days"
camping,"I’m camping alone now, I’m in quite a nice spot and I do a bit of gold prospecting while I’m here but something I can’t seem to do is relax, I always seem to get in a semi shit mindstate and I feel uneasy the whole time. Any advice?",Can never feel completely relaxed camping alone? Any tips?
camping,,"It's the first campfire that I light by myself, haven't rained in weeks so it's pretty easy ngl."
camping,,"Reminiscing on our camping trip and wheeling with the boys!! In my backyard! (Not really) 😁beautiful Bailey, Colorado points if you know what flower your looking at... 👍🏼"
camping,,View of a storm over the ocean from the top of Cadillac Mountain in Maine's gorgeous Acadia National Park.
camping,[removed],"Windproof Lighter Metal Tiger Cool Design with a One-Click Ejection Knife. Could I invite you to test it？ then you can get it for free. If you are interested, please DM me (USA ONLY)"
camping,[deleted],what's a a spiceal needs summer camp like
camping,[deleted],Woah! This little camper has a ton to offer!
camping,,i have super powers
camping,I am male 5 10 200lb,What is the lightest 0 degree bag with a 150 budget
camping,,help.......?
camping,,February Camping in the PNW Birch Bay SP
camping,,Dry Tortugas Camping Trip - What We Ate while Camping
camping,,Winter Hot tent Camping in the Boundary Waters
camping,"Gonna be doing some fishing and camping around April. Looking for a great spot to camp along the river? Preferably away from people. I’m looking for a more secluded spot. I was hearing good things about Hobo camp but I heard it was washed out. 
 
  Would love to suggestions or even some other alternatives in the CA area.",Looking for a great spot along kern river.
camping,,Trying to enjoy my morning coffee at the tent. This is my view...
camping,"Hi,

First big camping trip with two dogs, and fiancé. We should be fairly set to go for the gear side of things. But if anyone has been to Big Bend (Texas) and has recommendations, we would love to hear them! 

Thanks in advance.",First camp in Big Bend National Park
camping,,Best place to solo camp and enjoy the view?
camping,,Ice Camping for GIANT Fish Catch Clean Cook! Multiple PBs and INCREDIBLE Underwater Carp Footage
camping,,Gotta love a weekend away
camping,,Adirondack trip B&amp;W
camping,[deleted],Car Camping Question
camping,,Can't wait for Spring!
camping,,Different kinda crossroads @ okefenokee
camping,,"A little solo camping trip in Wilson’s Prom, Victoria. Had the whole site to myself!"
camping,,We launched a truck wheel for life OUTDOORS! Let us know what you think! :)
camping,,DIY Military Surplus Awning : )
camping,,Last summer on Vancouver Island 🇨🇦🏕 There’s no place like home
camping,I have Cabela's Alaskan Guide Model 6-person Tent and I want to add insulation. Any recommendations for insulating this type of tent for Camping in the Rocky Mountains?,Insilating Tent
camping,"With COVID having ruined all our travel plans last year and looking like this year will be no different, I’m definitely feeling the pinch of cabin fever after a long, isolated winter. I can’t wait to get out on the trails and put all this new camping and hiking gear to use.

The trouble is, spring and early summer here in Southern Manitoba is tick season. The fiancé is totally petrified by the things, ans tbh I’m not a huge fan of them either. I can deal with mosquitos and black flies, but ticks in large numbers is a hard no. Tick season typically lasts until mid to late June here, but I would love to be able to get out and enjoy some time in the outdoors before that.

Does anyone know of any areas in Manitoba, Western Canada, or Northwestern Ontario where ticks are not such a big issue?

Of course COVID will have some say in what we’re able to do but it would be nice to know of some options that might be viable. Will drive as far West as Yoho or as far East as Sleeping Giant if needed.",Avoiding ticks in Manitoba/Canada
camping,,Bonfire on the ranch
camping,,Hoh rainforest in Washington last summer. Super magical spot!
camping,,FAT GUY IN PINK TU TU | BELLY FLOP FOR CHARITY | PART TIME RVERs
camping,,Hammock meditation
camping,,Campfire explosion
camping,"Slept on a cot for years but thinking about making a change to a low profile blow up pad. 
What’s your opinion?",Cot vs blow up sleeping pad.
camping,,"⬇️⬇️ Need SPONSORS to help take my camping adventures to less fortunate communities to give underprivileged kids the opportunity to camp, roast a marshmallow &amp; experience the outdoors for the first time. Please get in touch! #jasonkemm #moments_in_motion #camp_with_jason #jpro5ive"
camping,[deleted],"My cousin and I are attempting a yoga retreat at her family’s campground near Garner State Park! Almost completely packed and I received a job offer in town yesterday, and was laid off from my job in Houston due to building needing repairs from freeze. Seems like the time try something new."
camping,,That's the most interesting view (from inside) of the ShiftPod shelter tent.
camping,,I am building a DIY camping/sleeper trailer—what features are a must-have? Is there anything I should keep in mind?
camping,Sorry for the unoriginal question but I can't seem to find the same question. I go camping all year but it never gets below 0 (usually stays between 2-5 when really cold ) and I want to know what's the lightest and comfortable sleeping bag I can get for this and not too expensive. I already slept with a bad 10° one with these temps and it was cold but not too bad if it can help.,Best 0° sleeping bag around 100€?
camping,,Throw down grill getting some use on an overnighter in NE England.
camping,,Tips to Keep Your Camping Trips Safe and Secure - AtoAllinks
camping,[deleted],Zebras Camping in the Forest
camping,"In Colorado there's plenty of spots to pitch a tent amd plenty of places for our huskies to explore. But our old 4 person tent is getting cramped and our 3 huskies don't like being too far from us at night. And this season my wife will be pregnant so the more room and comfort, The better. Not to mention gear and all that we don't leave in the jeep.

It's time tk upgrade anyway and I'm looking over the cabin family tents for us. I dont have a grand to throw into a top end one. And we see the mountains maybe once a month for a weekend when my job isn't in the way of it. 

I've been lookin at things like the Ozark Trail Spring Lodge. I like the room divider since we also have friends that like to come and we play card games and stuff unless we catch a rain outside, amd the dogs would have plenty of space to explore. I like the closet amd extra storage areas too.

Are these things worth it in that style yet? Or have you used that one or have a recommendation for us? Thanks guys!

[Link](https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-14-Person-Cabin-Tent-in-Beige-and-Green/802935832?wmlspartner=wlpa&amp;selectedSellerId=0&amp;&amp;adid=22222222228138515403&amp;wl0=&amp;wl1=g&amp;wl2=m&amp;wl3=247868535528&amp;wl4=aud-1025747331336:pla-472177024557&amp;wl5=1014517&amp;wl6=&amp;wl7=&amp;wl8=&amp;wl9=pla&amp;wl10=8175035&amp;wl11=online&amp;wl12=802935832&amp;veh=sem&amp;gclid=Cj0KCQiAj9iBBhCJARIsAE9qRtB5YKYLkVweuNOhuCHNXxf0S3cuB92Z65_ApRqDB5zLt2HngTNRBo4aAqPCEALw_wcB) to the tent in question",What do you guys think about the cabin style tents?
camping,,Trying to keep cool on a very hot day (and night) at Bemm River.
camping,,Nomad life is very tough 😋
camping,,Fire Maple Camping Utensils Dishes Cookware Set Picnic Hiking Heat Exchanger Pot Kettle FMC-FC2 Outdoor Tourism Tableware
camping,,20pcs Portable Disposable Soap Paper Whitening Exfoliating Mini Outdoor Travel Camping Hiking Tools Wash Clean Hands Heath Care
camping,,Widesea Wind Proof Outdoor Gas Burner Camping Stove Lighter Tourist Equipment Kitchen Cylinder Propane Grill
camping,,Montana last summer. Can’t wait to go back
camping,,Anza Borrego - camping
camping,,"Already missing last weekend Mallee Cliffs, VIC , Australia"
camping,[removed],Gear Suggestions/Advice: Backpacking Tent and Sleeping Bag
camping,"Hey! First time poster, really excited. I started saving for a camping trip to take in November (the first camping trip I’m planning). I’m in Ohio and I would prefer to go somewhere warmer, so I was thinking Georgia. Any advice on where to look at? They seem to have so many beautiful parks, it’s hard deciding...

I’m planning on regular tent camping, nothing too fancy or difficult.",Georgia camping?
camping,"I'm a 17 year old planning a roadtrip with my friends, and I'm aware that alot of campsites have a strict no unaccompanied minors rule. I was curious if anyone knows, will they intently check if I'm 18 or older? Like will they ask for a form of ID? Im sure it varies but I would like to know as a general rule. Also if anyone has any cool locations through the US that you want to add to my list to visit, feel free to comment.",Do campsites require ID?
camping,[deleted],Sometimes simple is best....
camping,"I got everything I needed to do overnight hikes and while I do really enjoy it. I find it rather hard work and I always have a terribly bad night sleep on those small hiking Matts not to mention paper thin tents, I just feel so exposed lol. But yeah I find car camping to be just a lot more enjoyable for some reason.",Anyone else prefer car camping?
camping,,Hollow Tree Stump Fire
camping,,Camping near Siletz River Bend in Oregon.
camping,,Sunset while Yurt Glamping near Yellowstone this past summer!
camping,"I can find some on Amazon advertised as providing shade,  but the reviews mention that the airflow isn't great. I am only looking for a way to keep the windows open and the bugs out.
Car is a dodge grand caravan if that matters.

Any recommendations?",Mosquito Nwt to cover car windows
camping,[removed],Would you use a glamping delivery service?
camping,[deleted],Sunset over Yurts near West Yellowstone
camping,,Ice camping in BC. This is our setup for ice fishing. It’s a Canadian army arctic tent and very comfortable with the wood burning stove.
camping,,"Great campsite at Bendoc, Eadt Gippsland, Victoria"
camping,"I want to go camping very badly. I have just Purchased my first Hammock, yet I want to camp! I have a reliable vehicle!",I am 16 years old and live in the city!! How do I go camping!!!!
camping,[deleted],Pretty high up
camping,,Egg in a hole mmmmmm yummy
camping,,(Camping Survey) Input Needed for Camping School Project
camping,,A magnificent view of Hong Kong
camping,,Coyote Pack Howls for 8 Minutes Straight *Coyote Sounds &amp; Behavior*
camping,,Tried to Winter Hammock Camp in my backyard. Wasn't a total failure.
camping,,"Colorado Collegiate Loop August 2020: Hi all, just thought you guys would appreciate some of the pics from a trip i did this summer, was my first time hiking at altitude and i can’t wait to do it again!!"
camping,I’m usually a pretty careful person when I’m with “The Guys” but what about camp made devolve into a half savage who was cussing in the cabins with his friends.  My friends even said I became a different person at camp and acted like I was on cocaine half the time,Can some pleas explain this to me
camping,"Hi all! 

In a few weeks I will be setting out on my first real-deal camping trip, I'll be staying on Santa Cruz Island in Channel Islands NP for 5 nights with my girlfriend. I've spent a good few months researching everything I can find about the subject, we have all the gear we'll need (as far as I can tell), but I thought this would be a good place to come for more specific advice before we set out. If any of you have stayed there before and have specific tips and tricks for that location I would love to hear it(bonus points if you've stayed in late March). Or if you have any other general tips that the internet doesn't talk about I would really appreciate it. Thanks so much!",Advice: Channel Islands National Park
camping,,My friend sleeping CALMLY
camping,,Barbecue (BBQ) in The Forest With a Doggo | Skewers | Young Veal Carnati
camping,"Hi all,

I am in a business class and my team and I are coming up with and idea for an app and need some feedback. Our idea is an app for the Great Lakes that tells you the current pollution data in and around the area you're looking to enjoy the fresh water. This is merely for customer data and discovery, so any feedback would be greatly appreciated! Thank you!!

[https://forms.gle/xBpx5YgwVZVVANw79](https://forms.gle/xBpx5YgwVZVVANw79)",Water Pollution App
camping,[removed],Are campervans allowed on RV campsites?
camping,,Some photos from my trip to Ft mountain last weekend.
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/j7zd5pdn0aj61.jpg?width=960&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=02b338a580373ed168c6555ac270eba22fb97859

https://preview.redd.it/3r0yxodn0aj61.jpg?width=960&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c4ea9dd7751d5ce5c87d0f9d78c45e5c5b352727

https://preview.redd.it/owvxbqdn0aj61.jpg?width=1072&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=ffe78e27fdef16875c900781813c33debf7a56ff

https://preview.redd.it/3v79rpdn0aj61.jpg?width=720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=fa773c1acabd6fb976aee0f94ab20677196064f0

https://preview.redd.it/d9cujqdn0aj61.jpg?width=720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c23b3cc9ba6eef9b580bf7919c8813235a6c655e","Cornhole and Camping, December 2020. Pat Mayse Lake, N. Texas."
camping,[deleted],"Cornhole and Camping, December 2021, Pat Mayse Lake, Texas"
camping,"Hey, 

Been looking at lots of reviews of the Hubba Hubba NX2 and the reviews seem to be very divided. Anyone have the Hubba and have an opinion on it? Any help would be great! Thank you!",Looking for honest opinion on MSR Hubba Hubba NX2
camping,"We are going camping this weekend with a 3 year old and a 7 year old and temps are expected to drop to 40.  They have 20 degree sleeping bags and I plan to double bag my 3 year old with a smaller sleeping bag, plus they are sleeping on self inflating pads with a high r rating.

Still nervous that they will be cold!  We ski as well and am wondering about the pros and cons of wearing thermals+ ski pants / fleece to bed.  Has anyone tried this?",Wear ski gear to sleep in 40 degrees?
camping,,My campsite with my buddies from last summer. Probably the best trip I've ever had! Northern MN
camping,,"With more than 50sqmi, 5 waterfalls, 9 tunnels, hundreds of wood cabins and camping grounds, you can spend days in here without getting to know the whole place. Google maps/GPS: 📍P8H7+74 La Ciudad, Durango . 📍23.7282192, -105.6871797"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

I would love to go backpacking for a good 6-7 days, preferably in the backcountry. I live in Reno so could drive as far south as Fresno or Yosemite or Sequoia National Forest. I could also drive as far north as the CA/OR border and similar. I doubt much of the Tahoe Rim Trail is accessible or available for anything outside of advanced skills. I consider myself an intermediate winter backpacker.

It’s my first winter out here, but not my first time winter camping experience. Any suggestions on some place I could drive to, park the truck, and then spend a good 5-6 days backpacking a loop type trail or a out and back trail? I figure, with snow shoes, I can likely cover 8-10 miles a day pretty easy but wouldn’t want to stretch further than 12 miles in a day due to shortened days. Let’s keep it it 10 a day to be on the safe side. If the trails are clear, and no shoe shows required (just hiking boots and microspikes or crampons), I could cover 12-15 but don’t want to stretch it further than that.

So are there any 40-70 mile loop trails in the central to Northern California area for someone who is realistically an intermediate winter backpacker (well past beginner but wouldn’t consider myself advanced)? Also would much prefer forests to desert.",I’ve got a month PTO (all of March). Where to go?
camping,"In an effort to pretend that outside isn't still covered in snow I've been making plans to take our baby camping. She'll be about 1 and I don't even know where to start.

Most of our gear is on the more minimal/lightweight side of things so looking for your gear recommendations for family camping.

Baby's never been a good sleeper so I also worry about her napping / sleeping well in a tent, so experiences along those lines are welcome as well.

Plus any miscellaneous tips you might have! I know not to let the kid touch the ground after bathtime 😂",Give me your best tips for camping with babies/toddlers!
camping,,Benefits of dragon fruit
camping,,#Sharabi_TheTrueStory शराब में ऐसा नशा है जो अनमोल मानव जीवन को बर्बाद कर देती है। सद्भगति में ऐसा नशा है जो मर्यादा में रहकर की जाए तो जीवन को आबाद कर देती है। फैसला आपको करना है। ज़रूर देखें Video https://youtu.be/Mdn32wVN8wk
camping,,A windy day
camping,,my dads just started a youtube channel idk if promotion is allowed but if so it'd mean the world to him if a couple of you guys could go and subscribe
camping,,You never know who will show up when you camp in Vermont. Stowe October 2020.
camping,,Camp chill vietnam
camping,,"The Basin Campground / America Bay : Sydney, Australia. Only a short walk from the actual campground too. Helpful rangers, great for a trip with the boys!"
camping,"This an experiment of mine to put a playlist together of beautiful and easy meals, hope everyone can enjoy it !! 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=27s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=27s)",Australian camp cooking
camping,,Last minute impromptu camping trip last week.
camping,"I’d like to camp solo more frequently, but I’m not used to it and I get a bit nervous. What are some ways you got over your apprehension?",How to get over the fear of camping alone?
camping,,"The morning view from an open cabin in Viken, Norway"
camping,,Canaveral National Seashore
camping,"My husband and I may need to move cross country from LA to live with his folks on CT in a few months due to Covid (and just wanting to leave LA in general). While we are both not working and have the time to go travel a bit, we are creating a camping bucket list of places to camp/visit before we leave the west coast and I would love to know your favorite spots! 

Currently have Yosemite booked for April. We've done Big Sur several times (currently our favorite). Hope to get out to Joshua Tree and go back to Sequoia National Forest and even trek to Yellowstone. Would love tent campground recommendations or general parks/places to check out before we leave the western half of the states. Thanks!",Top recommendations for west coast camping!
camping,"I am looking to purchase a smaller camper van.  Any leads welcome.

Thanks",Seeking small budget camper van...
camping,,My dad at one of his fav spots ...eagles view he calls it.
camping,,The Ohio Winter has me pining for Colorado again.
camping,,The sunrise from Bald Rock Mt.
camping,,Weekend to Double Island
camping,,How durable are Kodiak tents? Will dogs damage the floor?
camping,,Wife is 20wks pregnant and still down to camp with me!
camping,,Quick Overnight to Install Stovejacks
camping,,No better way to enjoy the cold than camping inside the Quinzhee you built!
camping,,Camping at cranberry run camping ground in pa
camping,,"Ensenada, México 🇲🇽"
camping,I’m looking to go to Sequoia NF backpacking and camping in the next 3 weeks or so.  It looks like I have to buy permits for each night and and decide where I’m staying.  Is there a good loop trail where I can park my truck and then backpack for 5-6 days and end up back where I started?  I’ve never been so any help would be appreciated.,Help with route plan
camping,"If I were to bring a tv in my tent to watch Netflix and play some Xbox with my cousin, would moisture ruin it? I know it shouldn’t ruin the Xbox because I’ve done this on numerous occasions. Oh and also this is backyard camping, so probably even more of a sin to this subreddit","this is probably a sin to this subreddit, but I have a question about bringing a tv in a tent while it rains"
camping,,Last minute solo camp on some public land. Forgot my sleeping pad and was cold as hell but still had an amazing time.
camping,,Camping from 2 years ago in Coudcroft NM near Ruidoso New Mexico. Part of the White sands missile range can be seen in the 3rd picture.
camping,"Has anyone camped at New River Gorge National Park in WV? Planning a trip there in the Spring. Hoping to do some hiking and kayaking. There are a few sites in the park itself and other state/private campsites just outside in the surrounding areas. Never been there and it is a big area, so if folks have stories to share or recommendations, I'd love to hear them. Thanks!","New River Gorge NP, WV"
camping,,I just discovered this page. they have all the essentials for camping. Amazing🌲🪵🦌
camping,,Attempting to make some shade in the desert
camping,"[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=24s](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DJrID3emg7s&amp;t=24s)

Gday everyone !!  Here is another ripper of dish that you can enjoy when you camping or simply had a busy day at work and needed to put something together soon for the kids and the family or simply for yourself.",The Ultimate Pasta Dish In The Australian Bush
camping,,Turning My Gear Test into a Date Night!
camping,,What is everyone's choice of fuel for alcohol stove?
camping,,Idyllwild campground. Perfect for night sky views and super convenient location. They also have hot water and outlets 🙂
camping,,"Weekend camping in Idyllwild was successful. Super cold, but the snow is almost all the way melted and the sunshine was great 🌲"
camping,,"3 months, over 10 campfires!!! God is Good"
camping,,First time winter camping. Beautiful skies before sunset over Lake Michigan.
camping,So many lakes are cold year round and I've been looking for a camping spot with a kid friendly swimming area with warm water. I've been to Bass Lake a few times which is great for this but wanted to see what else is out there. Any suggestions? Coming from the bay area and willing to drive for a great destination. Thanks!,Favorite camping spots near warm water in California?
camping,,"A little windy (and cold) camping next to a ~600 ft gorge, but the views were certainly worth it (Rio Grande del Norte National Monument)"
camping,Heading up there with my brothers for a week. Any info would be good. We have alternate sites ready but I want to try it out.,Anyone been to Stough Reservoir?
camping,,Nice knife for the woods
camping,"Gonna go camping for a few days with my friends. What are the things I need besides water, phones,  food, tents, and flashlights? Thanks in advance.","Going camping for at least a few days, what are the things I need besides the obvious?"
camping,,The joys of car camping and chasing powder in the winter!
camping,,First time camping on the ice this weekend. Cramped isn't the word to use with a cot in my shanty. Cozy is a good word to use.
camping,,Good ol desert in winter.
camping,"I have recently washed my Synthetic Puffa Coat with tennis balls in both the wash and drying process. I have now realized this was a bad idea because the insulation inside has moved and in clumps. Has anyone got any fixes or solutions they would love to help me out with? Many Thanks   
Ben",Synthetic Coat Restoration!!
camping,,Wild camping in France overlooking Geneva last weekend.
camping,"May or may not be a dumb question, but me and my boyfriend are going on a thirty day road trip so we bought a portable camp stove that uses butane canisters. The canisters on Amazon are about 4-5 dollars a piece whereas a canister of butane-propane mix is 2 dollars at Rei. Are the propane mix ones acceptable or should I pay for the other ones? Thank you for any help :)",Butane canister vs. Butane Propane Mix?
camping,"Looking for a new tent this summer and beyond for car camping. Some specifics:

* We've snagged a waterfront site on Lake Superior, so there's potential for super high winds
* Needs space for two adults, a dog, and a pack and play for an infant

I have an old Black Diamond two person mesa that I love for the back county but obviously that doesn't work here.  I want to buy something that will last me 10+ years and I hate the idea of using a tent a handful of times and tossing it to the dump in a year or two (That Black Diamond got pumped by some storms over the years and it still going strong)..

The two tents I'm circling are:

* Coleman 8 person Skydome
   * [https://www.amazon.ca/Coleman-6-Person-Dark-Skydome-Camping/dp/B07XGDMFTW/ref=sr\_1\_11?dchild=1&amp;keywords=coleman%27s%2Bsun&amp;qid=1614015519&amp;sr=8-11&amp;th=1](https://www.amazon.ca/Coleman-6-Person-Dark-Skydome-Camping/dp/B07XGDMFTW/ref=sr_1_11?dchild=1&amp;keywords=coleman%27s%2Bsun&amp;qid=1614015519&amp;sr=8-11&amp;th=1)
   * Love the dark room feature for my kids nap schedule
   * Love the size
   * Price is really great
   * Weary of coleman and the durability of the brand. They advertise if can withstand 35mph wind but I mean, really?
* Eureka Kohana 6 person tent
   * [https://www.mec.ca/en/product/6013-766/Kohana-6-Person-Tent?colour=BL501](https://www.mec.ca/en/product/6013-766/Kohana-6-Person-Tent?colour=BL501)
   * Eureka's seem to be reliable
   * An okay size for what I need
   * Love that it's from MEC (for non Canadians—MEC is a Canada REI and they have great customer support
   * Would like to spend less money but if that's what it is, that's what it is

Am I missing any tents I should be looking at? Does anyone have any opinions on the two that I've listed?",Tent advice (Canada)
camping,"Which tents do you recommend for 4-person winter camping? (And why?) We are a family of four.

We had a bit of condensation in our sleeping pads underneath where our bodies were. Why is this? No one had been sweating. What should I do about it?

My wife was chilly in her sleeping bag (big Agnes rated for 0 Fahrenheit, it was 16). What liners would you recommend?

I went to bed hot in my Katabatic quilt so I stripped to just thermal top and underwear and then woke up a bit chilly. What do fellow quilt campers recommend for maximizing warmth?

All in all, it was a family hit. We just need a couple tweaks and we’ll be good to go again.",Winter Camping Questions
camping,,Sunset Campfire In The Red Rock Desert Of Northern Arizona
camping,,This is why I camp!
camping,"Heading to Alabama Hills soon with a group of friends. Wondering if groundfires are allowed or do I need to bring my solo stove?  Also, is there enough dead wood in the area to gather for firewood or should we buy and bring in? Any info will help from some of you Alabama Hills veterans.  Thanks",Alabama Hills Campfire and Firewood
camping,My partner and I will be driving from the Twin Cities in MN to Teddy Roosevelt and then to Glacier NP during June. We'd like to break up the driving to Glacier across three days and will be staying at Teddy en route. Are there any good camping stops between Teddy and Glacier that you recommend?,MPLS &gt; Teddy Roosevelt NP &gt; Glacier NP - camping in between?
camping,,Had a lot of this weekend. Crossed a frozen pond in the Adirondacks and stayed on a island in our hot tents. It was my first time I’ve fishing too. It was a blast!
camping,,Had a lot of this weekend. Crossed a frozen pond in the Adirondacks and stayed on a island in our hot tents. It was my first time I’ve fishing too. It was a blast!
camping,I have a 1500 w Small space heater can I plug it into a power bank without causing a fire if I am sleeping in a camper van in winter time?,Space heater and power bank
camping,,First Time Winter Backpack Camping in a Tent - Eastern U.S. - 2 Feet of Snow - 10/10 Would Recommend
camping,,"Great spot in the French Alps last night. You can’t beat a fire on a winter camp. Sunsets, steaks and sunrises don’t hurt either 😉"
camping,"Hey folks, I'm trying to snag a few days for late season at Glacier National Park this summer. I've been getting up every morning for the last week in attempt to get a site, but am told it's already been booked every time I try (despite having my spots picked out and clicking book now at 7:00 am PST SHARP). Do any of you kind folks have any advice or do I just keep trying in hopes of beating someone to the punch? 

Thanks for any help!",Tips for booking at Glacier?
camping,,The Ultimate Pasta Dish In The Australian Bush
camping,,BEST CCW HOLSTER !! Hands Down? Camping holster
camping,"Hey Everyone,

I've got a 24 foot Aerolite Cub 236 2003 that i want to bring cold weather camping which means i will obviously need the heater. The camper currently only has 1 battery and from what i have read, the one battery will not last the entire night without possibly damaging the battery. If i add a second battery, and i make sure they are charged with the generator prior to night time, should i easily get through the night of running the heater? My generator is kind of loud and i don't want to have to run it all night and irritate everyone else out there camping.

Some additional Details - The camper has two tents for the beds which i know will make it harder to warm, outside temps will be around 30 degrees F. and i was planning on setting the thermostat to 65ish.

I ask this because i do not want to invest in a bigger battery box, bracket, and an extra battery if i will still run the risk of not making an entire night with heat or with damaging the batteries.

Thanks in advance to any insight!",Camper Battery Question
camping,,Streak and egg without egg for breakfast. (Green stuff on steak is horseradish)
camping,,First time making a snow shelter and sleeping overnight in it with our dog
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,(One of the) Grand Canyon(s) of the East
camping,,My camp site last summer!!
camping,,JUST RELEASED-Documentary on Vancouver landscape photographer! Stunning images and a really interesting story! Has some crazy camping sites along the way!
camping,,Hugo and I enjoying the sunrise over North Stradbroke Island
camping,,A hidden gem
camping," 

I normally do international travel, but due to a virus that must not be named, I am not able to. I have the itch to travel again. Last year I planned a trip across the US (coast to Coast), but plans fell through. This year I need to get out and see the world. Have you ever rented a van and what would you suggest? I am not sure what price I would pay, but I figure renting a car and hotels would be about 200-250 a night so I was hoping for a cheaper price than that. I have found sites for RV's, but that would be an overkill for one person.",have you ever rented a van ?
camping,,Needed time to reset. The desert did not disappoint.
camping,"Long story short, I have the opportunity to get any reasonably priced tent as a birthday gift and I'm looking to select the best one to camp with my wife and my 3 year old with. The little guy loves the outdoors, and is finally potty trained!

I have a Eureka Timberline 4 which I have always treated as a 2 person tent. What size tent would your recommend that would work well for the 3 of us? 

Key parameters

* 3 season camping, in areas that can be wet at times. 
* Durability and ease of setup are more important than reduced weight.
* Bigger than a Eureka Timberline 4
* Ideally less than $300 US.",Best tent for 2 adults and a little kid?
camping,First time camping at BLM land in the couple of weeks. I heard folks are allowed to shoot their fire arms. How safe it from your experience if I were to stay overnight for a few days. I hoping my car doesn't get shot up or get I get shot by accident? Are there places that sections off where you can camp and where you can shoot? Or is it free for all?? Thanks.,BLM Camping - How safe is it?
camping,,"Four year dating anniversary dinner, So grateful she also loves camping~"
camping,,RV &amp; Camp Visit to Rainbow Springs
camping,,"Ah, the amenities of camping... Pine, AZ-ish (also check out the garlic-shaped onion)"
camping,Hey all—where could one go camping and get some bushcraft in?,(USA) Primitive Camping in East Pennsylvania and New Jersey
camping,,I’d be eating cold noodles for dinner but who cares
camping,,Finally organized the camping/ outdoor gear.
camping,,"First time camping in Buena Vista, Colorado, USA. A few 14ers in the distance. Would highly recommend."
camping,Afternoon folks! My wife and I are making our annual road trip to Vegas this year and we’re looking for some tent camping suggestions around the Flagstaff area? We have dependable 4x4 and we’re hoping to camp by a river this year but def open to all suggestions! Thanks!,Flagstaff Tent Camping Suggestions?
camping,,Camping in the Texas hill country the weekend before the winter storm
camping,,Simple Intro into Belagine Laws of High Intuition and the Harmony of Nature (Zalmoxianism)
camping,,Desert Campfire At Dusk In The Remote Red Rock Country Of Northern Arizona [OC]
camping,[https://benjamins-goods-1.myshopify.com/](https://benjamins-goods-1.myshopify.com/),Best camping store
camping," Does anyone have experience with either/both of these sets? I am more interested in feedback about the Pinnacle set and if the claims on its efficiency are true! I am willing to spend the extra money if the value is there, but I would love to hear from the community's experience! 

[Pinnacle Dualist](https://www.rei.com/product/165301/gsi-outdoors-pinnacle-dualist-hs-cookset)

[Halulite Microdualist II](https://www.rei.com/product/147771/gsi-outdoors-halulite-microdualist-ii-cookset)",GSI Outdoors Pinnacle Dualist HS Cookset vs Halulite Microdualist II
camping,,When you’re waiting for that sunlight to hit your tent after surviving a 6 degree night
camping,,Early Morning Breakfast
camping,"Any tips? I’ll be making a tarp tipi, which I’ve done before. I’ve been to the area a bunch before, but always with a friend. Any advice and tips for a first time solo trip?","Upcoming solo overnight trip, winter conditions (high of 35° low of ~19°). Northern Appalachia, PA"
camping,,"Inspired to share by that other moto camping post, fun trip I went on 6 years ago up near Mt Baker, WA!"
camping,I want to do some car camping in Dinosaur National Monument in July. Any suggestions on the best campsite to make it easy to see the park. Consider I am traveling with a 1-year-old and 4 year old. Thanks.,Dinosaur National Monument - Advice on where to camp
camping,,Brooch rose Search website:decoratiuneagoogle.demo.ro
camping,,Does anyone know the name of this tent. I lost the directions and when I do a Google search about the tent I cant find a tent matching it. I know the brand is Coleman.
camping,,Camping Season opening 🏕
camping,,Got a pretty good view of the Flatiron from my camping spot
camping,,Got a great view of the flatiron from my camping spot
camping,"Hello 😊
 We are Melanie &amp; Daniel and we cycle 🚲 from Germany to Japan around the world ... Over 50,000 km, 5 years living in a tent.  We have already experienced several accidents, were followed by the police, had escorts, got caught in a sandstorm, got married at a couchsurfer place in Morocco and experienced a lot of crazy stuff.

 After our return from Africa, we are now in Turkey after 13000km.  Instagram.com/vaegabondsworld

 The borders with Georgia and Iran are still closed, so we couldn't continue cycling towards Asia.  That's why we worked through the winter here and created a lot of new adventure videos and blog articles for you.

 Our current video number # 45 is about the chaotic but wonderful Albania
 https://youtu.be/BE1wBdLU25Y

 All other adventures from over 13,000km and 1.5 years of living in a tent can be found in this playlist

 ⏫ All countries |  Start in Germany |  around the world by bike in chronological order: https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PLG43vqBetZVoX_lcPDs_cWEfqbCnZ_Mhv

 We have also prepared a packing list for our bike world tour:
 https://vaegabond.com/ratgeber/packliste-fahrradweltreise_7450


 Hopefully we can inspire or distract you a little in this Corona time.  Stay healthy and greetings from Turkey
 Melli &amp; Dani

 Our channels:
 YouTube.com/VAEGABOND
 Instagram.com/vaegabondsworld
 Facebook.com/vaegabondsworld
 VAEGABOND.com","5 years of camping | all season 45°C down to minus 20°C | traveling the world by bicycle for 50.000km | camping, cycling adventure videos"
camping,,FLEXTAILGEAR |The All-In-One Multifunctional HEATED BLANKET
camping,,couple camping
camping,"Amazon's reviews have spun me in circles

Any recommendations?",What LightWeight 2 People Hammock +Mosquito Net And Rain Fly?
camping,"It's been a while since I've been camping but I grew up doing it. My wife and I are wanting to get back into it and I've started buying other essentials to get ready for camping during the spring and summer. I understand this is a difficult question to answer without many details or what I'm looking for, but I'm looking for your opinion (whichever reasons it may be) on what is the best ground camping tent. If money wasn't a limit, which tent would you buy? Thanks in advance!",Best on ground tent (2-3 person)
camping,,First time in the hot tent (backyard)
camping,,"Beach camping on American Beach, Fl. Nothing like a fire and the sounds of the waves."
camping,,"She Finally Came In! My new Estwing Special 17"" camping hatchet. Pictured with my trusty handmade damascus pocket knife (~discussion of gear choices, elitism, extreme mod pedantry, and determination within~long read)::pen for scale::"
camping,"Well, since I wasn't able to gain the information, comparison, and discussion that I originally sought, I thought I'd post this in a few other subs in an attempt to get advice from people that know what the hell they're talking about when it comes to a chunk of steel.  So let's talk turkey, and if you feel like some morning mod-drama, read further:   

TL:DR:  Cool Axe and a knife, Let's talk about it.  


I'm not going to name name's and call out specific subreddits, so I'll just set the stage like this:  About a year ago, I lost my job due to being at high risk to Covid because of extreme lung conditions and a close-contact family member who literally has no immune system from chemo treatments for lung cancer.  Since I'm almost totally isolated and have huge Depression, Anxiety, and PTSD mental scars from being tortured as a child, I knew going into this, that the only way I was going to keep the demons at bay (and keep myself alive) was to work...  and boy did I work.  

Among many *many* other things, a large facet of my learning experience has been survival and self-sufficiency.  I went about constructing a huge urban garden around my property, learning how to fish with lures, hunt with a slingshot, and craft traps and shelters out of wood found in the forest, using only my trusty pocket knife and an axe.  

So I posted this picture on a subreddit where I thought I'd get the best information surrounding the subjects I've been striving all year to learn.  I even saw a post on the front page of that sub that was almost exactly like my post, although to be fair, I also wanted to talk about the workings of my beloved pocket-knife, so I included that in the picture too...  

#DENIED. 

My post, the message said, did not live up to the stringent measures put in place on that sub to keep out vanity photos better meant for ""Instagrammy type pictures"".  So I messaged back:  Hey, I wanted to talk about gear with the other members, and since there's already a post of the same type on the front page, why not let mine through too?  

I got a reply:  

&gt;A difference is that the other Poster wrote a full comment to accompany the picture post.  Not really sure what the point of the pen and a 'decorative knife' is, so NOT literally the same type. 

Oh ok, no big deal. I plan on commenting too, I replied, as my axe came in with a defect that needed fixing, and I wanted other people to know that too before making a purchase.  The pen is for scale, obviously, and the knife was the tool I've been using all year, it wasn't some mall-ninja 'decorative' knockoff, but a fully functional tool that, as I said before, I wanted to discuss the in's and out's of, for people that might like to get one of their own in the future.  Kind of elitist of him to assume the latter, I thought.  

&gt;Rulers are for scale. Or coins that people are familiar with. Or even jokingly - a banana. Axes are sold by weight and haft length - which you would know having just bought the item.  

So... I... didn't use the method of scale you prefer? But the axe's length is right in the title?  

&gt;The pen is redundant. And pens vary in length - unless somebody recognises that particular one, it doesn't help in an appreciation of scale.  

So... the pen is at the same time a redundancy of the scale stated in the title, but also *not good enough* for people to recognise it's size?  It's a damn Bic pen!  Bic Pens come in *fewer sizes* than coins do... who doesn't know how big a Bic pen is?

&gt;The knife is unrelated to the Comment. Pictures should be used to illustrate your text contribution.  

But... it's right there in the title, d00d...

&gt;If there is a fault with the axe, then your picture needs to clearly show the issue. It doesn't.  

Ok... well the axe just had a bad burr on the edge, so I couldn't exactly show that, but again, I'll happily go over that in the comment section so people know.  

&gt;But this ""burr"" was not mentioned in your title: "" ... Great heft, great split"". Where's the picture of the split? Presumably you will be returning the item to the manufacturer or retailer, though they may ask why you continued to use a defective item.  

I was referring it's 'wood splitting' ability... why would I refer to a defect in the axe as 'Great'?  This is **the third** axe I've received after returning two others for being more 'decorative' than I thought it was, and the other's head bending over like a taco after splitting one piece of wood.  Since it was just a burr anyways, I just shaved it off with my grind stone.  Surely it would be helpful for other people to know this, along with information regarding the shoddy axes they shouldn't waste their money on?  

&gt;The knife was pictured to have conversation about gear in a Post about an ax?  The knife is unrelated to the Comment. As explained before - Pictures should be used to ***illustrate*** your text contribution.  I'm sure the maker intended it to be ""decorative"". It's far from a sharpened prybar lump of steel, isn't it?

It's... in the title... *and* the pict... oh never mind...  but thanks for the elitism *again*.

&gt;There seems to be something of a gap between your expectations of the subreddit, and the reality. Whilst I appreciate the length of time since the reddit account you post from was first registered, you may have missed the development and refinement of this particular subreddit during that time. Perhaps a better match may be found elsewhere on reddit?  

No, dude... I don't think there was any gap in expectations, my post fits the subreddit's intentions perfectly.  I wanted a discussion about wood carving tools, and I got an endless litany of caveats you pulled out of your ass to make yourself the 'debate victor'.  Looks like the *true* intentions of your sub is to pick apart other people's posts **for your own vanity**.  Have fun lording over your precious subreddit...doesn't know how big a Bic pen is?

&gt;The knife is unrelated to the Comment. Pictures should be used to illustrate your text contribution.  

But... it's right there in the title, d00d...

&gt;If there is a fault with the axe, then your picture needs to clearly show the issue. It doesn't.  

Ok... well the axe just had a bad burr on the edge, so I couldn't exactly show that, but again, I'll happily go over that in the comment section so people know.  

&gt;But this ""burr"" was not mentioned in your title: "" ... Great heft, great split"". Where's the picture of the split? Presumably you will be returning the item to the manufacturer or retailer, though they may ask why you continued to use a defective item.  

I was referring it's 'wood splitting' ability... why would I refer to a defect in the axe as 'Great'?  This is **the third** axe I've received after returning two others for being more 'decorative' than I thought it was, and the other's head bending over like a taco after splitting one piece of wood.  Since it was just a burr anyways, I just shaved it off with my grind stone.  Surely it would be helpful for other people to know this, along with information regarding the shoddy axes they shouldn't waste their money on?  

&gt;The knife was pictured to have conversation about gear in a Post about an ax?  The knife is unrelated to the Comment. As explained before - Pictures should be used to ***illustrate*** your text contribution.  I'm sure the maker intended it to be ""decorative"". It's far from a sharpened prybar lump of steel, isn't it?

It's... in the title... *and* the pict... oh never mind...  but thanks for the elitism *again*.

&gt;There seems to be something of a gap between your expectations of the subreddit, and the reality. Whilst I appreciate the length of time since the reddit account you post from was first registered, you may have missed the development and refinement of this particular subreddit during that time. Perhaps a better match may be found elsewhere on reddit?  

No, dude... I don't think there was any gap in expectations, my post fits the subreddit's intentions perfectly.  I wanted a discussion about wood carving tools, and I got an endless litany of caveats you pulled out of your ass to make yourself the 'debate victor'.  Looks like the *true* intentions of your sub is to pick apart other people's posts **for your own vanity**.  Have fun lording over your precious subreddit...","She Finally Came In! My new Estwing Special 17"" camping hatchet. Pictured with my trusty handmade damascus pocket knife (~discussion of gear choices, elitism, extreme mod pedantry, and determination within~long read)::pen for scale::"
camping,,Beautiful place for Camping😍❤️
camping,,Fresno Ca.
camping,,"Camping in the Marysville Mountain in Victoria. Warm days, cold mountain streams and the best campfire made damper!"
camping,,Checking things from this snow storm
camping,"The American West is unique with free dispersed camping in some areas on public land. My question, is this an American thing or do other countries have free dispersed camping? I guess I'm specifically interested in Germany and Austria.",Dispersed camping in Germany and Austria? Or other countries?
camping,,Kenosha area.
camping,"As I am sitting by my camp fire, watching it, tending it, waiting for it to die and to douse it; I thought to myself “Boy, I love my welding gloves, they make fire tending so easy.”  Obviously welding gloves and not generally on the camping gear list, but it’s so easy to tend to small campfires my just reaching in there and moving the wood around. So it got me thinking, what are the more obscure/ off label camping items that you love? Or what’s your fav item in general?",What is your best (obscure) camping purchase?
camping,,Just outside Salida.
camping,,Last ones for the day.
camping,,"Camping in Green Water Valley, Death Valley National Park, CA. I set up camp inside this rock shelter in between the sites of Green Water and Furnace. High winds today, this shelter should do the trick."
camping,,How do you organize your camping gear?
camping,,Yokohama Geolandar X-AT G017 - Fitting &amp; Initial Impressions
camping,"I managed a private campground over 12 years asked me any thing. No question about ( KOA, NPS, STATE PARK).",Campground manager
camping,,Bushcraft cooking a Roast chicken lunch
camping,,Camping in Mayo FL. Sadie Mae is the goodest girl.
camping,,Apollo camping in AZ was popular a couple weeks ago so here's one more of him just outside of Grand Teton Natl Park last May.
camping,,What are these little things? Found them on a walk
camping,Getting ready for a 4 night bikepacking trip. Is a canister of fuel enough or should I bring extra? I’m thinking I’ll only need it for coffee/hot chocolate twice a day and Mountain House meals. There’ll be three of us.,How much Jetboil fuel to take along?
camping,,Relaxing Hike/Camp Alone in New Zealand’s Mountains - Tramping the Earnslaw Burn - For Someone Stuck in Lockdown at the Moment and Yearns the Mountains (This is where they filmed the Hobbit and LOTR)
camping,,We had a special guest at our campsite. Joshua tree National park.
camping,Me and a buddy are looking to do the North Truchas Peak loop in later March. What weather conditions should we anticipate? I figured there'll be snow but how bad is it?,"Pecos Wilderness, NM weather conditions in late March?"
camping,,"October camping. Minister Creek, Allegheny National Forest."
camping,,Went on a overland camping trip last summer!
camping,,Went on a overland camping trip last summer!
camping,,Rooftop tent advice please! This was our previous setup until my husband’s Tacoma got totaled in a hit and run a few months ago. We bought a 2021 Suburu Outback as a replacement. My question: can the outback roof handle the weight of a rooftop tent with two adults sleeping in it?
camping,,Rooftop tent advice please! This was our previous setup until my husband’s Tacoma got totaled in a hit and run a few months ago. We bought a 2021 Suburu Outback as a replacement. My question: can the outback roof handle the weight of a rooftop tent?
camping,,You have to love no bugs winter camping!
camping,,Simple life
camping,,Camping is awesome and winter camping with out the snow is even better.
camping,,Sunset Campfire in The Remote Red Rock Desert Of Northern Arizona. Can’t Wait to get back Here!
camping,,Beautiful norway
camping,,Lac Bouillouses ( -10°C ) - Pyrénées - France
camping,,I've been doing a little bit of camping in Michigan this winter in my One Tigris hot tent.
camping,,What is the best and most cost effective 2 in 1 portable cooler and heater for a tent?
camping,,Great outdoors... can’t wait
camping,,Looks like Utah has less of a winter than Texas...
camping,,hi im not new to camping but im no expert. i thought id just post this here if anyone would like to have a chat on the best camping spots in or near texas or just about some cool camping experiences youve had
camping,,h
camping,"Hey, I need a serious flashlight. No bells no whistles, no bs. One that will blind a bobcat, watertight but not waterproof, handheld with strong rechargeable batteries. A working man’s tool. You’ve been out there. Where do I look?",I need a no bs flashlight
camping,,Summer in Stratchcona Park on Vancouver Island.
camping,Hoping someone can measure the length across of the otterbox 45 at it's base. Thanks!,Do you own an Otterbox 45?
camping,,Can’t wait to get back out! Electric scooter has been such an added bonus last season
camping,,Some photos from my last camp!
camping,,Stove is in the tent!
camping,,Before and after gear check for a Joshua Tree 2 day back country hike (: very excited as I’ve never been to J-Tree
camping,,Just did my gear check for a simple 2 day hike through Joshua tree for my birthday tomorrow! Was hoping my ULA Circuit bag came in today but it’s too late :(
camping,No more having to keep throwing things into the fire pit! These work great! And you'll help the entrepreneur live an independent life!,Support an autistic adult by buying JT Firestarters!
camping,,"One of our favorite spots to camp near Las Vegas! Lake Mead National Park - Echo Bay (Camp Coordinate: 36.297712, -114.399848)"
camping,"Hi all! I am going to be living in a camper van for the summer and looking to double my living area with one of those screened in gazebos, but I can’t seem to find anything with a built in floor. I’ll be fairly protected from wind, but we can get severe rain and thunderstorms every so often. I’m also going to be working long days and I don’t want to have to take it down so I need something sturdy. Would be amazing if there were zip up walls too, but I’m not sure if those exist! Preferably available in Canada so I’m not paying huge import costs. Thanks!",Camping gazebo with a floor?
camping,"Thanks to the mods for allowing me to post this.

I'd like to take a quick second to let you guys know about a new subreddit \[VA Campers\] ([https://www.reddit.com/r/vacampers/](https://www.reddit.com/r/vacampers/)).

This new community is for all types of camping (overlanding, tent, backcountry, RVing) and activities (attractions, hiking, cool towns, etc.) to do while camping in Virginia and neighboring states.  I see there are a lot of posts here relating to Virginia, so I think some of you may enjoy the new sub.  So help me out, come on by and post your favorite places and things to do.",A new community for Virginia campers
camping,"Hey everyone, I live in Western PA and want to know some good camping spots in the area. Also, interested in WV, OH and NY areas that are a few hours drive from Pittsburgh. Does anyone have any reccomendations?",Camping in PA
camping,I'm 16 and have never been camping before and I'm thinking about going camping in the Catskills with some friends. I have been hiking up there before and have sort of scouted a few possible camping sites in nice areas but am completely new to camping. What's some basic advice for going camping?,Thinking about going camping and need some advice
camping,,First-time Winter Hammock Camping -17°
camping,,happy camping Cute Travel Car Camp camper key Road sign Keychain https://moonaro.net/collections/keychain/products/happy-camping-cute-travel-car-i-camp-camper-key-road-sign-keychain-glass-cabochon-traveler-key-chain-goddess-charm
camping,,"Late August at September Morn Lake, Montana"
camping,,Found a great spot outside Canyonlands NP - We think Elon would fancy this site lol
camping,"Any recommendations for camping in Little Rock Arkansas; Amarillo, TX; Albuquerque, NM?

We are tenting but do want electric.

Mid March trip so any advice is welcome.
Thanks",Tent Camping in the US
camping,"Planning a camping trip to Franconia this summer and looking for any suggestions for camp sites. 

Trying to avoid grounds with a lot of families and RVs and more just tent camping. 

One of the best camping experiences I had was at a small campground near Acadia National park that was more “rustic” in that they had no on site staff, no running water, and only one outhouse for the grounds with a fire pit and picnic table at each site. Also had to carry all your gear to the site from a dirt lot in the front which was cool (about 5 minute walk uphill so not bad at all) Made it feel more remote like backpacking but with a little luxury. I loved the simplicity and feel of the site like that so looking for something similar hopefully! 

Would love any recommendations",Franconia New Hampshire Campground suggestions?
camping,,"One of the top 5 places I’ve pitched a tent... Del Norte Camp, Santa Cruz Island, Channel Islands NP, California."
camping,,Finished my camping gear. Now to get back in the woods
camping,,"Favorite camping spot from last summer, day to night to morning transition. Goat Mountain, WA! Sea of clouds was incredible!!"
camping,"I'm considering upgrading from my Coleman Classic to something in the $100-150 range. I was hoping for better low temp cooking. Has anyone made this transition, and was it worth it? Also, this is for car camping so backpacking rigs aren't necessary.",Is upgrading from Coleman Classic Stove worth it for Car Camping?
camping,,"One of the top 3 Sand dunes in mexico, 'dunas de bilbao' located in north México a few hours from Monterrey. Nice place to do some sandboarding &amp; camping. To get here just enter either of the next codes directly on google maps/gps: . 📍25.4266196, -102.8959761 📍C4G3+JJ Villa de Bilbao, Coahuila"
camping,,Camping in Australia
camping,,3F UL GEAR 2019 Lanshan 2 Tent 2 Person Oudoor Ultralight Camping Tent 3 Season Professional 15D Silnylon Rodless Tent 4 Season From R1295.67
camping,,Top 11 Summer Camp Art Ideas for Young Children
camping,"New to the reddit and seeking to get into camping, mainly solo but my concern is laws and regulations. While I intend to start small with campsites and parks, I do want to move on to wild camping and camping in the mountains. I need to know if anybody here has any idea on the laws in Georgia, USA about wild camping and camping that is not paid for or in national parks",Need information for future camping
camping,,"Does anyone have real world experience on the difference between a ""wedge"" shaped trailer and a ""square"" shaped one? MPG? Sway in the wind?"
camping,"Hey all! I'm planning on doing a lot more athletic camping (bringing multiple bikes, kayaks, etc) and it's going to be beyond what I can safely strap onto my truck and also fit humans. So I'm looking at 8-12ish foot trailers to put the gear into and keep safely locked up at the sites.  


I'm finding trailers seem to either be ""wedge"" shaped up front or more compact and ""box"" shaped. I would \*assume\* the wedge one would get better gas mileage but can't find any actual testing or comparisons online from real people not trying to sell me something. Do any of you have experience with these kind of things? I'd just like to hear some input, thanks a ton!","Anyone have eal word experience with ""wedge"" shaped pull behind trailers compared to the more traditional ""blocky"" ones?"
camping,"I have wanted to get a hot tent with a wood stove for several years now and I’m finally going to buy one. I need suggestions on a solo hot tent and wood stove that is good quality but not insanely expensive. All in maybe $400 tops. 

Ive browsed Amazon but everything there has very mixed reviews. To me the heat and ambiance of the wood stove is incredible and I want that but I also want a safe set up and I don’t want to break the bank. Appreciate any input!",Hot tent suggestions
camping,,Frozen pile of branches in the middle of lake forms comfortable and calming resting place.
camping,,"Inside this Mexican national park, you can explore 9 tunnels, from 100m up to 1.68km. They were meant for train tracks but never finished. . Nearby: ⛺Camping spots: yes 🏚Wood cabins: yes 💸Entry fee: Yes. GPS: . 📍23.7282192, -105.6871797"
camping,,"Visiting my old campsites around The Danube river, but flooded and frozen. it turned out to be a wonderful adventure."
camping,,"When life gives you snow make an angel. I love you Texas, stay warm."
camping,,"Fun to get out and sleep in the bush, having a woodstove makes it easy and warm."
camping,,Hike to Frozen Waterfalls and Camping in a Homemade Teepee
camping,Hey all. I live in northern Florida and I am looking to do a little weekend getaway and find a nice spot in Georgia o camp overnight and sleep in the car. I would like to get a suggestion for a place that is quiet and with some pretty nature. Mountains are a plus! Any advice is welcomed. Ideally would like to drive max 6ish hours out to reach it.,Need help finding location to do an overnight car-camping.
camping,,Sorting thru some gear. Gonna trek out this weekend. NORTHEAST PA
camping,,Somewhere in North Georgia. Enjoy!
camping,"So, tomorrow I will do my first night out in the snow. Since it's the first time camping in winter, i will stay close to my car just to see how well i can nail it, so it will be quite safe. 
My concern is: should I stay well dressed inside the sleeping bag? Being only a night, insulation from the floor is not a problem, having enough things to insulate well other than a reflective sleeping mat, but the sleeping bag is not designed for winter, but i have prepared clothes that keep me warm outside in even cooler temperatures. Is that ok? I have clothes that kept me warm at -15°C while outside.
For food, high calories it's what I thought would be the best: fatty cheese, chocolate,...and? No nuts, I'm hyper allergic to them.
One pair of gloves should be enough, and they are mittens designed for skiing so they are pretty good at keeping warm.
Any tips would be great","Camping in winter, -5°C"
camping,,"Curious, for those of you that do backpack camping. Along with your tent do you bring a hammock as well? Debating if it’s worth it for just a quick evening setup instead of a tent on those beautiful nights. Not that it takes all that long to set a tent up."
camping,,I love going camping with no destination; found this gem of a spot during one of those adventures in British Columbia
camping,,He's testing out our new sleeping bag.
camping,,Camping ROCKS!
camping,,First time camping in two years
camping,[removed],Best Dog Hiking Backpack
camping,,My Mr Buddy Heater shuts off after 30 minutes due to the green propane cylinder becoming icy cold and creating condensation on the outside. What is causing this and is there a remedy besides switching to an alternative heat souce?
camping,I love camping and live in Washington and you'd think those two would go hand in hand however I live in south east Washington which means that it's kind of a hell hole when it comes to outdoors activity's (at least for a lot of the stuff that I enjoy) so if anyone knows any good spots around southeastern Washington Hell good spots around Washington in general is appreciated. Thanks.,Anyone know good spots around south eastern washington?
camping,,Camping Lovers Gifts
camping,,Camping Video Collection [ 4K Ultra HD ]
camping,,Soo cold but so nice waking up in the first snow.. #netherlands
camping,,Just a nice tarp settup.
camping,,Various winter camping photos (February 2021)
camping,[removed],"Get Registered Passports, Driver License and ID Cards"
camping,,Wood heater in camping
camping,"Stumbled across this upstart website. It's the least predictable content I've ever read and truly speaks to a subculture that doesn't really have a voice in the media landscape. You can follow them on insta @  thedirtlot

https://www.the-dirtlot.com/post/ski-town-landlords-are-lizard-people","Dope website for dirtbags, ski bums, etc"
camping,Hey guys is anyone from Southern California? I live in Palm Springs and am looking for some camping people? We are planning a trip out to Blythe to camp swim and fish on the river. Anyone interested in going?,California!
camping,,My husbands idea of a fun camping trip.
camping,,"East Java, Indonesia 🔥"
camping,,Cover of Etta James
camping,,Shrink your URLs and get paid!
camping,"Hi All,

My mom has difficulty walking long distances, past knee surgery, and I've been contemplating on how to take her camping since she has never gone camping/hiking. She requires assistance entering or exiting vehicles with high clearance, going over tall curbs, or anything tall which involves bending the knee. I am researching places I can take her which I can drive up to the spot and requires minimal walking on certain parts (e.g. Yellowstone). For the sites that require walking like 2 or 3 miles to get to a spot, are there any recommendations anyone has or has seen that would allow me to get her there? I'm not saying a wheelchair, but I'm not saying something not like a wheelchair.


For reference:
She had the knee surgery over 15-20 years ago
She is approximately 5 ft 3
She is 67 years old",(Help) Take Mom Camping (past knee surgery)
camping,"New to sub. I figured it a good place to ask.

I miss camping but need my CPAP. I have batteries, but they are short lived and heavy.

I'm looking for various options to off grid, to glamping, to sleeping in a car.

Recently became homeless for awhile and now seems important.

... I have access to a place to sleep now, with regular power, if ice storms do not kill it again. Just now seems prudent.",CPAP User
camping,,Had a blast out in southern Oregon this past weekend. Year 11 of an annual camping trip!
camping,,A nice sxs ride in Southern Missouri.
camping,"“use the included NiMH rechargeable batteries for up to 12 hours or use 3 AA batteries for up to 29 hours.”



Motorola T260TP Talkabout Radio, 3 Pack https://www.amazon.com/dp/B01DM7AEYE/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glt_fabc_3W2TMNFREZJ36VHRGPN1?_encoding=UTF8&amp;psc=1",I bought some walkie talkies and it came with a battery and also allows you to use your own AA....it says the supplied battery provides 12 hours or use AA for 29 hours. Why the difference?
camping,"Hi all,

Me and my kiddo have good sun-zero rated bags, foam pads etc. so we have that portion of gear covered. We also have a roof top tent but we’ve been experiencing some windy conditions and that sucker really makes a lot of noise, even after I’ve accounted for loose cables and stuff. We are looking for a ground tent that is affordable yet deflects the wind at least moderately better than the rtt so we can sleep better at night. Hoping to find one that is big enough for our sleeping bags and mr buddy heater. We don’t want 10-20mph wind noise to be a barrier to camping. Any tips or suggestions are greatly appreciated. Thanks!",Affordable Tent for Windy/Cold conditions
camping,,How Small Business Can Benefit From Personal Loans | Slick Cash Loan
camping,"Hey folks,

I am looking for frequent campers to interview for a university assignment. If you are bothered by mosquitoes when trying to enjoy your time in nature because you are unable to properly deter them, I would love to talk to you to hear more about this issue. The interview would take place on zoom, be a maximum of thirty minutes and, if you are okay with it, recorded. Please feel free to reach out!",Interviewees wanted!
camping,,SE Idaho!
camping,,Out Camping and I find Free Mill Gold by Crushing some Rocks!!
camping,,Caribou 18” stove came in for my wall tent. Doing it’s initial burn. Love this thing already. Sadie is wondering why I put perfectly good stick in the stove.
camping,I ordered two Mountain Hardware sleeping bags (the rook) but their customer service cannot answer whether it zips together even though on their website it says that it does. I am pretty irritated with them so I am looking to purchase a down sleeping bag from another seller that can zip together. Was looking for something with down insulation that goes down to about 15. Thanks!,"Looking for a lightweight, backpacking, down sleeping bag that you can zip 2 together."
camping,,"Just got a new tent! I am having a hard time finding an appropriate sized footprint/ground cloth for it... any recommendations? It is 14'x9 (168""x108)."
camping,,Bivi’s and Bevvies
camping,,A full camping kit for £230! I put this together to help people starting out in the wold of wild camping. I hope it helps.
camping,,MEDIEVAL TIMES DINNER &amp; TOURNAMENT | ORLANDO FLORIDA | DINNER THEATRE
camping,,Cherry pie pie iron. *Redeeming my original post with before and after.
camping,"Hi everyone. Questions about my stove in regards to winter camping. I own a hot tent but it will be too small to fit 4 people. I do own a 6 person, screened in porch, Coleman tent. I looked up the specs and it doesn't specifically say fire retardant. After some googling, I am still stuck. Do you know if I will be able to use a stove jack on my 6 person tent and use my stove with it? I just do not want the tent melting and causing us harm. I planned on putting something down on the ground so the stove doesn't burn through my floor. Any advice would be great, thanks!",Advice on Winter Tent and Stove
camping,,Top Ten Best Dog Hiking Backpack of 2021............
camping,,Grab the day by the balls people !
camping,,Camping trip
camping,,‘Bama Hills w/ My Son.
camping,,Map shows which U.S. states spend the most on RVs per capita
camping,,"Ever Wondered Which 12 v fridge would be best for your applications. We test Engel, ARB, Waeco and Snomaster. Power Consumption, 12 hour, 24 hour Test. Insulation test. Fridge Cycling Test. The science behind the tests."
camping,,A little lakeside valentine date
camping,,No power? No problem.
camping,,Those who are love to camping they will know about tent. I'm here to share with you two durable tent ( Tepui VS CVT) that makes with same materials have but in this article It's presents some specific things that helps you to choose helpful tent. Here is the link
camping,,The Channel Islands is the best camping you can do off California's Coast
camping,,"Just a white night in Lapland, Finland on the Three countries border"
camping,"Hey everyone, I’m planning a camping trip for the first weekend in March and I’m looking at places about 45 min- 1 hour away. I’m about 30 min north of Pittsburgh,PA so that would be where we are going from. We are going to be tent camping, and I would prefer to go somewhere where we don’t need a permit. Any suggestions are welcome!",Camping in Pittsburgh
camping,"We're considering purchasing a Kodiak Flex-Bow 10x14 canvass tent. Does anyone own a Kodiak tent? Is buying one worth the money? One of the main reasons we're considering canvass is they aren't supposed to leak. However, we know canvass tents are heavy and take longer to set up. (We aren't backpacking) Are they worth those inconveniences?

 Any information would be greatly appreciated! 
.  

Thanks so much.",Question about Kodiak tents
camping,"Recently received our Shiftpod2 and I’m getting anxious to get out there! Any groups that get together? If not, anyone interested in starting one? These are luxurious and I can’t wait to mod this out!",Anyone ready for camping season?
camping,"A bit spur of the moment, leaving in a few weeks for a trip and want to camp during it. Thinking of doing it around Joshua Tree or Big Sur...
Have never camped before, but feel the pull to be with the Great Mother, ground, meditate and hike. 
Any advice you'd give for a first timer? Good resources? I'll have my car with me (not sure if that helps anything). 
Thanks in advance!","First time camping, and going solo. Not too much time to prepare, looking for advice."
camping,"Sure maybe it's against the rules, but you kind folk here inspire me in all sorts of ways to get outside. I love Cotopaxi, and as a Utah local, I can't help but support a local company! They've got great marketing, in fact, they sent me a 20% coupon, so I bought a puff! 

Then they sent me another one.

… and that brings us here. So, whoever can guess where my last weekend adventure was (or whoever is closest) will get the code for 20% off.",COTOPAXI is the BEST and the WORST. HA.
camping,,"Thunderstorm camping in Lake St Clair, NSW, Australia"
camping,What are your favorite camping stoves and grills?,Camping stoves and grills.
camping,,Tallulah river campground is a must visit during the rainy season
camping,,I went on my first solo camping trip. Got hit by the winter weather storm in Texas.
camping,,My favorite place
camping,,"Ticks, scorpions, snakes &amp; baboons! This is the Cederberg Nature Reserve. About 3hours north of Cape Town, South Africa 🇿🇦 Some are lucky to have cold weather &amp; snow. We’re dying in +40c!! Happy camping! 😬✌🏻#jasonkemm #camp_with_jason #moments_in_motion #jpro5ive"
camping,,Bad 4 season tent
camping,I need recommendations for a winter women’s sleeping bag. Do you have a favorite? I am doing a multi day trip. Weight is a consideration. Thank you!,Women’s Winter Sleeping Bag
camping,"Hi. I'm looking for an easier way to inflate my sleeping pad. Mostly car camping so a little extra weight doesn't hurt me. I am asking in particular about something that would fit the aircore's intake valve.
Please don't judge me :). I have some nerve damage in my hands that makes the ""normal"" way of inflating challenging.",I'm looking for a hand or foot air pump to help me fill my big agnes aircore sleeping pad
camping,"Hello! 

&amp;#x200B;

I was looking for something to put over a sunroof of a car that would allow it to be open (for ventilation) but also keep rain out. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

Advise? Recommendations?",Sunroof rain cover for car camping
camping,,Teardrop Camping w. 🐈 by the 🌊- Little Guy Mini Max Tab
camping,"Camping in SoCal, need suggestions for decent tents. One that will fit couple of cots.  Going to start off car camping then hopefully backpacking.  
Any tips/equipment that I might not think of as a new camper? 
Basically my shopping list includes: shelter, food/water, and first aid.","New to camping, need suggestion!"
camping,,"Sunrise on Lake Powell, AZ/UT border, USA"
camping,,Tough Hook Outdoor Gear Hanger 15% OFF - Coupon Code: PRES15
camping,,"Hi, me and fellow classmates are in a class named EDD in school, we have to create a invention or innovation that would affect our life. We chose something that applied to camping, it would be amazing if you could help by filling out this survey. Thanks!"
camping,"Hello! (TLDR at bottom)

My boyfriend and I are hoping to do a big Europe road trip this summer (if COVID allows it). We want to make the experience as close to nature as possible (and hopefully cut down on spending in the process) by camping as much as we can. Thinking of going through Belgium, Germany, Czech Republic (specifically Prague), Switzerland and France (then back to the UK). We will be driving in a car but will be camping in a tent; it is a very small car, too small to comfortably sleep in for 3 weeks, so would appreciate any places that have parking too. 

We have no specific areas we want to follow yet and are in the baby stages of planning this journey! Would very much appreciate any advice/recommendations people can give for pretty places to camp in these areas. 

TLDR: my boyfriend and I are doing a road trip through Belgium, Germany, Prague, Switzerland and France and would appreciate any recommendations on where to camp!",Europe road trip camping suggestions (details in comments)
camping,,Camping on BLM land outside the valley of fire
camping,,"Dreaming of spring and camping. I started this Camp'n Wagon build last summer but haven't fished the interior. I have the woodstove, solar and 12 volt appliances ready to go as soon as the weather warms up. It had icicles on it his morning."
camping,,Winter snow camping with my 11 year old
camping,,Winter snow jcamping with my 11 year old
camping,I’ve just bought a very expensive (Sea to Summit - £175) sleeping pad. Should I be putting a foam mat underneath it to protect it from stabby things under the tent that could puncture it?,Foam mat under a sleeping pad?
camping,,Which place in the western part of the US is warmest to camp in March?
camping,,Trying to win a ORION 35 cooler VOTE SO I WIN IT PLEASE EVERY VOTE COUNTS
camping,,"My daughter and I canoeing down Linda Lake in Algonquin Park, September 2020"
camping,,Mount Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,[deleted],Mount Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,[deleted],Mt. Whitney was really showing off this past weekend.
camping,,Short camping trips (1-2 nights) vs long camping trips (3+ nights)... Which ones do you think are best and why?
camping,,Chocolate Cherry Cobbler with a Marshmallow glaze from this summer on a weekend getaway
camping,"Hi,

I picked up the Vango Vista 800 for £20 in a second hand store and I have since pitched and re-waterproofed the tent (everything is fine).

I am interested in extending the tent with a porch/awning but there is no specific model available which is made for it, as the tent was created for Go Outdoors, who did not want an awning designed.

Can anybody recommend a suitable awning for this tent? I have so far looked at the Hi-Gear Universal Porch and the Vango Tigris 800 porch, which both look suitable.

Thanks,",Tent awning for Vango Vista 800
camping,,Rodna Mountains. Such a morning.
camping,,Camping in the Welsh Brecon Beacons last summer
camping,,Pasé de una tienda de campaña para mochileros para 2 personas a este tráiler emergente de 1981 que heredé de mi abuelo. ¡Se siente tan elegante!
camping,,"the Subpolar Urals, lake"
camping,"Hello!

I'm looking to start camping in a month or so and want to have my bases covered with regard to things I'll need. I know that everyone's needs are different, so a few quick things:

\- I just purchased a camping hammock on Amazon, so my tent is taken care of in that regard (though I would gladly accept suggestions on ground tents as well!)

\- I am looking for suggestions on a backpack, boots, sleeping bag, flashlight, lightweight camp chair, food things, etc.). I plan to get into backpacking and traveling fairly frequently, so any and all advance is welcome to a 'newcomer' of sorts like myself.

I'd very much appreciate any guidance you can provide!",Comprehensive Setup Question(s).
camping,,Three Years of Time-lapse
camping,,Mojave Camping! (Coordinates + Experience)
camping,,Good morning happy campers
camping,"Hello, I and my husband moved to the US last year and we are thrilled to see the camping culture here. We are looking forward to go for camping after winters and have started researching about the gears. We are planning to start with car camping and then try the bag packing. Not sure if it is relevant - we live in Raleigh, NC but would be travelling to various places across the states. 

We have done some research on tents and have nailed down our requirements to - 3person, 3 season, no hard requirement on free/semi/non-free standing, preferably &lt; 4lbs, atleast 1 vestibule, has mesh/window for star-gazing as well. Any suggestion for a tent that will cost &lt; USD250 ? (open to shell out few extra bucks if it is really worth it)

Appreciate any suggestions.",camping tents for newbies
camping,hey i’m in upstate new york and looking for about 3 night camping/backpacking trips to do in early summer. please help me out and give me some ideas :),looking for good 3 night trips
camping,,Solo Camping &amp; Hiking in the Philippines
camping,,"Car Camping before the deep freeze. Not overly scenic, but in the woods nonetheless. :)"
camping,"I am planning a trip to Lake Mead for 2 nights (Fri-Sun) around late March or early April.  There are quite a number of campsites that are first come, first serve.  Questions:
- Where do you recommend to camp?  We are novice campers so prefer places with toilet facilities and potable water.
- Do you have any suggestions on increasing the likelihood of getting a site (or are there enough that this isn’t a concern)?
- Do you have any recommendations on hikes or places to see while camping there?

Thanks in advance for your guidance!",Availability of campsites near Lake Mead
camping,"So I’m in the market for a new tent and am on the fence about a couple of them. What are y’all’s experience with canvas tents? Also are the REI co-op tents any good. Have heard mixed things about those. Not looking for a backpacking tent so weight isn’t an issue. Also looking for something with flexibility in terms of weather (cold, snow, rain, heat). Thanks in advance!",Tent Recommendations
camping,"I was wondering if anyone had any good recommendations for sites at Wilderness State park. Is there tent sites that are better than others? I have read mix reviews. Some people say the sites are really close together and others say you cant tell your in a camp ground.

Any other campgrounds around that area that might be more secluded? Trying to stay mainland but wouldnt might going a touch into UP if there's better spots.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks",Wilderness State Park MI questions
camping,,Sonic the hedgehog in my camp fire.
camping,,"Abandoned Mansion, Do I go inside and explore?"
camping,,This is the Chuck Box I built to hold all my food and cooking supplies while camping out of my truck camper.
camping,"We love our a-frame camper, but hated the lack of interior storage. In this video we will walk you through our IKEA hack for adding interior storage to our Rockwood A192HW camper. We were able to complete this DIY project for under $200 using the IKEA Lixhult Cabinets. This DIY would also work on similar campers including the Rockwood A122 or Flagstaff T19QBHW. 

[https://youtu.be/Pch8jwUgcME](https://youtu.be/Pch8jwUgcME)

[A-Frame Camper Ikea Cabinets Storage Hack - YouTube Thumbnail](https://preview.redd.it/arof8pu5ijh61.jpg?width=500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=1a3a2980ba3422a0e28138236841e7455923274b)",A-Frame Camper Ikea Cabinets Storage Hack
camping,,Hi I am a 14 year old boy. I have been wanting to go solo backpacking would it be safe and what would I need.
camping,,"Crazy rain storm the first night and a bit wetter the next few days than anticipated but Fremont Peak State Park, CA was something to behold."
camping,What's the backpack size you usually bring to like 7+ day trips in cold winter conditions? Is 70L enough?,"Backpack size in winter camping conditions -10, -20°c"
camping,[removed],My experience with the best camping tool that has ever been created
camping,"For those of you who use blue barrels as a means of storing food in a bear-resistant/scent-resistant container, **where do you purchase the barrels?**  I'm in the market for several of them (either 2 60L barrels, or 4 30L barrels) and the markup appears to be significant. 

There are many people reselling them online; however, I have a few concerns.  First, the resellers are marking up the prices significantly...most are near the price of new containers.  Second, there's really no telling what may have been stored inside them while they were in the possession of the reseller(s).  The market appears to be flooded with blue barrels which were used to store diabetes medicine, which renders the barrels no longer safe for containing food...however, the resellers don't seem to be overly concerned about that.  Isn't the point of these barrels generally to store food? Am I being overly cautious? 

My question, then: where can I go to buy straight-up food grade barrels from a reputable source?

These barrel systems are popular for people doing river trips, and I know a few of you have probably already dealt with these questions. Thanks in advance for any insights you may have!","Finding safe, refurbished/renewed food grade blue barrels"
camping,,Looking through the weeds at Grand Teets in Grand Teton National Park OC = @daltonjohnsonmedia [1000x667]
camping,i am new camper. am i would like a good knife .any recomasions,good camping knife
camping,,Went ice fishing this Gamily Dat weekend and camped in the ice. -36*C. Good times.
camping,,"camping l´almuravella | Visitamos este camping en CUDILLERO, ASTURIAS. |..."
camping,,"So simple setup, yet I miss this little home with all this staying at home."
camping,,Our challenge: camp at least once every month for a year. Progress: 9 down 3 to go
camping,,Donald Trump Lally Sleeping peacefully
camping,,Winter camping
camping,,How to start a fire with wet wood!
camping,[removed],THE BEST RV TACTICLIGHT XFLASHLIGHT
camping,,Wuling unveils its first camping-ready truck
camping,,"Camping the Ya Ha Tinda in Alberta, Canada. It was -40 overnight but nice and warm in the tent. Such a beautiful area, I look forward to camping there in the summer."
camping,,Fastpacking overnighter photies
camping,,Sharing warm and colorful night with friend!!!
camping,,Fastpacking overnighter photies
camping,[removed],Backpacking/hiking meals - questionnaire
camping,"Hey everyone! So I’ve been looking to reserve a camp ground in September and October but all those weekend are already booked up, even though you can only book 6 months in advance. Does anyone know if I actually missed the booking rush or is that normal for it to be showing no vacancy already before the actually booking allowance? OR are group sites only available since those are twelve months out? I appreciate any help on this! Thanks!","Shenandoah National Park reserving camping spot (Mathew’s arm, Big meadow. Etc.)"
camping,,"Camping in the middle of the bush. Right in front, the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]"
camping,,Halls Gap
camping,,Fire dragon
camping,,Let’s camp
camping,,Winter tarp camping
camping,,"Great day at ""El Chaltén"", Argentina"
camping,,Sonnenuntergang in Kalabrien
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. Looking right into the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. The last picture is the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,Camping in the middle of the bush. The last picture is the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]
camping,,"Camping in the middle of the bush. In the ladt picture, the steam of the Victoria Falls. [OC]"
camping,,What’s up fellow campers! Wild camping in South Africa. Cederberg mountains. 3hrs north of Cape Town. I slept under the stars with a troop of wild baboons about 200m away. Awesome stuff! Check out the video here — https://youtu.be/z58vmnqzqg4
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/fnuo56ze0fh61.jpg?width=4032&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=9249492091c90a858a39bb6c48191f1b363b9f2b",Camping in the desert and campfire color matches the sky color
camping,,"Camping Peruca in Garjak, Croatia. Little part of Paradise!"
camping,,Camp life😍
camping,,The UAE's Deadliest Hiking Trail
camping,,Decided to post one of my favorite sunrises while camping for my cake day. Nothing beats a Nevada hot spring.
camping,,My first camp prep/pack!
camping,,Van life
camping,,Winter camping fun
camping,"The amazing scenery of the scenic rim! So close to a lot of activities, bushwalks, lakes, swimming holes and so much more! Drop by and get 4 Wheels On The Road now!

\#4\_wheels\_on\_the\_road

*Processing img tj6a9ezndch61...*

*Processing img md2c3czndch61...*",Peaceful and beautiful camping on the Logan River?
camping,Are there any good apps that show public land versus private land to find good dispersed camp spots?,Good app to show public land
camping,,Night Site CO
camping,"I am planning an overnight trip from Vegas towards the end of March. I haven't spent much time desert camping, so I am looking at an overnight trip either at Joshua Tree or Zion. Looking for feedback for those of you that have been to either.

At Joshua Tree, I would probably reserve a site at Indian Cove or try to get one of the first-come-first-serve sites. We will be leaving in the morning on a Thursday, so there is a chance we could get a good site if we risk it.

At Zion, I would try to get a site at the South Campground. 

Thanks!",Joshua Tree or Zion
camping,,Why doesnt anyone use webbing to hike with? It's extremely useful kit! How did this never take off?
camping,,Some recent photos from our trip to Ginnie Springs in Florida! Campfire and some star photography!
camping,"Hi all, I'm getting back into camping after many many years absence. I have bought plenty of gear. I have been missing a sleeping mat because I had no idea which one I should go for. Im hoping for some suggestions. The tent I have is a Highlander blackthorn. I'm hoping for something affordable, but am open to suggestions for good gear that will last. I am from Northern Ireland if any UK campers have any weather appropriate suggestions!",1 man tent sleeping mat ideas?
camping,,"Camping, Adventure &amp; Outdoors! All sorts of cool, fun stuff. Check out https://jpro5ive.co.za for more. Smash the gallery page for my latest camping shenanigans! Follow my #moments_in_motion @jpro5ive on Instagram."
camping,,"You clicked the link! Thanks, you’re too much! I camped in my bivy tent, keeping things nice &amp; simple. We had only 1 pot each &amp; fashioned our own utensils to eat. Just another awesome camp, as always! Very sweet! 😬🤙🏻"
camping,,"Howzit all! Please help. Posted a photo earlier, no problem. Now when I hit the + button (on phone) to post another photo, I only have the 1 recent photo, NO access to the library? Why? What am I missing? Is it a “limit” thing? Thanks! 🤙🏻"
camping,,"Camping, Adventure &amp; Outdoors — South Africa, Western Cape! All cool camping related stuff! Check out my site for more. Happy days fellow camping legends! 😬✌🏻"
camping,,"What’s up fellow campers! New here, no clue what to do. Please help!?"
camping,"Hello everyone! My birthday is in mid July and my tradition the last couple of years has been to take a camping trip. In the past I’ve kayaked through Algonquin provincial Park and done an overnight in a campground in Rocky Mountain national park. I Recently moved to Washington and would like to do a trip along the coast with a campsite on the beach. I’m pretty well set up to do either car camping, Backpack it in, or boat-in.  I have a dog and would prefer to bring her along, which makes Olympic national Park not an option (assuming like other parks they don’t allow dogs on the trails).  My vehicle is four-wheel-drive capable so some rough roads to get to a destination are doable. The dog does well in the kayak so a boat-in site on calm waters is an option. I am looking to spend two nights and I would prefer to be in the same place both nights so that I can relax a bit. I welcome any and all suggestions:)",PNW transplant looking for trip suggestions on the coast
camping,,"Perfect conditions for day-camping in the mountains. Viken, Norway"
camping,,A Dozen Spectacular RV Parks for Winter Camping
camping,,True Story
camping,I live in NYC so find places to camp is a hard task. I don’t have a car that I can use to travel there. Anyone know any camping places near Queens NYC?,Camping places in NYC?
camping,,Me and my kids
camping,,One pot ramen on trianga in -3c (26.6f)
camping,"Hello,   I love the idea of camping on the beach, i dont know where to start, im looking for a free campsites on the Georgia-Savanah coast to something in North Florida so i dont have to travel too far,
 Ive been all over the internet looking for answers but it feels like i can only find sites i have to pay for 
My goal is to pack a cooler and only need gas money to get there and back. 
Where should i look for spots? 
What about my vehicle,
Idealy if i could sleep in my car amd park where theres a public shower/bathroom  that whould be just as good as setting up a tent",To sleep on sand
camping,"Hi! I'm a product designer in Chicago working on a small side project to design a really good camping checklist app. **I'm looking to talk to people who car camp and/or backpack** and who have either made their own lists before or found it not worth the hassle.

Format would be via **Zoom**. I can offer you a **$20 REI gift card** as a small thank you for your time.

**DM me your email** and a sentence or two about your camping/backpacking habits if you're interested. I'm looking for **5 participants this round** but there will be more in the future 🤘",Looking for people to test a camping checklist app concept via Zoom. $20 REI gift card for 30-45 min of your time
camping,[deleted],60% off Garmin Vivoactive 3 today on Amazon
camping,,me irl.lol
camping,"Reddit, Im waiting on warmer weather to go camping for the first time ever, aside from Army “camping.” To add to that, I am bringing my 5 and 3 year old boys. What are some tips or recommendations? Also what are the essentials you wish you had on your first trip?",Newb Camper with kids.
camping,,Winter maintenance
camping,,"Naruto Shippuden, Chapter 1"
camping,,This fire pit
camping,,"Coffee at the pond on the propety of my grandpartens. never saw that much snow here, one of my favorite paces to relax"
camping,,Cosy raining car camp at the beach.
camping,,"North Cascades, Washington State. August 2020"
camping,,Secret beach cove.
camping,,Perfect coastal day.
camping,"I'm interested in camping for free (or cheap as possible) in areas I have not yet explored. Mostly in Utah if that matters. I would like to take advantage of BLM land when beginning my camping trips by car, but it is a bit intimidating driving 2+ hours, not knowing if you can safely and legally camp in a spot identifiable as BLM land from a map.

Basic google research tells me that I can camp anywhere on BLM land with certain restrictions. But I am concerned with the information the blm.gov website doesn't give me. They would have me believe I can camp almost anywhere on BLM land without a permit, but I have heard stories of people getting ticketed for camping on BLM land, or particular areas being unsuitable for camping. I know BLM land is free and I'm not going to be able to just drive in and have a picnic and firepit waiting for me (although for some it does seem that easy), but I can't be the only one to boondock in unfamiliar places on BLM land.

So I guess my question is, how do y'all get peace of mind when picking a spot to camp in the wilderness when far from home? Are there any specific apps or communities or websites you recommend? Are the blm.gov maps up to date? 

Again, I know BLM land isn't going to have the same luxuries of renting a pull-in spot at a KOA, but people seem to have success boondocking and car camping on BLM land. For my specific purposes I would be tent camping within a mile or so from my car (has 4x4), but I use the term car-camping because it's not BLM land I am familiar with, and I have to deal with parking my car somewhere.

So, any help would be appreciated.

TLDR; what ways can a beginner get peace of mind car-camping on BLM land?",Beginner's Guide to wilderness camping (free)?
camping,,"ITAP Sunset, camping in Erie PA 2020."
camping,[removed],Carriage RV &amp; Lifestyle RV Owners Club &amp; Forum
camping,[removed],Looking for Tent Advice - First timer
camping,"Hi Reddit. What are some large, cold weather tents do you all recommend? Thanks in advance",Best tents for camping in cold weather?
camping,,It was cold so we slept inside 🥶
camping,"Greetings, denizens of r/camping! I need your help!

I’m planning a month-long western US road/camping trip with my doggerino and am coming to you all for advice! I basically want the epic national park loop experience, but national forest instead so I can dispersed camp with the pup. Buuuut it’s hard to find information on specific parts of the national forests. I know many secret spots are closely guarded, but are there any you are willing to share? 

Bonus points for being national park-adjacent for the possibility of day trips! 

Thanks!!!!",Best dispersed camping in western US?
camping,,Whoever said overlanding is boring doesn't know what he was talking about. Check out the video
camping,"Went winter camping with my girlfriend. Thrilling experience but got a few tips that could help others. We had green spruce branches under us as well as sheep fur. We combined our sleeping bags together, got blanket over us and 2 layers of every clothing... We had simple tarp above us.

About wood:

* Most of the wood will be dry since there is no liquid water in winter so you will have no problem finding some spruce branches for starting the fire.
* Wood is dry, but hard to find... Most of the wood is covered by thick blanket of snow so your main source of wood will be standing/fallen trees
* Thus... 2 hands : 1 axe is a good ratio... thank me later...
* You won't have fire in the night... so deal with it...

Camping:

* Good ground isolation is absolute must!
* Another ones body warm is great but sleeping is worse then...
* Your roof will probably get damp from your breath so keep that in mind...

And also... most of your things that you plan to do won't probably be doable since you will be cold af, we planned on heating some stones to keep us warm during night... But we survived, got ideas for better next time... So hope this helps someone else too ;)

[https://imgur.com/a/](https://imgur.com/a/dEsJUbX)  
\*Our last fire before sleeping, girlfriend for scale :D",Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,I'm in the northeast US and I have a typical easy set up 6-person Coleman tent. Need some advice in keeping the inside of the tent warm.,Need advice for keeping the inside of your tent warm in the winter.
camping,"I've been looking for a practical celestial navigation book for the intent of camping and hiking, I can only find advanced sailing type of content though, do you guys know any reading that could help me?",Any Practical Celestial Navigation Book?
camping,,"Super soft, great fit! I’m 5’3” 150lbs G cup, fits so well!"
camping,Let's save the obvious where were you camping comment on every picture post.,Request: require the location be included in trip reports and photos
camping,"These advance solar generators can be kept charged with solar panels, AC power (when avail), 12v Car outlet, gas generator or even from a small wind turbine. 

This gives you more ways to keep your essential items running during a power outage or have portable power for camping &amp; outdoor events.  An advanced solar generator that's built here in the USA. 

[https://www.deltaforcepower.com](https://www.deltaforcepower.com)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img fv8apydfx3h61...*",Advanced Solar Generator That Charges With OR Without The Sun!
camping,,Guy do you know this thing and where can I get its parts ?
camping,,Some place in the Mexican cierra campaign site
camping,"My partner and I have booked every aspect of our 2-day Rim to Rim trek including the South Rim campsite, shuttle, and a Bright Angel campsite (even the steak dinner at Phantom Ranch to cut back on pack weight). We tried desperately to get a North Rim campsite or room at the lodge on both reservation opening days, but they were sold out immediately. Any advice on where to stay on **Sunday, June 20th**, the night before our trek?

We planned to be on the trail by 5am for heat considerations, and worry that camping outside the park will affect the heat-conscious schedule. For example, Kaibob Lodge has space, but the shuttle arrives at the trailhead at 6am, placing us in the Box between 10-11am. 

Any advice is appreciated. Also, if you're staying at the North Rim on June 20th and have space for 1 ultralight tent, we will lowkey pay you to cowboy camp. Help!",Grand Canyon North Rim - Everything but the Site!
camping," Happy Friday everyone. I am making this post because I recently created a similar group on Facebook, and several members here who have been enjoying it so far recommended that I share it with you all, as they thought that you might like it too. For the past couple of years, I have set up alerts on Amazon that tell me when ""Black Friday"" caliber or ""Door Buster"" sales begin within the Camping/Outdoors department. Many friends and family have asked me to let them know when an amazing deal pops up. I started receiving a lot of these requests so I decided to create a page dedicated to sharing the best deals that show up on my alerts. I have been receiving a lot of positive feedback on the sales that I find, so please check it out if the concept interests you. Thank you!

[https://www.facebook.com/groups/1409221645932599](https://www.facebook.com/groups/1409221645932599)",Camping/Outdoors Black Friday Deals Year-Round
camping,"I'm in the process of writing a **massive** tent camping guide, and I've arrived at the part where I let my readers know how much they can expect their gear to cost. 

I made a spreadsheet with all the important gear and their average prices and came up with a total of about $1000. Keep in mind that this is based on quality gear for camping at a campsite (so no wild camping). Do you guys think this is realistic? 

I also feel like there are things missing, but I can't think of any. Maybe you guys can take a look and share your thoughts? I would love to hear them.

Here is the spreadsheet: [https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/155gPQgEQ2E82EDEsig8x38tekTIb0DkkqNjSNUcfg7c/edit?usp=sharing](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/155gPQgEQ2E82EDEsig8x38tekTIb0DkkqNjSNUcfg7c/edit?usp=sharing)",Is this how much your gear costs?
camping,,"A boy, a dog, and adventure in the Blue Mountains of Eastern Oregon."
camping,,Jiangsu Yukoufu Is Superior Water Bottles Manufacturer and drinking water bottle supplier
camping,,Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,"Went winter camping with my girlfriend. Thrilling experience but got a few tips that could help others. We had green spruce branches under us as well as sheep fur. We combined our sleeping bags together, got blanket over us and 2 layers of every clothing... We had simple tarp above us.

About wood:

* Most of the wood will be dry since there is no liquid water in winter so you will have no problem finding some spruce branches for starting the fire.
* Wood is dry, but hard to find... Most of the wood is covered by thick blanket of snow so your main source of wood will be standing/fallen trees
* Thus... 2 hands : 1 axe is a good ratio... thank me later...
* You won't have fire in the night... so deal with it...

Camping:

* Good ground isolation is absolute must!
* Another ones body warm is great but sleeping is worse then...
* Your roof will probably get damp from your breath so keep that in mind...

And also... most of your things that you plan to do won't probably be doable since you will be cold af, we planned on heating some stones to keep us warm during night... But we survived, got ideas for better next time... So hope this helps someone else too ;)

\*Our last fire before sleeping, girlfriend for scale :D",Winter camping in Czech Republic - Jeseníky... It was probably -14°C and 20 and more cm of snow...
camping,,Desert camping
camping,,Superior Borosilicate Pitcher and Water Bottle Supplier
camping,[removed],$5 for your opinion! At what age did you get your first cell phone? Help us with our study! ( PayPal / Amazon Gift Card )
camping,,Maple Soy Glazed Smoked SALMON- FIRE IT UP FRIDAY
camping,,"Throw back to my good bye camping tour before leaving Alaska, taken at a site outside of Mccarthy."
camping,,How To Love Wintertime Camping Even If You Hate The Outdoors
camping,,Hello. This is a picture of a tent and clay stove that I built
camping,,The best views are the ones you don’t need to sit up from your bed to see
camping,,How can ı find dry wood for the fire in the winter camping. What are your suggestions?
camping,,Camping nearby a glacier
camping,,Can’t beat beach camping (with the exception of flies that bite you).
camping,,Can’t beat beach camping in Australia. (With the exception of the sand and March flies)
camping,"1. Your drink stays nice and cool.

2. Don’t have to worry about keeping perishable food chilled.

3. The fire seems to feel a tad bit better.

4. Appreciation for when the sun is closer.

5? Everything freezes overnight. Everything.

Anybody have any other things that they love about winter camping?",Things I like about winter camping.
camping,Any opinions on these 3? Looking for something very comfy as a tall side sleeper. I prefer something a little heavier for sleep comfort--won't be backpacking with it. I'll be car camping this april in the south..so probably lows of 40 degrees F.,Big Agnes Torchlight vs Nemo Disco vs Nemo Tempo?
camping,,Woke up with this little fella next to the swag
camping,,Tell me you love cane's without telling me you love Cane's!
camping,,A little winter camping in Idaho.
camping,,4 days with the phone off=😀
camping,,"My daughter and I canoeing across Linda Lake in Algonquin Provincial Park, this was right in front of our camp, 4 days of beautiful weather and you can see the color change in the background."
camping,"Hello!
I am planning on going camping mid March and was looking for recommendations for your favorite camp sites that aren't too crowded, have a good view of the stars, and is close to Philadelphia, Delaware area?
I appreciate all of your help!
❤",Recommendations for East Coast!
camping,,Winter creeks in Oregon are the best!
camping,,Think I’ve seen this cabin in a horror film!
camping,,BIG NEWS! 1988 Toyota Fj62 Land Cruiser Beginning Stages of Part Out/ 1986 FJ60 First Drive/For Sale
camping,,New YETI Tundra 45! Slapped a few stickers on her already!
camping,,"Camping overnight in a tree in the backyard with hammock, lockdown vibes. Super enjoyable"
camping,,Honeymoon camping at Great Basin NP last summer
camping,,North Vancouver Island camping trip last fall
camping,"i'm trying to slowly chip away at the national parks, but to be honest am nervous about driving all the way out somewhere and not being able to camp/ not having a nearby backup campground. 

my general itinerary is this:

* austin --&gt; cloudcroft, new mexico area (to explore white sands). i want to camp in lincoln national forest for three nights.
* then after, drive from cloudcroft to guadalupe mountains national park and camp there for three nights. 
* then el paso area --&gt; austin. 

i'm a bit nervous because neither lincoln nor guadalupe mountains take advanced reservations. i just wanted to ask from people experienced here how early is early enough to grab a FCFS spot, generally? 

thanks so much, everyone!","how early should you arrive for first-come, first-served campsites?"
camping,,Morning coffee after camping next to preserved old Romans wells in Croatia during my thru-hike last summer.
camping,,Snow camping set up in Grouse Ridge
camping,,"Sometimes all I need is my tent and my guitar [OC] [White Mountains NH, last summer]"
camping,,WIN OUR CAMPERVAN FOR £5!
camping,,Hot French press morning coffee in the frozen forest ☕
camping,,"Photos of Yosemite’s ""firefall"" — a stunning yet brief February phenomenon"
camping,,"Cedar Creek WMA, GA"
camping,,"Cedar Creek WMA, GA"
camping,,This is Tenerife Island in Spain. We went surfing and camping. I stoped to take some photos. What do you think?!
camping,,Some photos from my last scout trip
camping,[removed],Backpacking food for the trail: What are your thoughts?
camping,"Husband and I love camping in Michigan's UP, but haven't branched out much on *where* we stay. 

We also love Kentucky &amp; Tennessee's LBL, and usually spend half the day driving around looking for a good spot to set up. Any recommendations there?


Also East coast beach camping!?
Never been to the ocean but would love to sleep on the beach. 

I'm excited and trying to get at least one good trip planned before our baby is due in July.","Favorite spots in MI, KY &amp; TN"
camping,,Mirror Lake State Park-Wisconsin Winter Camping 6°
camping,,One of the best fire I’ve done!!! Btw that is me
camping,"Hello, I am part of a group of business students conducting interviews for a project developing a business in the camping industry. We are looking for candidates to interview (virtually), which take about 10 minutes of your time. If you would like to help us with the project, please PM me for more info, or leave a comment saying you're interested.

Thanks for reading!",University Students Looking For Some Interviewees
camping,,Winter Camping in the Arizona Superstition Wilderness
camping,,Great view
camping,,Snow camping setup
camping,,"Was cooking breakfast this morning when this little guy paid me a visit. Negev Desert, Israel"
camping,,Army helicopters continue search operation on K2 for Ali Sadpara and team
camping,,"Winter Camping, It’s Just More Fun!"
camping,,"Winter Camping, Fun Than Summer Camping"
camping,,Camping as a therapy for grief?
camping,,Best Small Hiking Backpack
camping,,Big cool birds
camping,,Seeking campground suggestions on this route - May 2021
camping,,Reflective beauty in WA.
camping,,Hidden gem in BFE Nevada
camping,,Found at secret location in George Washington NF
camping,"I have run across one— we’ve been camping in a pop up, which we like a lot but It’s dying. I’m thinking a Rialta is a nice combination of low drama and still able to boondock. Am I right?",Anybody have a Rialta?
camping,I don’t spend a lot of time in the woods and haven’t dealt with ticks before. I’m taking my kids camping over spring break to an area that has a lot of ticks according to some reviews I’ve read. Is there a certain bug repellent that is really good for ticks or any other trick I can use to keep them away? My kids are younger and aren’t going to do the best job at checking their clothes and stuff for ticks.,How to avoid ticks?
camping,,Since we're talking about gear storage
camping,,Adirondacks Forest
camping,,Hello. This is a bamboo tent I built
camping,,Who likes organizing their gear almost as much as camping?
camping,,How do you afford to camp year round?
camping,,Planning to camp in 2021? Here's what you need to know
camping,"Do you know of any that are open?  I want to possibly go next weekend, and I honestly haven't camped before.  I don't wanna bring much supplies, but if anything I have a wrangler that I can sleep in to stay warm.",Good beginner camping spot in Shenandoah?
camping,,Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,,"It's a dream come true, having a fire in the snow. Looking at snow and trees while sipping on coffee. Now I wait for another snow day, for the second stage of the dream, Camping in the snow."
camping,[deleted],Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,[deleted],Camping in Zion at the end of January
camping,[deleted],First fire in the snow
camping,,OVERNIGHT stay in BUSHCRAFT SHELTER. HOMEMADE ICE CREAM
camping,,Went on a camping trip in the mountains of Utah and got this stunning picture 💙
camping,,"Trying to find my camping chair drunk, after the fire goes out, and no headlamp."
camping,"Particularly with six rivers it seems there are a lot of options all along the river. They all seem so beautiful!

Particularly oak bottom and panther flat’s campsites in six rivers seem to appeal to me. I like lush greens, rivers, watching fish, and water ponds.",Planning a Patrick’s point and six rivers trip? Which campsites do you recommend?
camping,"I moved to Wisconsin in May of last year. I haven't gone camping in forever. I need to get away from it all. The problem is, the snow is packed up! I'm not sure what type of gear I need. I lived in Texas before and camping there is a lot easier. What's some gear I should bring? What type of tent should I use? Thanks!",Can someone recommended camping gear for the cold/snow?
camping,,Planning a camping trip? Probably going to need a camp fire at some point and time right? We have top quality rich pine aka fatwood bundles perfect for getting your fire going! Contact us now for an exclusive offer! Diamond State rich pine aka fatwood! https://etsy.me/2Z38Sdl
camping,,Our family trip to Tammisaari
camping,Hi y’all I’m looking for some hot spring recommendations. I’m located in the central coast of California / Northern California. I’ve seen a lot of info going around I’m just looking for some first hand recommendations. Preferably free natural hot springs with camping near by of course.,HOT SPRINGS WANTED
camping,,My two most used knives. The one was my great grandmothers shed knife. And the folding knife my grandfather and I found metal detecting (Knobel’s Grove) in the early 80s. I use these for EVERYTHING camping cooking hacking carving fishing hunting fingernails etc.
camping,,"To Winson and Gladys. From the Hornbrook family, grande prairie Alberta."
camping,,Little campfire behind my house
camping,,Could as many people do this sign but the place you’re from? It’s my grandparents 60th anniversary! Want to reach as many as possible!
camping,Hmu with something you'd do with no one else in the room,Bored so let's chat
camping,,Amongst the pidgeons
camping,,View of Mount Adams from a cliffside campsite at the base of Mount St. Helens
camping,,Wild camping spots in the UK
camping,,Waking up early for the road trip and getting such views on the way
camping,"Can somebody explain about wood for fire while camping? I camp using freecampsites.com, but I’m afraid to get some kind of ticket for illegal fires or , especially, cutting wrong wood. What are the rules? Like, most of the times I can collect small/medium sticks, but when I see dead tree I’m afraid to use saw/axe to collect big blocks for overnight fires.

When I watch YouTube videos, a lot of the time In forests of Siberia it’s like “cut whatever you want”

Also, any cheap tent/wood stove setup advice? 
Currently I’ve Kelly Gunnison 2p tent",Wood and camping(USA)
camping,"First post! I have been a long time lurker on this subreddit but have been an avid camper my entire life. I'm in the process of building a Tacoma with roof top tent setup for the spring. 

I had been in the market for a rotomolded cooler for a while. I looked at all the big brands like Yeti and Pelican as well as some options we have readily available here like Woods and ProFrost. I needed a large capacity cooler because at times we will have up to 6 people using it at once. After seeing one in person I ended up going with a Whiterock cooler (TRK78). The build quality matches that of all the top end brands but what really set it apart was it's latch system. It has this 2 stage ""detent"" that not only seems to really set the seal perfectly but also makes opening and closing so much easier. 

I have only done some preliminary tests with it at home but I will eventually be doing some side by side comparisons this spring with some bigger name brands and see how it performs. First impressions though are really solid! 

My truck build starts at the end of February and I am looking forward to sharing more pictures of the build!",Whiterock Coolers
camping,"I'm pretty particular about campgrounds. This one just didn't cut it. 
[hickory knob](https://youtu.be/-ouCD3bH7Vs)",We were under-whelmed with this place.
camping,,Foggy morning at the state park last weekend
camping,,Found a huge mirror on the trail!
camping,,"They get caught by the police in Africa, get caught by a sandstorm in Sahara, outdoor camping for more than one year, get married while couchsurfing and a lot more... Fully subtitled in Turkish, German and English | Morocco cycling adventure | 20 episodes of outdoor survival cycling through Africa"
camping,,Hello from Tammisaari camping -20 c
camping,I've camped when it has snowed before but I've never set up a tent in the existing snow. Do I clear the snow away first and then put the tent directly on the ground or do I set up on the snow?,Camping in snow question
camping,"Heads up: I am suuuuper frustrated, so I apologize if this is inflammatory.

This year sequoia national park changed how they you request backcountry permits - yay no more faxing in and wondering if you got a permit! So I got on as soon as it opened to make sure I could get passes for the trips I was intersted in. Opens at 7am and the site doesn't even crash or anything - whoopee! BUT, half the campsites are not listed, some trails are on there while others are completely missing - I was scrambling to replan all my trips around the available sites for so long that I couldn't get any of the permits! Can someone explain to me why so many campsites are missing!?!?!?!

&amp;#x200B;

Im so bummed - I had 4 trips ready for booking in priority order in case I had any trouble and now have none. yup, just sitting here crying. I'm crushed.

&amp;#x200B;

check out [recreation.gov](https://recreation.gov) it's even a nice website!",sequoia new permitting system...how does it work?
camping,,My set up Vs my Buddy's
camping,,"Camping without tent, only sleeping bags. No fire, only cold food. Sunrise. Spain. Summer 2019."
camping,[removed],How to make a tequila table.
camping,,Love my hammock
camping,,Sunset in wonderland
camping,,A good buddy on mine does survival gear review. He is an Air Force SERE specialist and just want to show him some love. Take a look.
camping,,Funds for university
camping,,"Junior sous chef Archie the beagle, helping cook breakfast at the camp kitchen in Moab, Utah"
camping,"To start this off, I live in Ohio, and my friends and I want to go camping, but we’re not really sure where to go, or even where to start looking. To explain our confusion, we do not really want to go to a national park or any campground, rather, we want to be able to go somewhere where we can be as loud as possible. Not asking for spots, just asking about how we should go about finding a place.",How to find a good camping spot?
camping,,When your husband wants to test out the portable solar setup...
camping,[removed],New camping rental company
camping,"We have looked &amp; looked &amp; looked, and finally we believe we have found it. OUR DREAM CAMPGROUND!!! We can’t give too many details yet, because our offer was just accepted, but it has over 100 sites consisting of tents, cabins, RVs and RV sites, lake, river, pool, gameroom, lots of activities and close to major attractions. 

We are so incredibly excited to continue building upon the amazing place it already is &amp; make it even greater. Our dream is to have a destination campground that is a beautiful, restful, politics-free zone, that becomes your regular spring, summer or fall getaway and the happy place you go to in your head all year long. Follow us on our journey and then follow us to our destination.",WE THINK WE’VE FOUND IT!!!
camping,Does anyone have permanent sites? Just bought a small piece of land on a local river. Looking for ideas. Maybe an outhouse and permanent camp kitchen? Will be using a tent for a while at least.,Permanent campsite?
camping,"I’m looking for spots away from people, not campgrounds. Thank you!",Best camping in the San Bernardino mountains (CA)
camping,,Beautiful Vietnam
camping,,Sunrise over wonderland
camping,,"Moro Campground, Crystal Cove State Park, Laguna Beach, California"
camping,"Me(37m) and my 2 daughters(both 6f) are currently camping. The girls shower room is a 5 minute walk from the men's shower room and I'm not comfortable leaving my girls alone for that amount of time.

The showers have no curtains or walls to prevent people from looking at them and am wondering if there is anything I can do to prevent any potential creeps from watching them",How do I keep people from watching my daughters shower while camping
camping,"I'm not the one planning it, my mom is, so I want to know which thing I should suggest to her for what we should do in June when we go to Maine. 

Thank you to anyone who should respond.",How should I go about planning a camping trip/ booking a cabin and or lodge?
camping,,Wir geben niemals auf
camping,So my sleeping bag is rated at 1C or 35F and I have a sleeping bag liner I’ll also be wearing long johns sweatpants and sweater and a hat while sleeping. I’ll have a wool blanket beneath my insulated sleeping pad. Will all this be enough for -20 or should I get a warmer sleeping bag all together. I was fairly warm previously when I had gone in -9. This was without the liner. What do you guys think,Winter camping advice
camping,,Someone (me) forgot to weigh down the tent
camping,,A warm weekend at Burnt Corral campground
camping,,"Enjoying the weather with the locals. Port Macquarie, Australia."
camping,,"One of my favorite sites, tucked away on an easy and gorgeous 12-mile loop in SE Wyoming."
camping,My wife and I have a campsite in Yosemite in April. It’s a Saturday and Sunday night. We’re looking to do a little backpacking trip on Friday and coming back Saturday. Does anyone have any recommendations? Not wanting to get too much elevation for storms and snow etc. going to do my research since my wilderness permit for my first choice (ten lakes) was denied for that time of year.,2 day backpacking trip in Yosemite. 2nd week of April.
camping,"This winter I started trying my hand at cold weather camping and have been enjoying it so far! however something that has prevented me from extended trips is that I always seem to end up getting my sleeping bag wet overnight. I've been sleeping in a tent (Cabelas Alaskan Guide Model Geodisic 4man for reference) and so far i've always gone with a friend or 2. The tent is big enough for 3 comfortably but inevitably, when sharing the tent I brush up against the edges of the frost covered tent walls. Is there a way to prevent the frost from building up along the walls of the tent? I had read vending is a necessary thing to do and last trip we slept with the window on the door opened. I also (mistakenly) tried a waterproof slip to cover my sleeping bag but I ended up awake at 3AM soaked through (down bag too...). My theory is sweat/respiration from the body got trapped inside the waterproof cover. 

&amp;#x200B;

TLDR: How do i properly vent my tent and how can i make sure frost won't build up before it's already gotten my gear wet...",How can I stay dry at night cold weather camping?
camping,,"Lake Powell, Utah. One of my favorite campsites."
camping,,"Looking to take our pop up camper out more. We live in Temecula, CA so prefer to stay in So Cal. Any suggestions for areas where the roads aren’t too bad?"
camping,,Barbecue (BBQ) in the Forest | Pork Steak | Pork Sausages | Pork Kebabs
camping,"Please confirm if this is even normal, because i believe this is very dangerous, and before anyone says why are you tipping on its side if this was in a tent really there could be 100 reasons why this could happen and very easily be knocked over, i cant believe its supposed to be like this

so i just brought a kampa parabolic heater i was using in our tent after i took out and only turned heater on its side for a second and - this f\*ki\*g happened

please confirm if this is even normal really

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=63NTKaEqyIE&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;ab\_channel=rosra](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=63NTKaEqyIE&amp;feature=youtu.be&amp;ab_channel=rosra)",is this even normal video included very dangerous
camping,"So my family and I are interested in doing more camping...more nature oriented get aways and less to tourist attractions. The last time though we camped in a tent, it was a disaster. Rained like crazy, we got soaked, it was freezing...but the lake, the kayaking, the hiking were amazing!!! So, we're trying to figure out the best way to do this. Bigger tent with cots, pop-up, etc. RVs seem just ridiculously expensive to me and I really don't get how anyone justifies the cost when considering gas mileage, site fees, wear and tear, property tax, registration, etc. I'd love to hear what gear others use and love and how to make camping more endurable during bad weather. I am leaning toward a large tent with cots and air matresses, but I am fairly new to all this. Camped a lot as a kid, but only a few times as an adult. Want my daughter to love it as well, and not hate it because of the lack of a good night's sleep.",Tent or.....?
camping," ⁣  
𝐈’𝐯𝐞 𝐛𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐨𝐟𝐟 𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐟𝐨𝐫 𝐚𝐛𝐨𝐮𝐭 𝐟𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐝𝐚𝐲𝐬. 𝐀𝐟𝐭𝐞𝐫 𝐝𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚 𝟓 𝐝𝐚𝐲 𝐟𝐚𝐬𝐭, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐰𝐚𝐬 𝐬𝐮𝐩𝐩𝐨𝐬𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐛𝐞 𝐚 𝐜𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐭 𝐦𝐞𝐚𝐥, 𝐭𝐮𝐫𝐧𝐞𝐝 𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐨 𝐜𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐭 𝐃𝐀𝐘𝐒. ⁣  
⁣  
𝐈 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐫𝐞𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐭 𝐢𝐭. 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐞’𝐬 𝐰𝐡𝐲:⁣  
⁣  
•𝐈 𝐜𝐚𝐧’𝐭 𝐫𝐞-𝐠𝐚𝐢𝐧 𝟓𝟎 𝐩𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐬 𝐢𝐧 𝟓 𝐝𝐚𝐲𝐬.⁣  
•𝐈𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐨𝐰𝐞𝐝 𝐦𝐞 𝐚𝐧 𝐨𝐩𝐩𝐨𝐫𝐭𝐮𝐧𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐚𝐧𝐚𝐥𝐲𝐳𝐞 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐠𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐨𝐧 𝐢𝐧 𝐦𝐲 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐭𝐫𝐢𝐠𝐠𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐦𝐞, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐝𝐢𝐟𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭, 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐬𝐚𝐦𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐰𝐡𝐚𝐭’𝐬 𝐧𝐞𝐰 𝐭𝐨 𝐦𝐲 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐦𝐚𝐲 𝐢𝐦𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐰𝐚𝐲 𝐈 𝐝𝐨 𝐨𝐫 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐭𝐚𝐤𝐞 𝐜𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐦𝐲 𝐛𝐨𝐝𝐲.⁣  
•𝐈𝐭 𝐠𝐢𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐦𝐞 𝐚 𝐜𝐡𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞 𝐭𝐨 𝐩𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐦𝐲𝐬𝐞𝐥𝐟 𝐰𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐚 𝐰𝐚𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐜𝐡𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐞𝐧𝐠𝐞 𝐦𝐲 𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐬𝐞𝐭, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐛𝐨𝐝𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐠𝐞𝐭 𝐛𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐨𝐧 𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐤. ⁣  
⁣  
𝐌𝐨𝐬𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐮𝐬 𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐟𝐫𝐨𝐦 𝐮𝐧𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐡𝐲 𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐤𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐡𝐚𝐛𝐢𝐭𝐬. 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐢𝐬 𝐚 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐜𝐞𝐬𝐬, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐢𝐭’𝐬 𝐨𝐤𝐚𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐡𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐬𝐨𝐦𝐞 𝐛𝐮𝐦𝐩𝐬 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐛𝐫𝐮𝐢𝐬𝐞𝐬 𝐚𝐥𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐰𝐚𝐲. ⁣  
𝐎𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐥𝐞𝐟𝐭, 𝐈 𝐰𝐚𝐬 𝐦𝐲 𝐡𝐞𝐚𝐯𝐢𝐞𝐬𝐭 𝐰𝐞𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭, 𝟐𝟒𝟓. ⁣  
𝐎𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭, 𝐈 𝐡𝐚𝐝 𝐣𝐮𝐬𝐭 𝐥𝐨𝐬𝐭 𝐧𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐥𝐲 𝟒𝟎 𝐩𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐬. 𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐰𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐭𝐢𝐦𝐞𝐬 𝐈 𝐡𝐚𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐞𝐭! ⁣  
𝐈 𝐝𝐢𝐝𝐧’𝐭 𝐡𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐢𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐨𝐠𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐠𝐡 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐣𝐨𝐮𝐫𝐧𝐞𝐲, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐈 𝐝𝐨𝐧’𝐭 𝐧𝐨𝐰, 𝐛𝐮𝐭 𝐈 𝐤𝐞𝐞𝐩 𝐦𝐨𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐨𝐰𝐚𝐫𝐝𝐬 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐬.

# To learn more contact : bhaktigiti108@gmail. com (remove space)",How I lost 40 pounds in just few days
camping,,"My brother gave me this DEER,I love my brother."
camping,,Finally home from a great weekend at the Blue River and some successful trout fishing. Made for a good dinner over the campfire.
camping,,"Camping in the Valley of the Gods, UT. [OC]"
camping,,"Valley of the Gods, UT. [OC]"
camping,,"A frosty night Valley of the Gods, Ut. [OC]"
camping,,Love me some campfire meals 😍
camping,,"Best time of the year to visit and camp in Death Valley National Park, California"
camping,,"Daydreaming at work, thinking of all the camping I'll be doing this spring. Here's a couple photos from last year."
camping,,"Best time of the year to visit and camp in Death Valley National Park, California"
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img nrxzzfm976g61...*

Whether you're heading off to the park for a weekend picnic or you want something to stop your lunch from turning into a warm soggy mess before your lunch break at the office or college, a decent food cooler bag is essential. There are several types of coolers, the main ones which are made from hard molded plastic or strong synthetic fiber.

Most people have a cooler that is hard, which can mean heavy or bulky, making its' mobility limited. Here, MIER soft cooler made from durable fabric with thick insulating materials, but they are more lightweight, practical, easily packing away when not in use. Even more, most [MIER cooler bags](https://www.miersports.com/collections/coolers-lunch-bags) Inside using heat-welded seams to prevent flexible liner leaks, very easy to clean when spilled juice/soup.  


So how to choose the best cooler for yourself? There are some points for you chosen:  


* Thicker insulating linings generally work better and look out for fastenings such as strong zips to help keep the air out.
* Name brand cooler, which is using food-grade material.
* The Interior is heat-welded seams so that it can prevent leaks.
* Solid stitching reinforcement on all stress point, especially the shoulder strap.
* Easy to foldable and store.

To understand this, you need to look at all aspects of a cooler. All in all, we need to measure performance — how cold it stayed, how easily it loaded, how durable it was against leaks, how comfortable it was to carry. So interesting! Hope this information can help you. Anyway, we welcome you to email us to tell us your good idea or suggestion.",How to Choose a Best Cooler Bag for Yourself
camping,What tents and or manufacturers are using polyester for their tent flats? Not pros or cons question just wondering what companys are using it on the tents.,Which tents have polyester fly material?
camping,,Supper in the rockies 😍
camping,,Our riverside campsite this weekend
camping,,Me &amp; my best friend built a fort in the woods &amp; watched cartoons.
camping,[deleted],It was cold so we slept inside
camping,"Hi hope it's ok to post this as a first time poster here.

&amp;#x200B;

I own a canvas bell tent for when i go camping (or more often larping) and i was looking to invest in some equipment this year. 

&amp;#x200B;

I was looking at getting a in tent heater but not really sure about the best options out there and it will need to be suitable for use in the months of Late November and December. I know propane heating is out because it's really bad circulation in the tent and carbon dioxide.

&amp;#x200B;

I have alternatively been looking at a hand cranked/solar panelled battery pack which has a usb port in it. To have one of the small office/desk heaters. However i don't know how reliable and useful a small heater such as that is.

More often than not we never have an electrical port because we are camping right in the middle of the woods so it needs to be something portable and the like.

&amp;#x200B;

Any suggestions?",In Tent Heaters!
camping,"Since life is on hold, I thought that maybe making a channel of my campfires would be a nice thing that brings some kind of joy to some people out there.No talking, no me promoting some brands or any other kind of bullshit. Just videoes of campfires, atleast once a week. Feel free to check out.

And Admin, delete this post if it's against some guidelines.  


[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bq8Igd0ms64](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Bq8Igd0ms64)",Made a channel for my bonfires/campfires
camping,,"Promised the daughter we would go camping, and then got quarantined. Still had a pretty good time in the backyard though! (Eastern NM, USA)"
camping,,"Don’t feed the deer, camping or not"
camping,,"Car camping with a British Roadster, spotted on Vancouver Island, BC (Summer 2019)"
camping,"Any suggestions for the best resources to find good dispersed camping spots on BLM land or National Forests? I like AllTrails but its more for hiking and not camping. It would be nice to have a combination of trails and roads and boundaries of BLM and National Forests so I know where I can and can't go camping on public land.

Thanks!",Best app/website for dispersed camping?
camping,Just curious on your experiences with woodstove winter camping. What is your set up with the cost and sleeping capabilities? Looking into an alaska trip next winter,Anybody use hot tents?
camping,"We’re looking to do a late March trip with the kids and my wife would love a spot where you can hear water. She doesn’t sleep great while camping, and I think some flowing water white noise would help. She also just really likes being near water, generally.

I have some spots in mind, but all are in the mountains where it’ll be pretty cold for tent camping in March. I’d love to find a place at lower elevations that would work. Primitive is fine. We’d be car camping, but don’t need electric, etc.

We’re in the Piedmont of North Carolina. Any suggestions within a few hours?",Riverside/stream side camping in NC/SC/VA?
camping,,OfflineDay starts at Sunset this Friday. Here's a friendly reminder. Enjoy your time away from all the noise. With love - OffllineDay
camping,"I am currently renting a house that has a bed outside (regular mattress, pillows, sheets etc). It's super comfortable to lay there during the day, but unfortunately due to the humidity at night, the sheets get absolutely drenched. Are there are other gear I can buy that will keep moisture free in high humidity? I am thinking of buying an air mattress. Any suggestions for something more comfortable? And what about the sheets and blanket/duvet?

https://preview.redd.it/ldvrdtkbphf61.jpg?width=1500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=047a95f43fe8ae4f1bd02380803d6a8ea80ee5d7",Outdoor Bed (Permanent) - Materials?
camping,"Hello Reddit,  Looking for some advice/ideas/suggestions for some great camping places/trip plans for across Canada.  We live in Ontario and have done some camping in the area but we are looking into doing a 2 week (ish) camping trip either out west or east of Canada.  We were hoping to ask fellow reddit followers for some ideas/suggestions etc to make this a great trip.  So send us your camp ground ideas, hiking trails, kayaking spots etc., we would love to hear it all!",Canada West/East Camping Ideas
camping,[removed],Lighter camper options for under 10K?
camping,"**Cold winds:**

In all my previous camping trips in winter, I must have been lucky to not having much wind, that luck ended the last few days. With day temp being a cozy -10 deg C, and night time towards -19 deg C, sitting by the campfire did not warm my feet. I also could not literally warm my boots too close to the fire, maybe risking the glue and the plastic on my boots coming undone. I realized then that a single layer of wool socks probably wasn't enough. Seems like I would have to consider buying some larger boots that I can use with two pairs of socks + a plastic bag inside.

&amp;#x200B;

**Boots:**

Ugh, I need better/larger boots in winter that is warmer. A single medium thick wool socks isn't warm enough for me.

&amp;#x200B;

**Drying socks and failing:**

I tired two times to dry my wool socks at the campfire. Once at the side of the flames, and the other time lower at the side of the hot coals. Both times my socks melted and either turned into stiff plastic, or became so brittle, and two socks of different pair ended up with a hole in them. :(

&amp;#x200B;

**De-icing my tent:**

On a positive note, I managed to de-frost my tent after a couple of days out in the cold. I very carefully, used a trangia spirit burner with full fuel, and burned that on the trangia triangle stand, on top of a plastic thingy so it all wouldn't risk melt the bottom or slide around. **I made sure to stand outside the tent during the burning as I had no idea just how dangerous it might be re. toxic carbon monoxide and carbon dioxide.** The flame was not hot/high enough to damage the top of the tent. It was surprising to see that the interior temperatur rose to what must have been +10 or warmer, also making sure I have some ventilation going on. I manage to defrost most of the interior in a single burn, with some small stuff left in the corners.

Edit: I should keep better eye on things, because just because I managed to de-ice the tent once, maybe it won't work as well the next time. Only did it once.

&amp;#x200B;

**Spirit burner fuel:**

I made sure to bring an excess amount of spirit burner fuel, and I am happy having done that, never really having to worry too much about running out anytime soon when making food.

&amp;#x200B;

**A relaxing campfire:**

Well, assuming there isn't any wind, it is a good idea to floss/brush teeth and eating food and whatever by the campfire, instead of doing that later in the cold. Melting a little snow on the fire is also fairly trivial, and doesn't have to reach boiling point for brushing one's teeth.

&amp;#x200B;

**Changing clothes in the cold:**

I like changing first the top side, and then the pants side, while being in my sleeping bag, either in the evening, or early in the morning before I get up.

&amp;#x200B;

**Thawing food by the campfire:**

So, thawing food by the campfire was simple enough, I just had to be a little patient. Also, bad idea placing hot dog buns inside my jacket, three of them became squished. :) Also, thawing a small bottle of mustard, I had no patience for that. Placing the small bottle of ketchup some time before eating, made most of the ketchup liquid and usable. To my surprise, the ""beer sticks"" (meat) that I had brought with me, had not frozen, and could be eaten as such without warming them up.

&amp;#x200B;

**Failing to dry my sleeping bag:**

So, after some time out in the freezing cold, I can't help breath onto the top part of the sleeping bag, and that stuff turns to ice. Afaik, that icy part is not a big issue, but still, hanging my sleepin bag to dry outside, there was too much shade and hardly any sun shone onto the sleeping bag, and with the sun being so low this time of the year, I gave up drying to dry the sleeipng bag in the sun, and brought it home instead. :| I have no idea how damp if at all my sleeping bag was, probably not an issue, but then again, I have no idea.

&amp;#x200B;

**Added:** I have for the previous two weeks been in and out of the woods, either camping or just being out in the cold, and looking at my toes, two are blue (the ones beside the big toe), and should they fall off, it is an improvement, from when I was camping out in -5 deg C, and lose two big toe nails, and the two beside. I actucally had to yank them off, because they did not want to fall off by themselves. :| My last bad camping trip in 2018, my other shoes became wet and very cold from goofing around in the powdery snow (just wool socks inside autumn boots), and I was unable to start a fire the first day.

&amp;#x200B;

**Bacon:**

Frozen. Bacon.  Hard to manage unless you go for thawing the whole package. Probably best to protion at home, before it all gets frozen hard. I sort of managed, and had bacon wrapped hot dogs with sesame seed buns. :) I also brought lompe because there were 8 buns for my 9 hot dogs. I also brought tortillas for my re-hydrated hot meals, but I never used any and took them home. They too ofc were frozen, but with lompe it was rather easy to separate into individual pieces when frozen.

&amp;#x200B;

**Snow brush thingy:**

So, I brought along a snow brush for a car and it worked nicely for cleaning off snow from the oversnowed campsite and also boots and tent.",I learned some new things duing winter camping
camping,,"Camping in Toujen, Tunisia be like"
camping,,By the Bonfire
camping,[removed],New Year 2021 celebration package in Rishikesh
camping,,Been going through a rough patch and one of my friends decided to get me outside; Northern Singapore.
camping,[removed],Hope you’ve had or having another brilliant day
camping,,California Hotsprings
camping,,smokenado
camping,,Ladybug Season
camping,"I’m taking my husband on our first car camping trip when it gets warmer. We are in the process of acquiring our gear, so have no idea what size boxes we should plan on getting for kitchen and sleeping/gear stuff.

We have a sedan (no hatchback) and a medium sized dog on the back seat. I was planning on putting the cooler next to him on the seat. 

Would it be better to just have one plastic bin in the trunk with kitchen stuff and dry food in and rest of the stuff spread between a duffel bag and smaller plastic bin?

We would only be going for a weekend on our first trip.

Any recommendations for a setup would be helpful! Thanks 😀",Recommendations for kitchen and gear box size... (first trip)
camping,,"My 3yo had had enough of the campfire shenanigans, so she went into the tent alone to read Pete the Cat Goes Camping 😸"
camping,,Cooking steak dinner in the back of my Suburban Camper
camping,,Where To Buy Professional Eyeshadow Palettes In Bulk
camping,,"Past Trip to Rainbow Mountain Whistler, Canada."
camping,,Stayed at Lake of the Ozarks State Park last summer. So many deer that would come straight up to the campsites!
camping,"... and it has friends nearby...

Hi! My girlfriend and I are camping down in Turkey and starting 21:00 yesterday, a stray dog has been barking and growling at the entrance of our tent. There seems to be a massive pack patrolling the forest.

We figured it'd just leave eventually, but guess what: it is still here 11 hours later... 

Any advice? Would it be a better idea to just get out of the tent completely so we can scare it off and give fighting it off a better chance (in the case that may be necessary) or should we take a more slow and friendly approach?

I would usually go for a friendly approach, but this dog is clearly very upset with our presence. We're not scared of dogs, but would prefer to keep our limbs intact. 

Thanks!",There's a very angry dog outside our tent...
camping,,VR Camping Videos!
camping,,Really missing mornings like these! I took this on a disposable camera. Adds to the nostalgia camping holds for me.
camping,"So the first part of this is from listening to ""missing 411"" as well as creepypasta stories -Which is very wide but can have a subset for camping and stuff- BASICALLY just creepy/scary stories that may or may not be true. Can you share yours or link to a good scary story?

ALSO the reason I am posting is because I currently live in my car BUT I have never camped before. I was at a Walmart and saw a $25 ""3 person"" tent and thought ""Gee that is pretty cheap""...

So can you tell me:

What all do I need to camp? What to buy and stuff? Be pretty specific and detailed?

What are the dangers and how do you combat them? Honestly I have considered buying a BBGun cause they are $30 at Walmart but I didn't know if it was considered a ""Gun"" or of I was legally allowed to keep it in my car or if I need a permit, etc... But staying in my car has proven VERY safe and I have never had an issue... Even so I am kinda scared of camping... If anything I would want to know in case of an emergency....?

Oh and also how do you eat and stuff? I don't want to kill any animals or anything...",CREEPY Camping Stories? PLUS How Can I Try To Camp?
camping,,Had to take a layout photo before a nice quiet trip in the jungles of Guam.
camping,My friend wants to go on a 3-6 hour hike and then camp out at the top for her birthday. I have never before been camping or hiking for that long so i have no idea how to plan this. What do we need? Where can i look for places that i can camp at and that have nice hiking trails? Please help me out,Camping trip in CT
camping,[deleted],Scratch made fire pizza!
camping,,"What is your most cherished camping item? Mine is my Grandfathers's 55 year old stove. It is one of 2 items I have of his. He died before I was born, and I am very glad to have it. I'd like to restore it one day, but until then I'm glad to be using it very regularly."
camping,,From a recent 4 day solo trip. Is winter anyone else's favorite time to get out?
camping,[deleted],Most recent trip to Alamo Lake State Park (AZ)
camping,[removed],"I need feedback, please"
camping,,Tips for camping sandbars during a kayak trip?
camping,[deleted],Hey guys ! Can you set up a tent in a isolated park for a few hours ?
camping,,Rate my setup
camping,,"tried cooking rice in a bamboo for the first time, i'd it went prenty well. hahaha"
camping,,"My favorite camping purchase by far! Thule Tepui Autana 3 with annex. Odell Lake, Oregon"
camping,,I brought my kids to the same spot my dad took my brother and I camping 25 years ago.
camping,,That camp food.
camping,Wondering how strict they are with the number of tents allowed on a site. It says expanded sites can have 12 people but only 2 tents... if 6 people have 3 backpacking tents would the make us leave?,Has anyone camped at Peanut Island in palm beach?
camping,,Tuskegee National Forest. Alabama looking kinda spooky.
camping,,a box of kindling camper joy
camping,[removed],Water Straw Filters
camping,"My fiancé and I want to take a camping  trip soon and we are unsure of what the best camping spots near us with little to no fees? Somewhere that offers camping year round, drive up spot, porta potty’s, picnic tables, fire pits, preferably 1-2 hours drive from us in Eugene Oregon? Also preferably somewhere where it’s a larger campground and most likely other campers there?",Oregon Camping Spots
camping,,"Me and my 3 friends are camping in Big Bear, California in the snow for 3 days, 2 nights. Any advice?"
camping,,"From our hike up to the falls while camping - Fall Creek Falls State Park, TN, January 2021"
camping,,"Being out in the rain is still better then being stuck indoors, most of the time"
camping,,First time making Shakshuka. I really recommend this as a breakfast dish during cold weather.
camping,Me and some buddy’s are looking to plan a trip to the Grand Canyon SOON and I was wondering if there was any free BLM land nearby that anyone could suggest?! And if so where is it located? Thanks!,Need a Grand Canyon camping sight
camping,"I've been looking at tents for my future 8 day camping trips (4 times a month April - August) and I have landed on this tent

Any thoughts before I buy it? 

It is a 3-season tent and if you're wondering, I'm interested in the teal navy one. 

Is the North face a trusted brand for tents?",The North Face Homestead Roomy 2 Tent
camping,"Hey all,

I am new to thermal pads. I had some questions that I figured people who camp alot would know!

* Do you think thermal pads are worth investment when it comes to low 40s (f) or are they meant for lower?
* Do you still use an air pad on top of these? Or are they meant to replace? 
* Any recommendations on brands? I see there are air type (like the air pad I use) and there are foam types that fold up in a Z shape. 

Im looking to do some camping where it usually wont get below 40 or so. Smaller form/lighter is great but i dont need it to be that.",Question on Thermal Pads
camping,Suggestions are appreciated!,Looking for a campground where I can leave a camper year round in Michigan’s UP.
camping,,Water treating techniques?
camping,,Natural Spring
camping,,My First Month Car Camping :)
camping,,No frying pan? No problem! Throwback to steaming a salmon filet over pine boughs while dispersed camping in Pisgah.
camping,,You can tell from my designs I’m from the PNW
camping,"We are planning a trip from Utah to Montana to see family, and plan on camping near Yellowstone on the way back, but I personally don’t like staying in camp grounds, do any of you know of some decent open camping areas near Yellowstone?",Free camping near Yellowstone?
camping,"Last weekend, I found a BEAUTIFUL spot to hike, camp, and fish in Blue Ridge, Ga. I set up my hammock along a rushing creek right off the Appalachian Trail. I had a blast hiking, fishing, and camping in one of my favorite new spots. In this video, I take a few minutes and show my winter hammock camping setup, and share what I believe is the most comfortable way to camp.

[https://youtu.be/IZ1f215fmuQ](https://youtu.be/IZ1f215fmuQ)",Hammock Camping
camping,Thinking of going camping there this weekend into next week and beach camping. Are you able to get to beach camping without a vehicle with 4WD? And what other things would be cool to check out?,Padre Island
camping,"You hammock-camp when hiking? What if there are no trees - **like, on a beach.**..?

Simple: the 1 extra item I take for this eventuality is a piece of Tyvek as ground-cloth. Then just use the inflatable mat I use in the hammock to lay on - and sleep bug-free as if I'm in a tent.

https://preview.redd.it/w4h0ixymu8f61.jpg?width=1720&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=9cdf3e4af0faa1819ac71549c2f4e84e58412e31","OMG, no trees..."
camping,,SOLO ICE CAMPING CATCH CLEAN COOK with INCREDIBLE UNDERWATER FOOTAGE (Day 1)
camping,[deleted],Does anyone have advice on stuff that someone with a bad back could use to sleep on at night while camping?
camping,What are some good places to camp in Los Padres National Forest ?,Los Padres National Forest
camping,[deleted],Photo I took while at our campsite in sequoia.
camping,Go forth and conquer!,Good morning good people
camping,,Just some good winter camping eats
camping,,The midnight views
camping,"Hello! I’m new to camping and a friend of mine (same household) wants to go somewhere around May/June (assuming everything is okay). 
Joshua tree is her choice, but I wanted to see if there were any options that have the following;

- on the cooler side, some shade available please
- would love for there to be green but understand if this isn’t available
- bathrooms available?
- within &lt;4 hours of Los Angeles

Thank you!",Southern California camping around may-June. Any recommendations?
camping,,"shark point chickee , everglades national park"
camping,"Hi everyone, 

I'm in south central PA and finally have my set up for car camping in my subaru outback! I was wondering if anyone in PA knows any 420 friendly campsites? Any help or link to appropriate subreddits are greatly appreciated!",PA 420 Friendly
camping,"Having spend literally decades traveling and living in all kinds of places like sailboats, vehicles, etc, .. one thing I've learned is that if its hot I can sleep pretty much anywhere as long as I have some kind of fan blowing on me.  Fans keep the air moving over your body and allows your body to use its ability to perspire to keep you cool.  So now I want to start researching to find something that is long lasting, light weight, easy to travel with, and flexible power (which probably means USB if the fan has enough air flow to be useful ..).

Love to hear your thoughts and recommendations.

Edit, also not as interested in fans with integrated rechargeable batteries because I prefer to centralized battery power ..","Planning for summer .. I need a portable fan, would like some pro advice from experienced people who use them (meaning not random Internet search results from people who don't actually use one)"
camping,,Valentines Day For Outdoorsy Ladies: 7 Gifts That Don't Suck
camping,"I'm wondering about the tricks of the trade, finding campgrounds when it's summer and in glorious locales like the Rocky Mountains (or the Pacific Northwest).  Let's skip pandemic effects for now, since I may be traveling and camping for a couple of years.    


I'll be getting a National Parks pass, so I'd like to favor those to get the \~$8/night camping fee, but I am fine diverting to state parks if Nat'l's full.  I can hit places on Monday for a week or two stay.  I am in a SUV w/tent, and don't need hookups.  Will I always be able to find a state or private camping spot within 50 miles in case a weekend is full?",Normal Summertime Campground Availability in U.S. Rocky Mountains?
camping,"What do y'all do to power all your portable devices (also including camping gear) while on a trip or in remote locations?

I have a solar panel for my trailer, which has a car battery. Also a high capacity power brick for recharging devices.

For camping gear items like headlamps, I was thinking about purchasing a battery charger with rechargeable batteries that I can charge from either my trailer or brick via USB.

How are you handling this?!",Portable charging strategy?!
camping,,Looking forward to cooking outside again.
camping,[removed],I’m available for hookup
camping,[removed],Campervan Rental Suggestions ?
camping,"I have this older tent that is green and beige or OD and beige as some one once called it. the color isnt really faded but is in fact remarkable condition as I have lugged this tent around with me in my life for over 25 years. I cant even tell you where I got it from. I always thought it was an old military tent. I was told all the pieces were in the bag but I have NEVER been able to erect the tent. I have had several ppl throughout the years try and figure it out with me, but to no avail. My only option now is to find the model and buy replacement poles or fashion my own some how. I am not too knowledgeable about vintage, canvas tents. I was a boy scout, grew up in the military so Im no stranger to the outdoors or tents that I have grown up with. But i am hoping to find some one with some info on this tent. I have pictures and because reddit is so picky with posting pictures, I will def send some in email. 

&amp;#x200B;

Color - Green and beige

5-8 man tent (Large)

Canvas with 2 side windows, split zipper door and a tarp type bottom.

Very heavy duty. 

No logos on the tent ANYWHERE

Only a metal tag embossed with the tent model number (which I have searched and searched for to the ends of the interwebs with no avail)

It kind of resembles a sear vintage hillary cabin tent, but all hillary's had their logo on the doors. 

&amp;#x200B;

If ANYONE can help me with how to get this thing standing, I would appreciate it!!  I'm pretty sure it a ""Cabin"" tent.",Researching older 60's/70's Canvas Tent
camping,[removed],https://sociali.io/ref/gu51874460
camping,,Can’t wait for spring and the warm summer months to return. More camping in the ADKs awaits.
camping,"Trying to be spontaneous with a group of friends, any available primitive campsites for the weekend? I wanted to do something in the Florida keys but looks like it is all booked a year in advance. Any recommendations?",Looking for a campsite for this weekend in south Florida.
camping,[deleted],Jackery Power Station
camping,,The best way to start the day
camping,,The weather turned overnight from my last post
camping,,"Missouri has some beautiful waterways. Hopefully the Wild &amp; Scenic Rivers leg of the state becomes less impacted by people, soon. :/ Below is Hawn State Park"
camping,[deleted],Summer 2021 is looking very exciting! 71 day camping road trip 🏕
camping,,2020 Campers Choice Awards
camping,,"Snowy solo trip in Suches, GA"
camping,,A Joshua Tree winter weekend at Indian Cove Campground!
camping,"My friends and I are keen on camping sometime this year, ideally in the not so hot spring. Location isn't really an issue, however we are east coast and if the trip involves flying there will need to be a rental car; which I'm sure will be accommodating to our gear amount.

We have no interest in RVing, but would like to maintain some of the nicer amenities like a restroom/shower at least once a day. I don't know if there are places where you can hike between camps with running water and set off again the next day. Any pointers would be much appreciated.","What would be a good ""in between"" kind of camping for a group that is less experienced?"
camping,,Good morning
camping,,Camping Rough Botswana
camping,,Good morning :-)
camping,,"Got a few inches of snow over the weekend camping in Linville Gorge Wilderness, North Carolina."
camping,"Does anyone know of a European version of BLM land dispersed camping? I know in Scotland you can camp pretty much anywhere as long as you don't bother anyone, but what about other countries?

&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/lqzav46hx1f61.jpg?width=850&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=cc909640b5f127edc32ff30b93f754fa3cc8489f","Great camping in Alabama Hills, CA last summer. I miss BLM land now that I am back in Europe."
camping,[deleted],Instagram outdoors page
camping,[deleted],High-speed chase ends in tragedy for local Vermont rabbit. (My camping story from last weekend)
camping,[deleted],High speed chase end in tragedy for local Vermont rabbit. (My camping story from last weekend)
camping,[removed],COMING SOON HAPPY BALLANTYNE DAY IF YOUR WANT TO NEED SPECIAL GIFT CARD THEN WE ARE PROVIDE 100% FREE $200 AMAZON GIFT CARD
camping,"""That which we need the most will be found where we least want to look""",Inspirational
camping,,First hill top winter camp - only 520m but with wind it got chilly
camping,[deleted],First Hill top winter camp - only 520m but it got cold
camping,[deleted],Tent Camping in Dhanoulti | Dhanoulti Camping | Yelnyadventure
camping,,Driving in Chobe national park Botswana. Great camping at Ihaha campsite lots of wildlife
camping,[removed],A chance to win a free cordless hair dryer
camping,"HI, 

I am looking forward to taking a one month roundtrip vacation around my country, a road trip on my 150cc bike and camping gear with my mini bike trailer(possibly), any ideas anyone has such as preparations, experiences are welcome, this will be my first bike road trip I am going on and organising .

&amp;#x200B;

Many thanks.

&amp;#x200B;

\#WildBunch",Any one take road trips with motorcycle buddies
camping,,Nice place to live in Baja California.
camping,,Santa Barbara Mountains to Sea
camping,,"Who else uses tying up bear bags as an excuse to practice too many knots? This one has some lashings around the bags, a square knot to tie two ropes together, a two-half hitch on the log, a taut line hitch to tether the rope, and a clove hitch to tie off the remaining rope 🪢"
camping,"
Have a fantastic day",Good morning
camping,,"Izmir, Turkey. I really miss camping."
camping,,Can’t wait to go camping and try this absolute machine out
camping,,I camped all across the US this summer but beach camping in the Dominican Republic might take the cake
camping,,Weekend trip on the Blue River for Rainbow Trout
camping,,"Camping site at Kheerganga, Himachal Pradesh, India. 31st Jan, 2021."
camping,,A little winter camping last night during the winter storm in ny
camping,Where is the best place to find camp spots when all state parks in CA are closed because of covid?,Where to find campspots
camping,,A very cold night in the blue ridge mountains
camping,"I'm looking for a collection of campfire stories that I can take camping and read aloud around the fire on long dark summer nights. Ideally not just a 'spooky stories' book, but one that also has Jim Bridger-esque tall tales of all sorts of outdoor adventures. Anyone know of anything like that?",Anyone got a good book of campfire stories?
camping,[deleted],Thank you much! The shirts came out PERFECT!
camping,[deleted],Bought these for our best camping friends and they loved them. As you can see by the photo!
camping,,A playlist full of folk music that’s best listened to when sitting around a campfire!
camping,"Hi all, 

I’ve been trying to find a portable power station that I can charge with my car while I drive, that will power a small space heater overnight for a SUV sized room. Any recommendations/tips?

I can’t figure out the numbers behind battery output/input for either item",Question about space heater/power station needs
camping,,Need more rope
camping,[removed],"Mid December Covid hit our little town we live in when not camping. It got me, my wife, her brother, my sister in law, and her father along with several other dear friends of ours. We all survived. So now we donate to help others. Schedule your blood bank appointment today."
camping,,"Norwegian coastline view, from summer last year!"
camping,,Winter Camping in Northern Wisconsin
camping,,"What a scene it is !!! Do you know, what it is called?"
camping,,enjoying winter &amp; building fire in snow - viking style
camping,,"Winter camping in Jemez, NM"
camping,,Dutch Oven Enchiladas and Pizza From Last Weekend’s Camping Trip...
camping,,When I camped at Joshua Tree National Park for the first time last July.
camping,,Nice spot next to a farm
camping,,"Beautiful artwork, isn't it...?"
camping,[deleted],Nice spot next to a farm/Esbit Stove &amp; Crusader cup
camping,,Lowcountry camping in January
camping,[deleted],Lowcountry camping in January.
camping,[deleted],I do this design for my camping lover friends.
camping,,Fire
camping,,Windy conditions with the RTT. Had to strap the edge of the rain fly cover at night due to the flapping noise. Still great sleep with that ocean breeze.
camping,,Here is the summer and interior pics and story in comments
camping,,My Camping Setup.
camping,[deleted],My Camping Setup!!
camping,[deleted],My Camping Setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,[deleted],My camping setup!!
camping,,"Grand Bend, On, Canada late September last camp of the year! Beautiful. Had a little fake fire/heater action super cozy."
camping,,Beach camping Ho Tram Vietnam
camping,"Hello all: I'm a bit of a novice camper, and am wondering if the ""dispersed""/ primitive campsites around Big Bend are open without any reservations? There are several places that pop up on Google Maps when I search for ""dispersed camping Big Bend"", and I'm wondering if all of those are just sort of ""open"" on a first come, first served basis. I'm wondering what to do over spring break during the third week of March and could use some guidance. Is Big Bend feasible at all?",Primitive camping available around Big Bend?
camping,,Ocean glow
camping,,Our paradise
camping,,First time in new tent!!
camping,,Beach camping PNW
camping,,Camping in Bhamala a beautiful area surrounded by mountains with a river flowing next to it.
camping,"Hey guys, it would be awesome if some of you filled out this 15 question form :D

[https://forms.gle/aXAXpTdBC9KREHtu9](https://forms.gle/aXAXpTdBC9KREHtu9)

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you for sharing!","Your motivations, goals and frustrations during camping"
camping,,Rise and brapppp
camping,"What are some good places to camp in California during the winter? 3-4 Hrs Max from LA. 
Thanks🤙",Winter Camping California
camping,Have a nice day,Good morning beautiful people
camping,,Dispersed camping near Medicine Bow - August 2020
camping,[deleted],Dispersed camping near Medicine Bow
camping,,This was my home for two years in the Colorado mountains. I miss it everyday
camping,,The Big Dipper above our campsite this past summer. It's what I dream of when it's -25C outside.
camping,,before the storm rolled in.
camping,,"Clear -6° VT last night, snowshoe car camping"
camping,"I have a North face 700 down jacket. Which I want to wash but do not have any down jacket / sleeping bag type of laundry detergent are there any recommendations as what makes a good substitute laundry detergent for a down jacket?


Thank you",Down jacket washing
camping,"Driving to a camp site this summer that's about a 7 hour drive. 
There is a place about 2 hours we can stop and stock a lot of perishables and also pick up all varieties of ice. Not sure if we should pick up all food and ice at our stop, or at least prechill the cooler on the drive and then stock. 
4 nights it needs to last, we can pick up ice reasonably close to our campsite. 
Not sure what cooler to buy, what ice (or ice packs! to use, when to fill it (in relation to our long drive time), etc.!

What would you all recommend?",Need some tips on a cooler and how to pack it.
camping,[removed],Not everyone gets to go to bed on a full belly🥺
camping,[removed],Not everyone gets to go to bed on a full belly🥺
camping,"Hey all! Your posts have inspired me to finally take a camping road trip! I just booked 4 nights at Lost Claim campground outside Yosemite in May. Does anyone have experience with this campground? It looks near the park which is great since getting a campsite in Yosemite seems impossible. Unless there is something I'm missing?

Also, does anyone have suggestions for camping in or near Sequoia national park? Thanks in advance!",Planning my first camping road trip!
camping,,Weekend getaway to the tall pines of East Texas.
camping,,Did a test burn in my Solo Stove Titan today! Very impressed with it so far
camping,[deleted],It was cold so we slept inside
camping,,"Snow Camping - Mogollon Rim, AZ"
camping,[deleted],"Cold morning in Flagstaff, AZ"
camping,[deleted],Bedtime
camping,[deleted],He made it through a 20 degree night 🥶
camping,Need some advice on a new 6 person tent. We need a new one since our current tent is just to small for our cots and dog. I am planning on getting a small camper in the next year or two depending on finances. I’m on The fence if I want to get a better tent like the kodiak canvas or just go with the Coleman instant tent since I’m planning on the camper in the next couple years. I know as far as quality there really is no comparison but the cost is almost 400 difference. We’re camping into late fall for hunting in Colorado so weather and definitely wind is an issue. Any advice would be greatly appreciated,Cheap or expensive tent
camping,[removed],Doing the coast to coast (Devon) For charity in may any support would be much appreciated!
camping,"Hey folks, I'm sorry if this isn't the perfect sub for this, I've posted this in a few places and there's nowhere very specific to find the answer as there seems to be very little trace of this campground on the internet unless it goes by a different name. It's called East Rock Springs Campground, in the Sheldon National Antelope Refuge.

It's listed on google maps, there's a couple sparse entries about it if you search for it. There's no campground listed there on the forest service website (though maybe it'd be on another federal website?). There's two reviews on the google listing and they're fairly recent, saying it's an awesome spot, but that's about all there is. It looks like an incredible location. It shows up on google earth satellite and you can see a little path leading to what looks like could be a campground? This is the place on google earth.

[http://us.geoview.info/east\_rock\_spring\_campground,5703582](http://us.geoview.info/east_rock_spring_campground,5703582)

They do mention you need a capable 4x4 to get there, which I have, but obviously I'm a little hesitant to go miles and miles down back roads looking for some campground there's little documentation of. But then again, it couldn't hurt to try, right? Worse comes to worse I can probably boondock out there...

But there are a lot of people here, maybe someone's familiar with the place?",Little known campground in North Eastern Nevada - is it real?
camping,[deleted],Counting down the days until Summer! ~Olympic National Forest~
camping,"I do a lot of winter camping, and I typically camp with my girlfriend... so I’ve been thinking about purchasing a double wide sleeping pad to make things a little more warm/comfortable.

Currently, we both use the Klymit insulated static V sleeping pads, so I’ve been looking into the double version of that one... but I’m wondering what other options are out there. 

It needs to pack small enough for backpacking (I have a 65L bag), so something like a big exped mega mat would probably be too bulky.

There are a lot of cheap options on Amazon, but I would like to get something of higher quality, while not exceeding $250.

Any recommendations?",Double wide sleeping pad recommendations...
camping,,Starved Rock a Couple Weeks Ago.
camping,,Travel
camping,,Last spring’s camp trip to Valley of the Gods and Monument Valley. ⛺️🏕
camping,,Last summer’s camping trip at Green River lakes. 🛶⛵️🏕
camping,,Camping at Cathedral Valley⛺️🏔🏕
camping,[deleted],Camping at Cathedral Valley 🏔🏕⛺️
camping,"So, I'm in need of finding a camping buddy. I've gone solo a few times and I love it but I'd like to find someone who enjoys the outdoors like myself. Any tips on how to accomplish this?",Need a camping buddy
camping,[deleted],"Found a new fav campground in Key West, FL! Bahia Honda State Park was AWESOME!"
camping,,Living room camping on a cold and rainy PNW day.
camping,I’m looking to sell my Nissan 370Z to potentially lease or own something that I can use to camp with. I’m on a budget so I’m looking at cheap options beyond the Subaru Outback (which I’m considering),Cheap vehicles that are good to camp in?
camping,[deleted],It was extra cold so we slept inside
camping,,"Trying out the new ""suv"" air mattress vs. tent at Death Valley NP. Comfortable and warm! Sunrise from my car window."
camping,,Desert camping
camping,,Our 10x12 inside set up. Floor pads help with rocky surfaces. We also have a small ceramic heater &amp; coffee maker set up that's not seen in the photo. Nothing is better than staying snuggled up in a sleeping bag with a cup of coffee first thing on a chilly winter morning.
camping,,"Yellowstone was full up last Summer but I found a wonderful tent site just north in the Gallatin National Forest, MT. Love a good sunset."
camping,,Core 12 Person Instant Cabin test run
camping,[deleted],Spring Camping Trip to Cathedral Valley.
camping,[deleted],"Spring Camping trip to Cathedral Valley, UT!!"
camping,[deleted],Spring camping trip to Cathedral Valley and Monument Valley.
camping,[deleted],Spring Camping trip to Cathedral valley and Monument Valley..
camping,[deleted],"Spring camping trip Cathedral Valley and Monument Valley, UT."
camping,,My camp fire Tampere -19 degree C
camping,[deleted],Winter Camping near Moab..
camping,"I am seriously annoyed by how my piezo lighter doesn't light, even though I've emptied it and refilled it with lighter fluid.

I can see the piezo thingy causing sparks, but I have no idea how large the arcing light is supposed to be to ignite the gas.

The gas, obviously comes out of the lighter, and I've even managed to increase the gas flow a little, with no effect.

**Q: What could be wrong?** At this point I am more interested in knowing the issue, than getting the lighter working again.

I did noticed, some time ago, I got the lighter working again, as long as I stored it vertically, but that doesn't work when I try it again. Storing the lighter upright, does not make the lighter light up.

This lighter has a small window, so I can see what the level of gas liquid is inside at all times.

Somehow my mind is thinking of calculated expiration dates for consumer products, like light bulbs, but what could be wrong with this lighter? The piezo igniter seems to work.","My piezo lighter doesn't work, not even in room temperature, what could be wrong?"
camping,"Hi, I have a self-inflating sleeping pad and it can be pretty bulky rolled up in its bag on trips. I’m wondering if I can pack it folded along the back of my pack without damaging it? Couldn’t find any answer online. Thanks!",Question about self-inflating pads
camping,,Manti Lá Sal National Forrest
camping,"Me and my son are about to do our first wild camp in the next 3-4 weeks, our dog will be coming too. Location will be south west Scotland.  

Any tips, such as making a fire without scorching the ground, which food to cook in the fire, needs to appeal to a fussy 10 year old.  Going for a number 1 is easy enough what's the standard practice for number 2?

We want to try some basic bushcraft, any ideas on this?

Thanks.","First wild camp, any tips?"
camping,,Hey guys check out our YouTube channel and recent video
camping,"I have a Carinthia Defence 4 bag, which is rated at -15 degrees celcius comfort temperature. Even at 0 degrees I get very cold, and freeze all night. What should I do?",Freezing in my sleeping bag.
camping,,Camping in Australia done right. Share your set ups.
camping,,Dancing Flames
camping,,"Wanting to book 1-2 weeks of a campground, am i able to book this when the first day becomes available?"
camping,,You may not like it but this is what peak camping looks like!
camping,,Such a beautiful set for the day. Waiting for the new rise 🌄
camping,,Pic not the best. But steak and veggies skillet cooked over the campfire.
camping,,After the storm southwest montana usa summer 2020
camping,,Is it camping If you are not in the woods?
camping,,Is it camping if you are not in the woods?
camping,,Soul searching in the snow
camping,,"Campsite heaven in Willamette National Forest, Oregon"
camping,"I'm planning to camp for a couple months. From August to November. The biggest issue I'm having is finding a place to camp, preferably free but I have absolutely zero idea where to go. I want to go somewhere where I can be alone and not too dangerous because I've never camped this long before. I live in Florida currently but I'm willing to travel out of Florida to go anywhere.",Need help finding a place to camp for a couple months
camping,,Indoor camping
camping,"Hey all, are these a thing? I can’t find any online.",Foldable hot tent stove
camping,,"How To Make Baked Potatoes In A Campfire - Campfire Meal, Grill Survival..."
camping,,Snow turns camping into something hilarious. Location : Turkey / Belgrad Forest
camping,,Camping last night in Michigan Waterloo recreation
camping,,A silent camp in the woods of western Turkey
camping,,"Snow in California - Camp Nelson CA, in the Sequoia National Park"
camping,,"Couple of months ago we discovered a white sandy creek oasis about three miles down the river in Tuskegee National Forrest in Alabama, and last night we finally camped it."
camping,,Smoked Prime Rib at our annual deer hunt
camping,So I am curious on what are the popular/easy methods to keep your blades ( knife or axe) sharp while your in the bush. I know that if I'm only out for a day or few days my blades probably aren't going to become so dull they will be useless but I was thinking about a long term survival situation. Does anyone take a sharpening stone with them and if so what kind?,Keeping blades sharp
camping,,My favorite part about camping is the company
camping,"I have access to a lot of granite countertop cutouts.  The size of a sink or end piece of a large slab.  They are just a rock that is cut about an inch thick and polished on one side.  They make GREAT flat areas for camping cooking or anything a countertop can be used for.  Is it wrong to leave one of these at a campsite for the next person?  Not National Parks or private camping sites, but end/side of the road State or National Forest unpaid sites people use once in a while.  It is just rock. Toss it on another rock and they shatter into smaller rocks.",Is bringing a rock from one location to another and leaving it bad thing?
camping,,"Sunrise Campfire &amp; Coffee— Henry Horton State Park, TN"
camping,"Like the title states, I’ve got 3 days of PTO to burn by the end of March and with weekends and days off needed during the week I could stretch it to 6-7 days in a row. 

I live in PA and would prefer to not be camping in freezing weather. I’m considering any states south of me and would prefer to not go lower than SC. 

What places that fit this criteria are worth checking out for the camping but also the nice weather?!",PTO to burn by March
camping,,fındık içi
camping,,"Beautiful sunrise with a sea of fog on the way to Zion National Park, Southern Utah"
camping,,Little surprise waking up to a collapsed tent with a couple inches of snow in AZ. Good thing we packed the necessities to make our morning a little better.
camping,"A camping trip to Green River Lakes, Wyoming last summer..

https://preview.redd.it/3u4d0dbthhe61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=7f909dcf350e291a663fadb714ca89f2780617e2

*Processing img wtv19tcthhe61...*

https://preview.redd.it/a2n70gcthhe61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=c7b9b31b509f8134da9518771514a3c7da3be038","Green River Lakes, Wyoming."
camping,[deleted],"Green River Lake, Wyoming."
camping,"I love to camp. To me the best trip is remote and private, a challange to acess, weather backpacking or trucking. A clear night to cowboy camp under the stars. And a fire roasted hot dog. And some friends to share the time with.

To my wife- its a queen sized air matress inside an instant pop up tent with a rug and a heater. An entire refrigerator to cook meals on the bbq and both our dogs for company.

I also enjoy her style, but she dose not enjoy mine.",What is your ideal camp?
camping,,Night one was freezing but beautiful. Tonight in South Carolina it should be warmer but half an inch of rain on the way overnight. First trial in the rain.
camping,,My current situation.
camping,,Camping @ GEMINI BRIDGES
camping,Winter camping trip Veterans Day 2019!!,Winter camping @ Gemini Bridges near Canyonlands N.P. !!
camping,"I think I can conclude that I do not prefer winter camping in -20 deg C. 

I think I would prefer -5 deg C or -10 deg C.

In -14 deg C, I had a fairly good time in my sleeping bag, having a sleeping bag that should be ""usable"" down to -25 deg C. However at -20 deg C I could feel a chill presumably from the zipper line, which was only covered by some thinner bit of fabric and maybe a little filling.

Changing clothing in -20 deg C was surprisingly ok, probably helped by having dry clothing available ofc.

Putting on ""ice cold"" boots in -20 deg C, was also surprisingly trivial, and did not feel freezing cold, because I had dry socks and also had been previously using a shopping bag around each foot out in the cold.

By the campfire I got smoke in my eyes and I got tears in my eyes, and I felt my eyelashes starting to freeze. :D

My campfire lit up with one match though (firestarter heh), as I had been careful using dry wood only. I found some possibly non-dry wood from a fallen tree that blocked a trail and had to be sawed off, so I put two long logs at the bottom of the campfire to better reflect the heat and eventually those too at the bottom started to burn.

I was happy I had been using an assortment of hand liners, gloves and mittens, incl. thin water proof construction worker gloves.

When I got up in the night, feeling the chill in -20 deg C, and I had to take a piss, I had to make a decision if I wanted to try go at it, for the next 6 hours, or just walk home, so I walked home. :)

I had also been using a 1+ liter hot water flask (w. proper screw plug), and I noticed that the bag was still moderately warm after 6 hours being in the sleeping bag, but even with the hot water flask, the chill I felt was not fun and I wasn't sure what was wrong. Could be that it was the zipper area, or, that my neck strap did not fully seal my upper part of the body, even though I tried to make sure I had a tight fit.

I will now probably camp in less freezing conditiosn and also look into what a better sleeping bag might look like.",-20 C camping woes
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/tx70u92mnge61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=5325266714313acceb2fe2f7a1f0454e06254151

https://preview.redd.it/f0bzdi2mnge61.jpg?width=6000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a31f70b47f56c7af28548089493bb4e6b4511e7f",Winter camping near Canyonlands N.P. last winter!!!
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 62r08r1lmge61...*

*Processing img 4z52fr1lmge61...*",Winter Camping last winter near Canyonlands N.P.
camping,,"Island camping , narragansett bay RHODE ISLAND. 3 summers ago"
camping,,Go camping they said. Get away from people. Enjoy nature
camping,,"I love winter camping! Here are a few shots from my most recent camping trip. Spent the night near second peak of Mt Seymour n ar Vancouver, BC. Camping in the winter is a bit more challenging than the other seasons, but with the right equipment and the right experience it is amazing!"
camping,,Glamping in South China with my girl. We are camping rookies who love the vibe.
camping,,"Not so much winter camping, but camping at Lunch Counter on Mt Adams in Washington state last September. Had to knock the ice off my tent the next morning, but the stars were amazing that night. Two day hike up."
camping,Hey All.  I am planning a campervan trip in June to Oregon with my daughter (9) and brother (not 9).  Any recommendations for places to go inland oregon would be appreciated.  My brother has done the coast so we want to try other things.  Looking for recs you wouldn't find on a standard goolge search.,Oregon Campervan trip
camping,"Hey everybody,

Noob camper here. I’m taking my family (wife and 3 young children) camping in a couple weeks at Sam Houston National Forest. It will be my first time truly camping, but as we are moving to Denver in a few months, and intend to really get into more outdoor living with the kids, we figured this would be a good start. While I don’t have a lot of experience camping, I do consider myself to be relatively capable outdoors, so I’m looking forward to finding out how right or wrong I am.

We have most of the essentials taken care of already (tent, sleep mat and bags, and various other items), but the one thing I’m very curious about is food. Option 1 is obviously to just bring a cooler and make sandwiches, but I’d like to cook at least 1 might. My wife thinks we need to just buy a stove, while I’d prefer to try cooking over a campfire. I’d be interested to know how much of a learning curve there is to cooking with a fire.

Also any other tips anyone can provide are welcome!",Camp cooking
camping,,Since we’re doing winter trips... my buddy and I a couple years back at flagstaff lake. 5 mile hike in and out!
camping,,Snow camping up on Mt. Rainier
camping,,🧟‍♀️
camping,,Summer vibes
camping,,Roof top on the Mississippi
camping,I just purchased a berghaus air 8 and I am interested in buying the air porch however im just wondering am I able to use any tent porch or does it have to be berghaus specific.,Berghaus air8 and porch question
camping,,All set up for a great weekend of camping.
camping,"Planning a travel to New England in the spring, traveling from FLA to MASS and would like to stay at interesting, tiny campgrounds - like Trimble Park, in Mount Dora, FLA. Little county parks, etc.  Suggestions????  Cautions?","Suggestions for small (say, County) campgrounds from FLA to MASS"
camping," TL/DR: just curious what others do in regards to campsite layout to fend off critters.

I’ve grilled tasty smelling foods on grills and made stews in Dutch ovens for most of my camping life. With that even though food and garbage was stored in the car after dinner my campsites were typically visited by various scavenging omnivores during the night. I’m pretty sure it was the remnants of cooking grease that attracted them.

They would come check out the tent even though I would wear different clothes than I cooked in. I would hear stuff get knocked over outside the tent, you know typical stuff.

I tried an experiment the last five campouts. I was hiking / dispersed camping. My fire and cook area was at least a hundred feet away from my sleep area. Plus I only made easy meals with a single pot and an alcohol stove. Nothing with a heavy aroma but yet still tasty. I left no food bits behind as is my general practice. My food bag was hung somewhere between the cooking area and my hammock.

The only animals that I encountered were deer. In one case there were a pair of bucks running around a nearby clearing snorting and clicking at each other in the full overhead moonlight.

The other was a deer at dawn who saw my hammock and kept smacking his hoof on the ground while he stared at me. Both truly cool experiences.

Other than that, no trash pandas, bears or anything bothered my campsite at night.

Do you think 100’ away is overkill for campfires or cooking?",What is your typical distance between campfire / cooking area and where you sleep?
camping,,We are buying some large acreage and planning on having a few campsites. Do you use private campsites and what do you look for in a campsite? Thank you.
camping,,What price are you paying for insurance on a class B RV.
camping,,Fire is life in the outdoors
camping,,Fire is life in the outdoors
camping,"I just picked up a new 4-season bivy and want to try it out in the snow. The location I was planning on testing it out is a campground in the summer, but in the winter it's mostly unused. It's right beside a fairly busy cross-country skiing trail and a snowshoe trail, about 2-3 hours by snowshoe from a ski resort.

The problem I have is that the new bivy is bright orange and kinda looks like an emergency shelter. I'm worried that someone might see me from one of the trails and think I'm in trouble. Is there a good way to mark the site and make it look like I'm there intentionally? My plan is to dig a trench to sleep in (for the wind) and then mark around it with flagging tape on sticks so I don't get stepped on if it snows. I'll also have my rucksack and snowshoes there outside the bivy which might help.

I still want to be fairly visible so that I can be found easily if something goes wrong and I don't return when I'm supposed to, but I also don't really want to be bothered if everything is fine.

Has anyone dealt with this before? Am I just overthinking it? Any advice is appreciated.",Worried about bivy bag looking like an emergency
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,RV Life - Joshua Tree National Park Part 2 - RV Living
camping,,Beautiful please
camping,,"Recent find, they seem like they're in good shape. Any advice before I head out in snow?"
camping,,Nature Photos
camping,,"After years of taking long exposure and time-lapse photography across the country, I’ve finally put them all together. If you want to see more content like this, please follow @crucible_pictures on Instagram."
camping,,Sights and sounds of the snowy Squamish river
camping,"Hey everyone I was thinking about getting a Hennessey hammock. Seen quite a few videos of them being used and they look great. They seem packable, light and easy to set up. Anyone have any experience with these hammocks? Or can anyone suggest another dependable hammock. TIA",Hennessey Hammock
camping,,"Sometimes, you just make do. This was one of our winter backpacking trips in the Sierra Nevada."
camping,,Trip with family and friends location: Jeddah-Saudi Arabia
camping,,*!$##?!***!!! Free campers. #sberryrvcamper. Rhode island USA
camping,,Camping at the beach!
camping,"It’s just as simple as that, folks. I want to make sure I don’t freeze (especially if there’s wind/rain and a fire is not viable). Any general tips or gear recommendations? The temperature where I’m going averages 35to15F/2to-9C.",Prepping for first winter camping trip! Advice?
camping,,Winter / Late season hammock camping. Would this work in conjunction with a sleeping bag and nothing else? Or do I need to get an under quilt with a sleeping bag and a static pad (blow up air mat that would normally keep me off the ground).
camping,"Hello! Need some advice on what to get. It must be big enough for a family of four

Thanks",Best cast iron pot for campfire cooking
camping,,"luckily the campground was full so we found this spot literally on the edge of the Mogollon Rim instead (Payson in the distance, 2k ft down) (a few years ago)"
camping,"I live in the Atlanta area and have a tent for my Jeep Cherokee. Two dry runs in my backyard with the new gear so far, one field run a dozen miles away, and now this weekend I head about 100 miles northeast solo to Lake Keowee in South Carolina (near Clemson) for two nights. First nights in rain. 

Where are y’all off to this weekend, what’s the weather your are expecting and what gear are you running?","Where is everyone camping this weekend, starting January 29th, 2021?"
camping,,North woods during a snow storm. Nothing and everything at the same time. -In the woods we return to reason and faith. -Ralph Waldo Emerson-
camping,,I just picked up a new T.
camping,,Comparativa de aislamientos
camping,,"Seasoned steak in the of Wadi Abaythran, Saudi Arabia"
camping,,"A dog, a hammock and a campfire"
camping,I was thinking of taking my family camping this summer and have heard great things about moose river plains in the adirondacks. Was wondering if anyone had recommendations on which camp sites are best for seclusion fishing and swimming in this area,Recommendations for Moose river plains adirondacks
camping,,Pleasant Valley Campground on the Owens during the 2020 fires
camping,,The iKamper withstood another snowstorm in the Sierras (Shaver Lake). Life is good. https://youtu.be/66PkmoRiQyQ
camping,I am taking my kids camping for the first time this summer I haven't gone since my oldest was born so about 4-5 years. I'm a relatively experienced camper.  I'm looking for suggestions of places to camp whether it's a campground or primitive camping between central New York and the Adirondacks. Preferably free with easy access to fishing and swimming. I hate camping at a campground right on top of other people's camp sites. Usually I would just hike in one of the parks but having small children I'd like somewhere I can have my car near the camp. All suggestions are appreciated!,Looking for secluded family camping in central new york
camping,,Savings Store
camping,,"Camping in Gleeson’s Landing, South Australia"
camping,,There must be sufficient preparation for every expedition in the wild.
camping,,"Camping in Killarney Provincial Park, Ontario"
camping,,Moonrise on the Mojave Desert
camping,What are your must-have items/equipment for a week-long backpacking?,Backpacking
camping,,"Just patiently waiting to go camping again, in the meantime, I guess I'll start updating gear"
camping,,"""fire and the nigh sky are two things you can look at for hours"""
camping,,Can't Wait for the Sun Again in Western Ontario
camping,"Going on my first solo trip on Saturday with the dog. Figure I would go easy and do limit cooking sense I am still buying gear. Can anyone recommend an easy and simple meal to cook for dinner? Breakfast is simple with cowboy coffee and bacon and eggs. Only cook supplies I have are a cast iron skillet and the basic kit you get for hiking. I have a 1 burner colemans stove I was going to bring, but will have access to a fire pit. Any suggestions???",Meal ideas?
camping,,Camping just outside of Austin! Pretty cool spot. Russell Park.
camping,[removed],Help me out by answering this quick survey
camping,,Market research survey
camping,[removed],Help me out by answering this short survey
camping,"I live in the DC Metro area and am looking for an escape. I’m looking to go out to the mountains with my dog, and seeing as its winter I was looking for a cabin. I’m not looking for anything fancy, but I definitely want something off the beaten path with nice mountain or forest views.

I’m probably not looking at the best sites or just expecting a bit too much. Most of what I’m finding is houses or “cabins” in town and/or meant for 4+ people. It’s literally just me and my 35lb dog.

I’m willing to travel up to 6 hours for this getaway - but given COVID restrictions I know some areas may not be an option.

Any recommendations are appreciated!",Looking for Recommendations: Rustic Cabin Camping and Pet-Friendly
camping,"I work at a cpground and we are thinking of building a hammock site with permanent posts. I have never used one before. Anyone have a layout of a design for a site? And those who do hammock camp, what are some of the good and bad of developed hammock sites?",Hammock camping
camping,"Sup yall,

Thinking of heading up to trona Saturday morning, some good rain is expected Friday nigh.  I've never been up there, I'm wondering if its a gamble, are the roads sandy? more gravel packed? any pointers would be great.

Cheers!",Trona Pinnacles post rain?
camping,,Fire roasted chicken for the camp family!
camping,,I'm in! Let's go.
camping,"Those in CA, with the restrictions lifted, are any campgrounds open again? Hard to tell.",Bay Area/Northern California Campgrounds open now?
camping,"Hammocking with my son on an island 2019. 2020 trip got cancelled because of...  well you know.

&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/vdlj2howp3e61.png?width=2390&amp;format=png&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=a1b1853c25b6047133b73d9a4d5c6a388bf8c5f1",Hammock camping on an island
camping,,"Campfire and beautiful sunset at Harriman State Park, NY"
camping,"I just booked a site at fish creek in Glacier NP, in my rush to get a site before they're all gone I didn't really look it over too much, until after when I notice that it says ""site not suitable for tents"", even though they let me choose a tent as my equipment and have it listed on the site as being allowed. What do they mean? Am I going to have problems setting up when I get there?","Site not suitable for tents- but tents are ""allowable equipment"". What does that mean?"
camping,,The Onion is throwing shade
camping,,a four-day trip to the cabin in the southern part of Norway
camping,,"Tough picture to capture, but my most exciting camping to date! Camping at the base of Volcan Pacaya in Guatemala! Yes, that’s lava in the background!"
camping,,Fodable rocket stove i made for a camper.
camping,"I’m not from the island but my dad and sister we’re born there. Dad is what you call an ex-pat and sister hasn’t been since birth. 

I have traveled to the island a handful of times always staying with aunts and uncles who are all much older now. They don’t really hike and camp they are more the casino type. 

Is a solo camping trip to Puerto Rico feasible? I do speak Spanish and look like and islander. Has anyone camped and if so where on the island. Looking to stay near family in case (Arecibo Area), but open to any ideas or suggestions.",Puerto Rico Camping advice 🇵🇷
camping,,I survived the night with my best friend during NC’s snowstorm (hammock camp)
camping,[removed],Best Honey benefits in health
camping,,Geertop camping tent - TopRoad 3// Three colors options. Do you guys like it?!
camping,"So I brought ketchup with me camping, in the freezing cold. I thought I could just thawn the frozen bottle of ketchup somehow, but now I am not sure what to do, because it seems obvious to me that the ketchup would re-freeze several times over if one leave it in the cold over serveral days.

Maybe ketchup bags would be better? Thawns more easily and portions better?",How do I best thawn a bottle of ketchup in winter?
camping,,Best camping sites in north India
camping,,Good morning beautiful people
camping,,Find great camping products on gobigshoppe.com with FREE shipping worldwide.
camping,Hey I’m in Missouri and was wondering the best places to go camping in the Colorado mountains. Also please give any info that may be needed. Like passes I might have to get,Colorado camping
camping,,Doggos bed for camping. Anyone got something similar?
camping,,Beautiful sun rise &amp; Camping @Hong Kong
camping,,Went solo camping and this happened. Run in with a Cougar!🐱
camping,,Campground at Havasupai falls
camping,,Camping from above
camping,,Winter camping from 2 years ago. Going again next week.
camping,how about you?,i like camping
camping,I’m looking for a place to camp/ bushcraft for a week in Michigan does anyone know of any cool spots?,Best places in Michigan?
camping,,🍻Cheers🍻
camping,,About today's morning stroll!
camping,,"Lijiang, a healthy place to escape city stress, with an excellent environment and leisurely lifestyle"
camping,So anyone go cold weather camping with their dog?  I'm teething to figure out what to take for my border collie when we go out.  I have boots and coat.  Not sure what else to specialize for cold weather.  She goes during warm weather with me all the time.,Doggie Camping?
camping,"I was wondering if anyone knows of any good spots for overnight car/van camping in or around Big Bear Resort. I have a Sprinter Van that can fit essentially anywhere a car does, but unfortunately it's not AWD, preventing me from getting to anywhere too tricky. 

I'm originally from Salt Lake, so I'm used to the snow, but don't have any frame of reference for Big Bear during the winter. Ideally I'm looking for anywhere to park overnight, somewhere that I won't get ticketed or hassled. 

Curious if there are any year round campsites, overnight lots, dispersed camping, etc. 

Any advice is appreciated!","Big Bear Resort, CA - Winter Van Camping"
camping,,Plaid pals 👯‍♂️😎 couldn’t be cooler
camping,[deleted],"Camping alone, until I can camp w/ friends."
camping,,"Camping alone, until I can camp w/ friends."
camping,"What are some of your most trusted and needed ""things"" for car camping?  
Thinking about seeing some National Parks and instead of a camper or hotels, I think that living in my SUV would be a good idea. I know campstove/pots &amp; pans/cast iron, blankets, cooler.   
But what are some other ones you have used in the past and continue in the future?  


Bonus points for any campsites you have used in the past.",US national Parks Car Camping Essentials?
camping,,My almost monthly Mojave desert getaway pics from last month dec 2020. It was cold asf for me.
camping,,Hello everyone! Me and my best friend Mentos went out to the woods this Saturday. And i made some tasty dinner! Butter cooked turkey with onion infused shroom sauce besides freshly cooked potatoes. I hardly recommend to try out recipe! Video ? ---&gt; https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2Co63mAQJBY
camping,Looking for a place to set up camp in two weeks! Would love a super scenic view to wake up to. Any recs out there?,Campsites with a view in North Carolina?
camping,,Just received this hand forged axe / hatchet. What’s something I can use to preserve and protect the wood and my hands from abuse? Just oil? Or gloves....
camping,,"4,000 mile Family Vacation, 38 people total (all vehicles/campers traveled together)"
camping,,View from the van - Grand Teton National Park - Wyoming
camping,,Our Solo Stove Ranger in action. Loving this!!!
camping,,"We had no plans for the day, so we figured why not walk a few hundred metres into the woods and make the fish soup outside instead? Hallingdalen, Norway"
camping,Can't wait to get back out camping once lockdown lifts. Missing some nice sunrises and sunsets being stuck at home.,missing camping
camping,[removed],Asking for help
camping,[removed],"If you want to get $200 Amazon Gift Card free, click here and submit email."
camping,,Thought someone here might find this useful.
camping,,"Perspective is a humbling thing. I heard a lot of complaints about how the quarantine impacted the mind of many, in a negative way. It impacted mine in a positive one."
camping,,Our Wilderness Escape Mobile Camper
camping,,Took this photo last october in eastern Finland and just realized that i love it as wallpaper awell.
camping,,The solo stove... My favorite spontaneous facebook purchase.
camping,,Any one have any personal methods of dealing with mosquitos and black flies while spring/summer camping in northern ontario?
camping,,レッドレーザーポインター100mw指し棒型 赤色レーザーペン型レーザーポインター 強力
camping,"We camped here for 4 nights between Christmas and New Year.

*Processing img 1817lgqgold61...*",Camping at Al Sila in the Arabian Gulf
camping,,"Camping at Ft Jefferson, Dry Tortugas NP. 70 miles west of Key West FL, it's got the best beach in the Keys and a night sky to die for"
camping,,"Camping at Ft Jefferson, Dry Tortugas NP. 70 miles west of Key West. Best beach in the Keys, and billions of stars at night. Worth the effort!"
camping,I am looking for a good travel guide or book that includes state parks all around in the US. Any good recommendation?,State park guide recommendation
camping,,My First ever Winter Overnighter! I did it under a small hennessy hammock tarp and managed to get a big fire going - very cozy! 😊
camping,"Hey all, looking for some experienced folks who have the GSI cookset. I love to cook outside and did a lot in scouts. 

I’m intrigued by the pack-ability of the sets. In the perfect world, I’d get the Pinnacle full camper set, but honestly as a single guy, the backpacker seems enough for me. Anyone have the Bugaboo instead? I’m down for a lower price if they preform similar. 

Love to car camp, and I’m looking for something to help me stay out in the woods longer. Around two nights. Interested in MSR too if they have a good option.",Anyone have the GSI cookset?
camping,"I have 3 big dogs. 1 is a boxer/Rottweiler, 1 is a husky, and the other one is a pitbull/black lab. My concern is how to keep them in the area. I was looking for portable fences or something. We have stakes for the ground but I'm so paranoid about them pulling it out, which happened once. 

We can't afford a rv or a rv rental. I would like to get your ideas and inputs on this. I miss camping and my pups hold me back from going back out.","I have 3 big dogs and want to go camping, but I got concerns."
camping,,"Montgomery Bell State Park, TN"
camping,"I've gone camping with my family multiple times when I was younger, I'm now 25 with a wife and daughter, and I really want to get back into camping. I have a large tent, chairs, and an air mattress, that's about it. I'm just wondering what are your guys must haves for camping? Any tools that make your experience that much better? I'd love to hear. Thank you!",What are your camping must haves??
camping,,New to camping. What tents do you guys recommend for 5 or so people?
camping,,First winter camping trip on top of « mont des morios » in Quebec. -16 celsius with winds up to 65 km/h
camping,My close group of friends never like camping and never want to come along with me and the few times they have come they complain a lot. How do I go about this because I’m willing to go almost every weekend. I’m willing to go by myself 18(f) but kinda worried if anything bad were to happen. For the people that solo camp do you have helpful emergency items? Do I need a new group of friends? Jk but fr.,My friends hate camping!
camping,"Hey everyone, I'm looking to order a tent in time for valentine's day, and I've tried looking around the discount websites, and I think I've narrowed my choices down.

Ideally, what I buy will be useful in future genuine camping endeavors.  My girlfriend and I aren't \*hardcore\* outdoorsy people, but we enjoy hiking and I want to introduce her to some good camping experiences in the future.  This tent can serve as (A) bonafide camping gear, or (B) a cheap shelter that we can bring along if we decide to include other people and have (by then) bought a better separate tent for ourselves.

I think [this Stoic Driftwood 3](https://www.steepandcheap.com/stoic-driftwood-3-tent-3-person-3-season) would serve well for (A), while [this Wakeman 6-person](https://www.overstock.com/Sports-Toys/6-Person-Tent-Water-Resistant-Dome-Tent-for-Camping-With-Removable-Rain-Fly-And-Carry-Bag-Blue-By-Wakeman-Outdoors/15439589/product.html?refccid=6JIEM6DEDS6LGGSBC5I54SFTCM&amp;searchidx=39&amp;kwds=camping%20tents&amp;rfmt=top_rated%3ATop%20Rated) seems to fulfill the goals of (B).

For the sake of my uses for V-day, spaciousness, and comfort is more important to me than durability/quality/utility - which is why I'm even considering the Wakeman.  What I'm looking for by way of feedback is whether the I should dismiss the Wakeman entirely because it's crap, or whether I should skip on the Stoic because I'll probably find a good deal on a good quality 2-3 person tent in the future.  I only really see myself pulling the trigger on something like the Stoic (or any comparable alternatives provided below) if it's pointed out that the sale opportunity is really crazy.

Thanks!",Help me pick a tent!
camping,,"Wanted to share my Portable All-In-One Kitchen kit! It's waterproof, dustproof, crushproof, and contains everything I need for food prep. Modded from a hard-case &amp; can withstand any weather that's thrown at it."
camping,,The most important thing you need to know when camping!
camping,Looking for a good bag to use as a edc,Looking for a good edc for outdoors
camping,It would be really beneficial to get advice from women about some camping related things,Is there an active subreddit for women and camping?
camping,,Another camping trip in the books. Can’t wait to head north for the spring.
camping,,Another camping trip in the books. Can’t wait to head north for the spring.
camping,,https://sociali.io/ref/gu51874460
camping,"So I'm new to the bushcraft field but I've been doing a lot of research and am in the process of getting some gear I can rely on. I haven't had the opportunity to go out in the field because I personally do not own any land nor do I know anyone at the moment who has sufficient wooded area that I could practice. So I've been looking in to camping around lakes, rivers etc. However I have been worried about the legal aspect. I prefer not to trespass on someone's land and cut anything down because I wouldn't want someone to do that to me. Also I have found that the government land that surrounds the lakes they do not allow camping off of a developed site (sites that have water and electric hookups and there are some ""primitive"" sites that's just a cleared area with a gravel patch for a tent.) Any suggestions? TIA",New to bushcraft and need advice
camping,,Summer Camping
camping,We love camping at the beach but I hate vacuuming sand out and finding it for weeks after the trip... We want to camp off the water and have the same great time minus the sand. So I was wondering if there are any good rivers or lakes that are around the San Antonio or Austin TX area that can provide the same great vibes?,Best place to camp/overland off the water that is NOT the beach?
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 0tjoauwi9id61...*",Camping in the Arabian Gulf at Al Si'la near the UAE /Saudi border
camping,"Hi. I own this.

I have used it half a dozen times. When I do so, all my friends and family make comments like ""Oh so we glamping"" and then they're so happy and cozy. It is \*absolutely\* required to use a 10x10 straight leg tent with this. The photo says ""canopy not included"" but it should say ""canopy and frame not included"" Kind of expensive altogether but I adore it. I originally bought it to lure my non-outdoorsy friends and fam to camping but honestly now even I love it and I never thought I'd love car camping so much. ( I'm mainly a backpacker )

[https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-7-Person-2-in-1-Screenhouse-Connect-Tent-with-Sewn-in-Floor/677979266](https://www.walmart.com/ip/Ozark-Trail-7-Person-2-in-1-Screenhouse-Connect-Tent-with-Sewn-in-Floor/677979266)

Now is a good time to buy. It sells out all summer.

&amp;#x200B;

I use two cots in it but it would easily fit 4 cots.","For those who like it lush, this is the single greatest tent of all time. G.O.A.T."
camping,"  

**Bell Tent Sussex**

Luxury Family **Bell Tents for sale** for, glamping and festivals camping, lovingly handcrafted with 100% organic cotton canvas. A waterproof unzippable tent, perfect camping tents all year round. 

[www.belltentsussex.co.uk](http://www.belltentsussex.co.uk/) 

Our 100% cotton canvas bell tents make a great option for camping in the great outdoors. We offer tents from 3 meters to 6 meters that provide ample room for family and friends. We cherish the fact that the product is made with organic, premium quality cotton canvas for long-lasting use. All camping tents are crafted 280 GSM canvas materials for durability and longevity.

For convenience, these tents are faster to set up without worrying over their tension and tightness of the pegs and poles. It comes with strong guy ropes and heavy duty quality pegs, and poles. Our tents have galvanized steel tube and copper-zinc coated for better stability. They’re also easy to carry and very convenient for storage.

All our bell tents our waterproof and strong enough to endure the harshest of weathers. Our tents of all sizes have thick PVC flooring for better protection against dirt and grime and are fully zipped and sealed making them 100% waterproof, also keeps out ALL bugs.

What’s more it has 4 half-moon windows and 4 vents on the apex that are meshed for better breathability. Our Bell Tents also come with a polyester anti-bug net to get rid of those pesky mosquitoes.

Bell Tent Sussex also sells portable wood burning stoves, perfect for inside the bell tents, canvas awnings, cast iron tea pots, coir mats, air beds and much more.

To look at our range of products please see links below, we have a live online chat, so feel free to ask us any questions you may have. 

[www.belltentsussex.co.uk](http://www.belltentsussex.co.uk/) 

3m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-3-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-3-metre/)

4m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-4-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-4-metre/)

5m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-5-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-5-metre/)

6m Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-6-metre/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/bell-tent-6-metre/) 

Porch For Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/arc-porch/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/arc-porch/) 

Awning For Bell Tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/canopy-awning/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/canopy-awning/) 

Stoves For Bell tent - [https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/portable-wood-burning-stove/](https://belltentsussex.co.uk/product/portable-wood-burning-stove/)",Bell tent Sussex
camping,"I really wanted to go to this campsite I like being at, but with snow and additional snow fall, I was simply exhausted and failing to complete the last 10% of the trip, and I had to put up my tent near a trail. Pushing on was just not an option.

Worse still, I spent two hours unable to get a campfire started at -14 deg C the next morning. Luckily I could make warm food by boiling water. The sleeping bag was warm, so that was nice, but the nose got cold. I will try bring  a filter mask and cut holes in it, to protect the nose a little while not really blocking air, maybe that will help keep the nose warmer. I even wore a bakalava, but it only has a small piece of fabric covering the nose and the bakalava (face mask) wasn't enough to keep the nose warm.

I did not want to quit, but I can't stay out there atm, so I went home without my gear, but I did take the time to stopming up a path through the snow the final 10% of the way. Luckily I managed to find the unmarked trail spot on, a second time, after the second snow fall, so that was fun. Some snapped branches indicates where the trail goes, but those marker aren't everywhere.

I think I will stay home for a few days and get back out, hopefully after the weather gets a little warmer, in some days it will be -15 outside, and probalby -18 in the forest.

I also had a firebox that I failed to light, so I made sure to bring it home, loosing a kilo of weight from my backpack that way. I also noticed that I had somehow brought ten pegs, probably another 200-300g weight I brought home as well. I don't need the tent pegs in winter.

I will go out again soon and bring more spirit fuel, firestarters and a woolen sweater, lots of matches and most importantly, plenty of plain woolen socks (not the thick one I already sleep with those).

So, btw, I tried out a new thing on this trip. Using leather boots, in addition to adding the goo to try seal the leather from water a couple of days before, I also used to shopping bags in plastic, in my boots. This I think helped me keeping me more warm, preventing sweat to soak the leather boots on the inside. It worked nicely. I also use various soles. Foam soal which is comfy, and soles for better insulation and warmth.","Had to quit sort of, things didn't go as planned (backpacking)"
camping,,Beautiful natural mosaics were everywhere this past weekend.
camping,"Attention all Adirondack park campers! I have a poll in r/Sacandagacampground. Come vote on your favorite spots and join the subreddit if you want. hope to see you all participate.

\-Aiden snyder

   mod of r/Sacandagacampground",Sacandaga campground poll
camping,,Our very first time camping and stargazing. I can't wait to find some more spots to try out!
camping,,AZ winter camping comes highly recommended.
camping,,"I quit my job as an RN in October to have more time and better mental health for my kids. This was our celebration trip to Blue Valley Campground near Highlands, NC. Their first “roughin it” trip, they did great!"
camping,"Hello! I'm wondering if it's ok to set up a tent in a park for a few hours. I've tried looking it up online, but it seems like it's only an issue if someone is sleeping in a tent overnight. I'm trying to find some alone time with my bf (we both live with our parents, and we don't want to stay in a hotel due to COVID), so I was wondering if a tent being up for a few hours would be a legal issue.

I live in California if that makes a difference.

Thank you!",Can I set up a tent anywhere (as long as it's not overnight)?
camping,,"There was a massive storm during the night, water dripping through the tent, and harsh winds. At one point I felt the ground shake, only to realise in the morning that a tree had fallen, fortunately it fell in a perfect arch over my tent"
camping,,"View from my tent on the Mogollon Rim, AZ"
camping,,"Morning on the swamp, Tickfaw State Park, Springfield, LA."
camping,"Ive never camped before in my life but have always wanted to go out and escape the city for a couple days. Im a nyc city guy (19yrs old). Been watching a lot of camping tips and stuff on youtube. I want to know your opinions on if i should go solo camping, and if not how can i get into the camping scene without anyone to personally show me.",First time camping (solo)
camping,,"A Man and his Dog Make Camp- Shenandoah VA, Cub Run Rd"
camping,,Remembering the backing through Tennessee this past summer
camping,,missing setting up camp with this guy at lake tahoe this summer
camping,,Winter camp - NorCo
camping,,Weekend trip to the Gila Forest in NM
camping,"I am getting an RV in May 2021. I'm thinking of ideas about where to stay, what to do. What are the suggestions and handy tips that you would give to a fellow camper?",Help for the first camping trip?
camping,,My first time camping in snow!
camping,"I apologise if this isn't allowed but wanted to try and reach as many people as possible. 

This year my partner will be taking on the mammoth task of walking 117miles from coast to coast in memory of our son George who was sadly born sleeping last year in April at just 5 months in pregnancy. He will be doing this for a charity who helped us with the service we held for George. Please click the link and consider donating so the charity can continue helping other parents financially unable to have the funeral/memorial of there wishes for their precious baby/child. [https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory#.X6rWaXbZClY.facebook](https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory#.X6rWaXbZClY.facebook)",in memory of baby George
camping,We have tented in the past as a couple but this year we will have a 1 year old. Does anybody tent with a toddler?? Or anybody with a family have a truck tent? Any advice or special gear? Hopeful for a fun summer of outdoors! Thanks!! :),Family camping
camping,I’m in the market for a queen sized air mattress and two twin air mattresses. I’m for sleeping pads too if anyone has any recommendations? Thank you!,Air Mattress/Sleeping Pad?
camping,,Our first time camping in Kentucky! Nolin Lake State Park
camping,,"Dome tent camp in white snow, location Luanchuan County, Luoyang City, Henan Province, Mainland China."
camping,,He’s got a strong connection with the force
camping,,"Some quick pictures from this weekend's trip to Michaux St Forest in Southcentral PA. A nice, cold camping trip in the beautiful woods of Pennsylvania!"
camping,I know this seems like a dumb question. But I recieved a pair of lacrosse alpha burly pro muck boots for Christmas. They're the 1000 insulate. What type of socks will make them easier to get on and off?,Sock reference
camping,"





Just got the email notification I know a lot of people have been on the waiting list for it, stay safe everyone!  The new coronavirus strain is like 50% more infectious.

https://medxsuppliers.com/

Even with the vaccine recipe it seems things are going to get significantly worse before it gets better. We just don’t have enough vaccines to give to majority of people.",Medx just restocked their CE certified KN95 masks for $2 each
camping,,Backyard Camping and Grilled Bacon and Cheese
camping,,"We loved our trip around Iceland with the Mink camper. Thinking about buying one, but is a teardrop camper feasible in central Europe (particularly Switzerland)? Any advice?"
camping,,Imagine Camping with that Gengar Sleeping Bag 🥰
camping,"Looking at the jayco flight and the evo T2700.

I like the finishes of the jayco better.

Layouts are very similar.

The evo has an upgraded chassis and is consequently heavier.

The evo has significant more storage.

If the layout is similar and the price is similar, go for the finishes I like? Or go for the storage?

Not planning to live in it, but having a closet and a pantry with a family seems like it might come in handy!",Purchasing a travel trailer! How important is storage?
camping,,Went for a camp &amp; woke up in the snow. Fantastic experience! Northern Ireland
camping,,"Went for a wild camp, woke up in snow! Northern Ireland."
camping,,How I Almost Died While Camping + Roobet Monopoly
camping,"Hello friends!!

I have a question related to tarp poles.

So usually when someone says “tarp poles” they refer to the poles used as external structure of tarps to give various designs, correct? 

I am wanting to know if there is a specific name for poles that can go on the internal structure of tarps to open the top portion creating more of an open environment. 

I ask this because my tent/bug net combo, the Eno Guardian base camp (fantastic btw) has rings on the top that I assume are for these types of poles.

Do any of you have any recommendations or use something like this??

TIA!",Tarp pole question
camping,,Am I wrong for taking a kid camping in the cold?
camping,,one of the best camping areas in Europe. In Samothraki Greece
camping,,Maybe th best place in Europe to go camping. Paradise In Samothraki Greeçe
camping,,"Slimmy Tabs Super-Burn Dissolvable Tablets - Natural Ingredients, Keto Friendly, No Calories, Gluten and Sugar Free, Vegan, Boosts Energy &amp; Tastes Delicious! - 54 Tablets (Berry Blast Flavor)"
camping,,"Take a hot bath in the open air with hot water flowing from the ground at its temperature Exceeding 35 ° C In cold weather, about 10 ° degrees Guaranteed to adjust your mood with special flavor and taste📍Oued El athmania ,Mila ,Algeria"
camping,,"Went camping with some friends in Fort Flagler, WA. Beautiful and a lot of fun"
camping,,"กางเต้นท์ภูเก็ต ภูชมดาว สวยมากบอกเลย Camping Phuket at Phu Chom Daw, Amazing viewpoint in Phuket"
camping,I live in the central valley of California. I want to camp again real bad but tired of taking chances and places not being open. Can anyone point me in the right direction? Ill drive anywhere in the state. I don't have a limit really,Willing to travel
camping,"The first time I went camping after getting back to Utah after military service, I went to a new location in the High Uintas. (Ashley Mnt Range) 

I got anxiety so bad I left all my gear, hiked to my truck, and drove over an hour to get cell service to call my wife. This was about 7 or 8 years ago!

Before my army days, when i was a teen-mid twenties, I would go truck bed camping alone all the time! Never remember feeling afraid, or having anxiety....Time may have a way of making one forget those fears though.'

How about you?",Do you get anxiety camping at a new location? has it ever kept you awake at night? What do you do to counter it? (stories welcome!!!)
camping,,Today morning run.. started with no sun and then saw it rising
camping,,No heater this time but I brought my 0°F sleeping bag
camping,"Personally I carry around a brass coin on every hike. It’s fun to fidget with and hold in my hand whenever I’m going on longer hikes. I like the feeling knowing that it has travelled with me and gone just as far as I have on my hikes for the last few years. It’s just cool to think that this little coin has travelled to more places than some of my friends and family. Does anybody else carry something similar with them that isn’t part of their gear? Please, share what you carry with you, and tell me what it means to you.",What is something you take with you on every hike? (Not gear related)
camping,Could a 16 liter pack be viable for a 2-3 day hiking/camping trip?.,Backpack size
camping,,I like taking the cat camping. Made this portable cat apartment for Luna. I think she likes it. Everything recycled.
camping,,Pancakes for breakfast?
camping,,⛺️
camping,,Nice fire with even better views
camping,,"To drain or not to drain, that is the question! :)"
camping,,Buy Verified Cash App Accounts - Bitcoin &amp; VCC Enabled
camping,,"Me and my girlfriend on our first snowy winter hike outside Stockholm, Sweden."
camping,"Has anyone encountered showing up to your campsite only to find someone else already setup on it?

Have a few camping trips planned this year and made reservations through [recreation.gov](https://recreation.gov). Not really concerned with summertime trips as there should be plenty of rangers/staff available to reconcile such situations. Have an early spring trip though that is considered off-season and campgrounds are not staffed every day and for limited hours, which has me wondering the likelihood someone takes my spot? I won't be showing up super late or anything, maybe around 5 or 6 PM.  


Who has had this happen? What did you do? What as the outcome?  


Thanks all!",Anyone ever have an issue with someone occupying your reserved campsite?
camping,,Home
camping,,"First field run and things are going great! Need a mallet and a campfire pan, but other than that it was cozy AF."
camping,,Camp setup at Jocassee Gorges overlooking Lake Jocassee November 2020
camping,,"Snow on top of snow at Mount Rogers, Jefferson National Forest, Virginia."
camping,,"Hola! I wrote a recipe book for life on the road - limited resources and ingredients in mind - hoping to raise some money to buy my own vehicle and escape the rent circle. If you would like to support or find out more, please visit greensheeplife.com 🌻 Stay Safe!"
camping,,Just small walk wit my dog..
camping,,"Extreme Winter Camping in a Polish Lavvu and a Cold Ice Bath. Kiruna, Northern Sweden."
camping,I would like to purchase a lightweight/small effective camping stove. Biolite has a small camp stove but its sold out on their website.,Whats the best type of camping stove?
camping,,"Here are some pics of me and my hammock on the Camino de Santiago. After spending the first 2 nights in albergues, I yearned for wildnerness. I spent the following 7 nights floating under the stars. Accompanied by prancing deer and curious boar, I couldn't have imagined a more beautiful experience."
camping,"Mother Nature never fails to amaze me. Isn't this view jaw droppingly wonderful to look at. Would you want to camp here if given chance?

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img y5dr5ykbo1d61...*",Mother Nature
camping,,OnlyFans
camping,,Texas winter camping getaway. Needed 4 days without news or social media last weekend.🤘
camping,,Always like reading outdoors
camping,,Winter Camping the day after Christmas in North Georgia
camping,,as requested.. my van walkthrough. enjoy!
camping,,#berniesandersmeme
camping,,"Snowy Winter Camping in the Forest outside Stockholm, Sweden"
camping,,Camping with the homemade tarp hammock
camping,,Backyard counts?
camping,"Hi there! Planning a trip to Death Valley NP the second or third weekend of March 2021. All NP campgrounds are closed until may but still would like to camp. We are fairly experienced tent campers and have done some camping on BLM and forest land. We will have a 4 runner and a mazda CX-5 (could present some issues if we need high clearance, but it has 4WD). Hoping I could get some BLM recs for tent camping! Was looking at Panamint Valley, so if anyone has experienced camping there that would be great too! Thanks so much!!",Death Valley Camping Recs
camping,"
https://sport.woot.com/offers/marmot-limestone-4-person-tent-2?utm_campaign=AmazonOffer+-+20210121+-+Sports+and+Outdoors+-+3199310&amp;utm_source=Amazon&amp;utm_medium=email&amp;ref_=pe_3199310_566157190

Solid deal on a premium car camping tent. The Limelight is tall enough for you to stand in. I have the 6p model.",FYI Woot is closing out the Marmot Limelight 4p for like $200 brand new:
camping,,A luxurious lunch. South of Zion NP
camping,,A luxurious lunch. South of Zion NP
camping,"Me and my partner lost our son George last year in April. The charity I am deciding to do the 120 mile walk for has helped us and a lot of other parents during the hardest time of our lives. During covid they are not getting much funding so they are struggling to help familys that are in desperate need.

Anything would be appreciated even a quid, if you can't donate please could you share as it helps just as much as any money would! Thank you so much here is the link [https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory](https://www.goldengiving.com/fundraising/GeorgesMemory)",Doing the coast to coast (Devon) For charity in may any support would be much appreciated!
camping,"When we go camping,, we have at least 2 vehicles, so space and weight aren't ever an issue. My knees aren't great, so I got a double height air mattress. Its just a cheap Intex 1 from Walmart. Its said on the box it has inner baffles (I think thats the word...), but its still really wobbly! Are they all like that or would a better 1 be more stable? Or should I just get a cot?",Air mattress vs cot?
camping,,Winter Camping Off To A Warm Start With Our Portable Wood Burning Stove and Waterproof Fire Starters
camping,,Raise them outside.
camping,,Nature Boy
camping,,Sunset over Rodman Reservoir in the Ocala National Forest. Florida has more than beaches y'all!
camping,,[camping in Oregon 🌅]
camping,"[https://youtu.be/es3Ag57\_GCc?t=115](https://youtu.be/es3Ag57_GCc?t=115)

Can you really camp in a hammock in freezing temps? 

Last summer was such a waste cuz of covid, hope this summer is better...but might try a winter/early spring?","I'm not much for winter camping , but this guy makes it look kinda fun!"
camping,,My Dad camping in a shelter we built...during a snowstorm!
camping,,My First Camp in my Bushcraft Shelter Snowstorm
camping,"Hey all! 

I am joining the Nevada Conservation Corps this April and will be going on 8 day camping trips, followed by 6 days of rest, from April to August and I probably have a billion questions. 

Is there a better subreddit for 8 day/ long camping trips or one for the Reno Nevada area?","8 day camping near Reno, Nevada"
camping,"Any opinions on Kicking Horse Campground in BC?  Campsites to avoid, extra things to bring, etc. 

Planning a trip for this summer.",Kicking Horse Campground
camping,"I’m 48 yo, 6 foot one and 250 pounds.

How exactly do you people sleep in hammocks all curved up at your head and feet? 

Seems like an unnatural position to sleep in when my whole life I’ve slept flat.

I’d like to invest in a hammock system for cold weather here in New England but the $25 hammock that I bought at EMS in Nashua NH recently clearly isn’t going to cut it.  

Thx for any help.",Noob question about hammocks
camping,,"Hammock camping a few weeks back on New Year’s Eve, the snow was a nice surprise!"
camping,,Some homemade high-energy foods you can take camping
camping,,Do you guys have any pet peeves when cooking in camps?
camping,"Just found out that we will be working remote for a few more months, so I am planning a few trips - where I can drive and setup a base camp type adventure, and do some small hikes from there in afternoon/evening.  I am looking for a good reliable Hotspot that is better than my phone hotspot, to where I can still work from ""home"" (camp spot).

Does anyone have any experience with something like this?",Any idea/tips for selecting a good WiFi Hotspot for remote camping? ie. not a local campground
camping,,Algonquin Provincial Park August 2020
camping,"Hi fellow campers, since the start of covid my best friend and I have really gotten into backpacking through Ontario’s national parks. We’re currently planning our next trip which will be from March 6th - 10th in the western uplands at Algonquin provincial park. Both of us have very little experience with winter camping. I was just hoping to get some advice from you guys on what weather conditions might be like, what type of clothes would be best to pack, and any other tips or advice for camping around that time of year. Thanks in advance for all of the tips you guys share, I can’t wait to read them!",Camping at Algonquin Provincial Park in early March
camping,,I miss (slightly) warmer days
camping,"This is one of our favorite camping spots in Anchorage, AK.  Yes, this is in the ""city"" of Anchorage, at 21miles/33k south of our downtown.  This is our ""let's go camping with whatever you have in your truck"" spot.  Cheers from Alaska, USA!","My first post: I'm Alaskan, so be kind :)"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... January '21, 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty. He had a blast off-roading and visiting this spot called the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty. He had a blast at this spot called the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,,"Swipe for more pics... January '21, 4x4 primitive camping near Anza Borrego State Park, CA. The lil guy's name is Matty - took him to the ""Pumpkin Patch"" 🎃"
camping,If I have a good quality sleeping bag do I still need an under quilt?,Hammock camping
camping,,"Camping with my 5 month old in Idyllwild, CA in July. This was his second camping adventure &amp; he loved it!"
camping,This is a sleeping bag I've had for about 6 years. Last time I used it was about maybe 1 or 2 years ago. Since then it's been packed away. I just took it out and the stuffing feels packed. What's the best way to refluff it? (Ik refluff isn't a real word).,Best way to refluff a sleeping bag
camping,,Beautiful sunrise last weekend camping 🌵
camping,,Winter Camping- First Attempt at Video Making
camping,,My brother and I got out last weekend for some winter camping. -10°C
camping,"So I'm looking to get a new tarp and I'm moving away from sil nylon, looking to get a silpoly tarp. I was thinking of HG but realized the head weight is only 1500mm rather then 2000mm. Is that much of a difference? If so, What tarps with (doors) would you recommend in the higher rating head weight area? Reason I'm switching is because I noticed in heavier rainfall it does soak up a lot of water and I'm trying to move away from that with silpoly. As well as the whole packing away while soaking wet thing too. It's not horrible but Im trying to make it less of a hassle. I'm looking for a tarp with line loc pull outs too. I can probably have them custom out them in so I'm not too worried about that. Please if you have any suggestions. Feel free to throw in your imput.",So I'm looking to get a new tarp
camping,,Truck Bed Camping in Glacier Peak Washington
camping,,Anyone know if there any good campgrounds around Southern California that are currently open?
camping,The pandemic has closed the national/state parks. Where can I still camp within driving distance of the Bay Area?,Where can I camp in the Bay Area?
camping,,My set up!
camping,,Can you eat rabbits with myxomatosis? Here are the deets:
camping,"Comicon is a thing......

Is campcon a thing?",Campcon?
camping,[https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCfbLUHs45SUVQTcVN0oAAgA/featured](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCfbLUHs45SUVQTcVN0oAAgA/featured),Friend of mine moved to the woods. Check out his youtube channel
camping,,Hammock in the snow.
camping,,Left picture is New Year’s Day 2017. Then the same spot in the spring.
camping,,Winter camping on the Colville NF
camping,,Do guys like my new budget stove?
camping,Suggestions?,"High-quality, easy, compact, quick set up tents for the winter?"
camping,"Trying to get back into the wild and take one of my daughters with me. Can anyone recommend a minimum packing list or good site/book to find one for 2-person back country backpacking? I’m rebuilding my kit from the ground up. So far, I have an REI tent that was discounted for being returned.",Taking 10 yr-old backpacking first time
camping,"Hey all. I’ve been eyeing the Life Tent and Life Bivy from GoTimeGear. Are these reliable products? Links provided below.

https://www.gotimegear.com/products/life-tent-survival-shelter

https://www.gotimegear.com/products/life-bivy-emergency-sleeping-bag",Thoughts on Life Tent and Life Bivy?
camping,,Camping off the Woody Gap portion of the AT with one of my camping buddies
camping,"Looking to see if there are common problems that people are having when they are camping, and if we can come together to offer solutions that we have tried to any of these problems!",What is the biggest problem that you face when camping?
camping,,Testing some wet/cold weather gear I plan to use next year when I thru-hike the Appellation Trail.
camping,"This is basically about bitcoin mining investments,making up to 2000$  daily from mining .dm if interested",Anyone interested in making extra money?
camping,,Motorcycle Camping in Nova Scotia
camping,,"This tent has now survived 4 seasons, from 97 to 7 degrees, 0 to 20mph winds, torrential rains, an 8in snow dump. Best tent to date!"
camping,,"How do you find wood that lights, esp in winter?"
camping,"Looking for some good camping spots in GA. Anywhere is fine, but I have been to the Little Grand Canyon so far!",GA primitive camping spots?
camping,"Hi all. Just got a small tab trailer and want to try it out. We are looking to spend a week in the mountains in GA, NC or SC in August or September. we live in south Florida so trying to keep it under a 12 hour drive but will go farther if it’s worth it. We have 3 dogs that will come along and want a spot with electric. Ideally a river or lake in the campground. Any suggestions on where to go?",Trailer camping in Appalachia
camping,,World's coolest winter? at Dubai UAE
camping,,"Camping on top of a mountain. (Naag Tibba, India)"
camping,,What a view
camping,,"Camping place at night roughly minus 15 ℃, the lake has frozen, bring to the milk and coke woke up in the morning also froze🥶"
camping,"I’m hoping to visit the Bonneville Salt Flats in Utah in spring, and I know they don’t allow camping on the flats. Does anyone have any recommendations for a campsite in the area? Thanks in advance!",Camping recommendations by the Bonneville Salt Flats
camping,,Tacoma ＴＲＵＣＫ camping | Washington: Coulee City [PHOTOs]
camping,,Camping/Hiking Bowmans wash
camping,[deleted],Tacoma ＴＲＵＣＫ camping | Washington: Coulee City [PHOTOs]
camping,,Camp finally set up (5*20ft domes)
camping,,It's been a long time since I went on a picnic with my friends. A rare photo
camping,"I recently bought a camping sauna which comes with a tent and stove. I'm looking for some places to camp which are close by a water source to take a plunge. Does anyone have some recommendations? Ideally, a place within 5 hours of the Bay Area, but I'm open to hearing about places further away as well.",Looking for waterfront camping recommendations in California for a portable sauna
camping,,This is for my next trip
camping,,Just For Camping lovers
camping,,Grand Canyon Coffee Sunrise
camping,[deleted],Cold Texas nights...
camping,,Camping in the Sierras (June 2019)
camping,"So I’m going to be on a 21 day itinerary of Maui, I will be walking around the entire island while camping along the way at legal beaches and parks, occasionally staying at airbnbs and couch surfing (yes people in Hawaii love the website couchsurf). I have practically everything I need for my trip that’s allowed on a plane before I hop on the plane. Anything else will be purchased there. However I’m looking at the tungsten 1p and the tungsten 2 p tent. The 1p is small, 4lbs, yet still can fit a grown man comfortably. However I’ve noticed the 2p tent is only slightly more expensive and only weighs 1 pound more with a lot more room and vestibules for storage. My question is, would that one pound/little bit of space in my bag, be worth the 2p tent or should I just bite the bullet and go the minimalist route with the 1p? Please this is the hardest decision I’ve had to make on my gear lol. Ps if you have any other suggestions for tents they’re welcome, the tungsten is just my favorite by far from what I’ve seen at the price range/packability and ease of set up. The tent MUST FIT INTO MY BACKPACKING BAG W OTHER GEAR AND ONE PAIR OF CLOTHES.","Deciding what tent to backpack with, please help."
camping,,Evening in the Adirondacks
camping,"Anyone have any recent reports for how the road to Usal Beach campground is currently? I know a lot of people warn the road can get really bad after rains but we haven’t had THAT much rain so far this year. Hoping to make it out there before the forecasted 2 weeks of storms in California. We have a lifted 4x4 Cherokee so I’m usually not too concerned, but we have never been to this spot and really want to check it out.","Usal Beach Campground, California"
camping,,"West Turkey Creek Campground, Arizona"
camping,,Any tips on how to deal with campfire smoke? Especially on rainy days!!
camping,Hey so I have a quick question. My girlfriend just got into camping and loves it (thank god!) And is a huge coffee addict. So I was gonna get her the Jetboil java kit for her birthday in July and was wondering if anyone knows if it might come on sale within the next couple of months?,Jetboil Java!
camping," 

Good day friends! Thanks in advance for those who take the time to read. :)  

I  have recently decided to bring my dream of camping in my car to life to travel around and have stumbled into the realm of roof top tents. The one I have my  eye on is the  [Tepui Kekenam 3](https://tepui.com/products/thule-tepui-explorer-kukenam-3). It looks like a good choice with the cons being mostly quality of life stuff. My issue is justifying the  price when I could just work on building out a frame for the inside to  sleep on with some storage underneath. However, sleeping inside the car brings about worries of not having enough storage in some situations which makes me lean more towards the roof top.

My question is: What is your experience with your roof top tent?

What is the biggest issue you have had with the tent?

Any recommendations or other options around the same price or lower?

If you could do it again, would you go with a difference setup?

Does roof top tent camping restrict you in any way from staying at campsites?",Roof top tent for my Subaru Outback
camping,,Wild Camping in English Countryside
camping,,"10 free power stations being given away, link in comments"
camping,,10 Best Camping Places in Uttarakhand
camping,"One man tent, chair, and table. Supper was a sub sandwich in the cooler. No fire needed. Allegheny National Forest, PA.

https://preview.redd.it/2uyr08wtzhc61.jpg?width=4128&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=3540a198cf86ca59772e4aa509299a7ee54d6dd2",My version of a quick and easy camp.
camping,,My friends and I are planning a trip to North Carolina to go camping here in about a month or two. Any recommendations on back country camping in NC for about a week? Thanks guys
camping,,"Blue Mountain of the Adirondacks, New York, United States"
camping,,How do I best maintain this grill grate (stainless steel)? I only gave it a brush today (steel brush afaik) after a very long time.
camping,,"At Peak One, Colorado, for the state’s first snow of the ... Summer. When we arrived the temps were at 97. One day later it was 7 with 8in of snow. The grounds went from 180 people to 6. Perfect timing :)"
camping,,"Tell me your story of getting ill from your drinking water. Location, water source, side effects, recovery process."
camping,"So to sum it up quickly I grew up in Los Angeles to two parents who grew up in Los Angeles. Neither of them ever camped as kids and the very few times I went as a child it was in a log cabin less than 5 minutes off a main highway.

Hardly what I would call true camping.

So I told myself I wanted to get out there and really do it. I bought myself a nice size tent, sleeping pad, stove, flashlight, firestarter, sleeping bag...

And it's all been in my closet for about 8 months now.

The thought of just driving out and finding some random place to camp is so foreign in my mind that it just doesn't make sense to me. I would really appreciate some guidance on getting out htere and actually teaching myself how to camp.

Thanks for any and all advice guys!",I've never camped. Nobody in my family has ever camped. I really want to learn. Where do I begin guys?? I've somewhat of a start but need help actually getting out there.
camping,,"Winter camping near Shenandoah National Park, Virginia. USA"
camping,,"Qinter camping on the Shenandoah River, Virginia"
camping," I'm currently doing A Level product design in the UK and for my project I have to design and create a product. The specification is extremely broad and allows for a lot of freedom, but a large part of it must be consumer driven, so I was wondering if anyone has any product ideas that would help them with camping (excluding fabric products e.g. coats, bags etc.). Thank you",Got any product ideas?
camping,,"Camping in Älvdalen, Sweden. Awesome company, tasty food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this 👍🌲🗻"
camping,,[Skyline camping in Oregon] [sunset]
camping,What should I bring to a camping trip,"Hey guys, I'm planning on camping this summer and this is my 1st time camping"
camping,,Sequim Bay State Park - 1/17/2021
camping,Great 3 day escape from everything and everyone.,Sequim Bay State Park 1/17/2021
camping,[removed],Free Stuff tools for Camping and Hiking.
camping,,Yukon mountain camp...just outside Carcross.
camping,"Love to car camp. I’d love a table to cook and eat that goes in the car. It’s either one of those roll tables (they have a lot of brands but they all have a modular design, with a separate surface that folds like planks. The whole thing packs into a smaller package, but the surface area is less.)

Or, a simple plastic folding table, around 4 ft. It’s sturdy and larger but the weight has me thinking. What would you choose for a few nights of cooking stews for one or two people?",Car camping and table advice?
camping,,One of the beat tentsite views I've ever had (Central California)
camping,[removed],Free Survival tools for Camping and Hiking.
camping,I’m planning a weekend road trip from Illinois to Maryland and back during the first weekend in March and was thinking of trying to overnight camp halfway. Can anyone recommend a place somewhere between Cleveland and Columbus?,Camping in Ohio
camping,"I'm planning on car camping in the near future, which I've only done in the past when it snowed so I'm not sure how warm it will be inside if it's not snowing. I don't currently have a sleeping bag, so I'm considering setting up a merino wool liner and sleeping in midweight merino wool base layers inside my car. Is that a reasonable setup or will it be too cold if it drops to ~30F at night?

I've seen people say only using a liner isn't really enough unless it's 75F+ but I think that's assuming sleeping outside. I usually sweat with sleeping bags so I don't want to buy something that will be excessive for car camping in that setup, unless I'm overestimating the insulation from a car. Should I go with this liner/layer combo or should I just get a light sleeping bag?",Car/Liner/Base Layer for Sleeping
camping,,My Simple Setup for Quick Overnight.
camping,"I have done no trace camping since I was a child. If there are people who are new to it, what are the challenges and hacks you find useful to make it more comfortable and to make it easier to erase all evidence of your passing?",No trace camping
camping,[deleted],"Zapata Falls, CO. Gave me a Fortress of Solitude vibe"
camping,,Does this method work?
camping,"I always cheap out on pants for camping, hiking and scrambling and I never learn my lesson. This time I want to buy an all season pant that I wont rip or donate after a year. I live in the mountains of Canada, warm summers, snowy winters and everything in between. I need something that's breathable for the summer but durable enough for the snow. Fjallraven and Outdoor Research seem to have what I'm looking for but at $250 + I'm wondering if anyone has found anything cheaper that does the same job. TIA",Looking for solid all season outdoor pants for men
camping,,Silent Solo Hiking- Mountain to Sea
camping,"Hello all!

Does anybody have a crossover SUV/SUV/truck that they swear by for car camping? I'm finally ready to buy a new car, but I want one that will really live up to being a travel car for me and my co-pilot, a 95lb German Shepherd!  As such, the more space, the better! 

Bonus points if it's a hybrid! If I'm enjoying the wild, I want to do my part to help save the wilderness. =D

(PS, will delete if on the wrong subreddit. Just hoping for some advice from the experts).

(PPS, no Fords. I have the escape now, and it's engine completely gave out at 58,000 miles. I want a car that will last.)",Best car for car camping...with a doggo?
camping,"So I’ve been wanting to do an overnight camping trip for some astrophotography and stay in the car. Was wondering if anyone has recommendations for maintaining airflow in the car without the car being on? I tried cracking the windows a bit, but last time when I went out to the dessert I got lots of sand blowing into the car and another time I had bugs flying in. Maybe some kind of netting made for that? To be held between the car frame and window?

Also, what are typically the laws regarding sleeping in your car? The places I’ve been before were in the middle of nowhere with no roads, so I didn’t really have to worry about it. This time it’ll be different since there is actual roads and stuff in the surrounding area, which means cops could drive by.",Wanting to go camping but have a couple questions.
camping,,Goooooooood morning!
camping,,"The sky looked cool [Flagstaff, AZ]"
camping,,"It was cold so we slept inside [Flagstaff, AZ]"
camping,,Cold view
camping,"I went camping this past weekend for the first time after buying some gear from REI. Did it alone and had a good time reading and playing on my Gameboy. The campsite I stayed at was right on the Potomac river separating Maryland and Virginia which was pretty cool. It was the type you park a little ways away and have to carry your stuff to the site.  
  
Was just curious from others with more experience about tricks for dealing with the cold. I got a pretty good sleeping bag that's rated for 18 degrees and a sleeping pad, but could still feel the cold ground underneath (Lows were in the mid 20s) Had on a bunch of layers with wool bottoms and top. I was up for about an hour around 4am feeling pretty chilly even with the bag drawstring closed around my head. I also had an issue where the breath from my nose was condensing on the outside of the sleeping bag and dripping back down onto my neck! Do folks double up and use two sleeping pads in the winter? How does one deal with condensation in the tent? I had the rainfly all the way closed most of the night to try to keep some warmth in and wind out but after noticing the condensation issue I unzipped it a little.  Also getting a sleeping bag back into it's little carrying sack is the most frustrating thing imaginable.
  
Here's a picture of my site and reading by the river! I had a good time and hope to take what I've learned to have an even better time the next trip.  Eventually I'd like to start doing some hiking/camping trips but have to figure out what to do about carrying multiple day's worth of food first. I probably also need one of those camp stove deals but then that's even more stuff to carry. Thanks for reading.
  
[Site](https://imgur.com/XUdEOAC)  
[Good book!](https://imgur.com/iF5JDDE)  
[The river](https://imgur.com/GPNrPer)",First time camping - Winter and solo
camping,,Camping in Mojave.
camping,"This may be a silly question but I've searched and haven't found a solid answer. I'm in northern Ontario and am planning on going winter camping. Usually in the summer keeping food in your tent is a huge no-no because of bears, but since they are sleeping now, is it ok to store it in my tent? Or somewhere outside burried in snow or something? Or should I just hang my food like normal? I'm thinking of other wildlife that I don't really want to encounter in the middle of the night (i.e. Wolves, coyotes.) Thanks in advance!!!!",What to do with food while winter camping?
camping,"[Buy Verified CashApp](https://usayelp.com/product/buy-verified-cash-app-accounts/)Accounts, We providing high quality Cash app accounts at the chepest prices with 100% verified guarantee.",Buy Verified Cash App Accounts
camping,,Solitude among the Joshua trees in Juniper Flats
camping,,"Another weekend in the ""hot"" tipi!"
camping,[deleted],Another weekend in the hot tent tipi!
camping,,"From a 7 week camping trip this summer. Sequoia National Forest, California. Headed out for a shorter trip tomorrow!"
camping,,Camping in the Kruger National Park (South Africa) with the wildlife coming up right next to the fence at night.
camping,,Winter Camping Pizza Taste Test - Ottawa Lake Campground Kettle Moraine State Forest
camping,,"6 years ago I took this picture while hiking with a good friend. Unbeknownst to us this was the first of what would become an annual tradition, to go out and explore different wild locations in the country. It was also the last time we step foot in the park. It’s about time to change that..."
camping,,Rate my camping temps were 27 degrees at night. Jennings State Forest.
camping,"I lve in kalamata greece and i want to try out camping ,does anyone know any good places?",Places to go camping in greece?
camping,,Just wow
camping,,[camping in Oregon]
camping,,Yukon living room
camping,,"Lone wolf howling in Transilvania, very close to my camp, sound on."
camping,,First time build the dome tent on mountain camp
camping,,Four days camp a week ago at Karangahake Gorge New Zealand with my mountain bike. Track was 3ft wide most of the time with a 64ft drop to the side so no time to stop for glory shots.
camping,"hey i live in illinois and was wondering if anyone knew a good place to go camping. preferably i’d like someplace very forested with a camp site available near a body of water, i only want to drive 5-6 hours max to get somewhere unless there’s a really good place elsewhere.",Looking for a place to go camping
camping,,This morning at Tahoe National Forest in my Tahoe
camping,,I figured you guys would appreciate this one ❤️
camping,,Tested my DIY Roof top tent this weekend in La Pine state park. Held up good with minimal condensation even at -2*C. Have to sew the windows for better ventilation though!
camping,I stay down in  north county San Diego/ south oc and i need to get out but blm and state parks are closed. Anyone willing to share a location? My insta handle is the same as my reddit if you want to dm me the coordinates? The last thing i want is to blow out the spot. Just want to get away from any sense of civilization. thanks!,Cali camping
camping,,Steel Creek Campground on the Buffalo National River in Arkansas
camping,,A little late but here’s some pics from our New Years camping weekend
camping,"We have a rather grand tent that we use a double high air mat ress in with an attached vestibule. It's really great, we've been happy with it, but due to some wind damage and what is shaping up to be a permanently bum leg, we're exploring other options. 

We chose such a big tent because my husband is 6'3"" and it's nice he doesn't have to bend over. But really, we only use the tent for sleeping/storing things we dont want condensation to gather on in the early morning. 

Here's our thought process:

Currently we pack up my 98 Camry to the brim. It works, it's just my husband and me. But our trips are usually: find a camp spot, pitch the tent, unload the suitcase/cooler/toiletry bag/camp stove/air mattress/bedding so we don't have a full car while we explore the area/find local firewood and have room to transport it. 

So, we started thinking of a little trailer to put that stuff in that we can just drop off in the morning, do our fun stuff, and then come back to set up. 

Which led to thinkin: my car's not gonna last forever no matter how good a mechanic my husband is. And he's a professional! Coupled with I had an ACL reconstruction a year ago that resulted in nerve damage to my shin; I can't kneel or even have pressure on 75% of my lower leg. So rolling the tent is stupidly funny with me trying to apply pressure with my boobs and elbows. We began to think - we don't use the tent for anything but sleeping. Why couldn't we use a little trailer  that has secured storage as well as a bed? Something that we can leave packed during the week, and just grab the cooler and head out Saturday morning? 

It also appeals to our desire to try a little winter camping. 

We looked at teardrop trailers but they have way more than we need. We don't need a kitchen area, AC, battery bank, shower, or toilet.  

My Camry has a hitch, but my next vehicle will be bigger. Maybe an SUV but I'm leaning towards a small pickup. So I'd have increased towing capacity. 

Is there a subreddit, or even a good thread, that would be in line with what I've described here? 

Happy camping!",Looking for holes in my plan as well as examples for a trailer
camping,,"First ever solo camping trip! Had a lotta fun in Hurricane, UT"
camping,[deleted],"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"farm shed camping, southern virginia"
camping,,"So grateful to have found this hidden gem over the weekend. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"So grateful to have found this hidden gem over the weekend. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"We made rice, beans, and chicken burritos"
camping,,He’s a good boy
camping,"Hi, me and a group of friends are planning to walk the west highland way (92 miles) for the charity 'Trees for Life'. Please donate (all proceeds go directly to the charity) it will really help us to make a difference to the Scottish wilderness. We are planning on doing the trek in April and may even attempt Ben Nevis, if time allows for it. All donations are strictly for helping regenerate the Scottish forests (now only 2% of its original stature) and protect native animals. Thank you very much for your kindness, every donation no matter how small helps loads:))

I chose the charity ""Trees for Life"" as I have always been very concerned about the global impact of climate change and I wanted to help make a difference to this issue in the best way I could. Scottish forests now only span 2% of there original stature and 'Trees for Life' plans on helping to regenerate the Scottish forests and to help conserve and reintroduce native Scottish wildlife. So I decided to get a group of close friends together to trek with me trek across the Scottish highlands, for the conservation of wilderness in the Scottish highlands. Please help me make my dream of global (Scottish in this instance) wildlife conservation a reality!

[West highland way for 'Trees for Life'](https://gofund.me/e1923e9e)",Treking the West Highland Way for the conservation of Scottish Wilderness. All proceeds will go directly to 'Trees for Life' (a registered charity)
camping,,"Winter camping cooler, Jester Park, Iowa"
camping,,"Winter Camping, Jester Park, Iowa (Trip report in comments)"
camping,,Camp chairs: Parts sourcing question
camping,,Would having Gucci x Northface increase your Pokémon Go catches? This collab is such a joke to me
camping,,What's your next adventure?
camping,,Awesome commercial
camping,,He found a bone
camping,,He found a bone
camping,,A good spot to pee and let the dogs stretch their legs
camping,,Sockwa X10 | Feel the Ground
camping,,A great way to wake up
camping,,Just got back from a quick weekender at Padre National Seashore - 60 miles of beach!
camping,,"First time cooking venison on an open fire, any tips or tricks? Full video in comments."
camping,,Back in September when the temps went from 97 to 7 in 36 hours...
camping,"Hello fellow campers. I'm a freelance writer currently writing for a camping blog. I'm not here to advertise. I'm actually here to ask a question to help fill in some information I'm lacking for an article. Please let me know if this isn't okay.

I'll get right to it. I'm writing about ways to make winter camping fun, whether you're camping in or out of the snow. I don't do much winter camping myself, so I was hoping some of you could tell me about what you do to have fun while winter camping? This applies to car camping and backpacking-type situations.

TLDR - What kinds of activities do you use to have fun while camping in the winter?",Ways To Make Winter Camping Fun?
camping,,"A 5 day Winter camping in Älvdalen, Sweden. Awesome company, great food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this. 🗻🌲"
camping,,"Camping in Sweden with awesome company, tasty food and amazing views. It doesn't get any better then this. 🌲🗻 The location is just north of Älvdalen."
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir.
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir
camping,,Waking up at Williams Creek Reservoir
camping,,"Found an awesome campsite near an old broken dam. Sierra National Forest, Ca."
camping,,"Set up a nice basecamp outside of Helen, Gerogia for a great two day trip"
camping,"So it is winter and with the snow around the more or less easily seen trails in the woods are covered with snow. Wanting to go camping out in the woods I thought I'd check on things to get an idea just how much snow there is. It would be no fun going anywhere with 50 cm snow, or worse.

Turns out there is in my area about 20-40 deep snow.

One task today was to trod a path through the snow to find my way later, and this works nicely as long as there doesn't come much more snow on top of the old.

Another task is actually finding a way through the forest without spending any excess time finding my way.

I managed to find my way, and it was a good thing I had a compass with me, as I knew I shouldn't try move too much to neither west or east. Not only did I manage to hit precisely this one stone on the path that I am used to seeing, I also hit right on the spot where the non marked trail ends on a crossing marked trail, so that was great fun.

Anyway, I spent some 4 hours making my way to my location, where I normally use some 80 minutes.

I spent some 6 hours walking around today and I am exhausted. :)

Because it is winter I had to bring a headlight, just in case it got dark when I was still out in the woods.

Despite me sloshing around in powder snow for hours, my pants nor my boots seems to get wet, probably because I had an insulating layer inside my pants and also venting my pants on the side to have the excess heat escape.",I am glad I checked out my camping spot ahead of time.
camping,,Mobil ski chalet and stealth camper build
camping,"Here's the link to the story - or you can just read it below! [https://www.happybucketlife.com/jakes-two-key-rules-for-happiness/](https://www.happybucketlife.com/jakes-two-key-rules-for-happiness/)

&amp;#x200B;

**Getting creative**

My family was never one of those families that went on exotic vacations a few times a year. While we couldn’t afford a spring break in Florida, my parents still found creative ways to take my sister and I traveling when we were little.

As a result, we explored our natural neighborhood in the beautiful state of Wisconsin by way of a few campgrounds every summer.

Years later, I am so grateful for these summer adventures and the lessons my parents taught me along the way. The importance of community and the importance of nature.

&amp;#x200B;

**2020 taught us so many lessons**  
This past year has been hard for everyone and we’ve all spent more time outside in an effort to keep our family and friends healthy. In so many ways, COVID-19 has been and continues to be, an absolute tragedy. There is no way around that. Loved ones dead. Businesses closed. Jobs lost. The list goes on.

Despite these truths, however, I do think we can learn so much from our experiences this year about how to be happy.

&amp;#x200B;

**Visiting every State Park in Indiana brought me more than just the views**  
Due to COVID, I've been able to visit nearly every State Park in Indiana this year. With travel options nearly erased, my friends I discovered camping as the best way to get out during quarantine. These adventures crisscrossing the state in search of a great hike or campsite provided something to look forward to nearly every week. I’ve made amazing memories and gotten to know my adopted home state in more ways than I ever could have imagined.

Each time I visit a new campground, park, or trail, I can feel myself connecting more deeply with my surroundings. With each step on a challenging hike, I feel more alive and the worries of the workplace fade into insignificance. The brain rests while the soul comes alive with the sound of birds, rushing water, and rustling leaves.  


**What I need to be happy.**  
These moments of clarity exploring the outdoors helped me find myself and what I believe matters. What I need to be happy.  


**It comes down to two rules:**  


Love the people you are with and love yourself.  


If you find the right crew, keep them around.

If you find something you love, keep doing it.  


Everything else will fall into place. For me, by connecting with the outdoors and sharing my love for nature with like-minded individuals, I found what I needed to feel joy in a horrifying year. For you it could be anything.",My friend's awesome story about how camping brought his family together and helped him define happiness for himself in 2020.
camping,,Back in September when the temps went from 97 to 7 in 36 hours...
camping,"I’ve tried the originals, don’t care for them. They don’t have a “sphincter” &amp; the caps often got knocked open, pouring product all over me &amp; my stuff. Cost exceeds the value.

Any alternatives?",matador flatpak dupe
camping,,My fiancé got me this
camping,[removed],Buying American is Difficult to do While Shopping Online
camping,,First time camping on BLM Land...
camping,,"Join us (in solitary) on the 5th of February at Sunset. A 24 hour break from our screens. Doesn't that sound nice? With Love, from OfflineDay"
camping,"Hello all! I’ve recently seen some awesome photos of the Adirondacks posted here and I know that the park holds some incredible nostalgia and intrigue for a lot of people interested in both hiking and camping alike!

I’m a college student in Upstate New York and I currently assist the Lake Placid New York Development Committee to help plan projects in tandem with Clarkson University that seek to improve both the community feel, public economy, and tourist attraction of the town and the surrounding park. I’d love to hear from all of you about your trips to the park in the past, what you did, what you loved about it, what you hated. It doesn’t have to be just about Lake Placid, but those stories are welcome too! I’ve lived near the park my whole life and have worked pretty closely with some of its local officials. Hearing stories from people who love the land and experiencing the natural beauty of the Adirondacks has always been an incredible way to learn about what matters to people the most. Stories. Photos. They’re so much better than just trying to ask someone what’s good or bad!

TL:DR I work with the Lake Placid Development Committee in the Adirondacks and would love to hear your stories from the park, both good and bad!",Adirondack Appreciation Post!
camping,"I was booking camping reservations last night for this summer and found out the US National Park system is extending free entrance fee into National Parks for 5th graders and their families. This is usually only for 4th graders. The park service extended it to 5th graders because many parks were closed last year because of Covid. Fifth graders do need to complete a brief (easy) test and print out the entry pass but then they and whomever else is in their car get into National Parks for free. Details in link. Rocky Mountain NP, Grand Canyon, Yellowstone and all others are included. Daily fees are usually $25-$35 per car per day. This pass makes it free until mid August. 

Get on it!

https://www.nps.gov/kids/fifthgrade.htm",Free National Park entrance fee for families with 4th and 5th graders (USA)
camping,"I drive a 2005 Ford Explorer and I’m looking to start traveling for cheap with my partner soon. We’re both broke and in our early 20’s, so packing a bag for the weekend and paying ~100$ for a car mattress seems a lot more doable than spending loads on hotels every time we go out. Our combined weight is approximately 500lbs- he’s muscular, and I’m just super tall and chunky lmao. I feel this would be a great way to start camping too, this would be a good place to kick on the AC and rest after hiking.

I need this thing to be super duper durable, I don’t want to pop it on our first excursion. Every air mattress I’ve ever had experience with pops quite easily- but that may just be because my parents have *always* chosen cheap over quality. 

Ideally, a mattress topper to go with wouldn’t hurt either. We both have scoliosis so the more support the better.

Any recommendations would be appreciated and I thank you in advance 🙏🏻","What’s a good, durable, inflatable mattress for SUV’s that can carry ~600lbs?"
camping,,Did some hot tent camping over the weekend near the Catoctin Mountains. Did not disappoint!
camping,Can someone recommend a durable wagon for primitive camping. My last wagon wasn’t very all terrain.,Help with Wagon recommendations
camping,,😉
camping,,My relaxing campsite recently 🤤🤤
camping,,Holiday Park Homes For Camping in the UK
camping,,Avail The Cash Back Offers on Dating before its gone...
camping,,Camping to the UK with Seaton Estate Holiday Cavan
camping,,WoW! Holiday Camping in Scotland with friends
camping,,Anyone know a good spot to camp in Western Washington? Live in Tacoma and I'm looking for a nice little spot that's not too far away
camping,,Found a cool rock the other day
camping,,Found a cool rock the other day.
camping,"I am sure I’m overthinking this and please excuse my ignorance. 
I was camping in the Appalachian Mountains in Eastern Tennessee near a river. Around 130 in the morning I was awoken for some reason. I heard the river rumble past but I also heard what sounded like splashing and “laughing.” The splashing sounded as if it was a kayak paddle pushing the water but it had no real rhythm to it. And when I say laughing, it was almost as if I was hearing a family kayaking down the river and giggling at jokes and such. I summed it up to being crazy people kayaking in the middle of the night. I listened for around 30 minutes before O drifted back off to sleep. It never seem to fade or grow silent it was pretty consistent. 

I’d love to know if anyone has anything I can rationalize this as. 1 am seems like a bad
Time to be kayaking through rapids of a river. 

I’m open to all answers from animals to folklore. 

Thanks y’all, once again I apologize for my ignorance in the matter, just kinda freaky",Just a question
camping,,"Camping in the San Juan Mountains, CO [OC] (1729x828)"
camping,What would you do if you get the chance to enjoy different kind of himalayan Enduro in the Land of Himalayas?,Himalayan Enduro Adventure
camping,,Olympic National Forest PNW
camping,,How We Almost Died While Camping in A National Forest
camping,,Adirondacks trip
camping,"Anything that really works but is a little left field beyond the normal things people take?

Thanks!","What do you have in your camping ""kitchen"" besides the normal utensils (knifes, forks bowls and tongs etc) that maybe other people don't know is a good thing to have?"
camping,,"City of Rocks State Park, NM. Interesting rock formation."
camping,"Flying to the PNW for camping.  While camping we will spend a few days roughing it on a boat in the Strait of Juan de Fuca.  I will be solely relying on my jetboil, hoping I can get fuel in Bellingham or Seattle as I know I can't fly with fuel.  Last time I flew to camp PNW it was a new jetboil in its package.  I used the heck out of it and made soup and tea for the few of us at St.Helens on a freezing day.   I left the fuel out there with my friend but can't recall if I checked the jetboil or carried it on.  I never cleaned it with alcohol or any other special tricks to remove fuel residue.

What have been your experiences flying with a used jetboil?  The flights are domestic.  I am stressing because I am putting a lot of planning on using this item due to the extreme temperature change for me.   I also don't want to rely on finding a new jetboil out there as I have limited time before getting on their boat.","Flying to camp, jetboil questions"
camping,"I have been researching camp kitchens and I really like this one:

GCI Outdoor Master Cook Portable Folding Camp Kitchen https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07C3WK867/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_ItpbGb3JS3PXX

The question is are these worth it even if you go car camping and typically have a picnic table? Just wondering if it’s convenient to cook and store equipment separately from the picnic table.",Is a camp kitchen worth it?
camping,[removed],Free everstryke weather resistant match!
camping,,Building a chuck box. This one's cool but needs handles for transporting imo.
camping,,Tonight we attempt to fit 3 humans and 2 dogs back there
camping,,Tonight we attempt to fit 3 humans and 2 dogs back there
camping,,"Nothing better than sitting by a good campfire! Big Lake, Alaska"
camping,"Hi, genuine question, I'm a 19 year old student thinking about my career path, and the thing that rejuvenates me is camping and spending time in the outdoors but it blows my mind how some people can find time to go camping, how do you make time and what kind of career/job allows you to enjoy this beautiful past time?",How do you find time for Camping
camping,,Good winter trip! Tested some wool gear to.
camping,,Professional Army Outdoor Camping 3 Men Tent + Storage Space - OD Green - New
camping,[http://ebay.us/SshTjK](http://ebay.us/SshTjK),Hunting Emergency Survival Kit Fishing SOS Survival Gear Outdoor Camping 12 in 1
camping,,Camping at Brazos Bend State Park to escape Houston. #fishing #camping #outdoor #dog
camping,,B
camping,,Trip to Adirondack NY State Park
camping,[deleted],Trip in Adirondack NY Park in September 2020
camping,,My friend design this for my next camping good luck wish. I just love the design. Do you guys like it??
camping,"Looking for some lesser known brands of high quality both ethically and actual material. Was doing research on The North Face and did not find good things. I would like to support someone that supports both the love for the outdoors and ethical labor practices. Someone (or a company) that puts people in front of profit, unlike North Face.

For reference:

https://www.outsideonline.com/2405448/outdoor-gear-factory-abuse-labor-practices","Direction on camping brands pls, not North Face"
camping,So I am going to finally take my dog Finn camping. He is still a very young and very skittish to new things and sounds.  Anyone have any advice on how to help ease him into camping? I know the first night I wont sleep much cause he will prob be up and dog all night. Oh and he is only about 25lb mix breed but very loud bark. Plus what the best thing to bring for his bed?,Advice for dogs first camping trip
camping,,"Al Naslaa Rock Tayma, Saudi Arabia, Natural or Out of this World??? Desert Camping Saudi Arabia"
camping,,"Alone in winter is fun, w/ family works too."
camping,,Camping at Brazos Bend State Park to escape Houston.
camping,,Dippers first winter camp
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,"Sunrise at FR 535, Arizona"
camping,,Is wool better for winter or summer?
camping,,Pennsyltucky boy here looking for a weeklong adventure in the Green Mountain State. Looking for a trout stream and loneliness. Send me coordinates or just a good park. And Go!
camping,,Happy New Year!
camping,,Rare driver camping
camping,"A bit of snow has come here in Sweden, so what better than going for an overnighter in Svartedalen nature reserve. Enjoy 😊",Solo winter camping overnight in snowfall | Making flaming hot Pan Pizz...
camping,,Campfire breakfast on the Muurikka | Testing the Helinox chair One
camping,,Happy New Year!
camping,,Camping on the red sea has its fun
camping,Hello all! I was wondering if you have any recommendations on how to find hike in campsites in my area. I’m from the Shasta area of California. If there are any good resources that you could share I would appreciate it!,Where can I find a hike in campsite?
camping,,More from waking up in a tent with a 6 month old. Everyone wants to know. How is it camping with a 6 month old?
camping,,Mojave National Preserve this weekend
camping,,After a hard day .... Comfortable night
camping,,Did some camping during a road trip back in NOV 2020
camping,,"How to stay motivated to workout, stay fit and healthy for the rest of your life"
camping,"I am looking for a heater for inside the tent. 

I found some that are propane powered but I worry about carbon monoxide poisoning, even with a detector. 

Are there any that run on battery or solar powered?",Best portable heaters for the tent
camping,,I lost my drone in the river! What now?
camping,,Tried our new solostove out in the backyard before taking it out for the real deal! Fun to look at and minimal smoke!
camping,"New, but packed away camping backpack stinks and has smelled as long as we’ve had it.  Threw in a storage closet and recently found it.  Has never been wet or had anything inside.  How can I deodorize it?  Safe to toss in washer?  No frame But has padded back and lots of straps.",Camping backpack smells... fishy?
camping,,"First time Camping, Kedarkantha base camp."
camping,,My home for night on a layer of spruce
camping,,This hammock was an incredible Christmas present to myself!
camping,,"Full rainbow 🌈. Just outside of Vernon, BC. Take me back"
camping,,Help a research study
camping,,It was a beautiful evening.
camping,,San Bernardino National Forest
camping,,Car camping on the beach tonight
camping,,Weekend project set up a fire pit for backyard camping
camping,,"Finally got out and used our Christmas gift. Bledsoe State Park, TN"
camping,"So I have a coleman river gorge 6 person tent and I really want to save some room. Plus the bag it comes in sucks. 

I know I obviously can't compress the poles...

But what size compression bag do I need? I love sea to summit but I don't think 20L will do, maybe 30? Any advice would be great. 

We prefer a larger sent for me, my wife, my dog, and possibly to bring along friends. Obviously getting a smaller tent is an option but don't think it's needed. Thanks for the help",Compression sack question #2
camping,,Camp fire
camping,,The city has been draining so I decided to get back into camping. Most of the nearby campsites are all booked for the weekend so I’m giving the new gear a test run in the backyard.
camping,,"Chill Surviving freezing cold in forest at campfire. I tried to make my second video more entertaining and chill, hope you'll enjoy guys :)"
camping,,I Almost Died While Camping in A National Forest
camping,,"View from the top of Mt Finke, South Australia."
camping,"As title.
I know about snow anchors for snow but whats the best solution when there is no snow but the ground is frozen?",Setting stakes/pegs in Winter/frozen ground
camping,"I just finished making a rough sketch of the entire guide but felt like there might be some things missing. Then I had the genius idea to see what the camping subreddit has to say about it. Could you perhaps give me some of your valuable insight? It will be greatly appreciated.

Here's the sketch: [https://dynalist.io/d/1KavL1XCDRozOhULBNpNyGRk#theme=dark](https://dynalist.io/d/1KavL1XCDRozOhULBNpNyGRk#theme=dark)

Note: not every line is a subtitle, some are just chunks of information and will be adjusted.",I'm putting together a massive tent camping guide and need your help
camping,,Lungs full of fresh air
camping,"Hello r/camping, I started piecing together a few emergency necessities for my car a few months ago which has ballooned into a bit of a hobby of curating a bug-out-bag. It started as reflective emergency road triangles, emergency blankets, knife that has a seatbelt cutter and window breaker. But now I’m onto lifestraws and single person tents haha.


Anyway, I bought a nice compass on eBay but it’s useless unless I know how to use it. My plan was to watch some YouTube videos and test it out locally then go out into the woods, in a relatively safe and not totally remote area and field test it. Since I’m doing that I may as well do a one day or two day excursion with a heavy load of all my gear just to try it all out. Below I’ll list all of the things I will be taking with me on my first run (hopefully I get the formatting right so it’s not annoying to read) and then on subsequent tests I’ll refine what is essential and what I can do without. I would greatly appreciate any tips or suggestions on things I should be ready for/need to buy/ or other cold weather camping advice. Thank you.


* 57 gallon backpack
* 4.3 pound single person tent
* 16x20 multipurpose drytop tarp
* nylon rope
* duct tape
* lifestraw with bladder
* winter clothing and knee pads 
* kbar, bear spray, emergency whistle
* [this first aid kit and all its contents](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B08CVRXH4Z/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_PVXaGb399YVES?_encoding=UTF8&amp;psc=1)
* spork, small camping pot and pan
* [this small stove with fire starter cubes](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B01B3NRAUA/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_fYXaGb7WV6MKH)
* zippo with spare fluid
* [this compass](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07Q3VSZ26/ref=cm_sw_r_cp_api_glc_fabc_x1XaGb763KSM5)
* ReadyWise Emergency Food Supply Grab Bag
* Handsaw, small collapsible trench shovel
* [This power supply/radio thing](https://www.amazon.com/dp/B07FKYHTWP?ref=ppx_pop_mob_ap_share)
* cellphone with offline map downloaded and gps. USB charge cord
* gloves
* Water bottle

Again any suggestions, tips, and advice are greatly appreciated. Thank you! Also I am in NE America to get an idea of the worst kind of weather I’ll be facing. For fun as an exercise outside of general tips; let’s say worst case scenario I need to walk about 300 miles- a four day journey -to the Canadian border.",Testing BoB. Wanted some tips on winter weather camping/navigation/survival.
camping,,My First Time- NO Tent- Solo Winter Camping Under a Tarp (AWESOME!)
camping,,What is your favorite place to have a breakfast? Share Your travel Instagram! ig : saigonmunch
camping,,Excited to try out our new sleeping pad. Camping in central Florida next weekend!
camping,,Best camping ever!
camping,,Here we go
camping,,Colorado just outside Durango
camping,,Waking up in a tent with a 6 month old baby like.
camping,,-10c hammock trip. Lake froze overnight
camping,,-10c hammock trip. Lake froze overnight
camping,,my camping view is very special from UAE
camping,,New hot tent setup! So excited to get it out today!
camping,,Camping at Mai Khao Beach Phuket Thailand!
camping,,Camping in one of Oslo's many lakes
camping,,"Twin Lakes, CO. We were fortunate enough to get this drive in spot."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img 5xgj2ao8snb61...*

 1. A good drying place  
Under the [awning](https://www.chinafoldingtent.com) is the best place to dry your clothes. The awning can block the wind and rain, and the lower part can be equipped with a drying rack to dry the clothes, even if it rains suddenly when you are out. More importantly, it can cut off the damage of ultraviolet rays to clothing and prevent clothing from fading and becoming old.

2. Harmony and unity of shading and daylighting  
While shielding the scorching summer, it can reflect strong sunlight into the room in the form of diffused light, so that the indoor light is bright and not dazzling, and does not affect the view from the window outside the room, extending people's living space from the interior Going outdoors creates a new living space.

3. Anti-ultraviolet function  
The sunshade's sunshade cloth has a special anti-ultraviolet function, which not only protects human skin from ultraviolet rays but also greatly extends the service life of indoor decoration and furniture.

There are a variety of patterns and colors of covering cloth. Users can personalize and decorate the window surroundings according to their own tastes. They can also choose the appropriate awning model according to the shape of the building to make the building equipped with the awning of the day The objects are more personalized decoration, thereby enhancing the image of the overall building.",What Is The Role And Function Of The Awning?
camping,,"Camping in Croatia, Peljesac Island"
camping,There aren’t many wild boar around my area but there is definitely one outside my tent and I have food in here. Am I gonna die? I don’t know what to do I just know that boars are very dangerous holy fuck one just touched my tent I think they know I have food,I’m fucking terrified
camping,,"Camping this past spring in Lone Pine, CA"
camping,,How To Never Get Bored Cooking With A Single Gas Burner or Camping Stove
camping,Alrighty y’all I’m looking for a place to camp around north Texas.  Preferably not a place with a lot of foot traffic. Any recommendations would be appreciated.,Looking for a free play to camp
camping,,Breakfast on the Beach @saigonmunch
camping,,"If it wasn’t for this sub, I wouldn’t know this tent exists. I can’t wait for spring."
camping,,SPARKS
camping,,View in Washington state. The mountains are so beautiful.
camping,,"Campers of reddit, What's one thing you didnt think you'd need until you needed it?"
camping,,"I have made steady progress over the years trimming pack weight. The past 3 years I've struggled justifying making additional changes. My eno hammock system is heavy, but it's not changing the smile on my face or heart, you know? Please challenge me here if I should consider making changes."
camping,,"She was very curious about us, and that white thing called a tortilla.. Curious and friendly.."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://preview.redd.it/1qswfx718lb61.jpg?width=4608&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=0df9d75f795d59b16c91ae62dc51f7fc1e3409ef",Spent a few weeks rafting the Colorado River and camping in the Grand Canyon
camping,,"Fishin Camp Life: Back axle on my pickup shifted, cannot go home to my Q..."
camping,"Just seeking advice on where to go this weekend. We're a family of 4 (kids are 4 and 6) and we camp often, but this will be our first time doing it on dispersed land and not a campground. We're traveling from Los Angeles in a minivan and we have all the gear. We were originally planning to head to Kofa/Palm Canyon in AZ but are last minute considering Alabama Hills now as it's been at the top of our list and weather looks super mild this weekend. I am mainly wondering if Alabama Hills will be extra crowded, as it's a holiday weekend. I don't know what to expect...if people say AH is ""crowded,"" does that mean you actually see neighbors in all directions when you look around, or are you able to get a good spot still with some privacy? Any opinions are very welcome - thank you!",Kofa or Alabama Hills for first time boondocking
camping,So what's the secret to getting a good / popular site at the state parks in Michigan? I'm locked and loaded every morning with no success.,Reservation problems with Michigan State Parks
camping,,Gurgling of water meditation
camping,,Under the moonlight
camping,,"Some good nights camping in Lincoln national forest, NM"
camping,,Bushcraft Breakfast - Petromax Firebowl - Wild Camping International
camping,,"Camping in the Ocala National Forest, just before the new year"
camping,[deleted],Camping in the Ocala National Forest just before the new year
camping,,"Undisclosed location in BC, Canada (I forget the name of the lake). What a beautiful place in the mountains :). Lake was freezing cold but very refreshing."
camping,"&amp;#x200B;

https://reddit.com/link/kxzoiz/video/9t1jda4x9jb61/player

This product is now available at [CatamaranTech.com/](https://CatamaranTech.com/products/23-in-1)

&amp;#x200B;",THE ULTIMATE SURVIVAL TOOL 23-IN-1 FOLDING SHOVEL
camping,,Tried a flame pack from Walmart for the first time. Camera just doesn’t do it justice
camping,,"Spent a night in the Amazon. It was cool but terrifying. I don't want to repeat it, lol."
camping,,Not a bad spot for a camp. Long hike in with way too much crap but it was worth it. Kenzua Dam in PA.
camping,"Looking for some great camping spots for summer and fall that are family friendly, any recommendations?",Need recommendations for camping spots in Northern California
camping,,Rainy mornings in the tent just hit differently.
camping,,We started 2021 with a leaky tent and crazy rain! Great story to tell now that it's over!
camping,,I will develop a andriod mobile 2d and 3d game for just $20
camping,,Decoratiunile naturii
camping,,"Daily daytime camp outs happening at the family homestead. (Might have a fireplace, but no water, electricity or bathroom.)"
camping,"I'm looking for camping gear,I'm new to camping(I don't know anything).I'm searching for cheap camping accessories,I'm searching for some places for camping(I'm from India).The places should be safe,I started thinking of camping because of yuru camp if you have places like the ones in yuru camp then please tell.",Looking for camping gear and places
camping,,"I will design awesome mascot for your esport logo, twitch or youtube"
camping,,When a donkey wandered in and joined us for breakfast while camping last summer
camping," 

https://preview.redd.it/zhsdwiymngb61.jpg?width=800&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=16a668958a5422fbce902ea77717f8b80d0b11a7

　　Do it yourself, how to, outdoor life

　　The investment [pavilion](https://www.chinafoldingtent.com/) seems a bit expensive, you can only use it in summer and the rest of the year, it sits there, no one uses it. This seems to be a waste of money, but you can never go wrong again. The pavilion can be used all year round, but you must know how to use the pavilion and for what purpose. So go out there, buy a pavilion, and use it all the time in some of the most unusual but awesome ways.

　　Tip 1-Turn it into an outdoor cinema

　　Since the pavilion is already set up, you can easily convert it into a home theater. Drag the TV, CD system, and other speakers to the pavilion for installation, or just buy another set of entertainment equipment (flat screen, soundbar), which can be covered and sealed when not in use.

　　After the theater opens, organize a party with your friends and family, watch the latest 3D movies, host a sports night, and even watch your favorite shows in this exotic new entertainment venue you created for yourself and your family. Unfavorable weather such as rain or strong wind may prevent you from using the pavilion, but you can invest in heavy-duty PVC solid walls to keep the pavilion warm and safe. Alternatively, you can use the pavilion when the weather is not too severe. Mother Nature does not show her anger every winter night or weekend.

　　Tip 2-Temporary Shelter

　　If you have a movable pavilion, you can easily move the pavilion in the hot summer to provide temporary shelter for vehicles. Install a pavilion on the driveway or sidewalk, and then park the car in the shade.

　　Tip 3-Build a greenhouse

　　Build a small garden in the pavilion to protect the environment. In winter, establish a small garden and plant seasonal vegetables such as potatoes, onions, peppers, eggplants, etc. Don't forget to buy strong or flexible plastic walls to keep the inside of the pavilion warm and moist. With the right heater, you can easily get a comfortable supply of fresh vegetables throughout the winter.

　　Tip 4-Open a pop-up store

　　Do you have a small business? Use it as a pop-up store by setting up temporary pavilions in parking lots, exhibitions, and popular shopping areas. You may need a license or permit, but this is a significant way to increase awareness of local businesses with minimal investment.

　　Tip 5-Charity Activities

　　Charity activities are an excellent way to collect food, money, and clothes for the poor. If you have a portable pavilion, place it near a church, hospital, or any event to promote charitable activities. With the right pavilion, you can attract walkers into the pavilion and encourage them to follow your favorite charity. After all, any kind of contribution can have a huge impact on any non-profit organization.

　　Tip 6-Temporary storage

　　Are you decorating the house? Or do you have to leave your home for a few days because of pests and fog? Use the pavilion as a temporary shelter or a place to temporarily store your property. In summer, this is possible. However, in rainy weather and winter, you may need extra protection. Under these adverse conditions, make sure you have a strong PVC wall to provide temperature control and protect you and your property from strong winds.

　　Tip 7-Use it as a team-building exercise

　　For seminar organizers, teamwork is a great way to encourage a community atmosphere. Building things together is a great way to encourage team unity, and the pavilion is a perfect choice. In a company seminar, you can divide your colleagues into teams and then compete. The team that built the pavilion received the reward first. This team exercise can encourage unity and ensure mutual communication and better professional ethics between teams. Of course, you can also set the pavilion as an outdoor seating area during business seminars, or set the pavilion as an outdoor snack area during business lunches or events.

　　Tip 8 – Make jazz on the kid’s birthday party

　　Children like to have fun birthday parties. If you already have a temporary gazebo, hold a pantomime, puppet show, or magic show in the gazebo and make the kids happy throughout the party. You can rent two more pavilions, and hire temporary tattooists, handicraft teachers, etc. Your young guests will have a wonderful time.

　　Tip 9-Giveaway

　　If you have a company, the pavilion is a great way to promote your company locally. Created pavilions with logos and distributed them to your vendors as freebies. You can also give it away to customers who shop in your store or customers who win simple daily contests.

　　Tip 10-beach party

　　If you organize a beach party, then you know it can be very windy and cold at night. In order to provide temporary protection, please set up a pavilion on the beach and place lounges, rocking chairs, and carpets in the pavilion to relax.

　　As you can see, the pavilion is the perfect holiday destination when it comes to relaxing outdoors. Just sitting in the pavilion completely comfortably in the pavilion can provide a multi-purpose investment.",10 Unusual But Great Ways To Use The Gazebo
camping,Hey Campers! What kind of tent do you recommend for winter season?,Winter tent
camping,,Car camping at a disused Quarry in South Australia recently.
camping,,watch this video
camping,,Campfire on the beach from a while back in Öland Sweden
camping,"I recently bought a truck and I’m trying to decide how I want to focus my camping set up. 

I have thought about buying a camper shell, building a bed frame with storage and sleeping in the truck bed. Only one issue, I’m 6’4 and have a measly 5 and a half foot bed. I could sleep diagonally but this would make it very difficult if another person were joining me.

I am also very interested in doing the roof top tent option which would be mounted on a truck bed rack. I love the idea of this because I could then use my truck bed for other items and likely be more comfortable. I would also be able to more comfortably fit another person. My main concern with this option is the durability and the longevity of these roof top tents compared to a camper shell where I wouldn’t have this concern. 

Anyone have any opinions on which option they would do and why?",Roof top tent vs Camper Shell
camping,Would it be safe for me to do a 2 day water fast while camping with my dog in below freezing temperatures? Or would it be dangerous without having any food to keep my core body temperature at the right level?,Fasting below freezing.
camping,,"Different camping view. Big Red Sand Dune, central Australia, for the Big Red Bash 2019. Remotest music festival in the world. 1300 miles (2000km) west of Brisbane 10,000 people all camping for 4 days. 3days there and 3 days back all bush camping."
camping,,"Looking down at McCarthy Creek to Booth lake, access point 17 in Algonquin Park, Ontario, Canada."
camping,[removed],NOLS courses for non-professionals? Worth it?
camping,,My favorite campsite from my favorite trip. The view of Half Dome was perfect. Also a few other pics from the trip. Yosemite National Park from 2017.
camping,We camped &amp; snorkeled at Devil's Den in Florida in our #tinycamper - IT WAS AMAZING! CHECK IT OUT! [https://youtu.be/PBH9lKFRx68](https://youtu.be/PBH9lKFRx68)   \- What's your dream camping spot? ,CAMPING IN FLORIDA
camping,"My wife saw a video of someone with an enclosed gazebo and a ducted fireplace, so now she wants one.

Yes, I've told her it's stupid and potentially deadly, but I don't know how long it takes for a single propane gas oven to fill a space with CO.  She said she would open the door while it's on, but I don't know if that's good enough, and it would make it cold.

How long can it run for without it being dangerous?",My wife wants to add a propane gas firepit to our 10 x 10 enclosed gazebo. How long can it run before I have to worry about carbon monoxide buildup.
camping,"My wife has pretty severe Scoliosis and has a lot of trouble wearing backpacks. I reckon she would do okay with a lumbar pack, but there does not appear to be any lumbar packs large enough to support a multiday excursion without myself being overburdened. Does anybody have some insight on packs that may help alleviate weight on her back? Or form fit to be weighted in a manner more suitable to her?",Backpacks for Scoliosis
camping,"Another Redditor just posted their pics of backcountry camping in Algonquin Park, and I have a flood of good memories from about 20 years ago in the late 2000's when a handful of buds and I used to go winter camping between Chirstmas and New years each year. I thought I'd share, even though this reddit seems more dedicated to pics than words :)

We never took tents. Back then, hot camping wasn't a thing, and we felt like we could get by without one - but that didn't preclude us taking some other ""creative"" shelters. We weren't much good at lightweight camping. I recall my pack was over 80lbs every time we went. Our clothes were mostly wool and we didn't do ""high tech"" fabrics since we were all broke, and the army surplus store was down the road.  Sleds were a prominent part of our gear.

In year 1 - we thought this was a once in a lifetime adventure, so everyone over planned and overpacked with all sorts of expectations and concerns. We arrived at Algonquin Park at the crack of dawn and hiked back into the woods on the Western Uplands trail (IIRC). Pulling the sleds and hiking in the snow was far harder than we'd anticipated. We moved slower than we thought we would and quickly saw we wouldn't be reaching our intended goal. Eventually we reached Starling Lake and declared it ""home"". 

John pulled out a huge 50'X25' Canadian Tire tarp and we started to talk about how we'd set it up to make a shelter. Eventually we stretched out the tarp on the snow and decided that we'd dig a pit to stretch the tarp over. The pit was dug, and  the tarp stretched out. by time we were done digging, the sun was getting low. It was a warm night for January though. No one was cold, and the snow was getting heavy - there may have even been a light fog. We found some dead trees in the woods and stripped their branches for firewood. The spars that were left, we laid across the pit to hold up the tarp, and lashed a grid together, then stretched the tarp over the trees and crawled inside dragging in our gear behind us. 

As we got the fire going to cook dinner, John produced a large piece of Tyvek housewrap.  We set 4 spars in the ground and made a gazebo as a light drizzle began to fall. As we ate, the drizzle thickened and we became concerned about freezing rain. After a meal of reconstituted dehydrated whatever it was, we all made a run for our shelter to stay dry, and indeed, it was very cosy inside - but the roof didn't have much insulation. We all decided that a quick shoveling session to put snow on the tarp roof would be a good idea. an hour later, the roof had a consistent 6"" layer of snow on it, and everyone headed back inside to dry out.

With about a half-dozen candle-lanterns lighting the space, everyone settled into or onto their sleeping arrangements. With the weight of the snow, the roof was a few inches lower. In the spaces between the spars, the tarp sagged more, but it was all good and warm and comfortable.

It wasn't until after we were asleep that the drizzle became rain. The rain was gentle and silent and we didn't hear it hitting the tarp since the snow muffled the sound. I think it was Jim who woke first. His sleeping bag had soaked through, and he woke up everyone else. The weight of the rain on the tarp had made it sag down to where it was nearly touching me, and the water in the snow pit was coming up from below. I was on a cot about 4"" off the ground and about 1"" from the ceiling and trapped between the water above and the water below. No one was getting out of the snow pit dry, and all of our gear was soaked through.

We all scrambled to the gazebo, which had collapsed with the weight of water. For the rest of the night we would stand outside alternating between trying to rescue our fire (which sank into the ground as it burned) and the gazebo (that kept wanting to tip over with the weight of water it was holding). 

As the night went on, nature was kind to us, and the temperatures dropped below freezing, turning the freezing rain to snow and the water to ice. Eventually, 2 of the guys were able to return to bed, but John and I stayed up tending the fire and the gazebo. 

As soon as the sun reappeared, we got everyone up and assessed how bad things were. I recall my backpack being a frozen brick. That may be incorrect, but for sure it was not in good shape. we decided to dismantle camp and hike back out. Everything weighed extra with all the water. Dis assembling the pit was a mammoth chore with the tarp frozen to the poles. 

Luckily we had food for 4 days and had only stayed 1. We ate well and laughed about our mistakes as we tore camp down. everyone was exhausted. On the way out, the trails were a skiff of snow over a slick of ice, and we all had to lean on each other as we trudged along with packs that were all over 100 lbs.

That year set the tone for all the years of winter camping that followed. It was the first great failed experiment - others would follow including home-made snowshoes falling apart on the trail, a mitten dryer that turned into a blowtorch when put over the fire, The year we arrived too late to build quinzees and ended up sleeping out in the open, the year we took a marine from Florida with us who had never seen snow, and so on. While all of our trips had amazing failures, we never felt like we were in real danger, and always came away laughing and having a great story to share. 

Jim and John are in their late 60's now and no longer camping. I miss going out there with them. I'd do it again in heartbeat.",Winter camping memories
camping,"Just spent 3 days on the river in the New Bren KOA, great little spot.I you have a chance check it out

Camper Rockwood Primer A122,

2 adults, 1 teen, &amp; 1dog

https://preview.redd.it/3fqxw7951cb61.jpg?width=1332&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=659c0aa430555bdaadb3097297623f27543d2bae",New Bern NC KOA
camping,,Spent the last week exploring Big Bend state and national parks
camping,,20 degrees is nothing when you’ve got a furry space heater in the tent!
camping,,Quick question. What is the worst that you've experienced during any camping trip?
camping,,"Love all the camping symbols on my shirt! Fires, s’mores to name a couple!"
camping,"I want to do more camping this year and I was wondering if anyone knows of a good bedroll or sleeping bag suitable for someone who is 6'10""?",Good Bedroll / Sleeping Bag for Tall Person
camping,,Recall on Sea to Summit Pots
camping,,University project: Portable hydromechanical generator
camping,,Trekkertent Saor DCF 4-season winter tent review
camping,,I could do this forever 💓
camping,"Hey guys, I have a few trips planned for this upcoming summer and would love to hear what kind of foods you bring when camping. There will be 2-4 of us together with 2-4mile hikes out to our campsites. I have a nice cooler and Coleman stove, but less to carry is always preferred. 

I read someone likes bringing summer sausage and roasting it over the fire. Those are the sorts of things I’d love to hear more of and thought others might as well. Thanks!",Suggestions on favorite foods to pack or meals to make?
camping,,"Little Limestone Lake, Manitoba, Canada"
camping,"I’m going solo backpacking/camping in mountain lion country. Not too worried about hiking during the day.  However, when I’m setting up camp, cooking over a campfire, etc... it will be around sunset and into the evening.  Any precautions I can take since I will be solo camping during their prime hunting time at dusk and right after nightfall?  Thanks in advance for any tips.",Advice on backpacking in mountain lion country
camping,"I am working to secure a remote location to be the site of an outdoor sustainability school that will include a no trace camping area, what are your thoughts about how popular that might be? At most I would prepare some specific areas to be flat enough for tenting and have water available on-site. More details at: [https://gofund.me/52fa3b77](https://gofund.me/52fa3b77)",gofundme to save 80 acres
camping,,Let's hear some of your best camping hacks that you have.
camping,[removed],レーザーポインター ペン型300mwレーザーポインター 赤光 紫光レーザー光線
camping,,"A cold morning in algonquin park, ontario."
camping,,"Resurrecting FJ60s, FJ62s &amp; FJ55 TOYOTA LANDCRUISERS: Parts, Builds, Revival &amp; Fixing Updates"
camping,,First Camping Knife!
camping,,BLACK - Pearl Jam | cover
camping,"My Campfire

I love it! [Mini Campfire](https://www.solikefire.com/collections/fire-pits-1/products/teenra-portable-stainless-steel-bbq-grill-non-stick-surface-folding-barbecue-grill-outdoor-camping-picnic-tool)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img ft9nayhgh9b61...*

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img v80b5nrdh9b61...*",My Camping Tool
camping,"A friend an I are planning to car camp at one of the sno parks near Tahoe, since some allow over night parking. Were wondering how cold it can get for us to safely camp in our car. 

We've tent camped with the overnight low getting around 30F. We have a down comforter, heated blanket (I planned to preheat it before we turn the car off) and a thick foam sleeping pad. Is there anything we should know before hand, and is there any rule of thumb for how cold is too cold to camp in your car? 

Thanks!",Realistic expectations for winter car camping
camping,,"Bushwacking up the ridgeline facing south overlooking O.S.A. Lake in Killarney Provincial Park, Ontario, Canada, early spring."
camping,,"Sea to Summit pots, recalled. Fyi and all."
camping,"To the people who have been to Glacier national park in the US, what were the best trails you did there?",Glacier National Park tips?
camping,,07 Subaru Outback build &amp; Yosemite January 2021
camping,"I've been making campsite reservations for a trip this summer to the National Parks and may have two friends joining me for a few days. All of the reservations I've made were just for one person and I am wondering if I need to make changes to that prior to my trip? It would still just be one site, but with two tents for three people. Any ideas?",Does the # of people on a site reservation matter?
camping,,Much prefer the bottom pic
camping,"I know a lot of campsites are closed everywhere so I'm literally looking for anything at this point. I'm in Santa Cruz and willing to drive 10 hours or a bit more in my Prius, so no off-roading and avoiding snow right now. I'm considering Moab or Zion if any camping is available, but does anyone know how the weather is in the winter there?  Any ideas on dispersed camping I could do? One of my roommates might have covid so it's ironically a better idea to get out. Hopefully somewhere is open?!!",Any dispersed camping open in California? (or possibly Arizona and Utah)
camping,"Hey guys,

So I am a newbie at camping, and wondering what kind of qualities do you look for in gloves? Comfort over thickness etc?",What kind of qualities do you look for in gloves?
camping,"I am interested in your experience camping at or near this park in North Dakota. Their camp sites are almost all first come-first serve this year which I have never done before. And as a planner makes me nervous!
 
Just looking for anyone else’s experience with this area or tips for actually getting a site. Thank you!",Anyone camp at/near Theodore Roosevelt National Park?
camping,,First night truck camping with this chompasaurus named Ringo. Slept more in the truck than he ever had at home.
camping,,Made myself a fun little sticker for my new tumbler.
camping,,First night in the new tent! Did a dry run in the woods by my house :) it got down to 21 degrees Fahrenheit!
camping,,"Camping with the pups at Fall Creek Falls State Park, Tennessee in October"
camping,[deleted],"Husband and I camping with the pups at Fall Creek Falls State Park, Tennessee, USA in October"
camping,,Bag-o-Lasagna and some garlic toast (Kissimmee Prairie Preserve State Park)
camping,[deleted],First time female car camper
camping,,I saw someone else awesome reflections photo and thought I would share one I took of my own! Bon Echo PP
camping,,The fiancé and I took a day trip out to Lake Fairfield State Park (TX)
camping,[deleted],The fiancé and I took a day trip out to Lake Fairfield State Park (TX)
camping,[deleted],The fiancé took a day trip out to some trails and Lake Fairfield state park (TX)
camping,,Don’t forget to look up the next time you’re camping!
camping,Do I just simply throw it out? Or is there a safe place to take it to? Can I recycle it?,What do I do with expired bear spray?
camping,,One morning while tent camping in the United Arab Emirates (UAE) mountains (2018)
camping,"I’m trying to find a place to do some dispersed camping away from everyone in Northern California. 

In particular I’m preferring to search BLM land for places to camp, but I’m getting a lot of conflicting information when searching online. National forests seem fine too, but there’s a lot of talk of stumbling into private property and whatnot.

To anyone with experience finding dispersed campsites to just set up for a day or two without anyone around, how have you gone about searching for/getting to these types of sites? Thanks for any advice you might provide!",Dispersed camping in Northern California
camping,,Black Sand Dune Camping Saudi Arabia (Quick Video)
camping,,My childhood best friend just started this channel. Figured this great community could give him some support!
camping,,#winteriscoming
camping,,"Reflections - British Columbia, Canada."
camping,,"Lake Louise, Alberta, Canada!"
camping,[removed],Looking for help with a personal project I am working on about camping!
camping,I've tried to Google it but didn't find anything. Anybody done any winter camping in MA and know places that allow it?,Winter camping in MA?
camping,,Palo Duro Canyon State Park
camping,"I know this is a goofy question.. 

Going camping in bear country. I’m a girl so I’d like to smell good but not attract bears.. 

does anyone know any tips for scents bears don’t like but people do? Or any other tips for a girl who’s camping that are useful.. it’s my first time! 😊🐻",Bear safe perfumes and soaps?
camping,"I am a mid-level experienced car camper and have only camped in camp grounds up until this point. This sub has inspired me to stop paying $15 a night to sleep 30 feet away from another tent and go explore the national forest near me (Talladega). I found my spot and checked it out last weekend. I also have two more backup spots nearby in case a gate gets closed or someone is already there. Each spot has an old fire ring.

Any tips for making the transition to dispersed camping? I think I am going to be a little freaked out the first night but I want to give it a go!",First time BLM camping. Advice? Freezing temps expected
camping,,Camping finally in “winter” TuHcan escape is Mt Lemon.
camping,,15 Smart Tips for Camping in the Rain
camping,,This little fella came up while setting up a tent in Cades Cove
camping,,Help Me Reach My Goal and Support: one last time
camping,,"Our first winter camping trip. Tahquamenon Falls, Paradise MI"
camping,,Cottonwood lake in pikes and San Isabel national forests (CO)
camping,,"Great Sand Dunes, Colorado. Hiker in the distance"
camping,,"Trip to Mt Iso, Senapati district, Manipur"
camping,,"Camping a cold November day in Oslo, Norway"
camping,,Cozy nook ambience
camping,,"Poland Spring, Maine"
camping,,Desert Camping in Unexplored Saudi Arabia
camping,,Red Sand Camping (Mars Lookalike) Saudi Arabia
camping,,Awesome Camping Experience in Unexplored Saudi Arabia by American Family (Mars Lookalike)
camping,,Black Sand Dune Camping in Saudi Arabia (Moon camping)
camping,,openfire cooking
camping,,From the lakeside
camping,,View from yesterday's hike!
camping,[deleted],View from yesterday's hike!!
camping,,You didn’t even know you needed these chairs!
camping,"Moved to Arizona a few years ago from the grand Teton area of Wyoming and have loved camping all my life. Moving out here has posed its challenges mainly being that i live in the city and it’s gonna be a drive anywhere to go to a decent camp site and when I find one, it’s basically a hotel for tents doesn’t feel like camping. Any good recommendations out there for beautiful areas that are “undeveloped “ or just don’t have a tents every ten feet?",Arizona camping
camping,I got the Nomad around three weeks ago and since then I have used it on two camping trips. I want to give you a no bs review so I’ll just list my personal pros and cons about the tool. Pros: it’s really compact so it takes no effort just to throw it in the bag or put in my wallet. The versatility of this thing is great it has like 13 or so tools (of which I probably use 6) but just cutting down Six tools into one makes the purchase great for me. Now the cons: the weight is more then I thought it would be (this might not necessarily be a bad thing but I just was caught off guard by it) and the knife on the tool is dull so I had to sharpen it on my stone. Overall I would give an 8/10. (https://backpackingmovement.com/products/card-multi-tool),Nomad Multitool Review
camping,"I decided one day that I was going to stop buying duraflame logs since they are a waste of money. Duraflame logs are made of three ingredients. Wax sawdust and seeds (for crackling sounds). 

Apparently a lot of people have sources for free sawdust near them but I can’t seem to find any of that so I came up with my own recipe. Instead of sawdust I substitute charcoal.


Here is the recipe

Take lump charcoal (home made or store bought) and grind it into a sand like powder using a blender/ food processor.
[tip: use a wire spoon called a spider to pick the coals out of a cold fire, shake off the soot and salvage the charcoal]

Melt wax in an all metal pot or kettle [this is importand] and pour it into a container with the charcoal until it becomes like wet sand when you mix it.

Scoop out the mixture with you hands when it cools down *JUST* enough and scoop it into a sheet of aluminum foil. Wrap the aluminum foil around the pile of charcoal and once fully enclosed, massage into the shape of a loaf/log. Set aside till completely room temp (about an hour for me)

Unwrap loaf from foil and place onto wax paper, wrap wax paper around about 3 times and press sides like a burrito so it is fully enclosed in wax paper.

***here is why it’s important to use a fully metal pot to melt the wax*** 

You can place the used pot on its side in a fire to burn off the wax and leave behind just soot, that can be easily scrubbed off with Brillo or steel wool with some washing abrasive if needed until all the black is gone.


Now some people don’t like using paraphin wax becouse some studies show it produces certain unhealthy chemicals when burned. I don’t have a problem with paraphin wax but if you do then you can use bees wax or if that’s too expensive use vegetable waxes like soy wax.",I think I figured out the perfect campfire fuel recipe.
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,,Tarp Shelter for Life
camping,,These are reliable methods to start a fire without matches or lighters
camping,"Trying to plan my summer camping trips and want to go somewhere new. I like pretty lakes/rivers where the campgrounds are either right on the shore or close enough for a five minute walk. Do you have any favorite campgrounds that fit that description, within 1-3 hours of Sacramento?",Best waterfront campgrounds in Nor Cal?
camping,,Eastern Sierras this past weekend. Unbelievable sunsets and stars!
camping,,Northern Ontario Camp N Cook - Steak and Beans
camping,"I’m looking at some from REI that start at around $50 but can go up to $100. I’m not a big spender when it comes to camping so I’m wondering if these are worth it. I don’t think I’d be using it for sleeping at any point, just hanging out. So I don’t mean a tent hammock.",Is a camping hammock worth it?
camping,,Whats your top five camping gear need to haves.
camping,,Photos from our 5 day trip in the BWCA from last week.
camping,[deleted],Photos from our 5 day trip in the BWCA last week.
camping,A lot of the stuff on amazon has bad reviews because it is low quality.,What camping cookware set would you recommend for cooking over a campfire?
camping,"Found this in with some family photos and and notes that my mother had saved over the years, she had cut it out, probably from a magazine I would guess.
Survival Training.
When I married 30 years ago, I was a camping enthusiast.  My bride had reservations about a camping honeymoon, but I painted a glorious picture of sitting close together in front of a campfire, or looking out over spectacular scenery.
There were a few mishaps.  For instance, she accidentally inserted the tent's center pole through the canvas; it rained that night.  The outboard motor gave up the ghost, and so did the fish in the lake.  Two flat tires enriched the journey home.  When I apologized for the discomforts, she passed it off cheerfully.  ""I know there will be some hard times in the future,"" she said.  ""But I've lived through a week with a nut in a leaky tent, and I'm ready for any natural disaster.""",Camping story from the past.
camping,,Deep in the Canadian Rockies (July 2020)
camping,,"Anyone else find a pocket bellows to be a great addition to their pack? My friend brought one along on our last camping trip, and it was quite handy!"
camping,Drag the rod towards you rather than pushing the steel away from you,Best use of a Ferrite rod
camping,"Me and my girlfriend want to go camping this weekend because of the holiday on monday, but so many things are closed because of the government shutdown. Does anyone have any recommendations for camping spots that are open?",Camping in California
camping,The office is currently closed. Am I still allowed to do some backpacking in the state park next week?,"Winter camping in Green Ridge State Forest, Maryland?"
camping,"Any recommendations for places to go dispersed camping or hiking or backpacking? There is some BLM land in Anzaborrego that is still open. 

Some of the longer mountain routes seem a bit long for a day trip and driving home. My girlfriend and I have a long weekend and are hoping to get outside and away from the city for a few days.",SoCal camping/hiking/backpacking
camping,,"BC, Canada"
camping,[removed],$5 for your opinion! At what age did you get your first cellphone? Help us with our study! ( PayPal / Amazon Gift Card )
camping,,"Sespe Wilderness, California- June, 2020- first solo backcountry camping trip"
camping,,5 Winter Camping Tips
camping,,"How to overcome my fear? I travelled from São Paulo to Manaus (Brazil) only to enter the Amazon rainforest but now I'm in front of it I can't enter it, I'm afraid, I don't know what can happen. My instincts are obliging me to return to the comfortable civilization."
camping,,Wallpaper
camping,,"A wild camp in Scotland, UK I did before lockdown. Longing to get back up there again!"
camping,,"As promised: The new hard shell roof tent from ventura. Coming to the market from Feb 2021, the price is amazing! log onto venturas Web site to put your deposit down and if you tell them landrover Jay recommended you - the price will shock you (there will be a limited number sold at an introductory"
camping,,レーザーポインター ペン型300mwレーザーポインター 赤光 紫光レーザー光線
camping,"With such a wide spectrum of backpackers in this group, I'm curious as to what people prefer as their cook set. Are you an ultralight alcohol fuel stove kinda trekker, or do you prefer the luxury of a larger kitchen?

I've been using the GSI Pinnacle Soloist for four years now... here is my gear review based on using it for day hikes, overnighters, week long treks and kayak adventures.

https://youtu.be/VueoAm-4OzI",Preferred cook set?
camping,,Good morning from Massachusetts!
camping,My brothers family and I are going to go to St. Mary’s Retreat Feb 19-22. Cannot wait to set up EVERYTHING I own for camping. Pics to come soon. I’m so friggin excited.,Can’t Wait
camping,"I'm going car camping next month, have an inflatable mattress, super comfy but I was chilly in November in the 30's. Likely the same temp next month. 

My bag is rated to 40 degrees and I put a liner

I was considering a walmart blue CCF mat on top of my mattress - super cheap @ $9 but not sure just how much they help. I've read they have an R value of almost 2, I'm curious how much that helps. 

Any experience with that kind of setup anybody?

Thanks",R-value of 2 - how much does that help?
camping,Where can I go to? Seems the forests are closed.,Socal camping spots?
camping,"Thinking about doing a night next week and would like some advice on must haves, or tricks anyone might know from experience.",Tips for winter camping!
camping,,Reflecting in the Texas cold...
camping,,"My review of the campground at Gulf State Park in Gulf Shores, Alabama!"
camping,,Campfire Breakfast
camping,,"Hehe, so true..."
camping,,"Star Lake, Tahoe Rim Trail, August 2020"
camping,"I got a 40L pack and my single-person tent is defaulted to being strapped to outside my pack, either on the top or bottom. Is it wise to compress or fold the tent body and rainfly to put inside the pack?",Packing tent in backpack: Compress or Fold?
camping,"Hey all! My questions are about mattresses, particularly cold(ish) weather mattresses since I'm going camping in about a month and it's likely to drop into the 30s while I'm there.

 \- Question 1: If I combine two R-2 pads, will it really make an R-4 pad (or is that an internet lie)? 

 \- Question 2: I'd like to bring my air mattress along for comfort. If I do, should I put the foam mattress *under* the air mattress, or *over/on top of* the air mattress for insulation?

TIA everyone - I really appreciate it!",Cold Weather Question
camping,"Planning a trip out there this coming weekend. I know inside the park is closed for camping. Looking for a spot to set up for one night. I figure I’ll locate some BLM plot and set up there, but I was curious if any recommendations would come through by asking. 

Thank you in advanced.","Those of you who have been to Joshua Tree recently, where have you spent the night?"
camping,,First time camping since I was a kid... I didn’t realize how much I needed this.
camping,"Getting prepped for an extended Moab trip. Bought a Firebox Gen 2, 5"" and a Trangia spirit burner. What do you guys recommend?",What fuel for Trangia?
camping,,More than a decent place for some warming drinks. ☕️
camping,,Modified this $20Fireman’s hatchet into a Bushcraft-ish axe lol. Let me know what you think.
camping,,Annual Boundary Waters trip led to a hopefully non annual hammock failure. Got to set up the Camp ENO bivy to finish off the trip!
camping,[deleted],Annual Boundary Waters trip led to what is hopefully a non annual hammock failure. Got to setup the Camp ENO bivy for the rest of the trip!
camping,"I have begun to plan for a small camping trip and was hoping to get some inspiration for the food. One of the best meals I’ve had was camping at Joshua Tree for a uni trip, and the supervisor made a deep dish zucchini lasagna. We cut up the zucchini (with other ingredients) and put into the deep dish then we put it under coals and fire to cook it (didn’t need a stove or nada). And for dessert we had bananas that we stuffed with PB, chocolate, and marshmallows and wrapped the stuffed banana with foil then put it with the coals (similar to the deep dish). Any fun creative cooking meals like this?",What’s the best camping meal you’ve made/had on a trip?
camping,,Is this how you start camping/hiking?
camping,,The beautiful Czech bohemian forests
camping,,[crabbing and camping ] Oregon coast
camping,,An amazing View from Big Bend National Park last summer
camping,My buddy and I had a fun time hiking up this mountain to this beautiful view,An amazing view from Big Bend National Park
camping,"Hi all,

I got a MSR Pocket Rocket Deluxe for Christmas, and I’m looking for ways to utilize this gas stove. It seems like it’s mainly geared towards backpackers trying to make MRE’s but I’d like to use this for something like a skottle or cast pan to cook some premo meals. With the output of the MSR being 11k BTU’s and the Tembo Tusk supplied burner (I think by Coleman) being 10k BTU’s, I don’t really see the problem, but it doesn’t seem to be marketed in that fashion. 

Any help is appreciated. Thanks!",MSR Pocket Rocket Deluxe Stove Uses
camping,,Trail Ahead
camping,,Snow in Louisiana! Enjoying every moment of it.
camping,,Kayaked 5 miles in the ocean to camp on this island. Also this was my first time going to the ocean.
camping,,Flourless Pancakes – 3 Ingredients
camping,,On the road to Birdsville with the camping table on the back
camping,,"Camping on the bank of the Diamantina 'river' in Bordsville, Australia. 29 December"
camping,"I'm looking to go camping with my girlfriend. We have a 4x4 &amp; offroad. We're in socal &amp; want to see something else. We're fine dispersed camping &amp; prefer secluded areas. 

Anywhere I can go that has forest, a lake &amp; a view?

Tried looking at Yosemite area, but surrounding forests have closed a lot of roads to go to dispersed areas for camping (Stanislaus National Forest). I. E. MVUM shows I can only be there 4/15 to 12/15

Tried Tahoe National Forest but it has a similar road restrictions fro. 4/1 to 12/1.

Lastly, can I cross state lines? Lol. Arizona seems more chill.",Where to go now? Lol.
camping,,Enjoying much in Camp
camping,"With the onslaught of this virus alot of us have taken to trekking and camping keeping in mind the social distancing aspect of this hobby. While there are alot of blogs amd videos on various trekking and camping spots most of the information is out dated and sparse. This led me to the idea of making a discord server for hiking, camping and perhaps travelling in general for our diverse country. Would like to know how many would be interested before putting in the work to make a server.","A discord server for trekking, camping, hiking etc in India"
camping,,Vatnajökull glacier in Island
camping,,Key4ce - IT Professionals
camping," Hi everyone, I'm in the market for a portable/lightweight power supply that can output 300W. I need it to have a capacity of at least 1000 watt-hours, but my understanding is that stations that can do this are very expensive and run at least 600-700 dollars, usually 1000 dollars.

I was wondering.. could I get a 300W portable power station (like the Renogy Phoenix or Rockpals) and add extra batteries myself? I'm also not opposed to building the entire thing myself, but it would have to be portable/lightweight, and I'm not sure that's possible. My budget is ideally $300, and at the absolute maximum $500.

Any advice would be appreciated, thanks :)",Portable power supply advice and recommendations
camping,"On the fence between getting a Teardrop camper or going with camping trailer with RTT.  I see PROs and CONs of each.  Teardrop camping scores high on the convenience scale while I see going with RTT closer to traditional tent camping experience. Both are still full of conveniences and a win either way. 

Really curious why you went one way or the other and if you later wished you had picked differently. Thanks",Teardrop camper vs camping trailer with RTT
camping,"I'm in Santa Cruz and looking for a little getaway alone. I've never camped alone but I know I can do it, and I'm looking more into dispersed camping, not campgrounds, because I know they're not open now. And you also don't have to pay lol. I have a Prius so I can't do any intense driving or off-roading and I don't want to drive in snow, so mostly thinking of going south for warmer weather. My one idea is Joshua Tree but I feel like a lot of people are going there these days. I could potentially bring my surf board if it's worth it but that depends on the ideas! I also don't have to stay in California, I'm just hoping for a place with no snow but want to adventure!! 

Also if there's any must-have gear lemme know! Especially since I'd be going alone (and a woman) :)",Ideas for week-long solo camping trip in California? (25f)
camping,,A very soft camp spot at Magheroarty Beach in County Donegal in Ireland
camping,"Having problems using recreation.gov. For e.g. see https://www.recreation.gov/camping/campgrounds/233116/availability and go out 6 months to july 10th 2021. On some sites it says ""available if reservation is before _____"", what does this mean and how can I hope to reserve something?",How do you guys reserve popular spots?
camping,,Old meets new for coffee while camping in the Sam Houston National Forest this past weekend. Absolutely gorgeous (and cold) morning.
camping,,Glamping and taco night on the West Coast in our Suburban Overland Rig
camping,,Steak time!
camping,,"QUESTION HELP. So I bought an air mattress to place in my tent and realized after I opened it that it uses an electrical plug. On the tag it says 120v, is there any way I can get this plugged into my trucks lighter port with some kind of adapter or piece?"
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,[deleted],"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,,A Short Video From Golden Horn Outdoor Knives
camping,"As the title says, we’re looking to upgrade a lot of our camping equipment including our cooler. 

We’re looking into Yeti Cooler 35. Seems solid, great features, durable, cherry on top; cool colors. 

But, what else can we look at that comparable? And if you have a Yeti, is it worth it?

We’re more than fine putting out this type of money for a quality cooler, something that will withstand the test of time. As long as it will withstand the test of time. 


TIA",Recommendations upgrading the cooler.
camping,,Top of the world
camping,,"The view this morning, standing on the End of the World, was unreal."
camping,I love hiking alone and I normally go on 8-12 miles hikes on days off. I have gone camping a few times less than five times. I want to try camping alone as a female. I would camp in my car as it would be my first time alone and pick up seems easier. I’d camp at a state parks with showers and toilets and the trip would be 2 days 1 night. Is this a good idea for a first time solo camper who is looking for more experience?,I want to try camping solo female but I’m an inexperienced camper
camping,,Burning a marshmallow
camping,,Who else loves a good winter camping trip?
camping,,January night in a wind shelter with the dog.
camping,"Looking to rent a smaller rv to take a road trip to the UP of Michigan in the summer with a couple buddies and my dog. Any hidden gems that you won’t be right next to someone? Not afraid to go all the way up to copper harbor. Just looking for some nice views, brews, and some fishing!",Quite place to rv in the UP
camping,"I am new to Georgia, and my tent attaches onto the top of my car. What are primitive camp sites that allow me to bring my car into the physical campsite?",Primitive camping in Georgia that allows me to bring my car into the camp site?
camping,,Palisades State Park in South Dakota last night
camping,,Winter camping in Canada on the shore of Lake Superior
camping,,"Mindblowing view from my camp of the Eagle Nebula, Swan Nebula, and Milky Way over Mt. Shasta [OC]"
camping,,Fire underneath the parachute. Ararat Vinyards NC.
camping,,More parachute camp pics.
camping,,Built a roof top tent for my forester !
camping,,"Since everyone liked the parachute camping pic so much, I thought I'd add some more."
camping,,"Since everyone liked the parachute camping pic so much, I thought I'd add some more."
camping,,Camping in below 0c (Sweden)
camping,,"Palo Duro Canyon State Park in Canyon, Texas"
camping,[deleted],"Greetings from Texas, it never snows here!"
camping,Is it a terrible idea to take a 20 degree bag into the 0-10 range and count on warm layers of clothing to make up the extra insulation? How miserable will I be?,using sleeping bags below their rating
camping,,RooftopTent Camping near Grand Canyon National Park (free dispersed camping)
camping,,"Greetings from Texas, never snows here!"
camping,"Specifically the REI Base Camp 6 vs Sierra Designs Nomad 6 for a family of 4. 

Anyone have experience with both?",Comparing 6 person tents
camping,,Subscribe to me to see even more content 😘 https://onlyfans.com/hawtmama00
camping,So for anyone that has the Coleman prairie breeze tent with ceiling fan/light system.  I know it runs off the cpx 6 battery pack rechargeable which is junk but can anyone tell me when the max voltage is on the fan/light? I want to make a replacement pack with my 3dv printer that will use 18650 li-ion batteries but just 2 of those together output 7.4V. would this kill the fan/light and/or the switch for it?,Coleman cpx 6 replacement
camping,,"August 2020. Bald Eagle State Forest, PA"
camping,"I'm needing more lighting in my tent, does anyone have a solution for running any sort of string light around the inside of a tent? It's canvas so I was thinking maybe some velcro would hold up the lights? Can't use a safety pin or anything, any help would be appreciated!",Creative Solution
camping,,Backyard camping!
camping,,"Only came for a night, stayed for 4..."
camping,,BCF Mossy Oak Survival Kit 2021 - Review
camping,Had a great time biking through the Karangahake Gorge.,Karangahahe Gorge bike camping. Bit of an NZ trip for the end of 2020 in heavy rain.
camping,,First backpacking trip in RMNP feels great to get away. (Summer trip)
camping,,Loco puppy
camping,Long story short I currently only have one of those cheapo roll up foam ones that don’t really do anything. Can anyone recommend any better ones that are more comfortable?,Camping pad suggestions?
camping,,"Glen Head Signal Tower, Ireland. Normally inaccessible in a 4x4. Access possible in the drought of 2018. These early-19th-century Napoleonic towers were part of an 81 towers communication system constructed, furnished, and staffed between 1804 and 1006 to defend Ireland against French invasion."
camping,,"When you can’t get out camping, camp in your backyard ⛺️ 🔥"
camping,,If I can’t get out sometimes I like to have a campfire in my backyard 🔥
camping,,"What is the most beautiful of this charming desert, it is the desert of Egypt, where calm, safety, psychological comfort and adventures are the most beautiful trip in the world, you will make it, you will feel that you are in another planet"
camping,,"Trying out the new hot tent and stove in the back yard, and it’s even snowing!"
camping,,"Regarding camping alone in the winter, yes."
camping,,Winter Camping ALONE. Anyone else camp like this?
camping,,wish I was out camping out in Utah...Doing some art inspired by the national parks. This time it's Arches! what's your favorite sun/moon color? Enjoy and thank you.
camping,,Is this camp griddle too far gone or can it be refurbished?
camping,Would like to know just in case I get a leaky tent.,What is a good tent seam sealer?
camping,"Hey guys! I've recently decided to try out camping after wanted to since i was a kid but never got the chance to. I'm coming upto my mid 20s and want to start doing more like hiking and camping, nature stuff. I love the idea and i always tend to sit in the garden for long hours, stargazing and practice breathing exercises and other stuff. I live in london so i can't go anywhere really local, i think. I like the idea of traveling up to scotland and visiting some places up there. If anyone has any information or tips before i make the travel, i'd love to hear them.  Thanks guys &lt;3","Beginner, Any Tips?"
camping,"Hey everybody,

I am looking to do a several week road trip through Colorado and Utah now that I am self employed and have freedom over my schedule.

I am a bit of a noob camper, but I would really like to do a lot of car camping in Utah and Colorado after having been stuck in my house for the past year. 

Utah especially seems to be a camping utopia, but there's almost too many spots that come up wherever I search. I'm not sure how to discern which places are actually worthwhile, especially for a bit of a novice camper.

What are your favorite campgrounds to go to in UT and CO? I'll be renting a decent sized car and for parts of the trip I'll have a group of 4 or 6 or so, but I'll also be alone for most of the trip.

Any advice is appreciated. Thanks!",Best campsites in Utah or Colorado?
camping,,"Highlands Backpacking Trail, Algonquin Park, ON."
camping,,Camping for a research trip and had the stars in my tent. Any advice on how to keep this from happening???
camping,"Does anyone know of an area that’s open for camping near San Diego? Right now it seems like everything is either closed because of the state park shut downs (due to COVID-19), or the fire ban. We don’t have a 4x4 so we are limited to short hikes into the area or car accessible.",Camping in SoCal
camping,Im currently enrolled in college and all my courses are online so I'm trying to find a way to use my laptop to attend class while camping/fishing. As far as power goes im covered I just need a way to get internet. Im on a family plan for my phone with minimal data so thats not an option. I found rentable unlimited mifi devices too which look good for extended trips. What i really want is like reloadable data only sim cards so I can prepay for a couple gigs of data and use a dongle to connect my laptop up. I looked around without finding anything good. Does anyone know of anything like that or any other options I could use? Im in the US and dont plan on going too remote mostly near highways,Doing classes while camping
camping,,"First hike and bonfire coffee of the year. Viken, Norway"
camping,[deleted],"First hike and bonfire coffee of the year. Viken, Norway"
camping,,"Don’t push yourself too hard! Cranberry Wilderness, West Virginia."
camping,,Ready for the warmer weather
camping,,Lakes Like Mirrors - ONF
camping,,Why do people put a circle of rocks around a campfire? What does it do?
camping,"Firstly, I hope this is the right sub for all your sakes. No one wants a newbie coming round here asking dumb questions.

In brief, I’m looking to do a road trip in Scotland and was wondering if it’s as simple as just driving there, take a couple of sleeping bags and doing your thing? I mean is prior research required or just wing it?

If anyone has done this before and has any tips it would be appreciated!",Advice: ‘Route 66’ of Scotland
camping,,"Watchman in Zion for New Years, Goosecreek south of Arches boundary on the Colorado, Mathers at the Grand Canyon, Daytrip to Bryce. All clean, well maintained grounds. Arches campgrounds were closed til March."
camping,,"Got to see this bad boy today. Cecil Webb camp grounds, Florida"
camping,,Throwback to having to sleep in a parking lot through my road trip... still enjoyed breakfast!
camping,"It's the middle of summer here in Australia, and where I'm camping next week may reach 47C or 116F. I'm looking for some specific tips, ideas or products other than ""seek shade"", ""go swimming"" etc. Cheers.",Tips on keeping cool
camping,"This is how we spent our reading week in Bruce Peninsula National Park, Toronto, and Niagara Falls and our recommendations out the best places to visit and camp in Ontario. I give you recommendations of activities you can do in Niagara falls, places to eat, and more! Subscribe and leave a comment below if you have been to any of these places!","HOW TO TRAVEL ONTARIO Niagara Falls, Bruce Peninsula National Park, Toronto"
camping,,not often you get snow at Big Bend National Park (TX)
camping,,"LAKE LOUISE Travel Guide, Top Things To Do, WHAT TO SEE"
camping,Besides the obvious *must have* things like fire starter etc.,What is your most important non-essential item in your camping kit?
camping,,Beautiful camping spot in the Blue Ridge Mountains. ⛰
camping,,"Over Christmas, we camped out in Ozark National Forest, about an hour from Huntsville, AR."
camping,,"Southern Lakes region, South Island, New Zealand. 10 days with 2 other families. Epic start to the new year!"
camping,"Not after advice, just curious what everyone purchased for your very first camping trip without your parents to supply everything. 

Not including food, water etc.",First camping trip - how much did you spend on camping equipment?
camping,,Want to take the family camping in the redwoods this summer. Who has a recommendation for a good spot? Will be staying for 2 nights.
camping,"Hi all! I plan on going camping sometime in the near future but the thing is I've never gone and I don't have any of the gear I might need. For personal reasons, I'm trying to avoid big retailers like Amazon, Walmart, Dicks, etc. Is there any good website or whatever to find cheap or even second-hand gear? Also are there any good checklists out there of the stuff you need for camping. Thanks :)",Finding cheap gear (first time camping)
camping,,My last camp with friends in a trip car beetle
camping,,Stephen F Austin Orion's Belt
camping,,"My SO took me camping for the first time, in sub-freezing temperatures. A fun, memorable trip (despite the very cold, sleepless night lol)! Enchanted Rock State Park, TX"
camping,,"Even in full lockdown in Glasgow, Scotland, it's always good to practice to get warm. -6degC, wet wood, basic fire starting kit. Always good to get used to being able to get a good fire in prep for actual camping"
camping,,Most Comfortable Tennis Shoes for Women: Expert&amp;#039;s Top 10 Picks
camping,,Found really close to one of my normal camping spots with bits of the wood all around it. Bear?
camping,"I've only been camping twice and both times were with an experienced camper. I absolutely love the experiencing of camping (and being in nature in general) but am too scared to go out and do it on my own. So scared, in fact, that it's been \~5-6 years since I last did it. 

I wasn't raised by a family of campers. I wasn't raised in a place that had abundant camping spots or nature to explore. 

I now live in a different place that has so many good spots it's insane. I've been living here almost 5 years now and really, really want to finally try camping. It doesn't even need to be super minimalistic like I see some of you do (which looks awesome btw). I just want to know some basics, some tips. Things to bring, what to look for, etc. 

I understand that much of camping is learning from mistakes. But I know there have to be some basics out there. 

Many thanks in advance to those who provide tips. I can't wait to finally do this!

PS - I do hike often so I am at least accustomed to being outdoors. I already own a tent and portable shower.",Tips/Advice for a Novice Camper?
camping,,Second time winter camping was a blast!!
camping,"I an going to have to go to Greeley CO in late March, and since it is the only time off I am going to get for a while, I’d really like to make it fun and do some camping and hiking on the way out there. I am starting from Oregon so I will mostly be on the I-84 and the I-80, so I am hoping to find somewhere that isn’t too far out of the way off one of those highways. Right now, I am leaning towards the Utah side of Dinosaur National Monument, but I have no idea if the weather at that time of year will be suitable for hiking and camping. I am not equipped for more than a little snow. If you have been to Dinosaur in early spring, I would love to hear about you experience, and if you have other ideas of places I could go, I would really appreciate it!",March trip along the I-84/I-80
camping,,Over night in the Swiss Alpes
camping,,"Nothing fancy, but we tried making insulated car window blackout curtains. We were camping out in Arkansas over Christmas (15 degrees), and wanted something to help keep us a bit warmer in our '03 Highlander."
camping,"So much [food that's good for camping](https://www.reddit.com/r/socalhiking/comments/kt3qrl/the_holy_trinity/), is also way too salty and too low in fiber. If you're camping more than a single night, how do you not get backed up?","ASKING THE REAL QUESTIONS: How does camping not make you constipated, bloated, and inflamed? I NEED TO POOP"
camping,,Did a little hike in/hike out at Shenandoah National Park on a nice loop that hit part of the AT; highly recommend you head to this park when you can!
camping,Looking to make a chuck box for my wife for our camping trips any ideas? Pics?,Camping chuck box ideas
camping,,"Took a trip to Uwharrie, NC last weekend! Poured rain both nights but cleared up during the daytime! Was super eerie but relaxing!"
camping,"I bought my first ferro rod. It comes with a scraper that's too dull to do anything. But when I briefly scratch the rod with the serrated section of my Gerber, I get sparks. For local camping, I can just sport my Gerber knife. I'd like to carry the firestarter as an emergency backup on my keychain, but I don't want to introduce any pocket items that are banned for commercial flying.

I obviously can't carry my Gerber in this post-9/11 world. Is there some other item that is sharp enough to reliably use with camping firestarters, but also safe enough to meet TSA regulations?

An orange flame BIC style lighter can at least be carried in checked luggage. But I'm also leaning towards more reusable, environmentally friendlier, less plastic products lately. That's why I'm keen to get into ferro rods.",Item sharp enough to use a firestarter but safe enough for TSA?
camping,,The Best RV Camping January 2021
camping,,"ice dip while camping on NYE, anyone else rinse off the 2020 with a cold splash?"
camping,,"Moose walking through campground. Redfeather, CO"
camping,,First time camping at Enchanted Rock!
camping,,YouTube Tour Of A Suburban Camper Conversion
camping,"Hello Guys, Am planning to go caming in MP and mainly near Pachmarhi Area. As I have already seen the snow and there are lot of people already there so thought of going into the greens this time.

So people over here if have or planning to do camping, please help me with my plan if going there is worth it!!
Thank you in advance.","How's Camping near Pachmarhi, MP"
camping,,i am this old
camping,"We are a couple looking to rent a van style camper and stay in the Florida keys. 

We have one small dog and love fishing. 

Not opposed to staying on a designated rv/camper site, just unsure what works for us. 

Any info and recommendations are appreciated. Thanks",Seeking Florida keys recommendations
camping,"Hi folks!

I'm heading out to Temagami for the first time this summer, the 2nd and 3rd weeks of August. Planning 10 nights doing a loop that leaves from Camp Wanapieti, over to Diamond, down through Obabika and back through Lake Temagami. Planning on taking it slow, doing the hikes at Chee-skon and looking for pictographs. 

I'm looking for any advice or experience you might have in this area, especially when it comes to booking a permit. I know you can only book a permit 2 wks ahead of your entry date, but do you have to tell them where you'll be each night? I imagine this loop is incredibly popular, do you think I'll have trouble finding a decent site? Lake Temagami is huge - do cottage powerboats tend to slow down around canoes or is it in my best interest to avoid them? (I did a large swath of the French last year and the cottage boats there were ruthless around canoes!)

Thanks folks - happy planning season!",Temagami advice?
camping,,Can't beat a nap in the woods!
camping,,Campground Sunbathing
camping,,The first guy to ever go camping - a Ryan George sketch
camping,,Gotta love a nice campfire...or two!
camping,,The view inside my hot tent on my last overnighter
camping,,call me +1 (267) 230-6431
camping,,BWCA is where my hearts at. Protect it. Please.
camping,"Travel across America

I’m a 20 year old guy, from Florida but staying in California at the moment. I’m looking to start a journey across America. I was wondering if anyone else is looking to the same but maybe too scared to go alone. I’m a friendly person, adventurous, and determined to do this long term. Open to different ways although I don’t have a lot of money and no car. I can fly anywhere to start in the US and would preferably like to camp out and walk but open to suggestions. Message me if you’re interested at all.",Walk across America
camping,"Hi mid 20s male wondering if it is safe to go camping during the pandemic?  Was thinking of taking my car to a state park in TX and sleeping in a tent, but worried about catching COVID-19 in the campground/specifically using the restroom.",Is it safe to go camping?
camping,,Down the Barron River
camping,[removed],レーザーポインター 強力 Amazon レーザーポインター 赤 目
camping,,camping @ big horn. IG: jessixa_ann
camping,[deleted],camping @ big horn. IG: jessixa_ann
camping,,Gold Head Branch State Park
camping,I’m not sure but is anyone camping in CA? I believe some of the forest are closed. Does anyone know any solid places near SoCal,Californi camping
camping,,Panamint Springs Resort just outside of Death Valley. Breathtaking views.
camping,,"Me and my best friend just chilling in the hammock. Betswy-co-ed, Wales (pre lockdown)"
camping,,Relaxing
camping,"So, it was late in November month I think, it was about 0 deg Celcius and there were strong winds. It was so shocking to me how cold it was, and my wool cap nearly flew off in the winds, partly because of how my old woolen cap had loosened over the years, no longer sitting tightly around my head.

So.. I ordered this new headwear with fake fur around the top and basically around the face. :) It should be a lot warmer than my old woolen cap, especially around the ears.

Next up, I should probably buy some mittens, because I have no warm gloves that are decent below 0 deg C. :( One can buy wool liners, but ofc, those has to fit inside your gloves or whatever. Too bad my old wool liners for hands has started to come undone in the seams on the fingers, have to consider buying some new stuff.","I had to buy new headwear, I hadn't realized the stuff I had was not good enough."
camping,,She enjoys the campfire
camping,,Lunch Using The GrandPa's FireFork
camping,[deleted],What's your favorite 2-person tent?
camping,,The views that keep on giving
camping,,Urban winter stealth camping behind factory in hammock
camping,,"Night view a few steps away from my campsite at Joshua Tree National Park, California, USA"
camping,,I drew the campfire! Located near the Buffalo River in Arkansas.
camping,Hope the mods approve.  You might find this funny:  https://youtu.be/eYa46Ap49Kk,Reminds me of how most of friends and wife feel about camping.
camping,,Waiting on that second cup seems like forever lol
camping,[removed],VISIT USA with a Travel Gift Card at 0
camping,,3 days camping down Indian Arm near Vancouver! One of the most beautiful places I have ever been - we left the phones behind and brought the Super8mm camera along for a fun adventure
camping,,Big Bend National Park
camping,,warms the soul
camping,,How to Enjoy a Winter Camping Trip
camping,,Can anyone identify the name of this style of caravan? Would like to buy one but don't know what to search!
camping,,Types Of Chainsaws - Tool Gears
camping,"I've been looking to purchase a survival knife for an upcoming trip out east. I'm looking for something that will be able to perform  well at a lot of different tasks as well as be used to defend myself from wildlife or (more likely) unsavory humans. As such I would like a larger blade (5-8 inches). The lighter the knife the better. I've been looking at a [Ka-bar Dog's Head Utility Knife](https://www.kabar.com/products/product.jsp?item=1317), but would love to hear what y'all use and recommend, thanks!",Good survival knife
camping,,Get Iphone 11 pro sign up and claim your entry now
camping,,Epic Spit Venison | Wet and Cold Wild Camp | Bushcraft Cooking
camping,,Wolds way north yorkshire walk
camping,,"Couple more pics from our New Years trip on the Murray River. Regional Victoria, Australia. So serene that all your troubles go away"
camping,,Seoul City in South Korea Tour in 4K BlueMoon Universe
camping,,Today I Made This Illustration rate please Thought you guys might like this design i made today
camping,"I am looking to buy some land near a national park to rent out to people who have RVs. I am someone who has never ever camped, and has always stayed in hotels when visiting these parks. I want to invest in the bare minimum at this point in time, and then eventually build a house to rent it out on AirBnB. For now, I was thinking of renting the land through Hipcamp and making it clear that there are no toilet facilities available, that the RV would need to come equipped with toilets, and that no dumping is allowed. Apart from the land being close to the national park, there would literally be no other amenities offered. Is there anyone in the RV community that would even go for something like this? How much per night could I charge? The national park in question is Sequoia &amp; Kings Canyon National Park.",What do people using RVs booking through Hipcamp desire?
camping,,"Dolly Sods West Virginia, Best Camping On the East Coast"
camping,"First of all thanks to everyone who commented with tips you all really helped and a lot of what you told me came in so handy!! 




Just wanted to update because I and a lot of the comments where worried it would be so hot that it would be dangerous .... I just wanted to say it was the complete opposite !! It rained and rained so bad the first night that our whole tent flooded and we had to throw tarp over the top of our tent to stop it !! We had to give up camping and book a hotel the next night because we were soaked to the bone and freezing cold !! Then we headed to Little Desert which was hotter and didnt rain but again absolutely freezing! I didn’t get a wink of sleep I was shivering all night 🤣🤣 


So yeah just an update and thanks again to whoever commented bringing a tarp sheet with us really came in handy 🤣",I posted here a while ago about tips for camping down great ocean road in Melbourne and wanted to update!
camping,"First of all thanks to everyone who commented with tips you all really helped and a lot of what you told me came in so handy!! 




Just wanted to update because I and a lot of the comments where worried it would be so hot that it would be dangerous .... I just wanted to say it was the complete opposite !! It rained and rained so bad the first night that our whole tent flooded and we had to throw tarp over the top of our tent to stop it !! We had to give up camping and book a hotel the next night because we were soaked to the bone and freezing cold !! Then we headed to Little Desert which was hotter and didnt rain but again absolutely freezing! I didn’t get a wink of sleep I was shivering all night 🤣🤣 


So yeah just an update and thanks again to whoever commented bringing a tarp sheet with us really came in handy 🤣",I posted here a while ago about tips for camping down great ocean road in Melbourne and wanted to update!
camping,,New Years night went well!! Here’s a winter fire to distract you.
camping,,Winter camping in Alaska
camping,,"Beautiful view from the Bartram Trail, Rabun county, Georgia"
camping,,"What is better for an ice box - ice bricks, bags of ice or just frozen water bottles?"
camping,,Ocotillo in October
camping,,A morning view from our cabin deep in the woods near the lithuanian border
camping,"Recently I have gone into research mode to try and find the best cookware set for me and my gf to use when we go on our trips, and it just now came in. My favorite part about it is that it breaks down into the size of two small pressurized gas containers, plus it is super easy to clean. Used it this past weekend and just wanted to make an appreciation post!

https://preview.redd.it/0h404dh8rs961.jpg?width=500&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=29c481f95f0b110410969a962c5577410d28d995",I'm In LOVE With My Cookware Set
camping,,"AAAC Wildlife Removal of San Diego &amp;#x2d; Trapping, Repair"
camping,"I'm an idiot and just spent 2 days camping in a bivvy (similar to a tent) on two very cold windy days with my door wide open and my face facing the door so I could watch the lake as I slept. It's really uncomfortable and red right now and I now have learnt my lesson, I am not more powerful than winter.",Anybody have any home remedies for wind burn?
camping,"Qustion for my fellow UK campers. I tend to spend most of my trips wild camping up in Scotland but the £40 budget tent I bought a while back is finally giving in.
I'm looking to upgrade to something in the £200 - £300 range.
Any recommendations for tents that can deal with the highlands weather? My current consideration is the msr elixer 2.",Best tent for UK rain and wind
camping,"I hate wearing shells camping because they always get an ember hole eventually and I was scared to wear my gortex jacket (which has now been stolen in true Vancouver ""fashion""). 

Just a big old heavy beat-around jacket for the West Coast drizzly winter camping. I guess those big tartan ones seem to be popular? 

I'm not from this continent or even a place that gets cold (mid north Australia). I've been in Canada 6 years but I still SUCK at choosing winter gear for some reason.

Please help!",Best jacket for sitting around a fire in the winter drizzle of the West Coast (Vancouver)?
camping,,"Get the BOIS together, we're having a campfire! Last stop before Mt Pinos, CA"
camping,,"First new year camp. California, Still cold!"
camping,,Camping in Sedona last week.
camping,"My wife started a travel blog for our PNW camping adventures around the PNW. She's been having a lot of fun with it. Though maybe you guys would like it. 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhIwZcQDuEY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhIwZcQDuEY)",My wife started a travel vlog of our camping adventures around the PNW
camping,,Just how effective would a rape whistle be against a bear? Asking for a friend.
camping,"Hi 🙋🏻‍♂️ Camping ⛺️ Reddit,

This Spring 🌸 I’ll be looking to car camp 🏕 with my little one (will be 11 months) for his first camping experience.

Just looking for some advice / guidance from others whom have car camped with babies 👶🏻 in the past.

I’m thinking 🤔 I’ll need a two person sleeping bag, my current bag is a “mummy” style.

Other than that, not sure what else is a good idea 💡 to buy / bring that I typically wouldn’t.

Many thanks 😊

David 🐉",Car 🚙 Camping ⛺️ with Baby 👶🏻
camping,,We all need more of this in our lives.
camping,,"Pixley Falls (Boonville, NY)"
camping,"Last week the weather was perfect.

https://preview.redd.it/k3bhfynh6q961.jpg?width=4000&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=ff0a382180a046412847c7c48261711bd5ad9f70",Clearwater Campground in Ocala National Forest
camping,"Just saw the backpacker's great post and thought I would share the view from our car camping site...

*Processing img 4xl8q9pa3q961...*",Clear Water Lake Ocala
camping,,First trip for 2021 in the Aussie bush. Can't wait for more
camping,,"Hello, guys, I am looking for camping survival kits, just found the 2 choices. But don't know which one would be the best, can anyone help me out? Really appreciate that."
camping,,"Australia, the water's muddy and it's 37deg C..."
camping,,Wal-Mart $1000 gift card giveaway. Sign up and get a chance to win $1000 Wal-Mart gift card.
camping,,Pre-Covid : The things we took for granted. Inch Beach - Ireland 2018
camping,Looking for a good air mattress and/or sleeping bag recommendation for a my husband and me. Temps aren’t below 30 degrees. What is the most ideal sleeping situation?,Sleeping bag/air mattress recommendations? 2 people
camping,,Leave No GPS Trace on Social Media
camping,,So I tried out Camping in -20 weather...
camping,,Freshwater croc not happy with me gettin a selfie
camping,,A pic from my most recent bikepacking trip in Sam Houston National Forest.
camping,"I’ve never camped in CT despite living here and want to do some solo camping closer to home. 

I know there’s a decent section of the AT that runs thru the state but I’m looking for other ideas as well. 

Any suggestions are greatly appreciated. Thanks!",Camping in Connecticut?
camping,,A Site I’ll Never Forget (Southeastern Utah)
camping,,Post campfire Ramen Noodles nap
camping,,#Camping #RoofTopTent #HEOTent
camping,,"Setup camp at an abandon farm in Antelope Valley, CA."
camping,,Prepping for my first time ever wild camping. Got a load of good deals over Black Friday. Any advice for a first time wild camper?
camping,,Kayaked in to this cliffside campsite deep in the canyons of Lake Powell.
camping,,Summer cliffside camping in Moqui Canyon on Lake Powell.
camping,,Probably the last wild camp I will be doing in the UK for a while... Ft a very pleasing old Vango.
camping,"There are a few tents I'm  eyeing for my family of 4, but there are no specs listed on the website of the retailer OR the manufacturer.  
I don't know if they are just last years models,  but it's odd that I can't find reviews or specs ANYWHERE... or is it?
Specifically,  I'm looking for specs and reviews of the Eureka Evasion 4 , the Eureka Bella Coola 4, or the SAIL Toundra. 
The one tent that does have info is The North Face Talus 4 , which I'll buy if I can't find more info on the others.  
Any advice would be super helpful",Where can I find specs and reviews of Eureka tents?
camping,,A Photo I Took Of Our Recent Trip To Ocala National Forest
camping,"Was just looking online for a Waterproof match for a post covid camping trip me and the boys have been planning and I stubled across one for FREE so I thought id share:

[https://twitter.com/FreebiesUsa1/status/1346537913962668037](https://twitter.com/FreebiesUsa1/status/1346537913962668037)

These are great bit of kit to keep in your bag on a trip.

Mine is due to arrive on Friday ill post an update on how it is.",Freebie Alert - Waterproof lighter completely free
camping,[removed],WATERPROOF matches - FREE!
camping,,Camping
camping,,Little excursion over the long weekend
camping,,Toasting Marshmallow!
camping,,"Winter in Yosemite National Park is something else, amazing!"
camping,,Cold weather backpacking trip at grandfather mountain state park
camping,,Pre-Covid Life. Camping on Inch Beach in Ireland
camping,"So i'am looking into buying an Big Agnes Flycreek or tigerwall platinum tent. However in the area where i hike, heavy rain is a given if i'm going on a multiple day trip. Now i read that Big Agnes tents have a 1200mm waterproof rating on the raincover and floor, aswel as the optional footprints. And stacking the floor and floorprint doesn't help and maybe makes it worse by trapping water between them. I've read online that to be sure that your tent floor is waterproof you need a 1500mm waterproof rating. Can anybody tell me if this is true or give me personal experiences with big agnes tents. If there is any chance of water seeping through the floor (given the floor isn't damaged) its a no go for me.",Big Agnes UL waterproof concerns
camping,,"In search of campground in Florida to spend my birthday. Activities enjoyed: fishing, hiking, kayaking, SUP- will have 50 lb fluffy dog joining. Any suggestions?"
camping,,Hanna State Park campground - Jacksonville FL
camping,,One of the best trips I have ever done with my VW camper!
camping,,Little freshwater crock trying to have a go
camping,,NYE in Brecon
camping,,"WHO have the Folding Camping Chair ? pls om me , thx"
camping,"Hello all! Looking to buy a sleeping bag meant for cold conditions, and a bedroll to match. Let’s say I have a budget of $150. What can I get?",Affordable 0° sleeping bag and bedroll
camping,,Kids 1st Camp
camping,,When the rain keeps everyone else away sl you and the kids have the campground to yourselves.
camping,,"I'm a female wanting to head out for my first solo camping trip. Husband won't go when the nighttime weather will be in the 30's...wussy! I'm looking for tips, advice, location suggestions from any other women who camp solo. #Nature❤"
camping,,17 tips for first time international travelers
camping,"Hey everyone, I'm planning on a 10 day road trip at the end of March from LA to Yellowstone and back.   I'm going w my bf and we're planning on camping most of the trip. I've tried to keep the driving as spaced out as possible and less than 7 hrs a day. LMK if you guys know of any good camping spots at any of our stops and if there's a better place than Provo to stop at that's in between Yellowstone and Vegas. Here's what I've come up with so far: 

**March 26:** 

Leave at 7AM

6hr drive to Zion National Park 

Explore Zion

Camp @ Zion

**March 27**

1.5 hr drive to explore Bryce Canyon NP

Camp @ Zion

March 28

5 hr drive to Park City, UT

Stay @ Airbnb

**March 29**

5 hr drive to Grand Teton NP

Camp @ Gros Venture Campground in Jackson, WY

**March 30**

Explore Grand Teton

**March 31** 

3 hr drive to Yellowstone

Camp @ Yellowstone

**Apr 1**

Explore Yellowstone

Camp @ Yellowstone

**Apr 2** 

6 hr drive to Provo, UT

Stay at Airbnb

**Apr 3**

5.5 hr drive to Vegas 

Stay in Vegas 

**April 4**

Drive home",Itinerary for road trip from LA to Yellowstone
camping,,Near Mammoth Lakes - CA
camping,,"For those of you who have experienced that hellish one way road that is tidus canyon, almost got me convinced to buy a 4x4"
camping,"Looking for a lantern that's easy to pack but packs a punch. Just need it for me and my wife at our site if we need it.

Would use it just to see what we're doing at night, inside the tent, and just making sure we have something other than the fire or our phones. 

Preferably runs on battery or can be recharged",LED Lantern recommendations
camping,,"Hello guys, I wanted some advice. If I were fishing off a pier at night and wanted a light that could shine the furthest through the water and into the depths, what that be more throw or flood and what are some good flashlights that could shine really deep into the water off a pier? Thanks!"
camping,"Hi guys. 
So for a while now I’ve had an intense feeling of wanting to run away from what I have now and who I have now and go totally alone with the only worry being food, shelter and safety. I live in the UK, so the only “bigger” forests are in the highlands of Scotland. Scotland also being the only place in the UK where free camping is legal; is why that would be the best destination. Temperatures can and have got to -10 degree Celsius/ 14 Fahrenheit in the winter with snow getting up to 6-14inches in the area I’m looking at. Weather is typically cold for around 3 months.Unlike Chris I want to be totally prepared with stuff that will keep me alive, especially during winter. And I’m also thinking long term so how would I keep replacing what I have if they became damaged etc etc. So many things popping up in my head which is probably telling me not to, but it’s making me so so happy and purposeful thinking about it. Shelter, warmth water I think would be the main important thing,  then obviously food. We don’t have the diversity of animals the US does so that’s a small worry of mine, although we also don’t have many predatory animals to worry about. I’ve thought about building a shelter into a save kinda thing like you see on the primitive videos on YouTube, except mine won’t be fancy water falls lol. Also building a fire place with a working fire/chimney . I don’t have hunting skills, actually none at all so advise there will be good especially traps as that’s taken my interest. Idk what I’m asking really I’m just asking for any advise you guys can throw at me, few things I’ve mentioned as you’ve read if you could help with those. I know it’s a bad idea but I want to and I plan to for as long as I can... is that do able ? Never coming back?",Planning to go “Into The Wild”
camping,,What it’s all about
camping,,Awesome Free Waterproof Fire Starter For Camping!
camping,,"Valley Of The Gods 01/03/2021, taken by me."
camping,"This will sound a bit odd but I’m looking for a two person tent that I could set up in the living room. Not a joke, I promise. My gf and I made a makeshift blanket fort a few months back to watch movies and it was really fun. Was thinking a small tent would make the process a bit easier. I have no tent experience so not even sure what to search for. Since it doesn’t need to be fancy or big, I’m looking more for cheap. Just enough to fit us in with a small tv. That and really easy to assemble. Any suggestions would be greatly appreciated.",Odd tent advice - living room tent
camping,,New Year Camping in BC Canada
camping,,Best way to wake up 😌
camping,,"Rincon Beach, Ventura, California [OC]"
camping,,"So I recently went through a divorce, my kids are staying with me tomorrow so I’ve set up this little indoor camping den to get them ready for our adventures :) trying to be a good dad and create those precious memories, hopefully they like it."
camping,"I (F28) have always loved camping since I was kid and continued to go camping (tent camping, specifically) into my teens and twenties. I’d camp at festivals or at camp grounds or parks. My fiancé (M27) has never camped a day in his life. He’s the type that’d rather have a cozy bed where he can control the temperature setting. But we both love to travel, explore nature, see new places and meet new friends. Does anyone have advice for me to try to get him more interested in camping? Or suggestions on how I could make the camping experience more comfortable for him?",Advice needed on how to convince my fiancé we should go camping more often.
camping,,"First Successful Winter Car Camping Trip in Moab, Utah"
camping,I am excited to go on some trips this year. I just freed up some time in my life. My wife and I have two trips planned for the next couple of months and I have a couple of solo trips planned for the next couple of months as well. Happy New Year everybody!,Excited!!!!
camping,,"Howth, Dublin, Ireland"
camping,,Awesome new backpack I got in a subreddit! This is a awesome addition for your next trip.
camping,"Hi there! We recently uploaded the movie from our latest overlanding journey in Sweden. Check it out if you want to, 50cm of snow and a Jeep JLUR guaranteed :). We spent all of the nights in a tentipi tent heated with a stove, and cooked all of our food over an open fire in a Dutch oven!

We have been doing overlanding trips every year since 2014, and all of our trips have been uploaded on our YouTube channel SevenBarAdventures. There are a lot of inspiration on our channel if you are interested!

https://youtu.be/ACiddaE1xDs

Cheers!",Movie from our latest adventure in Sweden with lots of snow!
camping,,This campsite cactus made my day
camping,"I've been lurking here for a while, and only went camping once in my adult life with friends. But i loved getting out and away from everything.

So my question is, have any of you just tried camping in your normal car, and is it any fun, or is it not the same as sleeping in a tent under the stars?",Camping in a sedan car?
camping,,Ooni Pizza Oven Rocket Ship Wild Camping
camping,,Monthly GIVEAWAY started on Deus-Blade. Great knife for camping!
camping,,Annoying Orange - 2020 KILLS!
camping,,It never rains when you camp in the snow
camping,,New Year New snowstorm lol. Had a great time in the woods this weekend!
camping,,Lake Powell 2020
camping,,Did some desert camping to start off the new year. First time in Kofa National Wilderness Refuge (Arizona). Great time to say the least.
camping,,"Wild camping in Wicklow, Ireland. Before it got cold!"
camping,,first snow = first snow bivy of the season
camping,,"Park Life, Dublin Ireland"
camping,,2020 highlights
camping,,"Camping fun,with Family and Friends and Drinks"
camping,,Marshmallows on Fire
camping,,"If you're looking for a camping area near Istanbul,check out Sakarya,Turkey #camping #turkey"
camping,,"#Camping in Sakarya,Turkey"
camping,,AMERICA’S NATIONAL PARKS RANKED BEST TO WORST
camping,,How me and a couple of friends celebrated this New Years.
camping,,Apalachicola National Forest
camping,,"1st roadtrip of 2021, and probably the last one for a while.."
camping,,Welcome to the bohemian forest
camping,,Camping with the sports games is a good idea? What do you think guys?
camping,,"Saying goodbye to 2020 at Matanzas Inlet, FL"
camping,,"Our Labor Day trip to Gallagher Head Lake in Washington state. The lake is about 5500’ elevation. It was gorgeous all the way up! The last pic is an abandoned gold mine, as the trail is an abandoned gold mining road from the turn of the century."
camping,"I live in Central Washington and I was looking to do a hiking/foraging/fishing/camping trip this coming spring, but I am struggling to find lakes to camp at that aren’t several mile hikes. I’m okay with a few miles or so for a hike, but I don’t want to go crazy. Do you guys have any recommendations for any lakes y’all have camped at where you know there’s fish? Thanks!",Anyone in Washington have recommendations?
camping,"OK, this is the first year with my boyfriend for Valentine’s Day. I am having a hard time getting him what he wants, he wants to do something that involves quality time and spending time together. Which is great because I love those things too. Anyways tonight I went to my BFF’s (Don’t worry we live in the same city and we both follow covid-19 protocols) and her camping gear was out, she told me she was “reorganizing it”. 
An idea formed in my head of what to do, he isn’t a fan for cold weather but the thing is I don’t mind it and have camped in the winter months when I was younger. The problem is I don’t remember what I need for camping now because when I did when I was younger it was all my parents gear which they have all sold. Other than a waterproof tent, is there any tips or tricks you as a camper can tell me about camping in the winter? And what can I do the cold? Also how do you cook food if camping in the cold? Any suggestions? Any help would be greatly appreciated! Thanks!",Valentine’s Day Idea?
camping,,Camping for New Years!
camping,"Kids always look forward to attending yearly summer camps. Once registered and before arrival day, all camper families will need to complete our Additional Forms (included in our Pre-Camp Packet – see below). [**Camp Forms**](https://campnorthstarmaine.com/pre-camp-forms/). Everything you need to know about the upcoming summer is located in this section.",Summer Camp Pre-registration Form | Camp North Star
camping,,Weather is just right for desert camping. Sonora
camping,,Back Yard Bushcraft Series Setting up Polish Lavuu
camping,,"Awesome weekend camping trip at Motosuko Camping Ground in Yamanashi, Japan"
camping,,"Sarek keeping guard&lt;3 Finnemarka, Norway."
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,4 Days on the Trinity River
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/ecQxNYBH3PThnMDa7](https://goo.gl/maps/ecQxNYBH3PThnMDa7)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img npn1o08rz6961...*",Park Life
camping,,Park Life
camping,,Back in Sep 2020 !!
camping,,"Hammock Stealth Camping, almost caught"
camping,,"Had a blast camping to start off the new year, we all made chairs and hung out the whole night."
camping,,Over night at Cook Forest
camping,,Spent the last week in the woods/desert. East Verde River and Sedona. Best way to leave 2020 behind.
camping,,Boundary Waters Camping on New Years (Minnesota)
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/8ewZ6BqA8uhZq3D77](https://goo.gl/maps/8ewZ6BqA8uhZq3D77)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img ny6pk3wdh6961...*",Park Life
camping,"Me and my dad are camping buddies, and I really want to get the old man a camping related gift for his birthday. 
I’m broke as shit, so if you have any suggestions for a good gift under 35$ 
I was looking at the Bison Rolling Grill. Or something in that field.",Good camping gifts
camping,,Pandemic paradise 😌
camping,,First Winter Camp
camping,,"Nice view to wake up to, to ring in the New Year"
camping,,Fishin Camp Life: Unloading my Grizzly to get ready to head home Part 2.
camping,,Beautiful Badlands South Dakota
camping,,First trip of 2021
camping,,My cat claimed my sleeping bag as her own.
camping,,I really want to go camping again
camping,"Any suggestions on places to camp in April in or around Ohio. Not looking for cold weather camping, not experienced enough, and would be car camping.",Camping in April
camping,,Built a log cabin in the woods - Scotland!
camping,,Best Way to Lose Lower Belly Fat
camping,,What it's really like to go camping overnight in the rainforest during HEAVY RAIN!
camping,"Hello there! Currently looking for a privacy pop
Up mainly to use as a shower/changing clothes at dispersed campgrounds and such) Basically my go to method is a spray bottle and a few wash rags to clean myself. It works fine if there is a bathroom on site i just throw my spare towel or tarp on the ground to catch the water/soap. 

My issue is I’m 6ft and wondering is that 3 inches really an inconvenience to other tall fellow campers. 
I’d be the main one using it, most friends if they join at 5”10-6”3. 

Would love some feedback before i make a purchase!",Anyone 6ft+ have issues with the Pop Up Pod?
camping,"I recently got a Nemo Disco 15 for Christmas and its my first time owning a non-synthetic sleeping bag. I decided to test it out tonight and one of the first things I noticed was a few feathers here and few. Fast forward to now (I've been browsing my phone for 2-3 hours since then, and my black boxers have visible down all over (probably a 4 feathers every centimeter. Not taking a picture for obvious reasons). Is this normal? This bag has amazing reviews online and I really like it ever for this leaking","Is it normal for downsleeping bags to ""leak"" a fair amount of down?"
camping,,"Near Moab, Utah. 10 degrees Fahrenheit. Free site near Lone Mesa."
camping,,"steep ravine, CA early December"
camping,,"Is it camping season yet? Colorado, USA"
camping,,"Our private campground in the Mississippi forrest ""Camp Firefly"" ready for visitors to experience the syncronous fireflies that call it home."
camping,,Fishin Camp Life: Unloading my Grizzly to get ready to head home Part 1.
camping,,Just used skills I learnt over 20yrs ago in a Year 8 Home Economics class to repair my Swag bag without stabbing my finger. Just sayin'
camping,Driving down I95 from NY to Florida.  Was wondering what people’s experiences with KOA campgrounds were like?,KOA
camping,,Early morning coffee &gt; late night marshmallows
camping,,Camping in Colorado during the start of Quarantine last year. With my Best buddy Dash!!
camping,"Hi All - 

&amp;#x200B;

I have the following sleeping bag for my wife and I: [https://www.rei.com/product/136334/rei-co-op-siesta-30-double-sleeping-bag](https://www.rei.com/product/136334/rei-co-op-siesta-30-double-sleeping-bag)

&amp;#x200B;

I want to get a compression sack to make this thing smaller but also keep it dry. I am looking at Sea to Summit brand. What size sack do I need?

[https://www.rei.com/product/730882/sea-to-summit-event-compression-dry-sack](https://www.rei.com/product/730882/sea-to-summit-event-compression-dry-sack)

&amp;#x200B;

I am also looking for one for my clothes to keep them dry and fresh. What size is good for a 2-3 day camping trip?",Help with Compression Sacks
camping,"I completely new to camping and have been getting all my gear ready (rooftop tent setup) for my first trip. 
I feel like my timing is shit as all the campgrounds in SoCal are closed due to covid. Does anyone know the status of dispersed camping options. 

Thanks so much.",Southern California BLM or National forest camping during COVID (2nd Lockdown Edition)
camping,,Of of the best days of 2020. Northern Montana in the summer.
camping,,"Some hammock camping on a beach near Clearwater, FL. Built the whole structure in the second picture during the night with my buddy."
camping,,Camping in KOFA National Wildlife Refuge
camping,,"Since the last post got so much love, here are some more shots from my trip to Great Basin National Park, I highly highly recommend going here. Sadly we didn’t have time to summit the actual mountain but just the glacier, it was beautiful and such a great hike in of itself"
camping,,"Since the last post got so much love, here are some more shots from my trip to Great Basin National Park, I highly highly recommend going here. Sadly we didn’t have time to summit the actual mountain but just the glacier, it was beautiful and such a great hike in of itself"
camping,,Thought these might make cool trivets for cast iron while camping
camping,,Arizona winter camping!
camping,"[https://goo.gl/maps/xAL9MiEkvmyGZN1C9](https://goo.gl/maps/xAL9MiEkvmyGZN1C9)

https://preview.redd.it/peun12hmmz861.jpg?width=2048&amp;format=pjpg&amp;auto=webp&amp;s=d15ed57aeca811e1908afa94db6aaec99097e74f",Park Life
camping,,This is how i woke up in 01.01.2021
camping,,Wish I could do more but CA shutdown everything again.
camping,"One of my younger family members were setting up their own online store selling these led beanie headlamps so I decided to buy one for camping and I’m impressed. 
Pros: It’s a Unisex, one size fit design so it’s suitable for all, it’s warm and cosy and provides a bright light to find your way in the dark. Suitable for all occasions, simple to use has rechargeable batteries all round solid piece of equipment. 
Cons: Delivery took roughly 2 weeks, could be improved, apart from that as a customer I’ve received great service and I genuinely recommend it.
[Their website](https://www.mackenziedisplays.com/products/warm-winter-beanie-led-headlight)",Led Beanie Headlight
camping,,Wildfie visitor!
camping,,"Beautiful Cabin in Finland, Fantasy B&amp;B"
camping,,Announcing the Absolutely Best Campgrounds and RV Parks for 2021
camping,,Perfect balance
camping,"My husband and I almost always camp &amp; hike together. I've been considering getting a double sleeping bag, particularly for colder weather- seems like I can steal some of his man warmth, as I'm almost always cold while he sleeps like a baby. Has anyone had experience using one? What are your thoughts? Things to avoid?",Thoughts on double sleeping bags
camping,,"Funds for university, organised by Bediako Bright Asare"
camping,"We use a 2500 watt 100ah lithium [solar generator](https://deltaforcepower.com/collections/portable-lithium-solar-generators/products/portable-lithium-solar-generator) from Delta Force Power for camping. It's lightweight and can power everything we need while we're camping out in our converted van. 

We also use it for emergency backup power. It can run a full sized fridge for 15 hours without solar panels (at night) and all day with the solar panels. 

You can also add extra batteries for increased run time.  My pic below shows the system with three total batteries (300ah.)

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img qkn5370x8y861...*",Best Portable Power For Camping &amp; Emergency Backup Power
camping,,Bacon in the dark [southernmost Sweden]
camping,,Successful New Mexico holiday trip full of some great hiking
camping,"For those of you who have been, where are the “secret” spots? Where do you recommend posting up for the night? What are the less traveled roads and paths?

My fiancé and I will be going in a month and need to start planning somewhat of list of things to see and do. We are camping in our truck so we plan on staying somewhere different every night.","Trip to Sedona, AZ, USA"
camping,"Hi, me and my boyfriend are going to take a trip down south (Georgia, Florida) and I was wondering if any of you guys know where I could rent the cheapest campervan. we are on a budget so if I could find something around 500$ for a week would be perfect. p.s (we live in Indiana)",Does anyone know the cheapest campervan I could rent for a week?
camping,,People working through the holidays be like
camping,,Love the feeling of setting it all up and just gazing at it in the scenery
camping," The best tarps we’ve found

#### OK, so tarps are just a sheet of waterproof material with some eyelets. Anything will do, but these top picks are reliable and come with the bits and pieces you’ll need.

&amp;#x200B;

*Processing img uhk7cy3p2x861...*

Best [Canvas Tarpaulins](https://tarpaulinsshop.co.uk/product-category/canvas-tarpaulins/) For Camping",The best tarps we’ve found
camping,"Hands up if you're not an outdoorsy person? 👋 Read about how my camping experience made me love the indoors even more! 😊
https://talkcrates.blogspot.com/2021/01/why-camping-is-not-for-me.html?m=1",Why camping is not for me!!
camping,,"Just found this sub, so I figured I'd post some of the cooler shots I got from a trip in February of last year. Will surely be browsing and posting here more often!"
camping,,"Coral Bay, Western Australia. Calm water and coral overflowing with fish 5 meters offshore"
camping,,"Coral Bay, Western Australia. Calm water and coral overflowing with fish 5 meters offshore"
camping,,first time camping in the backyard.
camping,,The yearly sorting and organizing of camping gear has begun.. yey. Amazing how much small and useless or otherwise expired *stuff* gets collected at my place
camping,,A beautiful day in Virginia.
camping,,Some productive advice in these comments for a fellow camper. 😂
camping,,"Dear ladies and genteimen, I want you to help me refresh the products :Outdoor sport gloves.If you are interested in this and your other requirements, you can contact us.We will send you the free samples directly,if you can help us write the good reviews."
camping,,Maiden voyage of the Stormbreak 3 in Hawaii.
camping,,Does anyone know of any truck camping near San Luis Obispo?
camping,"Looking for advice. Would like to beach camp the NC Outer Banks. Is mid February or mid March better? What specific area would you suggest? I’m from SC so can get there in about 5 hours. 
Thanks!!",Outer Banks
camping,,"Great way to waste some time, best to be prepared rather than do it on the spot"
camping,Does anyone know of any good spots along the coast and/or disperse camping spots where I can actually make a fire?,Places to go winter camping in WA state?
camping,My camping backpack is not waterproof. Looking for a good spray to coat it. Any recommendations?,Looking for water repellent spray for backapck
camping,,Glamping inside our Suburban Overland
camping,,"Camping in Palase, Albania (ALB). Picture taken from the seashore (Jon sea) and with Llogara Mountain in the background."
camping,"Hey everyone,

I have a quick question about camping near Mt Washington, NH.

I have hiked it throughout the summer a few times, but never the winter. I am curious if anyone knows how I’d fair camping close to my car in Pinkham Notch.

Thanks!",Mt. Washington camping question
camping,,"Couldn’t think of a better way to start the new year! (Superstitions Wilderness, Arizona)"
camping,,"I've spent one day at campfire in the winter forest. This is my first video, any feedback is welcomed. Thanks :)"
camping,"Hello! I'm super new to reddit but have been trying to plan a three week trip to a bunch of National Parks this summer and was hoping for some input! My dates are June 18th to July 9th and can post a more detailed itinerary if needed. I know this sub is for camping in general but if anyone has an idea of a better one for these questions please let me know. 

1. My first stop is Grand Teton NP, I'm leaving from Northern Colorado and expecting to get to Grand Teton around 2 or 3pm- is all hope lost at trying to find a FF campsite? Some of the stuff I've read says that Gros Venture and Lizard Creek would be my best bet but I'm worried I won't get a spot. 
2. I have about 1 and 1/2 days in Yellowstone (I know it's not nearly enough time), but what are the realistic ""must see's"" in that timeframe? I'm staying in the Madison Campground if that helps.
3. I'll arrive in Glacier on 6/23 and am worried that going to the sun road won't be open. Any suggestions on other areas to see/explore if this road isn't open? I also haven't made reservations here but am leaning towards Many Glaciers or St. Marys campgrounds- any input on those?
4. After I hit North Cascades and Mt. Rainier I'm heading to Olympic and realized that I am not going to have nearly enough time to even see the highlights. My current plan is to stay at the Kalaloch Campground and try to see the HOH rainforest and some of the beaches. Is there anything else I should try to see on the south side? Or a better way to spend my 1 1/2 days? 
5. I will be in Salem Oregon for the 4th of July as an in between- is there anything special I should see while there? I'm just staying the night so I won't have a ton of time there! 

I know that I'm trying to pack a lot into a short amount of time but I'm really hoping to see as much as possible. The parks I'm visiting are as follows: Grand Teton, Yellowstone, Glacier, North Cascades, Mt. Rainier, Olympic, Crater Lake. I only have 1-2 days in each park, but if anyone has any input about any of them I would love to hear it! Thanks!",Looking for input on NPS Road Trip
camping,,"Camping in the living room with my best friend! Too old to hike or sleep inside, but never too old to have tent snuggles."
camping,,"New Year’s Eve camping trip. Peak District, UK"
camping,,I recently acquired some land completely FOR FREE! Here’s how you can do the same:
camping,"I've been searching through r/camping , alltrails, [freecamping.net](https://freecamping.net) etc and there's just so much information that I'm to the point where I need recommendations from people that have been there.  


I'm planning a camping trip for myself and my dog for this coming May and I'm really interested in trying the Pisgah National Forest which is a few hours from me. The main complication is that although my dog loves hiking, she can't go as far as she used to and can't handle crazy hard trails either (she's getting soft in her old age), so I'm trying to find trails that have established primitive sites as soon as 1/2 a mile in. I'm also planning on staying a few nights so I will need reasonable access to water.  


Any recommendations would be greatly appreciated! You can of course DM me as well if you don't want to blow up your spot ;)",Pisgah NF - Looking for free hike in camp site recommendations (with close water access)
camping,,Interested mates only
camping,,"Camping in the living room with my best friend! Too old to hike or sleep outside, but never too old to have tent snuggles."
